Planned Parenthood has always been incredible in my experience. I got an IUD there which was fantastic, and they helped me with paperwork to get it covered by a state program, then I went with my girlfriend to get a Pap smear and exam, which was very anxiety inducing for her because she had some gender dysphoria issues. They were very understanding about her anxiety and when we asked them to go slowly and explain everything that was going on so she could deal with it better, they did. I think they spend a lot of time working with marginalized populations and people who don't get a lot of respect from the outside world, so they're especially sensitive to make sure that people have good experiences and continue to take care of their reproductive health.  It might be a good idea to prepare a little speech of things you want to say- that you're anxious, you've had bad experiences before, and you want them to explain what they're doing and why they are asking you these questions. It's probably true that people lie to them a lot about their sexual behaviors because they're ashamed, so they might feel like they need to push people to tell them the truth so they can give them the healthcare they need. That doesn't excuse being disrespectful to their patients but it might be easier to understand their behavior if you think about what might be behind it, and you can discuss it with them.  It's not being confrontational to ask people who you are paying to provide a service to do it in a particular way. 
I never do.
Men seem to have different struggles as whole, I personally wouldn't place a value judgment on those struggles and say they are "better" or "worse" than what women face. Men face far higher rates of substance abuse, death from violence, incarceration rates, and that's just what I can think of off the top of my head.
[deleted]
The other reason you see that in TwoX is because this is a sub specifically about women's experiences, perspectives, and reactions. There are many great places on Reddit to discuss men's issues and the very real sexism which happens to them. However, it really isn't here.
I second this. I'd like to know how she pulled it off!
Holy shit, that husband is so hot. I want to marry him first!
Wow, that's a pretty horrible way to view it. Men could make lists a lot like the OP, And they do, actually.     Not all of them are like the extremists. Why does it always have to be a god damn "them vs us"?
Feminism, but for men. We can't just call it feminism because of reasons. Not particularly good reasons, but whatever. 
I don't know what you mean here by reported rape because is there another way (without some sort of massive computer system like Person of Interest) to identify rape victims except through reporting? The only difference is who you ask to report it, and in what context. The Justice Department uses what I think we could call the 'justice system' while the CDC uses a survey it has constructed.  I think those questions are more suited to someone with a PhD, philosophy of law or something. I'm just an elaborate mechanic, except instead of cars I also work with their operators.   Generally, though, I have a good amount of faith--and I think there's no denying that that word is an appropriate one--in most jurisdictions in coming to a reasonable number what I viscerally identify (if that makes sense) as rape. As opposed to, say, sexual assault or even consensual encounters that are bracketed by illegal activity (drugs, underage drinking, driving and, in some sense, with an eye on the quoted CDC question, larceny).
[deleted]
We SHOULD be trying, but ultimately you can't know what it is like for them until you experience it yourself.
And then it hit me...prenup.
Wait, you knew it because I was sexually assaulted? And you chose to leave that part out when telling the other person in this thread about me and only leave in the part about me using the word fat?  The person who I was taking to had singled out my fat reference twice in two comments, so I assumed it was because she was implying I was offending her. Which you also read.
You were a gorgeous bride!! You should submit your wedding to be featured on [The Budget Savvy Bride](http://www.thebudgetsavvybride.com) -- your story and savvy-ness could help lots of other brides! 
Thanks for illustrating our point... Exhibit A, folks!!
I subscribe to /r/frugal and r/TwoXChromosomes, was completely fooled. 
Thank you &lt;3
Nope, I wanted the post I was replying to in the forefront of everyone's mind as they read. If you don't like it, don't read it.
[Have you seen this?](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/comments/26vntq/woe_is_me_im_female/)  Here's a hint: "fighting oppression" and ["posting complaints on social media"](http://i.qkme.me/36hw1z.jpg) are two separate things.  Here's a bigger hint: focusing on women as the victim instead of women as the powerful force who stand up for themselves **in the moment and not behind a keyboard** are fighting oppression.  You are just reinforcing the narrative that being a victim is a core part of being a woman.  So thanks for that.
I've talked to him about it. His eyes are open. 
&gt; “I think that it's terrible that a lot of these people [are] tweeting about this, using this hashtag,” D'Elia said. “I think it's a little bit s---y to what actually happened. I think that what happened was terrible, people died, and somebody's like ‘a guy looked at my butt, people died, yes all women.’ I think that's kind of rude to the people who lost their lives.”  I agree. Some women/ideologues/feminists are using the tragedy as political fodder to selfishly shift attention to relatively mundane issues, which is bad enough.   On top of that, they're outright spreading lies linking Rodger to men's rights efforts, and spreading cherry-picked 'evidence' to make the case about women, which it wasn't. More men than women died, and this happened because the guy was a psycho misanthrope, not because of gender politics. He hated everyone.   And on top of THAT, who is *anyone* to step up and say *ANYTHING* about "AllWomen"? It's just shameless sexism, made almost comical by the apparently common conception that it's okay as long as the people perpetuating it are female and as long as some women say it's okay.  
IMO, there was more to that weed than weed.  If it caused you to have that violent a reaction, whoever gave it to you to smoke was not a friend.
Excellent non-apology.
[deleted]
This perspective is coming from a man but this seems like a high pressure situation where you complied out or intoxication. While the compliance if verbal might mean that he can't get into trouble in my mind he forced himself upon you. He is a slimy bastard and I wouldn't associate yourself with him ever again. He took advantage of you full well knowing you were out of it. Cut all ties to the dirtbag and treat it as a learning experience I suppose would be my advice. I am truly sorry that you were so violated and it should never have happened in the first place. I have been falsely accused of forcing myself on a former lover (context: we had been intimate many times previously, I could tell something was wrong and I asked several times if she wanted to stop, she said no lets continue then a few weeks later decided I forced myself upon her) But if you didnt give him permission there is nothing false about calling it rape. Clothing isn't permission. Pot isn't permission. You give permission for your body. Chin up and stay strong. Only you can decide what to do from here.
I think part of the problem comes from the crossover between MRAs and TRP, where you get men talking about sexual value and sluts and hamstering and generally sounding very, very misogynistic. So people have a negative view of the two partly due to the fact that one is associated with the other.
You're such a cute couple! I hate you so much! XD  But in all seriousness, congratulations! You're both ridiculously adorable!
[deleted]
She said I just had a bad reaction to the weed and didn't think that he had assaulted me because I complied. A few months later she was fucking my ex behind my back (who I was still very emotionally attached to, first love and all that) and pretending to be my friend. I suspected it for a while, then someone told me. After that I was like "yea, gtfo, I'm done".
Considering I met her on /r/TwoXChromosomes, it only makes sense wedding plans would come through here too. 
[deleted]
I got bugs in mine, briefly. but some well placed moth balls took care of that problem right away
haha what the fuck? acknowledging that sexism exists is misogynistic? you don't even know what misogyny means, do you?
Depends on the kind. Roses do at the very edges but some of the things like lilies are a lot tougher. They do smell a bit strangely.... because they're covered in lacquer to preserve them. I put mine in a closed box with some potpourri oil soaked cotton balls and it seemed to take care of the problem
Well, it's a lot more than "simply" as anyone who has spent anytime looking at this issue understands.  It's about which positions/industries are more predisposed to flex time, which those people who raise families appreciate.  It's about needing to spend time away from work and missing experience.  It's about having other priorities in life related to making sure your children are turning out fine rather than worrying about a 5% increase on a paycheck.  There are more important things in life sometimes, and some people chose to pursue those.
How many people?!
In case it hadn't been posted, here is the school's dress code: http://www.inetteacher.com/upload2/204500/docs/school_dress_code_summary1_for_website.may2014.pdf  Not sure whether the students were aware of it, but it has been in place for about 2 years. Sending them home in violation of this dress code seems reasonable (otherwise they'd have to select parts of the dress code to enforce), but the actual dress code shouldn't have been passed like that. 
Thanks! Not sure of the specific model... but it's a Canon Rebel. Had a zoom lens and cranked up the ISO. Even with the high shutter speed I was surprised I managed to get this shot, since it was getting dark out.
[deleted]
If they didn't abort, they made their own lives hell. All i did was fuck them.
[deleted]
I think it's entirely possible and likely does have that effect on a percentage of children. That's one of the reasons why I think that movie watching shouldn't be an entirely passive experience between children and adults. Not that there needs to be a full blown critical analysis during the credits, but I think too many parents just pop a dvd in so TV can babysit their kids for 80 minutes and take no thought whatsoever towards what their kids learn from it. 
Making OP feel like shit. That judgement.
I bet! How old is he?
[This is the tutorial/pattern I used.](http://www.elli.com/blog/paper-rose-bouquet/) Mine were made of maps to fit our theme. No pictures of my own that I can easily get to right now, but you get the idea!
The police will arrest a flasher, at least where I live, I've read about arrests for it in the paper.  I'm so sorry you had to go through that. What a disgusting pig.
I can see where you're coming from, I just think it's important to try to view the relationship through the eyes of a child. From an informed and knowledgeable perspective, you're totally correct, the relationship is flawed, but falls short of abuse. I think the two of us are talking about two slightly different (but related) things. I'm arguing that the relationship, while not outright abusive, is potentially unhealthy for the development of the target audience because of their relatively naive and impressionable nature, while you're objecting to the tendency of people to characterize the relationship as being abusive and the result of stockholm syndrome, while granting that it isn't the healthiest relationship in the world. I agree with pretty much of what you're saying.
[deleted]
&gt;Who decides what is provoking and what is not?   If you're daring someone to shoot you, they might just do it. 
[deleted]
I think you should do whatever makes you the most comfortable.  In particular, I hope you aren't worried about what men will think. I'm a guy. I think neck hair is natural and looks fine. I don't get why women spend so much time removing hair (I mean, I get it, but I wish women didn't feel like they have to do it). One of my girlfriends had peach fuzz on her upper lip. I thought it was cute and I thought she was drop-dead gorgeous. You have beautiful curly brown hair... own it! 
&gt; I DID report it.  Great! Yay for user created communities.
*facepalm* You realise you are telling me that I am not oppressed right? And how that doesn't work, like, at all?   EDIT - he is an obnoxious piece of shit, evidence thankfully deleted in the reported posts.
Fair enough. Bachelor of Science in Neuroscience.
[deleted]
I like that it provides a temporary home for penises. It's so generous.
[deleted]
&gt; You're getting downvoted for dismissing someone's personal, painful experience. It's rude and not productive.  I expected to get downvoted which is okay; I also do not know how to delicately question a personally painful experience without coming off as rude.  My main point is that there is always two sides of the story, and the circumstances seem all too skewed against the original poster for this to be the actual events that unfolded.
Sounds like that doctor is just kind of an ass. If you otherwise felt he was a proficient doctor, then I say take a deep breath and see him again. 
I'm not a fan of this default status. It's harder to talk to about women's issues with all the influx of trolls and newcomers.   I don't like the idea of this sub becoming human rights 101 for ignorant people who pretend that women don't face legitimate problems. 
&gt; Especially the ones by Redditors who have accounts from before this sub was frontpaged, meaning they are going out of their way to come in here and disparage posts.  Wait, so now that it's on the front page....people are going out of their way to come in here?   Want to rethink that logic?   Now it's in plain view for everyone to see.  Now, no one is going out of their way....this sub is right in their way.  
Oh my god, at one of my other temp jobs I cried in the bathroom like 2, 3 times a week. She was super harsh and kept changing what she wanted me to do and then she'd yell at me for not making the changes she didn't ask for.  Do you have any makeup with you? I've found that lining under your eyes with white eyeliner makes it a little less obvious that you've been crying.  I hope things get better for you soon! :(
Agree on the photographer, although I also have seen less predatory behavior from good photographers anyway (ie a full day photographing an event with Y people is going to cost the same no matter what). Not only don't skimp on the photographer but dear god review their previous work. I had friends that had some of the most abysmal wedding photos I've seen, honestly could have been shot better by an amateur. All of this because they didn't do any research. There are definitely scummy photographers but good photographers are real artists and should be respected and paid as such.  I've used a few different photographers in my life and usually my family has had a close relationship will all of them. Choosing a photographer is a lot like choosing a dentist. You would never want to be cheap, and you also would never just search "dentist in my town" and pick the first one.  edit: I've now realized that care in choosing dentist may depend a lot on how awful you teeth are. I spend most of my dentist time with his hand in my mouth with a drill. Feel free to insert professional you care about their work.
Well spend your efforts sending them there then : ) I was just confused at the anger in the comment.
I'm fairly sure that you will regret it in the future but who am I to tell? It's your life and you must live it as you see fit. I definitely wouldn't feel wrong to be upset though. You have every right to feel that this was cheating. Moat people would feel exactly the same way.
Mine seems fine, I can't say I have any issues with it. I have Mirena IUD which has completely eliminated my periods anyway.
I am in the same boat!! I really wish I had more female friends (or friends of any gender, really) but going out is just so exhausting. plus I always feel like I'm imposing on them, and everyone silently hates the fact that I'm "tagging along". all I want is a couple of close friends I can play Gamecube and watch Harvey Birdman with, but I just can't seem to make it happen :(
Keep in mind the department of labor study was funded by the bush administration. Has editiorialized conclusions not supported by the data saying "there is 'virtually' no wage gap" and "the gap is caused by women's choices". and stuff like that. There have been a number of other studies that show even larger evidence of a gap and of discrimination. 
I only used a group as an example to highlight the amount of powerlessness that you feel when someone bigger and stronger than you is showing you unwanted attention.   Men get attacked and hurt much more than women so in actuality, statistically, they have more reason to be concerned about their surroundings. However, in the media, they are constantly showing women getting hurt or being abducted. In fact sometimes you will see a horror film's whose promotion picture will be of a scared, restrained woman. I can't recollect seeing as many pictures of men looking afraid and being restrained to sell a film. I am sure there is a level of satisfaction to be gained from being able to laugh at how much scared for their safely half the population is but surely, there must be other ways.   
I... You... Just... Thank you. It was one of the more traumatic experiences I've had and the initial shock of her saying that to me made me consider serious self harm for the short time I believed it to be true. So just... Thanks.
I went in with no upper body strength.  Most classes will start off with easy moves meant to help you condition for the harder stuff.  Just go for it!  We all started at the bottom and had to make our way up.  :)
&gt;nothing harms a cause like a false-flag operation that gets exposed  I'd say the fact that there was a false flag at ALL is bad, rather than just the fact they got caught.
Please don't hate yourself, a lot of us have been there are you're definitely not alone. It's not easy, for sure, and that's why it's best to realize that it's good to go slow and build up to something bigger. It'll make the transition easier on you, and suddenly those big goals won't seem so big. My best advice is to start small, and focus on today. Don't focus on tomorrow, or next week, or next month. Just go day by day. This will help you from feeling overwhelmed, and I promise, as you go it will get easier and easier. Just remember that losing the weight won't magically make you feel better, and that's nothing to be discouraged about! It will *help* make you feel better, because you'll be healthier, which will in turn help your mood and energy levels. I know that if you do little things like drink a bunch of water everyday and cut out some of the fattier, greasier foods, you'll notice a change in how you feel very soon, sooner than you might think. 
Thank you. I typically check at the end of the day after work, so as I go on, I see mass downvotes on simple questions or discussions that push them down. It's sad to see a space falling into downvote control.
When I went to an improv camp back in the day, there was a class for girls only.(I'm a dude) I wasn't sure what the point was, but afterwards they all commented about how refreshing it was not to constantly be pushed into a subservient role, or have to desperately fight for stage time. Iv'e had my eye out for that kind of stuff since, making subtle little comments to stage-whoring dudes throughout my comedic travels.  Edit: sometimes, I am that stage whore. I try to check myself though.
Holy shit, did we just have a respectful exchange of ideas in which both parties exchanged unique perspectives, ending in mutual understanding and new insights? 
He's completely out of my life. I've since graduated and am on the path to do bigger and better things!  It's hard to keep your head up, especially when you can't talk to anyone about what's happened, but I'm fighting, everyday, to power through.
&gt;You're missing my point. It doesn't matter even if my friend was in a tube top or a burka, and even if I did want to fuck her, I'd had looked away after quickly noting her attire, and then I'd go back to do whatever I was doing before. Not hard at all.  But this is *YOUR* point, your perception.  I most likely agree with how you would handle the situation  from an administrative view, but once again:  Just because you are not distracted doesn't mean that others should immediately share the same biology and control of their blossoming sexualities (OP's point about the teachers made me quite ill though).    IE:  It is distracting.  Handling of said distraction can be very insulting, but that doesn't invalidate it from being distracting in the first place.  I really don't want to argue this, I thought you were asking a simple question, and if we were school administrators we would very likely come to the same conclusion about our actions.  
[deleted]
Congrats!!!!
I don't know. I have only one true platonic and intimate friendship with a dude. That took years to develop after we attempted dating for a month and realized we weren't a good match for a romantic relationship. So my case may be a bit unique.   I understand your frustration, because other relationships I thought were friendships turned out to be expectations I couldn't return. Including one that was so out of the blue it was emotionally devastating. I'm sorry you had to go through it too.   It's like a woman being nice to a man is immediately interpreted as romantic interest. I hope not, anyway.
No, probably roughly the same or maybe a little less.  Definitely under reported.  Definitely not *that* under reported, but under reported.  It is, as I've said, unacceptable but its not an Indian problem.  Take a few deep breaths, reread what I've written, and stop putting words in my mouth.  I never said anything which implied that the numbers reflect a 100% reporting rate, or even a proportionate reporting rate, but 50x is absurd.
&gt;  Unless your occupation is eccentric billionaire, you'll be wearing a uniform most of your life.  Or a lab rat. No one here cares what you wear unless it might be dangerous (short pants, open shoes)
It is all in the past, just thought to share this. (first time receiving internet hugs!! - Thank you!)
I've lost 30 pounds since the beginning of the year, and the sub is a great resource. MyFitnessPal has also been a life saver for me. Definitely check it out if you can. :)
The #YesAllWomen campaign is intended to show how insidious the sexism can be, because of how pervasive it is within our culture.  If 1,000 different examples of 1,000 different degrees of severity are present, they still all form a pattern that paints the same picture of a gender that was once universally seen as Less Than, and not reached the point of Equal To.  It does not - in any way, no matter how much the anti-feminist apologists desire to see it - equate the act of a gal being eyed across the room with a gal being murdered.  It simply **doesn't.**  The point that is being made right now about Rodgers is a valid one, even if people refuse to acknowledge it.  An unfortunate mix of social impotence, mental illness, Affluenza, misogyny, and misplaced entitlement led a kid who was pissed as hell about his lack of a love life - sex and romance that he felt entitled to from women who wanted nothing to do with him, and apparently for good reason - to lash out not only at the female objects of his desire, but also at his male counterparts who supposedly were enjoying fruits that he was unable to earn on his own.  It's a sick and sad situation, but part of this is unquestioningly tied to this manchild's warring desire for and hatred of women as a whole.
Sharp! I like it. 
[deleted]
Beautiful! Yosemite is one of my most favorite places. We actually went there on our honeymoon. Would you recommend the Eagle Peak hike? I really want to go back and maybe we'll put it on our agenda. :)
You're so right, I see this quite a lot amongst men. Rather than seeing like and love as totally different beasts, it's like they see all relationships with women as being on a sliding scale from 'not interested' to 'just friends' to 'fiery hot lovers'. If a woman's attractive they keep pushing and pushing up the scale and they get hurt and frustrated when the woman doesn't want them in a romantic way, like you're holding them back at arms length while they're trying to move closer.  It's a shame that it can ruin such a great friendship. You can be close platonic friends with a man, but for that to happen both the man and the woman need to be clear about the difference between friendship and romantic interest. Men can be great friends to women when they're willing to accept the friendship for what it is and not as a means to an end.
I think men should talk but they never want to seem to talk on their own, they wait till the women start talking then interrupt the women as they suddenly decide this is their time to talk. So yes, they should lobby. How about equal paternity/maternity leave for both parents? How about dads getting custody of their kids? How about saying why do we always have to be the cannon fodder while the women hang back? How about saying religions who marginalise the sexes, makes men feel like they are animalistic and not worthy of simple human trust?  Please address whatever issue you like but please don't come to a women's sub and ask them why they are talking about women's issues!
Just enough time to rewatch the first season!
Yeah, you're probably right. Almost like in black comedy, you laugh because you don't know how else to respond... 
[deleted]
It’s hypothetical in the fact that I’m not explicitly discussing the policy itself, but the philosophical question of whether the sanctity of a woman’s body is greater than the lives of other people. Do I agree with the spirit of the policy? I want to say yeah, I do. I believe the higher up bank executives were trying to establish a protocol for when something like this happens. When a robber asks for all the money? You comply. When a robber asks for the combination code for the vault, you comply. You said to do this because the robber an unknown entity and has the probable ability to kill, which is worse than losing money, and which is ultimately worse than rape/molestation. Still, women aren’t the only one under effect of this policy. Men can be raped/molested as well. Ultimately, if this situation does come to play, no simple policy is going to stop women or men from resisting if they want to. You get dismissed if you don’t comply with company policy, simple as that. Policy isn’t law. Banks are private companies, if you don’t like what their policies are, go find another job.  You call me unrealistic because some vague *“shit”* hasn’t happened to me yet. Can you explain that? What hasn’t happened to me *yet*? Getting molested? Getting raped? The first thing you presume is that these things haven’t happened to me, and that I am naive and clueless about this subject. The second thing that you presume is that this stuff will inevitably, one day, happen to me.   Poking fun is great. I love teasing, I love making jokes. However, your replies never came across this way to me at all (barring your most recent one). Re-reading them, they still don’t. They come across as condescending, acerbic and close-minded. They feel like an attacks. If that’s not you intended to come across, then fine, but that’s how I interpreted them. Secondly, if I was actually in that situation, I’m positive I would let myself be violated, no question. Just because I haven’t been through that exact situation doesn’t mean I don’t know what I would do.   I apologize if I had come across as insensitive when it is clear that you feel very deeply about this subject. I just simply had a question (which was downvoted to hell). Just a fucking question. Not a statement. A *question*. I just wanted someone to explain to me their thinking, since in the original story, ALL of the women in that room objected to the policy. In my head, I didn’t find myself objecting, and I wondered why. I wanted to be enlightened.
This is your post however, and you must bear responsability for the people wishing to interact with you through the comment section. And if you have the time to respond to my comment, I'm sure you have the time to respond to theirs. Plus, it's a matter of credibility here, they called you out for misusing informations and sources. You have the responsability to be honest.  And thanks for downvoting my question btw, I don't see in any way why it deserved a downvote. 
Yes. I agree with you.
Generally, that is the type of MRA every woman who identifies as a feminist encounters at least once. When they refer to MRAs, they mean these men and are defining the movement in this way:    &gt; The men's rights movement is considered to be a backlash or countermovement to feminism. The men's rights movement consists of diverse points of view which reject feminist and profeminist ideas. Men's rights activists have said that they believe that feminism has overshot its objective and harmed men. They dispute that men as a group have institutional power and privilege and believe that men are victimized and disadvantaged relative to women. Men's rights groups generally reject the notion that feminism is interested in men's problems and men's rights activists have viewed the women's movement as a plot to conceal discrimination against men.  -from wikipedia, Men's Rights Movement  As a feminist, I do believe in addressing the issues that impact men right now, because they also impact women. Just as I believe that the issues that impact women right now *also* impact men.   I'm Canadian, so my issues are different from the issues that many people in 2X might discuss, but I do believe that it's important to have more resources for men who are victims of domestic violence, and I do believe that custody needs to be granted to the most appropriate parent rather than automatically to the mother, and I do believe that hypermasculinity and rigid gender roles damage men *and* women, and I do believe that teaching boys and girls what consent looks like will help *both* genders as they grow up.   Most feminists that I know believe in these things. But most MRAs that I encounter want to drown my voice under angry shouts, refusal to acknowledge that women do face issues, and an inability to recognize that acknowledging one gender's issues does *not* take away from the other gender's issues.   There is space for both genders to address issues in feminism - I don't see that in the MRA movement.   Sorry, I didn't mean to go and write a novel at you - I appreciated your conversation and time, and I wanted to let you know that I, at least, probably wouldn't consider you to be an MRA as the term tends to be defined. You seem like a decent person who cares about making the world a better place.
It's almost hypocritical. If women don't need to work, why is she getting smart and learning how to get a job and survive on her own, huh? -_-
[deleted]
CONGRATS!!! The two of you look great together. 
[deleted]
I haven't tried anything yet
I hate my uterus (bleeding for a fourth or more of the month accompanied by cramps is horrible, good for people that don't mind it) and my vagina itself was the bane of my existence for years (vaginismus and vestibulitis). Them combined have brought horrible depression, pain, and issues with self worth over the years. If I could have I would definitely have asked for XY when I was in utero. I wasn't given a choice so I live with it and I really enjoy being feminine (love dresses and heels!). When everything is going well and operating properly then I'm happy.   Physically I think my lady bits look pretty good. Post surgery it looks different and not as "perfect" but oh well. It generally functions better, so it was worth it.
She has every right to feel however she wants to feel.   I can understand completely how she'd feel discriminated against when this sub for women didn't take women like her into account when choosing the name.  OneYchromosome has the same issue with their name for trans men.   It's meant to just be a name and you can't ask her not to be hurt by it if she's hurt.   This sub itself is welcoming to all women regardless of their chromosomes. 
Probably afraid she'll cry too much while doing hard labour. /s
my toes start tingling just watching that picture. o_O
*woosh*
[deleted]
[deleted]
You have gorgeous hair!
Wow...
I was with you, and then not in the next sentence. Bleh.
I'm a guy and my oldest friend is a woman. We were born less than a day apart and were in the maternity ward together. We live on the same street and grew up together. She is like another sister to me. While we don't hang out that much, we will always be friends.   Although it does seem as though her boyfriends have been wary of me. But I just play that off as them subscribing to the stereotypical thinking that a girls male friends just want to bang her.
[deleted]
&gt; She basically just stared at them and went "Seriously?". They got sheepish and said sorry.  Not exactly, she couldn't pass as a man, she says so in [this interview](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Elkyk9YSub0). 
By the sounds of things, the chips are probably gonna fall in his mouth...
On your left!
Just an FYI, I'm a she. I'm letting you know just in case, because 'bud' is usually used to refer to men.  I've read his whole manifesto too, and I'm not sure that you actually did.   He believed he was entitled to social acceptance from both men and women. Women are just the people he was attracted to sexually, which has little to do with anything -- he fantasized about (kinda juvenile) romance, not sexual violence.. He never sexually assaulted a woman or hired a prostitute. Sex wasn't worth anything to him if it didn't mean social acceptance. It's very plausible that had be been gay instead, he would hate women for rejecting his friendship and taking men away from him, and hate men for rejecting him sexually. 
Has anybody tried a dry shaver, aka electric trimmer?  I just bought one when I went to change into a skirt after the gym and realized my legs were hairy, and didn't have time to go home.  The instructions say you can use it to shave your bikini line, but I'm kind of nervous to try.
I was just thinking about how good OP's photographer is. Getting a bright white dress and black skin to look good together in one photograph is not easy! I always manage to get somthing washed out or too dark. It's really amazing how the human eye can see the whole range at once, while cameras struggle.
[Owe me friendship?](http://2.bp.blogspot.com/_QonjXrwiEbY/TALTEZGAbzI/AAAAAAAAUKM/13-SsJMwKUA/s1600/Its+over+your+head.jpg)
I use one. It's pretty easy, but it's not going to get you a super close shave like a safety razor. I get terrible ingrown hairs using a safety razor, though, so it works for me. 
[all of the hugs!](http://thenicestplaceontheinter.net/)
No problem! You might also consider having your doctor work up your hormones. (r/PCOS)   My wife was only lean for about six months after I fell in love with her. Our main problems over years have been emotional (hormones .. hello?) and I always knew in my heart it was just a condition that needed treatment.  If it's not right, don't ignore it. Hope this spares you some pain on your journey.
Like, /u/Beautiful_Hurricane said, what you can do, as a guy, can have a strong impact on how the people around you respond to women (at least in your presence).  If one of your guy friends is being/doing:  dismissive, creepy, catcalling, judgmental, talking over a woman, making some silly joke that demeans women, making an *overt* joke that demeans women, saying something negative about a woman's weight/clothing/general appearance that is outside the usual "this is my preference" comments, someone uses the words crazy/insane/ridiculous/absurd to describe a woman just because she's a woman, your boss makes a comment about "all women", anyone around you makes a comment about "all women," there is reluctance to partner with a woman simply because she's a woman, there's a reluctance to agree simply because she's a woman, a woman speaks - no one responds - and then another person brings up her same point later on, someone changes the subject of conversation because a woman enters, someone says "you wouldn't understand/get it/relate because you're a woman," "you're a woman so you can't do ______," someone refuses to let her lift something heavy, someone comments that she might "break a nail,"   . . . then stop him.  Or her.  Stop them by saying, "dude, c'mon, seriously?"    That's the single most important thing you can do to help: *no longer accept this behavior as a societal norm.*  Because I think you've seen what happens often when women try to do it - they're dismissed, immediately. So help.  Do what you can.
I always thought the fuckzone was when a guy "only wants sex" vs an actual relationship. But I agree with your main point. 
I absolutely believe that the tone might have changed to be more critical and less universally supportive of thoughts presented. And I can totally acknowledge that this seems like a shitty situation to the people who preferred it the way it was.  Unfortunately though it's also a shitty situation for a great number of other redditors, who now have to see posts strongly implying that men women are treated far worse than men in society and, if they respond to that, are told that they are breaking some kind of vague and ill-defined rules of seeing things from the perspective of women.   So some people are definitely going to be unhappy, due to this situation which has come to pass.  Personally, I don't think it is more reasonable for the regulars here to expect to not have their views challenged than it is for regulars on Reddit to be expected not to challenge them.   I also very much disagree that it makes Reddit seem like a woman hating circle jerk. The tone here is very, very mild.   Have a good time on the date!  Edit: Just to clarify, I think it's a shitty situation, but well, it's either this group is unhappy or that group is unhappy or both are somewhat unhappy.
Cool! I love me some raptors! More!
go find a sex shop and pay cash.
Because we've got the notion in our head through one means or another that we're all badass sexual gods who should be allowed to have any woman we want.  We're conditioned to think that our worth is at least party based on the number of women we sleep with, and our ability to woo said women.  Turning a lesbian straight is worth more 'points', or something stupid like that.  That's my take on the situation.
Allow me to gush.  OMG you looked gorgeous! I literally said OMG when I saw that first photo. Holy shit. And the other commentators are right, those photos looked straight out of one of those magazines I love reading (it's because the photos are pretty and I want to look that pretty with flowers and what not)  Congrats!
[deleted]
We don't though. When I say we, I mean me, and you, and the vast majority of human beings. The rich countries oppress the poor, the strong oppress the weak. The theists oppress the infidels and the atheists yell back at the top of their lungs.  What you're describing isn't just the end of misogyny, it is utopia itself. Hardly a new idea. Not saying it's not a worthy goal. I do share it with you. But you should understand the scope. If we could solve misogyny, we could solve everything.  The solution will not be so simple as "they need to think like me". That's not realistic politics. The solution comes when not thinking like you leads to defeat, because it is inherently illogical. It comes when your way proves itself better, when groupss that accept equality move forward and leave others behind. It comes when corporations that include women see higher profits than those that don't. It comes when a sexist boss hires four incompetent men before discovering that the woman he initially passed over is great at her job. It comes when the " old school" cop has his life saved by the female partner he used to disrespect.
Oh yeah, the cap is FLAWLESS.
I don't doubt your girlfriend's feelings.  In terms of explanation (that isn't an excuse, offered because you mentioned confusion) - the cis-bias she finds here probably stems from ignorance more than intent.  Trans issues aren't necessarily on the radar of all members because of a lack of experience with them, and not knowing what might be upsetting means I, at least, am sure I sometimes am guilty as well out of ignorance.  I've been trying to learn more, but I'm certainly not there.  And your girlfriend isn't obligated to be my teacher, so I can accept that she may not be fully comfortable here and that I and others may contribute to that.  I admit, I've got a lot of questions, but don't have friends close to me whom it would be appropriate to ask such personal and possibly dismissive questions. 
[deleted]
I'm glad you got rid of your hurt.  I watched my mom get rid of hers and it's amazing to see the freedom.
This is where we get into the 'I'll know it when I see it' issue with defining what counts as a picture intended to be sexual vs. a picture that happens to be sexual to a given individual.  Basically, this is the part where you have lawyers arguing both ways before a jury.
&gt; Why go ballistic on people that bring it up?  I don't know - why do MRA's go ballistic when women talk about their own problems? 
I will be next week.
[deleted]
At 13 - I'd just faced some criminal charges for standing up to familial abuse from my mother. After I'd spent hours in a holding cell, the judge told me I was to march my way to a girls' home many blocks away in an area I'd never visited. Outside the courthouse, a man approached me (EDIT: No, wait, that's wrong. I had approached him to bum a cigarette). He'd been in court too, though I can't remember the charges he faced now. He was big and scruffy, not rich, and in his thirties. He was also friendly and carried himself in an open way, non-threatening way.  He asked if I'd like company on my walk because he knew how to get where I was going. I was feeling vulnerable, frightened and emotionally exhausted by my life situation. It was the first time I'd ever really felt completely on my own. I said yes, I'd like the company. I needed a friend. He was a good chaperone and great to talk with. Just the sympathetic ear I needed. I never saw him again.  In my teens I was offered rides by men I didn't know more than once, and took the offers. Guess what I got out of it -- a ride, instead of having to wait for the bus outside in the cold.   At 17 - I went for a walk during an ice storm. It was so cool -- there was a light rain, and all the trees were coated in ice. Branches were falling off trees onto power lines all across the city, including my neighbourhood. Power had been out for ages. There was such a creepy, eerie, quiet vibe to it all that I loved (yeah, I liked the danger, maybe too much... but here I am, whole).  Sparking power boxes flashed against the clouds in the distance. I was the only person around, until I came across a solitary man who said "Hi." We walked around and talked about the storm. He was probably ten years older than me, tall and thin, and that's all I remember about him physically. He offered to share his umbrella. He didn't ask for my number or anything (not that it matters that much), we just enjoyed one another's company and parted.   I've had so many wonderful male friends and lovers in the past, through elementary school, high school, university and work. Narrating the stories would take forever. Sure there have been assholes in my life, but they're such a minority.  When I see a man on the street, or in an elevator, or whatever, I'm not afraid. He's just a man, a person.   This "potential rapist," #YesAllWomen stuff has REALLY been grinding my gears lately. The more feminists bleat their hysterics, the less likely it'll be for *good* men to take a risk and lend a hand. That'll just leave the few bad ones. Fear will become a self-fulfilling prophesy, and the common courtesies and spontaneous friendships of strangers will go extinct. It's an awful thought but I fear it's already happening. 
Tbh that's kind of awesome.
I'm just trying to figure out how /r/TwoXChromosomes became /r/Feminism. As a new user who was not actively here before it became defaulted, I have to ask, was it always like this?       That being said, any male that is actively seeking to deny any sort of sexism against women exists is deranged. 
I'm just curious, why is it impossible for you to believe that someone could, just maybe, perceive something as sexist even when it wasn't? That thread was clearly full of legitimate sexist stories, I'm not denying that. I'm just not willing to believe it's -most definitely- sexism in 100% of cases.      Pick your battles carefully. I always tell my gay friends the same. The Mozilla CEO does not light a candle in terms of hurting gay rights when it compares to something like the National Organization for Women.       &gt;I STRONGLY disagree with gay people hurting gay people by calling out homophobia.       That's not what I said bsl. What I said was gay people are throwing the word 'homophobia' out at almost every perceived injustice and it's hurting it, to the point where some are even proudly calling themselves homophobic because it's become such a joke.
I'm human. Why do I suck? (give it your best, I don't break).  
&gt; family annihilators  It disturbs me that this happens enough that they have a name for it. 
[deleted]
So...only desperate men hit on OP? Because lesbian's body language isn't "inviting"? And you're sure that all of the men who hit on her can tell for sure that she is a lesbian?
[deleted]
Ehh, that's not always true. Sometimes the universe is just out to get you and it doesn't change.   However, I do agree with that on principle.   I just think that humanity... is so fucked up. Every person has imperfections. When you get a lot of people together, those imperfections get magnified and... people die. 
Looks like the MOH takes his job *very* seriously.
Well, your original post comes off as very reactive, but I don't think you meant it that way. I would like to point out that OP was NOT posting about their own experiences, they were posting about statistics of what ALL women face. This is not historical, this is right now. It is vastly downplayed on places like Reddit, which tend to be run by males. But it is very important to understand that these issues are faced on a societal level, and do not have to be faced alone.  Also, I maintain that 2x is a forum about women's experiences, and you probably got down voted because your post basically sounded like you didn't think it was a big deal that women were having these experiences. I don't think it says anything negative about the "women of 2x" when you come to a forum about women's issues, on a post that specifically gives a long list of statistical facts about what women are presently facing in our society, and basically say "I just don't think that's really all that bad". Yes, as a gay man you have had different experiences and your community faces different challenges, but that does not prevent you from feeling sympathy for others. It may be a common reaction, but it doesn't have to be YOUR reaction. There are a lot of natural points of allyship for Feminists and the LGBT community which include fighting against heteronormative stereotypes and patriarchal restrictions on what both men AND women can do.   I suggest, if you want to make a contribution to discussions like this, you could start by bringing up points of agreement between your view and the OP, then give points of disagreement. This community is currently facing a lot of trolling because of becoming a default, and although that may not be your intent, you might want to think about how you come off to others. 
[deleted]
I realize you will think I am anti-feminist. No, I am 100% aware of patriarchal human nature, history, social programming, inequality, history behind it, civil rights fights, and I am, in fact, a feminist.  But I am a realist as well. I accept and understand that we are still driven by very different core instincts, and that those will take time to reprogram. I understand that is partially an excuse, and I don't think it should be allowed to be an excuse for any crime or abuse, just this - things aren't going to fix over-night. Parallel fights like gay rights, etc, will have huge impacts on this as socially inacceptable bevahior towards feminine men (not all gay men are feminine) is challenged, leading towards more discussion on behavior toward's women - because yes, we will look out for our own first.  This is a big picture. it's sad this is how it works, but it's how it will work. My point is NOT to accept our shitty behavior, it is to understand that men like tits. That's just the way it is going to be. The solution is not "don't look at all."  The solution is "look once, have respect and engage from that point out" and on the other side understand "hey I got these things a lot of guys like, and mine happen to be big, I'm showing some cleavage today, let's judge each man individually on how far they take it."  Because I'm going to look. Because it's almost impossible not to. Boobs draw attention for us. But I'm not going to stare, drool or comment (where you can hear.)  Which is another point, don't destroy inter-gender private talk. Don't do it. Don't do it for men, don't do it for women - because that's what FAIR will be. Men are going to whisper about the hot girl. That's life. And women will chat about the sexy new water deliver man or intern or hireling or what not, same way. Maybe not to the extent, but there's science - real science - that says men are simply more sexually driven. That's just reality.  Equality means accepting reality and forming safe society within that reality, not forcing reality to fit an arbitrary definition of "safe."  Men should be able to tactfully and respectfully look at a woman they find attractive, women should be able to do the same, and it should be the asshole who push it too far we specifically and actively - and fairly - engage. Because I've heard - not nearly to the same degree (but I'm not in the circle, am I?) some pretty dirty stuff from some otherwise educated, professional, upward mobile women about some male coworkers.  I'm not your enemy.
So you would say that biology is not a factor in gender at all?  That's entirely likely, I don't mean to judge anyone by asking the question I did merely to talk about the concept of gender and biological sex as we understand them.  
Not wanting to be a devil's advocate but it was very difficult for me to understand that and I can still understand why it's difficult for men.  Even men who aren't doing it purposely to be harmful to women.  It wasn't until I thought about it in terms of something that I could relate to that it finally 'clicked'.  I'm a black male and equated the feeling of being socially marginalized due to preconceived notions of my race to the same issues that all women face.  It was an almost immediate 180 in the level of understanding.    
STUNNING!
I know, and that's what I was saying. I want better things for men, too. Better conversations, better rights, better institutions. But they have to want that for us, too, rather than just being afraid of what they're going to lose if we gain something. 
That's an interesting way to think about it. 
I'm not OP, but my husband and I did our wedding on a $5,000 budget, too, back in 2007. My parents have three kids, and they told each of us that we can have $5,000 when we get married, and if we wanted to use that for the wedding, great. If we wanted it for a honeymoon, great. If we wanted it for a payment on a house, great. It was ours to use as we wanted/needed. I decided I would make sure the money covered our entire wedding, **including our honeymoon.** Here's how we did it:  I picked out a wedding dress from JCrew (their website), and I think it cost $250. I spent maybe another $50 getting it tailored to fit. Gold was much cheaper then, and we got our gold wedding bands off of Kohls.com for about $50 a piece (I think mine was $40 because it was thinner, and his was about $60). We paid for a tux rental, but, for the life of me, I can't remember how much that was. My mother-in-law wanted to treat me to my hair, so that wasn't included in the $5,000 budget, but my nails were. My sister did my makeup. So, in terms of getting ready &amp; looking nice for the wedding, we spent about $500.  We had our wedding at the local bontanic gardens. It was $275, and we didn't need to get flowers or anything to decorate because the whole place was flowers! My husband's uncle officiated, so we didn't spend any money there, either. A friend of a friend played the violin, so I called her and asked if she would play some violin music for about 30 minutes to an hour for the ceremony. She brought a friend who played the cello, and we paid them $100. My father-in-law's best friend loves photography and offered to take pictures of the ceremony as our wedding gift (we asked him not to take pictures at the reception so he could relax &amp; enjoy it). So, the wedding cost about $375. Edit to add: the reception itself was extremely small &amp; intimate. I was too scared about being the center of attention and having people looking at me, so we let extended family know they would be invited to a reception but NOT the ceremony. We only had immediate family and best friends there (15 people, IIRC). So, we didn't have bridesmaids and groomsmen. We didn't need to help cover people's dresses or tuxes or buy gifts for bridesmaids or anything like that. So, yes, the wedding itself cost about $375.  Let's see... I basically made my own invitations by going to a paper store. It was maybe about $100? I can't remember exactly.   Our reception was pretty small (just under 50 people). I found [a beautiful tea house](http://www.boulderteahouse.com/virtual-tours/) that was willing to allow us to have the reception there without a rental fee. The reason was because our party wasn't large enough to need to take up the entire restaurant. I basically said, "If you allow groups of 50 people to do an afternoon tea, can't you treat my reception as a group?" They agreed as long as we weren't there for more than 2 hours. They roped off about a third of the tea house for us, so there were actually customers at other parts of the tea house during our reception. We paid the price of an afternoon tea for each of our guests. I think the bill came to maybe $1,200. It was the perfect time of day, 2pm, when people wouldn't be very hungry for a meal. So, everyone got little finger cakes and finger sandwiches, and we had wedding cake as well. People got to have hot tea and iced tea. I went to a bakery for the cake and spent about $200 for that. I spent $50 on a cake topper. On the tables, my mother-in-law brought the flower pots from the bridal shower we'd had earlier that week. So, the basic part of the reception (food) cost about $1,500.   For favors, I bought heart-shaped tea infusers online for about $1/piece. I bought a lot of loose-leaf tea from the tea house the week before. I also ordered gift bags with our names and wedding date printed on them. In total, I think it was about $2.50/person for the favors, and so it was under $150 for the favors. My mother-in-law new a woman who made fancy cookies, too, and she really wanted me to have cookies for favors. I'd shot down a lot of her ideas (they were expensive), but I decided to do the cookie one to make her happy. I think I spent $100 on cookies, so people got those with their favors as well. So, we spent about $250 on goodies for the guests.  With some of the leftover money, we called a car company, and they picked us up from the reception to drive us to the airport for our honeymoon. We also paid for our plane tickets with the $5,000. We went to Vegas, so I also bought tickets for a couple of shows (Beatles Love, Penn &amp; Teller). My father-in-law used his miles to get us a really nice suite at the MGM Signature, so the hotel was free for us. We set aside some money for food &amp; gambling. I think the shows plus the airfare was about $600. I think we took $750 with us to Vegas for dining out &amp; gambling.   So, the $5,000 more than covered the entire wedding, reception, and honeymoon. The leftover money went to the first month rent &amp; security deposit for our apartment (we didn't move in together until we got married). It didn't include the bouquet or the rehearsal dinner, since my husband's parents covered those expenses (they said they wanted to cover those things, as they are traditionally the groom's family's responsibility for whatever reason).   Edit: I don't have pictures of the reception on this computer, but I can try to remember to add a couple photos of it later. [Here is a picture of the wedding](http://i.imgur.com/FULUGsg.jpg). As you can see, the botanic gardens made for a beautiful setting!
&gt; Well, what about all the nice guys who go up to talk to a girl with hopes of meeting a caring person that may reciprocate there attention.  They would not go up to OP probably. She's a lesbian so I assume that she's not acting all that interested towards men, so the odds that she attracts these men isn't high unless she's drop-dead gorgeous (and even then there are ways of compensating for that)
You can do the same thing [with your goals in life.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=YtaCF0A5wWw)
Bleh, extra gross. I didn't know that.
Just want to see more photos from your gorgeous day! Congrats to you and your groom!
But that isn't this sub or its member's problem OR its purpose. I agree with you that this is truly the heart of the issue (that people are lashing out at us), and we of course want the same thing for men, but it's not relevant to a women's sub to steer the conversation so heavily away from women.
Also, out of curiosity, why do you choose not to advocate iuds?
The words you used were "what's worse are the people who think it never happens to men".  Sorry to patronize, but the comment was asinine. If what you meant is that everyone's suffering should be equally respected, then I stand by my rewark that you should think, then post.    And I think we are all aware that you could not care less what anyone else experiences are.  That is OP's point.  Thank you for making it so eloquently.
That happens to me too. I don't know if I do. I've only gotten 2 papsmears in my life and nothing was ever mentioned about it. Would they have told me if I did or should I ask again?
[deleted]
You're not saying it doesn't happen but you're pushing that you think women are crying wolf and they don't even know it. I have an issue with that!   That sounds like a very plain example of sexism and many women have a story that can relate, I know I have felt seriously dismissed in the workplace and feel as though it relates to not being taken seriously because of my gender.   You're trying to find a way to dismiss a woman while sharing a very typical example of sexism. Yeah, there may be many reasons her ideas were ignored but we do live in a very sexist society and she who experienced it was given the impression it was due to sexist reasons. You know, people can tell when they're being fucked with, women aren't these blind idiots looking for someone to blame for not getting where we want to go. People can tell when we are not being taken seriously.  I'm sorry that you can't put yourself in the shoes of a woman receiving and being aware of their disadvantage.   And how often do you hear people saying it's because whoever "hates women". Women receive sexism all over from people with the best of intentions, you rarely see women here saying "because they hated women". If it were on the surface like that, like I said before, it would be much easier to fix this problem. The people who "hate women" are easy to deal with because that's right there on the surface, sexism is so deeply engrained in our society (like homophobia and racism) that it's impossible to pin point, so when someone is able to find a typical example and people come around and "try to play the devils advocate" it's fucking annoying and proves nothing, only that women can't be taken seriously. 
I'm only 24 years old. I do not want any more children for a LONG while, but I do not want to eliminate the possibility of one day changing my mind and having another child.
I'm glad to hear that I wasn't off putting. I asked you a lot of questions about your comments at first. It makes me come off as kind off as on the offense. I found this exchange thoughtful and intersting, so, thanks for that. I had a very nice day. I played with kittens in a barn, which was as awesome as it sounds.   An interesting side note is that during our interaction, I got a pm, from a 15 minute old account, asking me if I "rub my clit with sandpaper?". I responded with: "Do you?", because I couldn't help it, and then I hit report. My account is openly female, but I never got creepy PMs from minutes old troll accounts before. Until recently, the only people who ever used to send me this kind of stuff were guys from TheRedPill, because I post on TheBluePill. But, since TwoX went default, I've gotten 2, from brand new accounts. I think it's the same guy though. Because the first one said, "do your boobs jiggle when you're on top?", and I responded with: "Do yours?", because I couldn't help it. Then I hit report.   Honestly, I thought it was VERY weak trolling compared to TheRedPill guys, so, I don't know why I'm telling you all of this. Except, that I guess that I think it's interesting enough to want to mention it to someone, but it's not exactly worth talking about IRL. 
I'm pretty sure the comment wasn't meant in the extreme, but if you don't perfectly understand your own person - as most people discover if they go to therapy - how can you expect someone to truly understand you? It's not about not understanding at all, but not understanding fully, and giving the other the benefit of knowing our understanding has limits.
[deleted]
Maybe, but I feel like that's extending the benefit of an awful lot of doubt to some of these guys. 
My university did, particularly with those known to have parties. 
...The hell?  No need to be a jerk 'round these parts, pal. :p
It's really not all that surprising. Disturbing, saddening, yes. Surprising, no. :(
I think disruptive content is a different kettle of fish and should be treated as such. Ban them from the sub. As a side note, this down voting because we disagree nonsense is going to be one of the things that make me leave this sub. :\
Many times, the guy chooses to have the procedure since the healing time and effects seem to be worse for women. I know a lot of people say they're fine in a day or two but I was in pain for a month after mine and it's messed up my hormonal balance.  Trying to get that fixed now, over 2 years later.
&gt;This sounds like someone who is really concerned about an issue that is affecting his life.    No, this sounds like a typical MRA dimwit.   &gt;Because some of the things that happen here, while positive for women, are negative for men.   And what is it, dare I ask?
I feel like I've heard of nothing but negative experiences on IUDs. Is this selection bias or do IUDs have as many problems as it seems? 
I agree on the downvoting thing. It's pretty easy to see when someone is just genuinely misunderstanding or getting off into the weeds, and if not, usually a couple more rounds of replies is enough to figure it out. For the record, I didn't downvote you. I tried to explain why your comment missed the mark in my opinion, and I hope that was helpful? 
I can't control the replies in here. And unfortunately, it's a VERY tangly sort of topic. That's why I kept my post confined to one very specific problematic behavior.   I have also been thinking about making a post addressing the downvote brigading that I've noticed, so on that, I agree.   Edit: I don't see an issue with the top comment, though...? I had to go look. It's against derailing discussions here, imo, same as my post.
Exactly. This dude is just doing what's best for his heart and mental health. Good on him for being reasonably upfront.
Thank you for your advice.  The police in his town know him and his brother well.  I am going to call or cisit them tomorrow.
Am I only woman who thinks pole dancing is stupid?
Thank you for saying! And sorry you're getting downvoted for what I think are pretty reasonable comments, even if I don't agree with a lot of them. 
They've been taught that that's what "alpha males" do (when in fact, men with any sort of leadership/interpersonal ability can easily tell when women aren't interested in them; they may try and get the woman to be interested as a challenge, but they aren't prone to fooling themselves with a numbers-based model).    It's really rather sad.  For most males, something along the lines of getting to know a woman would be the greater challenge but the seduction artist thing is really strong this century.
[deleted]
[deleted]
If OP does not want another child, she shouldn't be forced to carry out the pregnancy. Simple as that.  Hope the procedure goes well for you, OP!
Pretty much, yeah. I've never seen evidence of a 'rape culture' as defined by OP in her last paragrapgh. "Ugliest way possible." It's like a Murphy's Law of sex. Murphy's Law is a joke, peeps.
Now that would be impossible my good sir.
I downvote things I feel don't belong in the sub, things I think are trolls, and things that I feel are offensive and were meant to be that way. Most often in this sub I think I downvote things that are factually wrong or that I view as bad advice and want to push to the bottom of the thread.   I will also downvote people who disagree with me if I think their comment seems rude or I'm in a crabby mood. That's right, if you disagree with me you might lose one internet point.   But I'm pretty sure there are three people with a handful of alts that just downvote everything in this sub's /new. Why? Because they can! 
As if there is only one. :|
[deleted]
[deleted]
Glad I could help :)  Also, don't beat yourself up for being human (like the rest of us).  Of COURSE you're going to have issues from being raped.  I have to remind myself sometimes to have as much compassion for me as I would for someone else if they had been raped.  Seriously, I'm a fucking jerk to myself.  My encouraging thought is, once I started talking about it and being open and sharing....it really sucked a lot less.  It's almost nothing now.
It depends on the type of twins. The type where two eggs are fertalised runs in families and the chances  of it happening again are definitely increased. Identical twins happen when the egg splits in half after fertilisation. It's a fluke and is very unlikely to happen twice.  
Can you show me the posts where I said "me too me too!" and talked about my own oppression? Or did you just make that entire thing up?
[deleted]
[deleted]
&gt;Angry/bitchy attitudes like yours are what give the rest of the sensible feminists a bad reputation.   *Facepalm.*   &gt;Grow up.   No, you.
That's a good point (though not necessarily worth upvoting on this post). Doctors in the US are not even aware that they're recommending for parents to amputate most of the surface area of "primary erogenous tissue" of the penis ([Cold &amp; Taylor, 1999](http://www.mgmbill.org/theprepuce.pdf)).   Most US doctors seem to think the foreskin would either feel oversensitive or not feel like a part of the penis at all—whichever they think would be worse. Given this enormous gap in understanding of male genital sensitivity and function, it's really not that surprising that understanding of female genital function has remained limited so long as well.
Personally I love seeing a man's perspective around here, I am not one of those people who automatically hates any words that follow "As a man.....". However, if you would like to avoid being accused of mansplaining, I would suggest that you not try to explain any behavior UNLESS you have a female's perspective on what you are discussing. Obviously you're a man, but what I mean by that is, have you been told of an experience as seen through a woman's eyes? Did you "get" what she was saying? Or, did you empathize? If so, then you are commenting *from the female perspective* which is *exactly* what we strive for here.... Even if ultimately you disagreed at the end.  (It would probably help your cause if you walked through the relevant history and how you arrived at your disagreement if you would like to avoid downvotes though)  EDIT Just saw your username. Fuck it, I like what I wrote too much to delete.
Intention is what matters :) Don't worry about it, chance is you're going to unintentionally offend a lot of people in your life, we all are :D
[deleted]
COngratulations, you both looked lovely &lt;3
So women are priviledged because they're more likely to get jobs/work in a highly casualised, low paying, barely unionised, low status industry?  I'm not going to call that privilege sorry. It's based in the exact same gender role assumptions that result in serious discrimination against women, e.g. wage gap, glass ceiling etc.   Also, overall men are notably advantaged when they choose to engage in traditional women's professions in a broader sense. As a female teacher I can confirm the teaching profession is begging for male teachers, especially in the public system because a lot of trained male teachers end up going private for the higher pay/better conditions, because they have that option moreso than a female teacher with identical training/experience (private schools average about 25-30% of their classroom teachers being male to 10-15% in public schools).   It massively increases your chance of employment to be a male teacher because the profession is so female dominated, and parents in fact want role models of both genders for their children - understandably tbh, but it does make finding employment much easier for men. Being male also significantly increases your chance of promotion, and wages and status that comes with that, e.g. while 80% of classroom teachers are female, 80% of school principals are male. I'm led to believe there a similar situation in nursing as well, but must admit I haven't looked into that in any depth.  I'll also add in that literally every single thing that I've ever seen men complain about regarding people treating them as if they are some sort of risk to children has absolutely also been said to me in the course of my training and practice as a teacher, as well as to every other teacher I know. Men seem to take it much more personally, because I guess they aren't used to being treated like that (which is purely conjecture based on personal experience admittedly).
[deleted]
Why *wouldn't* a female-centric subreddit commonly discuss women's rights movements?
Where did I say any of that? My point is, if a woman benefits from stereotypical prejudices that result in her being considered over a man based purely on her gender, that is female privilege (based on the female equivalent of white privilege as defined by [this famous webcomic](http://jamietheignorantamerican.tumblr.com/post/72154890106/go-forth-and-educate-yourselves)).  I agree that gender role assumptions result in discrimination to both genders, but that doesn't make what I have said any less true.
I've personally never made them, but my relatives in Colorado do.
That could actually not be further from the truth, in fact it reads like a satire.  Try actually visiting /r/mensrights sometime. They **hate** traditional gender roles.  It's ignorance like yours that prevents progress. And people will believe you without seeing for themselves how wrong you are. You perpetuate incorrect information because you formed your opinion on limited and incorrect information.  Just talk to them, for fucks sake. Don't link to a shitty Wikipedia article about some movement from the 70s that's now apparently conflated with the modern movement for men's rights.  And they are not anywhere near the same as TRP! Stop being such liars! There's no hating women, treating them as objects or whatever else, in fact discussions about the impact of change on women regularly come up. They care about everyone, seriously. 
cute &lt;3
&gt;It's not like every guy knows what his asshole looks like  Uh, I'm pretty sure we all do. Plus, as a woman, how would you know that?
Yep. For every guy I have been friends with, I have lost one who I didn't want to be "more than friends" with. I have never had a guy stay friends with me after he said he wante to date and I said I didn't. None ever really explained, just disappeared. Some after years of friendship. They tend to act annoyed for confused. I think they fail to believe that I simply didn't look for the same traints in a spouse than I did in a friend, and can't help but feel offended. Fair enough, no one like their feelings to be unreturned. 
They're the most popular form of contraceptive in the world for a reason. Most people don't have negative experiences.
This is most bars, friend... even upmarket ones. And all transit. And libraries...  and streets... This is just incessant. We have to maneuver around this anywhere and everywhere.
It is hard to imagine why you would feel embarrassed. You are so strong and you've been through so much. I would not think less of a friend who told me this. Actually it makes me embarrassed because I whine about things that are barely even problems.   I guess we are always our own worst critics. 
At one of my high schools we had a pep rally and I was very surprised (and confused) when some boys came out and started stripping down to their underwear and hip thrusting everywhere.   I think it was some kind of underwear contest and I was very confused as to why this was happening at school and why no one else thought it was weird.  Us girls couldn't wear thin strapped tank tops but it was totally okay for these boys to run around in fancy thongs, hip thrusting around the gym.
The thing is, guys hide a lot of this behaviour from other guys. It's so amazing how different the world is when walking/being somewhere with a boyfriend vs. being alone - just two different worlds. The moment your BF (or even any man) isn't near you, the whole complexion of the world changes &amp; male behaviours become apparent. I've never been catcalled when with a BF but it happens a lot when I'm walking alone - this helps explain why so many men are so oblivious to what women experiences with men in public. The moment one of these creeps thinks he has a free lane and won't be surveilled by another guy, he's in there immediately. I think women learn to see this coming and avoid it by a whole range of evasive maneuvers. BTW while I'm extremely independent and not averse to telling guys to eff off, I do sometimes appreciate it when a decent guy notices what's going on and steps in to head the creep off at the pass. I also appreciate it when bartenders do this - as the best ones will do, male or female.
But how would seven year olds even be able to follow dieting behaviours? Parents are the ones to feed them and watch their eating patterns.
It's called a double standard for a reason.
"What about men" is derailing.  "I feel bad for you because you're so angry" is concern trolling.  Go to the twox front page. There is an awesome post addressing this right now.  So no. You're wrong. Buh-bye.
I disagree. What I see is a consistent theme directed at 2XC since it has become default is that outsiders have suddenly become "interested" and decided that if women discuss unpleasant experiences and verbalize some pain or conflict about it they are automatically calling themselves victims. There is actually quite a bit of dialogue here that does focus on women standing up for themselves but it is not couched in this bootstrapping bullshit so it gets named as the victim trope.   
Can't it be assumed that I wasn't referring to sexism that is exclusively men on women? Otherwise I wouldn't have asked for examples.
&gt;But I think men that come in here to support women feel the need to point out when false claims are made.   And that's usually inappropriate. When people are expressing frustration at being marginalized, it's not the right time to tell them that they're technically wrong (especially when what's really going on is that two people place different values on different outcomes). It's the right time to listen to where that frustration is coming from, and explore your reflexive responses: are you defensive? Empathetic? Annoyed? Apathetic? Thrilled? Emotions are all equally valid, but not all emotional expression is equally appropriate in every context.
[deleted]
Bilgerman, the parent post in this comment thread, in his first response to me.
[deleted]
[deleted]
the pick up artist community gets a lot of flak but one thing they teach is find out which girls are interested.  there are way too many women to try to convert the ones who arent.
&gt; unless they're from the asshole trolls we've acquired.  Bingo!  We should now proceed to drown them in cervical mucous.
[deleted]
Can someone explain to me how saying not all men is derailing? It seems like I've heard this a lot recently and it seems like a way of getting away with over generalizations. Do you really think that everyone that says it is a debate ninja with a master derailment plan or that its a natural reaction to broad accusations? I mean I've complained to plenty of women about women and they're the first to say "not all women".   And "what about men" seems valid. I mean you have to have something to compare this to. I have a 100% chance of dying some day, and that sounds terrible, until you realize so does everyone else.   But your list of things people aren't allowed to do basically means the only thing that is allowed is agreeing with you. And asking questions isn't trying to silence you, its actually trying to speak.  Edit: I just reread your comment. Just because someone made a post about something in an attempt to write off, by default, anyone that uses a certain phrase or question, does not mean you or they are right. I'm sure you wouldn't like it if people trained there followers to disregard your questions or concerns.
She's beautiful! Hope you two have a long fulfilled, happy marriage :)
That's insane. You'd save tons by making a playlist and dumping the DJ. Just my unmarried opinion but there are a lot of typical wedding expenses that can't really be justified. 
I'd recommend doing some kind of self-defence class/course. Your attitude is most important thing. If you do get a gun, or some other weapon, again train to use it. Pulling a gun, or knife is great when it scares the person off (and it often will), but if you hesitate, or aren't really willing to use it (and up until that point you may believe you are) you've just escalated the situation.  Self-Defence VS Martial Arts.  A lot of Martial Arts take a lot of time to get to a useful level, and while they can be useful, a lot of what you learn might not be. Also, you have the manner of training, some Arts/Gyms have very strenuous, and stressful training (suitable to your level), and this is helpful for self-defence. Other form, or sport (although Judo + a Self-Defence class isn't bad) based martial arts can be less useful. In the end, the most important thing is the instructor. I'd suggest Martial Arts if you have an interest in them as hobby, or a way to keep fit as well.  Krav Maga has a reputation, for being an 'easy' to learn, quick and dirty self defence Martial Art. I have no experience with it... Again, look for reviews of the class/instructor.  Self-Defence courses... Again... Look for reviews.  Last of all... Try to avoid dangerous situations. If you can't avoid one, try and extricate yourself as quickly as possible (run away). Lastly, fighting is the last resort, It might be worth resisting a rapist, but you may want to hand over your phone. Choose carefully.  
[deleted]
Thank you! I am going to post again once I have more photos. These were a few of the photos that were sent to me right after the wedding. I want to wait to post the budget once I have more pictures of the venue.
No shit, that's why this only cost 5k.  Genius here.
If a man is reading this, and thinks that he can file for rape after drunk sex; you best have a damn fine lawyer.
I didn't mean talking to them like a child. I understand that they don't understand. I'm talking about people who talk to them really rudely, like the senile person is intentionally not understanding. And when they're insulting them. One of my aunts would be like that with my great grandmother. My other aunts would just talk to the senile grandmother like she was a child.  Sorry that I wasn't very clear. I'm very glad that you're helping your mother. You must be a very caring daughter or son.
[deleted]
[deleted]
If you want to try and take a load off of yourself, it might be a lot easier on you if you try thinking about the emotional injuries he got from his past relationships in terms of actual physical injuries.  For instance, if you think of his ability to love and receive love in the same terms you would think of his ability his ability walk, then he has the emotional equivalent of a broken leg; he used to walk just fine, he even really enjoyed walking, and he would love to be able to walk right now with you, but he is incapable of walking until his leg heels (with you or with anyone else), so the best he can do is tell you that he would love to go for a walk with you once he's healed.  Time (and maybe some therapy) heals all wounds; don't be too hard on yourself.
I definitely agree.  I'm an 18 year old male, first year of university... ALL of my closest friends have had it away, and the entirety of my friendship group are predominately females, (when I say predominately I mean, they all are.)   The amount of pressure I receive from them, "Oh why don't you want to get laid like the other boys?" - Must I really provide an answer? Perhaps I don't want to? Perhaps I physically can't?  And I went to an all-boys school last year. The pressure was astronomical there, the testosterone driven conversation was akin to that of the British Television Show - The Inbetweeners. And those who weren't 'lucky enough' were branded 'virgins' or 'faggots' - which forced a lot of people to lie about their 'virgin status.'  And yes, I do remember the 'conquering' mindset. - it's very common. Quantity not quality. - was the oft heard tagline throughout my school.  At the end of the day, the type of men who engage in these 'activities' shall we say, are incredibly desperate and are obviously incapable of respecting another person's wishes. Recommendation: Steer clear of them.
High school doesn't last forever. Experiences do. You don't have to do partying, but maybe try something else? It sounds as though you're slightly introverted. Try doing things in your own. Fun things. And then hit up a party once with them. They sound like they care about you. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
Thank you for this post. I recall the news when Dr. Tiller was murdered. It made me recall another story- one that happened a few years earlier to another doctor.   http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/David_Gunn_%28doctor%29  I never met either man, but I will never forget  seeing Dr. Gunn's son speak on a TV show not long after his death.   Both have made an impact on my thinking and pushed me to a deeper commitment to choice.
Me!! I think mine is cute!
[deleted]
Insurance really does suck, but I'll do all of the calls I need to today. Thank you for letting me know to do that!
I'm sorry about your cast situation...they're no fun at all.  I'm in the southeast US.
I get the feeling you´re the troll. Your response to u/gmule furthers this.  On the point, i think possible troll post should be answered as short and concise as possible, maybe link to an appropriate faq. About the pms i don´t know because i don´t get those (male here) and i would certainly not judge the feelings/reactions of those who do.  Edit: if you´re serious about this discussion maybe take it to /r/theoryofreddit
[deleted]
Oh, my. That last pic is so freaking adorable. :)
Some people are simply asexual.  Seems like you might have married one.  If that's true, you can keep the marriage and have sex elsewhere.  You don't need to be dishonest about it, but living your life without sex because they don't want it is just stupid after a point.  Societal rules about sex and value are worthless, there's common sense rules about respecting and loving yourself and being happy in life that matter more.  Go have some fun, decide if you actually want to stay married. 
Yes! At least, I'm pretty sure that's a normal reaction. Even when I see someone who even looks like my ex or smells like him, I get agitated, flustered, and panicky. I have yet to actually see him in person, so I have no idea how I'll react if that day ever comes, but I'm sure I'll have the same reaction as you do. 
[deleted]
"Says the sexist girl who spit it out."  ?  "You are literally acknowledging your sexism here." How the fuck is that sexism? Majority: More than half.   "Does anyone? You're sexist and childish. I doubt it's about your gender when most of the people you meet lack respect for you."  The majority of people enjoy my company, thanks. Saying "sexist" more times isn't going to make it any more believable, hon.  "I'll back off on that one because I missed the word 'many' in 'many men don't see women as people'."  See, I use ***MANY*** men intentionally because no, not all men are like that. There are a lot that are, but not all of them. And as a gender, there's nothing wrong with them. What's wrong is the standards perpetuated by society that men are required to meet so as to prove their manliness.  "The hell would I know? I'm not treating you like a walking pair of breasts right now, I'm treating you like the sexist child you are."  You're treating me like I'm not allowed to have an opinion.   "This is literally everything you're writing in this thread. You are a flat out moron. Gender's not your problem, immaturity (and stupidity) is."  Dude, what the fuck? How... how... *how*... **how**... ***HOW*** do you get sexism from anything I've said? Sexism would be saying "KILL ALL MEN ALL MEN ARE ASSHOLES ALL MEN HATE WOMEN ALL MEN ARE EVIL" which is NOWHERE CLOSE to what i'm saying or what i believe.   I think men and women should be equal. I don't think men should be "better" than women (no, that's not sexism, dearest) and I don't think that women are "better" or should rule the world or anything either. I think that if men are allowed to... walk around topless, for instance, so should women. I think that if attractive women get fired for being "distractions" so should attractive men...  Pretty sure that's the definition of "equality"? Not "sexism"?
Just because no one else has stated it and it should be: No one should tell you how you're supposed to feel, trebeck_x.    I would encourage you to take some time to examine your thoughts and feelings on sex and if and/or why it's important to you.  I would even more strongly encourage you to discuss your questions with your SO since they're the only one who can answer your questions regarding their actions and feelings to you.  My own opinion is irrelevant for you unless you're still seeking external opinions, so you're free to stop reading after this.  It is my opinion that the motives for having or not having sex are far more opinion than the amount of sex, and that no one should ever have to feel slighted or wrong about why they fornicated with a consenting adult. If there are differences, it is Not a matter of 'right' nor 'wrong', but entirely about compatibility - it's a tough topic to discuss honestly and as there's so much social stigma though, so be sure to give yourself and your SO enough time to answer without feeling pressured to give 'the right' answer.  Secondly, in my opinion, the quantity of sex anyone else has or has not had in the past is only significant in a context of being able to express what sexual engagements that person does or does not like, and that for any relationships before entering a long-term stage it's a good idea to discuss sexual drives with your SO as well so you can get a feel for each of your libidos and express how important physical release is as well.  That said, that conversation is about expressing how important sex is to you both, to avoid potential misunderstanding such as potentially you misunderstanding that just because you are not horny does not mean that they are not either.  Nor is it that talk intended as a scheduling mechanism - spontaneity is an excellent spice for the dish of romance.  Anyways, the #1 most important part of a relationship is communication, and when the non-verbal forms aren't conveying, it's time to resort to the verbal.  Be well, be the kind of person you want yourself to be, and happiness is something you build for yourself with others.
Do the men of the family have to keep their nipples hidden?
My comment falls under Rule #1: no... Assholery.
Is it that hard to snap a picture with your phone?  To call 911?  To alert someone - anyone - that this happened.  You, the bystanders, your (awful) friend..  you all did nothing.  You want to complain about it but you don't want to actually *do* anything about it, or do anything to prevent it from happening again to the next girl.  Because that would be a "waste of your time."  As long as women like you do nothing, don't expect the problem to go away.  But hey, keep complaining to Redditt if it makes you feel good.  It's clearly easier than "wasting" your time by being part of the solution.  
[CONTINUED]  [:17  [My friend]: I can't believe I have to explain this to you.   In this culture, there is oppression, on both sides, but as it stands, I'm only looked at something to relieve pleasure. I don't mind, I've gotten used to it, that's why who I am and who I am so in to trust relationships. But throughout my entire life, girls have been raped and you know the first thing they ask you in court?  [:22  [My friend]: "What were you wearing"?  [:28  [My friend]: Why did it matter what I WAS WEARING?  [:34  [My friend]: WHY DID IT FUCKING MATTER?  [:39  [Some guy]: It does matter.  [:41  [Some guy]: God damnit.  [:44  [My friend]: HE FUCKING HELD ME DOWN AND BEAT ME BLOODY AND BLIND IN ONE EYE AND RAPED ME.  [:47  [Some guy]: It's not your fault if you were naked at all.  [:59  [Some guy]: It's never your fault if you're raped.  [:04  [My friend]: I have terrible FUCKING EYESIGHT BECAUSE OF THIS  [:08  [Some guy]: The information shouldn't matter in court or anything.  [:09  [My friend]: I WAS RAPED AND THE FIRST THING THEY ASK  [:13  [My friend]: IS "WHAT WERE YOU WEARING?"  [:15  [Some guy]: Yes, that is stupid.  [:16  [My friend]: IT DOESN'T MATTER.  [:17  [My friend]: HE DID IT.  [:24  [My friend]: THIS IS WHY I FUCKING HATE PEOPLE WHO SAY THERE'S NO OPPRESSION.  [:27  [Some guy]: But what you wear does matter like, in an overall sense.  [:32  [My friend]: It doesn't. Unless you consent.  [:35  [My friend]: Unless YOU SAY YES.  [:36  [Some guy]: No I mean.  [:38  [My friend]: HE CANNOT TOUCH YOU.  [:41  [My friend]: THERE IS NO FUCKING RIGHT.  [:42  [Some guy]: No matter what you wear.  [:48  [Some guy]: They don't have a right to.  [:52  [Some guy]: They aren't allowed to.  [:56  [My friend]: Then why does it matter?  [:58  [Some guy]: But protecting yourself by dressing up is just... Smart.  [:05  [Some guy]: It's called not being a fuckin' idiot.  [:12  [Some guy]: If you're naked in a shady ally with a bunch of hobos.  [:16  [Some guy]: Expect to be fucking raped mate.  [:19  [My friend]: I was wearing jeans, a t-shirt and some cufflinks on my right arm.  [:22  [Some guy]: Then yes, you're fine.  [:30  [Some guy]: But when girls strip naked and say 'Not asking for it.'  [:36  [Some guy]: And it's just like.  [:37  [Some guy]: No you're not.  [:38  [My friend]: They're not asking for it.  [:40  [Some guy]: You're just being stupid.  [:45  [My friend]: There shouldn't be this  [:52  [Some guy]: You know how it works?  [:55  [My friend]: "It matters because there are people who will rape you if you're naked"  [:07  [Some guy]: YOU CAN'T TEACH THOSE PEOPLE NOT TO RAPE.  [:09  [My friend]: I shouldn't have to wear a fucking army-suit to ward off rapists.  [:12  [Some guy]: THESE ARE PEOPLE WHO ARE SICK IN THE HEAD.  [:16  [My friend]: YET YOU KNOW WHAT?  [:20  [My friend]: when was the last time you heard  [:25  [My friend]: that because a guy dressed a certain way  [:32  [My friend]: he was raped by a woman  [:36  [My friend]: this is the culture i'm talking about  [:42  [My friend]: it teaches men, certain men, that fall through the cracks  [:44  [My friend]: that because you're horny  [:47  [My friend]: even if she's crying  [:48  [Some guy]: You... Believe in rape culture, don't you?  [:48  [My friend]: it's okay  [:58  [Some guy]: You're outright wrong.  [Some guy]: No one teaches people that.  [Some guy]: Sick people make up excuses for that.  [My friend]: Answer my question.  [My friend]: When was the last time a guy was oppressed by a female because of his looks.  [My friend]: Sexually.  [Some guy]: No it doesn't happen.  [Some guy]: But these are sick people.  [Some guy]: This isn't what people are taught or a part of culture.  [Some guy]: This is people making an excuse.  [My friend]: And there are people who aren't as sick who still don't believe that because I didn't consent I am playing 'hard to get'.  [My friend]: That's what people are taught.  [My friend]: If girls reject you, they're playing hard to get.  [Some guy]: NO ONE IS TAUGHT THAT.  [Some guy]: PEOPLE ARE JUST STUPID SOMETIMES.  [Some guy]: URGH.  [Some guy]: PEOPLE ARE SICK FREAKS, THEY'RE STUPID, THEY'RE AWFUL.  [My friend]: That's what we deal with when we go to bars or even just meetups.  [Some guy]: Urgh...  [Some guy]: You're one of those...  [Some guy]: Some people are fucking selfish.  [My friend]: I'm done. Alright.  [Some guy]: These men probably aren't sexist.  [Some guy]: These men are most likely just outright selfish.  [Some guy]: These men probably treat other men the same way.  [Some guy]: I don't think you understand how it works.  [Some guy]: People use excuses, reasons, 'culture', 'upbringing' to try to excuse them from their selfishness.  [Some guy]: Instead of outright admitting that they just wanted someone to fuck right then, and they want to keep trying.  [Some guy]: There is nothing I hate more than selt entitled feminist fucks.
Ahh wish I could Upvote many times. Dem ears! 
Self posts don't get karma. ;)
&gt;Disclaimer: NOT ALL MEN. I'm not being sarcastic. xD this is directed at a VERY particular kind of commenter, but one I'm seeing WAY too much of. So here we go.    I'm glad you wrote that disclaimer, because it highlights a point I want to make. Here on reddit, we hear a lot about women making false rape claims and using the "sexual harassment card" on innocent guys.   I think all these stories scares guys, making us feel like we have to be extremely careful when saying and doing things, so that it isn't interpreted as harassing or degrading. That's why many become hostile as soon as they see women discussing equality. They feel like it has backfired hard.   The thing is, yes things like this happen, but 99,99^99^9^9 % of interactions between the genders are completely normal. We only see the bad stuff because that's what gets reported.   The people getting all worked up here, both genders, are people that hasn't taken a step back, seeing the whole picture.
He does have corrections and he allowed me to put that so people could easily find them.
He did so much good for so many women, and was courageous in sticking by his job in spite of the danger.   Thank you for posting this! 
I know that feeling. Now whenever anyone is playing any sport I automatically duck. 
[deleted]
[Please read this before commenting in a similar fashion in the future.](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/wiki/faq#wiki_i.27m_prolife.2C_everyone_else_here_appears_to_be_prochoice.2C_am_i_allowed_to_post_here.3F)
[deleted]
Being creepy isn't Shy guy asking you out....   Creepy is more behaviors like: do you follow her around?  show up unannounced? act mad if she says no?  take "no" as "Try harder"?   do you have the posture of a predator sizing up prey?  do you "smell like deperation"?  (the guy who thinks his life is a mess, or KNOWS his life is a mess... and "if I just got a girlfriend my life would be awesome!"  or "I just want some real sex SO BAD...  why won't some girl just sleep with me already...."  )   In which case the predacious POV or the desperation is the real problem not the lack of female attention.   
THANK YOU.
The "Honor Harrington" series (sci fi) pretty much shaped who I am today. Written by David Weber, they focus on a woman (Honor Harrington) and her journey from midshipwoman to full on admiral. They're incredibly well-written and I love her character.
yeah that's the problem now I think, and most of the women from what I hear didn't want this to become public because a lot of people who wouldn't normally comment on it are now joining the conversations. I bet a lot of the more serious discussions like rape and abuse might end up happening elsewhere
[deleted]
[deleted]
I certainly don't feel the same way.
A hysterectomy is a major surgery with major aftereffects. Doctors don't remove organs unless there's a medical need for it.   If you don't want more kids, there are less risky measures like tubal ligation or Essure. If you don't want to have periods anymore, there are less risky measures, like endometrial ablation. 
This prompts so many questions: How did/would women respond to purposefully sexualised pictures of men? Is the 'tool' and 'non-human' brain area activation a result of the medium (photos)? What role does the medium play in these results? Do the results actually imply sexism and tendencies toward inequality or basic cognitive function?   Either the quote is vague or the experiment wasn't nearly robust enough to my liking.  What about reportage photography? What about testing female subjects as well?     
[deleted]
I almost always have a smile on my face and I do what I can to help people. I hope that doesn't upset them.
Less than 2% is on the order of 10,000 - 20,000 per year in the USA. By comparison, there are 6,000 liver transplants done in the USA per year.
[deleted]
[deleted]
don't go on a "break" or give ultimatums. that just creates more drama and stress
Awww! My dog would flip out if he ever saw snow. And he just recently learned how to do stairs... that was a proud moment for me. I always felt so dumb when  we'd walk up 10 stairs and I'd have to pick him up. Your puggy will learn one day! 
I am glad you reposted. I gather most people here don't  realize how hateful they sound.
Not looking down on anyone, just stating that I don't understand it. I've had a lot of celebrations, none of which cost more than a few hundred dollars. I just don't see where thousands of dollars would go.  I know people think its a special day, but really its not, there are 2,077,000 weddings every year in the USA alone. And around half of those end in divorce.   But I'm one of those people who hate weddings.  
[deleted]
&gt; If you were selected as the person to choose how late women needed to have a medical reason to do it, what would it be?   It's a medical decision between the woman, her doctor and her partner if she has one. I don't see why we as a society should have a vote on other people's medical decisions that don't affect us. Doctors know how to deal with difficult ethical decisions, I say we let them. 
Remember that the guys your age are just as inexperienced in relationships as you. Even sincere, nice guys might say stupid stuff that they *think* you would like to hear, and none of the sentiments were disrespectful, even if calling someone hot carries a little more sexual connotation than I would use. Coming at the right time and from the right person you might be happy to receive any of these compliments.  Being an apparently attractive young lady you will have to get used to receiving compliments like this. Better to just say thank you but otherwise not encourage any more when you're not interested.
I'm not judging "all guys" (NOTE THE GODDAMN FACT THAT I SAID "MANY" NOT "ALL" NOT "MOST" NOT "THE MAJORITY" MANY, MOTHER FUCKER).   I was specifically talking about my experience with those guys who hit on my at bars and those who hit on me in other places and won't take no for an answer. I'm not fucking talking about all men, get over it. 
Why is that weird?
My mom taught me to sew starting around age...four? I think. It can't have been any earlier; she was convinced I would put my eye out. Hand-sewed until age 10, when I hijacked her machine.   Doll clothes have always been my favorite things to do. They're small, so cheap fabric and scraps!yay!, pretty quick, and fairly simple to finish, so my impatient self can whip them out in a couple of hours and be onto the next project.  Still sew (check my other posts...) for a living AND for fun. My trusty little machine gets to clank away at all hours of the day and night!
Interesting read. I am not very acquainted with #Yesallwomen, probably because few of my friends use it. Even my female feminist friends. Anyway, I found your debate interesting because it seems to touch on the heart of what is a very relevant topic in modern gender debate - to my mind at least: The difficulty of many people creating meaningful categories. For instance: "You are talking about the problem of physical violence husbands inflict on their wives HENCE you neglect the men who are abused, trying to create a narrative where all men are abusers and women are always the abused who must be defended". (Crazy feminist category) Er yea, I dont know if that response is particularily relevant to your case, but it is what I popped into my head reading it.
I'm one of those people who will probably get married in a courthouse or not get married at all and spend that money on a nice long vacation and spend time together. Some women spend SO much on their weddings... its nuts! I just think of all the different things I could do with that money.
I mean I don't see it in the TwoX section anywhere. I can still see it if I come directly but if you go to TwoX and filter by new it's not there. 
Alright since you seem to think these are high profile modeling jobs, let me come at it from a different angle. There is nothing to be ashamed of for taking a job. There is something to be ashamed of for being so misogynistic that you think it's alright to objectify women like this.
I pulled them aside one by one as the different cars pulled up, without making a scene. 
GROSS I clean mine like crazy after even a friend uses it. 
My mom taught me to use a sewing machine when I was in 4th it 5th grade. I enjoyed making things and so I continued, mostly making stuffed animals and doll clothes.   Good thing, too. Fast forward to junior high/high school. We were really poor, and so many of my clothes came from my cousin, who was the same age as me but about four years taller and bigger. This was embarrassing because in 9th grade, my clothes were not only four years out of style, but were also clothes bought and meant for a fifth-grader. So I'd alter them, ripping off the pants pockets and adjusting the legs. Or turning shirts inside out, changing the silhouette, and painting a design on the back. I don't think anyone in school realized what was happening, they just thought I had a creative style, and I did get lots of compliments.   Fast forward another 25 years, and I'm still doing the same thing, except now I buy dollar clothes from thrift stores and alter them. My favorite thing so far had been "shirt-pants". The arms became the pants legs, the front of the shirt the top part of the pants, and the collar became the waistband.   I'm so grateful my mom taught me how to sew, and grateful that my family didn't strongly discourage me from altering my clothes, even though I know they were embarrassed to be seen with me in some of my creations. 
I thought when they let you out of jail it's because you paid your debt to society. Wouldn't that make him a former criminal? 
Downvote if you must, but George Tiller was a bold advocate if killing defenseless babies, many far enough along to have survived if he hadn't ended their lives. Choice begins prior to conception and ends when there is a new human life, complete with its own unique DNA, blood type, etc.   I don't advocate the murder of anyone, but to paint this soulless man as a hero turns my stomach.  I have heard every argument on both sides, and every single one falls apart when you replace the word "fetus" with the word "baby."
anti-choice.
Is this what it's like to be a default subreddit?
I was going to say this too. I've had this before. Give it a week or 2 before you freak out. If its still there in 2 weeks or it's worse THEN go see a Dr.
Thanks MetaBoob!  What's the proper etiquette for asking over there?  Do I cut and paste and make a new post or some how link it to the new subreddit?
Oh, I know it doesn't matter, it's just that sometimes I feel like I'm missing out on the lady-perspective.  All of my close friends are men.
Same here! Especially if we're meeting up for a girls night out, or a birthday party or something, people have usually spent some extra time curling their hair, or finding a nice top to wear. 
Nice you've provided so much to this topic: You read the first sentence. Congrats.
And it updates every Tuesday! 
No. People didn't do that stuff where I grew up. I never learned, although I know that as an adult if I had an interest I could take it upon myself to learn. But it's just not something that interests me, like not my cup of tea.
[Fix the problem](http://www.gunblast.com/images/AR15_HBARs/Mvc-055f.jpg)
I get those things all the time(ingrown hair or pimple)...they go away after a few weeks if you leave them alone. If you still have one after a month THEN I'd go see a doctor...  -also not a doctor
My second account is also having its comments filtered, so I'm responding with a new account  ==  A better example would be a bunch of convenience store clerks and customers, sitting around, telling stories about late-night hold-ups. Everyone is talking about how a small percentage of people you'd think are customers will pull out a weapon and rob a store.  One of the customers then recounts a story when he was innocently buying some gum, and a clerk mistook him for a robber, and hit him in the head with a bat, just to make the point that it's not always the customer that turns out to be the bad guy.  All I got for my story is victim blaming, to be made to feel like I brought the violent assault on myself. This whole thing was a shameful demonstration of humans lacking empathy for each other, because of some artificial human construct called gender that is supposed to tell us who is good and who is bad.  &gt;A reformed robber joins in the discussion, says he knows he shouldn't have stolen, but geez he only took 2 little candy bars and didn't even have a gun,   I didn't do the equivalent of rob her. Hitting on someone is not a violent act. I was friendly and non-threatening. The two girls were roughly my size, outnumbered me 2-1, and we were in a busy area. Being a man doesn't make me automatically threatening. I've had girls tap me on my shoulder, and do other physical things, when hitting on me. There's a difference between a light physical touch on a shoulder, and grabbing someone's ass, or pulling them to the ground, or physically preventing them from leaving.  I was not the aggressor in this case at all. This would be like a girl tapping a guy on the shoulder, flirting with him, then getting raped, and then everyone telling her she brought it on herself. You're victim blaming me because I'm a man, and men are automatically aggressors in any interaction with women, if they happen to be sexually interested in the woman, according to the prevailing wisdom here.
You might want to be specific about what region you're talking about, as far as I understand the laws in my region there are conditions under which notice is necessary, although I don't understand what repercussions there are for not completing it.
Nope. I shave my arms in addition.
Very true.  And some want to make it illegal and are just wrong, not evil.  In my opinion we should avoid demonizing the other side as people and focus on why they are wrong on policy.
I don't use any backup with Paragard. I can't stand spermicidal condoms so I haven't tried VCF. I'd recommend doing a test patch first if you don't know if you're sensitive/allergic.
Some girls are [straight shooters.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=b8iOg57ZmIE)  Some girls [have an edge.](http://imgur.com/K53kzbA)  Some girls [fly high.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Kara_Hultgreen)  Some girls are [out to sea.](http://www.theguardian.com/uk/2011/aug/08/royal-navy-first-female-commander)  Best of all - every girl is capable is simply [being](http://www.channelcast.tv/wp-content/uploads/2012/12/Gaia-energy.jpg), even thought *that* may be at times more difficult than all of the above combined.  [Namaskar, sisters.](http://www.urbandictionary.com/define.php?term=Namaskar) 
The notable thing about the failure rate of vasectomies is that if failure does occur, it is almost always within the months following the procedure. The longer you've had it done, the less likely it is to fail.   Once you're two years out, the failure rate is nearer to zero than any other form of birth control. Its something no other birth control method can boast -- for those methods, the rate of failure remains the same whether its been used for one month or 10 years.  So long as you follow doctors instructions (use a back up bethod for the first 3 months, semen analysis at 3 months), its a great option.   With that said of course -- regardless of birth control, I think it has nada to do with her choice to abort. Just a suggestion for her going forward, since she's had bad luck with IUDS. 
[deleted]
I can rock a sewing machine. However I get pissed off with things like hems. This is why my curtains at university were made of fleece. 
Go read the stories of the women who went to him. The vast majority of those pregnancies were very,  very much wanted,  and loved.  Tests showing problems incompatible with life,  or quality of life,  are often done after 20 weeks, and leave women seeking late abortions out of compassion, not soulessness.    Having read and listened to their stories,  comments like these make it hard for me to keep my cool.  
there are many people who don't trust women to make choices about their lives and bodies.
Yes, I got taught both in school in about 97 or 98. I don't have a machine, but I do small things like fixing tears.
I'm envious of her.
That's very admirable, but the ones you mentioned, like violence against women, you can't truly prevent. The best you can do is teach her not to be with someone that has those tendencies. Unfortunately since its such a rampant societal problem, there's only so much you can do.  In my case the only violence I've experienced was at the hands of my own father so you're already a step up. Personally I think that growing up with such a bad example of men (bad father, GGG older brother living elsewhere, uncles absent as well) is what may have contributed to dubious boyfriend/husband choices on my part later on. The best we can do as parents is to teach our children differently than we were taught and try and mitigate the misogyny and abuse.  I think the fact that you have all that in mind before your daughter is even born is a very good sign.
Exactly, not to mention you have a child, meeting other parents who share your interests through that medium can be easy sometimes.
How do you know?   Lot's of churches do meaningful charity work and help people. 
[deleted]
The bright side is you have a job!  I live in Arizona.  It is a 'right to work state'.  Do some research to find out what that means.  For me and my last job,  it means that the owner didn't need any reason at all to fire me!  There really is no protection for you once you work for the employer.  If they want you gone, they needn't give you any explanation.  
I believe it's specifically stating that he believed in women and their ability to be the arbiters of their fate.  A lot of men actually don't believe in that.
Find a high-end daycare! I actually think center-based care is a great alternative and really helps with first-time parenting. Think about the economies of scale involved. Infants require constant, focused attention. That is hard for anybody. At a daycare center, 3 or 4 adults can take turns giving the baby their full attention. Also, think about the books and toys. You would have to purchase a ton of stuff to be as well-stocked as a daycare center. Also, other children are stimulating for your child. Finally, at my daycare center the staff have years of experience with small children. They give me great insight into what's going on with my child. I would never choose to try to provide childcare by myself, I don't think I would do as good a job as I do with the added resources from my daycare center.   Everybody makes their own choices. I just wonder if you have given daycare a full evaluation. 
He's racking up new debt. 
My mother's second wedding was less than 1k. Weddings don't need an open bar. They had a potluck, booze by donation. The money went to renting the church, my mum's dress (made by a friend), and the live music. It was a good time.
It's legal. What's illegal is for references to lie about it, which is why sometimes they protect themselves from litigation by just confirming employment. IANAL but I learned this from [Ask a Manager](http://ask a manager.org).
Agreed...nobody is saying that a man who wants to keep the child should be able to force a woman to carry a child.   But If a woman doesn't want a child she is able to make that decision for the man and the woman.  So the man should be allowed his option of being able to opt out of the pregnancy by being released of financial responsibility.  Women have a choice and so should men.
That must piss you off.  You should send someone a picture of your penis so you feel better.
Get to a dr asap better safe than sorry
You rock with your lack of locks!  I developed alopecia universalis a few years ago, and the feel of the shower over my head is awesome, as well as everything you described. It is a freeing feeling. I understand your mom's concerns though, but frankly, a lot of people just mind their own business, I've only been asked if I'm going through chemo about 4 times in the last 5 years. It's been a hell of ride for me, as I didn't have a choice in the matter, but I'm slowly coming around to embracing my dome. I just miss my eyebrows and eyelashes more than the rest of my hair.
You want one ?
And shouldn't it?  Catholics are pro life. 
That's extremely worrying. The statistics have been around for a long time now, but I never realized such lengths were taken to outright ignore/deny them.
Hahaha, thank you! No, I totally get it :)  Dude, the shower-- it's so worth it. Especially so since it sounds like you've had hair for quite a long time, it'll feel even more epic. Go for it! 
[deleted]
[deleted]
&gt; Finally a woman on two x thats not completely insane  Although I guess I appreciate the upvote, I am curious; what about my post strikes you as saner than typical comments?   For what it's worth, personally, I don't agree with every comment in this sub by any means (obviously, since there's a lot of varied opinion), but I certainly don't think that every other post here is "completely insane." 
I understand completely. I wouldn't either.  Also, to be honest, I really doubt that he would get in any legal trouble for this, rape kit or not. :/ Frankly, as traumatic as the experience was, it is one of those instances where it's hard to call it rape because, as you said, you gave consent. Unfortunately, coercive sex, while despicable, is not illegal and still qualifies as consensual.  Of course, it sounds like you already know that. Please, go to a professional for help with your recovery. Trauma is so difficult to cope with on your own.  
Yeah, feminists do [love](http://m.youtube.com/watch?v=GO_X4DkwA_Q) MRA's.
AHAHAHA What? This place? It's infested with smug MRAs and mods simply keep them contained there. Not much of discussion though.
You've done nothing wrong, there's a lot of blind down voting going on in this sub since it became a default. Don't let it stop you from posting! 
It's Unfortunate that you've experienced that. There are always bad apples as well as a lot of misinformation out there on the internet regarding them as a group. I don't identify as an MRA, and while I do float around the community, I don't really participate too much. Usually the MRAs I get exposed to are the ones actually discussing the issues, as apposed to people just bitching and complaining.   &gt;They really do believe that life is easy if you're female and hard if you're male. They really do believe that society is anti-male, and that misogyny doesn't exist (or, if it does, women deserve it).  I've seen claims of it being easier to be a woman, but easier doesn't mean easy. Generally though I feel these claims are too subjective.  What we do know is that men are tried and convicted of the same crime more than women, they face harsher prison sentences. Depending on area they are around 1/3 to 1/2 of domestic violence victims but are far more likely to be the one arrested if police are called. Not to mention looked down upon for being a victim. Male genital mutilation is still a normal thing in Canada and the US. There are almost no places for a guy to turn to for help, unless they have the money for professional help. I think all of Canada, at the time of me writing this, might have one shelter for men. But I think i'm wrong, I don't think there are any right now. Government wont fund them.  Men are raised to 'suck it up' and 'deal with it' by 'being a man'. This type of mentality clouds their judgment when they're mistreated. It's easy to brush off sexual harassment when can't tell that it's happening to you. Also you're a man, you can handle anything brah... But when you have that epiphany and realize that these things do happen, and you don't have anybody to talk to about these realizations because most of your guy friends 'don't get it' and female friends insist it 'doesn't happen to guys'. What do you do? How do you deal with that reality? Some people become angry and spiteful, some are more constructive.    I don't know how many hold the idea that society is anti-men, but society has always treated men as a disposable assets. It's part of what makes it difficult to get government support.
Not you in particular, the entire "movement" comes across that way and it doesn't make men listen. Nobody likes being talked down to.  Men realise the actual real implications of sexism, of course they do. Often the reality is different though to the perception of a lot of women. You're not constantly in danger regardless of how it feels, that's called paranoia. You're not going to be attacked and thinking that way is dangerous and only makes people into recluses.  &gt;I can't tell you how many shocked boyfriends I've demonstrated the keys-between-the-fingers technique to.  They're shocked because *that's incredibly paranoid*. You'd probably react the same way if someone told you they carry a knife to ward off attackers, because it's a ridiculous over reaction that goes way beyond a sensible precaution.  &gt;Also, his assaults weren't exactly random.  Yes, he was angry at women and attacked random women. He was also *insane*.  It's the same as quoting a bunch of news articles about women teachers having sex with students and then trying to project that onto *literally every woman* in the most patronising way possible.  "Look, *you* might not be a pedophile, but you need to be told these statistics as if you are or could possibly make a difference somehow."  Imagine being told that, and when you explain that you already know it's horrible and that you don't do it or agree with it for it to be made into a joke and some ineffectual hashtag in an even more patronising way.   "#NotAllWomen, LOL! Let me lecture you about child sex offences anyway because it's *your culture that perpetuates it*!"  Can you see why men are resistant to this sort of generalisation? For many it will turn them against you purely out of spite, and that helps nobody. It's where the extreme end of the anti feminists come from.
[deleted]
Feminists are known to pull fire alarms in order to keep people from hearing about men's issues. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
MOAR LAZERS. Avoid my parts down under, cause you know...
Chicken butt.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Would your SO be ok with you getting sex from somebody else? Seems like that could be a solution if they aren't willing.
You look fantastic! Short hair/no hair is becoming super fashionable right now and it's exciting as hell
Asking for advice from /r/frugal = good  Trying to show off on /r/frugal = being lectured about how you could have been more frugal by your great–depression era grandparents.
Thats why I kept my old singer, only 2 plastic parts, all the rest metal and it is easy to maintain. Plastic will break down, so basically they are making disposable machines. I rebuilt two antique singers and a leather treadle singer. Great machine, just heavy cast iron base that is attached and is a pain to move (getting older and dont want to be carrying that beast around. I am going to put it on wheels with locks.
[deleted]
Some identify as former. I had to become Pro-Choice to actually be Pro-Life. It was kinda awkward, lol.
Again, terminating a pregnancy is NOT the same as failing to support your living, breathing child. No matter how many quotes you cherry-pick to attempt to back it up, your entire argument falls apart when logic enters the picture.Let me use a metaphor that might be simple enough for you to grasp. If you see an egg in your yard, and you get rid of it because you can't/don't want to have chickens, or if you put up a fence to prevent chickens from coming in your yard, that is equivalent to terminating a pregnancy or taking precautions to prevent a pregnancy. If you instead haul a hen and a rooster into your yard, allow them to mate, allow the eggs to hatch, then turn around and say 'what!!?? I didn't want chickens! This is bullshit!' and dump them on your neighbor's doorstep, and do nothing to assist them in raising said chickens, that is akin to your position.  
[deleted]
I'm so sorry sweetheart, no one should deal with that. Please seek medical attention if the pain is that bad! You should also seek out a source of comfort and conversation (not that the lovely ladies here aren't!), like a parent or counselor. You are not to blame for anything that happened tonight. If you said "No", which you made clear that you had, you may want to consider filing assault and sexual abuse against him. I know it won't be easy, but please stay strong. If the pain continues and doesn't subside I would try to see a doctor ASAP. He acted like a piece of shit, and then proved himself to be one. One day at a time, girl. 
No, it's not urging anything.  It is just an explanation.
We are, you said we shouldn't let him off the hook, im offering to do such.  I just believe sending him to jail isnt the right course of action. 
Please do. 
I understand that a lot of people have children going through puberty. I was merely asking her opinion given a reversal of roles, something any therapist would ask their patient. Its a slightly different situation in this case because they're both step parents to each others children, maybe that doesn't complicate things but maybe it does. Thats why i asked, contributing to the conversation and actually trying to achieve something rather than spouting drivel like a lot of other people. Good to see the women of 2X down voting somebody asking relevant questions about the OP's personal feelings and contributing perspectives from a mans standpoint.
You did well young(?) Jedi 
&gt; However he is using the definition of deserved.  This is where he uses the word "deserved":  &gt; Deserved is a different topic.  Meaning what he is saying has nothing to do with what women deserve.   &gt; All I have done is hold certain women's feet to the fire on immoral behaviors that place them at risk, and infer that they are rightly held accountable for them. There was no excusing of the rapes, no justification for them, just a calling to account that women who play on men's sexuality and/or loneliness like con artists in order to treat them like appliances (read: ATM's), or for the benefit of free labor. They are women who are begging for trouble.  I don't know how to respond to this other than quoting one part at a time.   &gt; There was no excusing of the rapes, no justification for them,  Ok.  &gt; behaviors that place them at risk  He is not saying that women deserve to be raped, even when they mistreat men. He is saying that sometimes these behaviors will cause "a tiny fraction of men" to feel entitled to sex from a woman, or possibly to want to rape them out of vengeance, etc.   But he's not saying that's right. He still blames the rapists.   He did say that he doesn't have as much sympathy for a victim who is victimized while doing something immoral, but that is not the same as saying that they deserved it.   If I were to walk up to every stranger I saw, and, from a reasonable distance greet them by saying "Your mom", eventually I would be punched in the face. I don't deserve to be punched in the face - that's a ridiculous escalation from words to violence, but it would still happen eventually, and it would not be surprising to anyone. People would say I was "asking for trouble", in the sense that it is well known that many people out there would react to my actions with violence.   The guy seems like an asshole. I'm not denying that. I think I realized that a long time ago, which is why I don't visit his blog or website, though I do visit the men's rights subreddit a lot, where I don't see people acting the way he does (occasionally a few who are downvoted), and I've long since forgotten that there were links to his website on the side bar.   If people can still get valuable information from him, then that is a good thing, and I would still accept that because he is not saying that women deserve to be raped, and he did not say that all women are to blame for some women who abuse children, or that he would never convict a rapist simply because they are a rapist.   He said that advising women on how to take precautions is not victim-blaming, he said that blaming all women for child abuse/neglect is the same as feminist campaigns that blame all men for something a minority of them do (or tell men not to be offended that women have a sexist bias against them), and he said that he could not find a person accused of rape guilty because there are exceptions and special rules for rape cases that we don't make for any other type of crime, that he believes could prevent all of the evidence from coming forward. 
Yeah no they will rip that stuff up. 
Oh man, they outrage me. I take a bunch of pills just so I *won't* be depressed. If there is some girl out there who wishes she could be depressed so that she can blog about it, "I volunteer as tribute." Please, take my depression.   It's not fun.  It doesn't make me popular.   It doesn't inspire me.   Depression is crushing. It is a cycling reset button, constantly putting me behind in the race. It is crippling. I have an invisible handicap, yet I'm still supposed to perform at level.   Man, this stuff is just enraging. STAHP. 
[deleted]
29 Hardly a padawan ;) 
[deleted]
Oh, honey. I am so, so sorry that this happened to you.   You're not stupid. You're not retarded. You're not a slut. You trusted a guy who turned out to be a giant, coercive asshole who paid no attention to your feelings, how you were reacting, and what you were saying. There is *nothing* wrong with having sex on the first date  *giant hugs*   I think you should go to a doctor, from what you said elsewhere about how you're feeling physically. I really hope that you have someone offline that you feel you could talk to :( 
Scare tactics rely on lumping everyone together because of the actions of one or two people.
Lose the weight to get rid of the guilt! You'll feel accomplished for being back to normal, and you'll save a couple of dollars on pants. Personally, I'd do it for the pants. I love my worn in jeans and shorts. Plus, if you lose weight down the road, after buying new pants, you'll have spent money needlessly. 
Don't get me wrong he isn't the literal devil nor represents the common mra.  I mean you should see my rant on Anita Sarkesian.  But I don't put this kind of thinking past him.   
How are we taking away the fetus's bodily autonomy?  &gt;This is not a health care question and never has been (except where the ACTUAL PHYSICAL LIFE of the mother is at stake  So only life or death issues count as healthcare?  If I have strep throat but I'm likely to live without antibiotics, is it not healthcare to go to the doctor?    &gt;this is about responsibility for one's actions and the choices one makes  In many cases the most responsible choice is an abortion.  &gt;killing/infanticide/extermination/holocaust so as to assuage their guilt at humanity's greatest catastrophe EVER: worse than ALL the most descried acts of history rolled together! Over 50 MILLION humans exterminated by literal butchery and/or chemical execution in 40 years!!!  A few questions for you then.  Is the embryo a person as soon as the sperm hits the egg?  Is that how you define personhood?    Assuming you say yes:  - If there were a fire at a clinic with a room full of frozen embryos, would you risk your life to go save them?  If there was also a room with a few toddlers, would you save a few toddlers or dozens of embryos?  - Do you believe organ donation should be required?  From blood donation to kidneys to all organs from dead people?  - When a woman miscarries, who do you think made that happen?  God?
CONGRATULATIONS, you're part of the problem. You yourself have *just gone and minimised men's issues*.
There needs to be a victim to blame in order for it to be victim blaming, don't you think? Telling people to be careful doesn't require a victim. Yes, people are warned all the time of the shit that can happen when you're under the influence. The amount of alcohol related injuries is astounding. Yes, people who rob others pick easy targets, the drunk guy is an easy target. We don't tell guys to be careful because society doesn't really give a shit what happens to men.
Thank you, darling. Very very kind words.  Anonymous support is incredibly comforting, especially when, like you said, it's hard to ask friends. Thank you. 
If someone from 2x posted in TIL every time a male rapist was granted rights of their child conceived via rape, it would be considered spam because it'd be a constant stream of posting.
That's a weird as hell attempt to explain it away, but in regards to the military they just want to keep everything and everyone professional looking and uniform as good representative of their organization. Women with shaved heads aren't traditionally considered professional looking and if you're looking towards the military to be ground breaking and fashion forward you are going to be pretty surprised.  As for the physically strong remark, you are touching on something much deeper than just a hair cut. Yes, women are on average physically weaker than men. Yes, trying to help someone that you aren't strong enough to actually help can be a risky deal. But beyond that, you are going into the whole "if a woman is strong enough let her into combat" argument which I have strong opinions on but don't really want to get into.  In the meantime, the military just wants their forces to look neat and uniform.
I can see you have a lack of empathy at least.
Y'all are so lucky. I only shave my underarms and legs. I get ingrown hair and scars from where the follicles are, so I have these dark brown (I have tan, caramel colored African-American skin) spots on my legs and underarms wear I shave. I also get underarm skin irritation so I can't even shave everyday. My skin scars is gets discolored from everything, even area where my clothes rub against my skin all the time.
Ok, now I think that you just didn't read the article I posted, because minus the go in groups part, everything else is written there. And people can't rely on groups protecting them all the time, so strangers also need to be aware of how effective rape prevention works (see this ["What would you do"](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=QIiQg5Hz8ic) for an example) 
No one is "ruining" this kids life. You talked earlier about mistakes and consequences this girl needs to take responsibility for. Well,  so does he. He coerced her into sex. He needs to be prepared for the consequences and I guess he'll learn from his mistake.
You're probably right that the guy here can't be legally incriminated. The reason you're receiving such a negative backlash is because you are sympathizing with the asshole who really hurt this girl. Maybe you're trying to give tough love but that's not necessarily what she wants or what she needs. Your logic is fine but your empathy is lacking here. 
[deleted]
You mean the guy who killed viable babies? I disagree with what happened to him very strongly, but let's not make this guy a hero. 
I hope this comment doesn't get buried and I know you've had a lot of responses, but please if you take anything else away from this, know that NOTHING is your fault.  This guy is a creep. Plain and simple. He manipulated, coerced, guilted and hurt you, and that is not okay. I know that right now it all feels very overwhelming and scary and you probably can't stop running things over in your head trying to figure out what else you could have done. The answer is nothing. There's nothing you can do or could have done to make this guy any less the asshole he obviously is.  A few things you might want to consider when the shock of all of this has passed:  1. He mentioned that he has no empathy,  has trouble relating to people and treated you with very little kindness or compassion. Girl, those are warning signs to some deeper emotional and psychological issues. Stay away from him!  2. His actions are blatant coercion and sexual assault. You did not feel comfortable, you did not want to have sex, he used guilt and persuasion to intimidate you. You have every right to pursue legal action against him IF you want to. Even after some time has passed.  3. I would encourage you to tell somebody what happened. Preferrably a trusted adult or someone with some authority. I know that's so so so hard to do, and if you can't right now that's okay. But trust me when I say that keeping this to yourself is not a good idea in the long run.  I'm so sorry that this happened to you. Nobody has the right to touch your body without your express permission, and you always DO have a right to say no, and even to change your mind if you think things are going too far. I hope you're okay. If you need somebody to talk to, you can always send me a PM.
[deleted]
I'm not getting married for another several years down the road, but when I do I'm worried about how much of a fuss it's going to be because I'm the only granddaughter on my father AND mother's side, and my SO is the oldest grandchild of a huge Italian family.
I found it really weird at first after growing up loveless and then all of a sudden be with people that hugged me, said they loved me and that they miss me when I'm not around. I didn't handle it very well at first. Do you find that? That being so close to someone a bit too much to handle at first?
[deleted]
Also: Oh my god no. I would not be splashing. Splashing = distress. AH. Worst thing to do. That's like running away from a dog. You. Just. Don't. Do. It.
[deleted]
&gt; Your mistake is assuming that every supporter views him as a murderer of innocent human children, when someone may instead see him as a man who spared individuals from a life of hardship.  Whether he spared individuals from a life of hardship is debatable. Whether he killed human beings is a scientific fact, and is not debatable. Legally, those he killed weren't "persons," though.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Maybe. I don't really see them ever relaxing grooming regs quite that far since they're pretty anal about all that and big on image (re: tighter tattoo policies even as tattoos become way more accepted in society) but who knows what the future holds.  Honestly though if they can actually solve all that other stuff they can keep their "sexist" hair policies.
You are right. I have no problem with strippers, porn stars, or prostitutes. I my mind I considered working at hooters less about "selling my body" but in reality it is =/= other lines of work. It was poorly worded and I was hypocritical.
[deleted]
&gt;Feel free to keep trolling.  Evidently I hit a nerve.  You asked a question but you don't like the answer.  Be an adult about it.
What a douche! And not only that, but what a dangerous person. Seriously, that got really dark, and if he's serious that he has no empathy, he could indeed be a sociopath. The fact that he could so convincingly deceive you and use you like that makes me think perhaps he's serious.  "How could I be so fucking stupid."  You weren't stupid. You were attracted to him and you wanted to make out and fool around. That's normal. It is also reasonable to expect that when you say "no" or "stop", your date will actually fucking *stop*. You didn't do anything stupid by trusting this guy - you've known him for a bit and you had no reason to suspect he would do this or that he was putting on pretenses the whole time.   "I shouldn't have let him get past kissing."  No...that's not quite right. His behaviour is not up to you - it's up to him. The woman's job is NOT to set limits for the man! It's up to both people to determine what the other is comfortable with and to respect their limits. He didn't respect yours, and that is NOT because you "let him" - it's because *he chose to*. That's on him, not on you. Physical stuff like kissing, hugging, petting, etc. is not something that women give and men take. It's meant to be something you both enjoy mutually.  "I'm so retarded, honestly. I fall for guys all the time and then I get used and abused."   You aren't retarded. You're lonely. And the kind of guy who sees women as blow-up dolls who exist to service their needs (i.e., narcissists) will deliberately target women who are lonely. He knew damn well what he was doing - and once again, that's on him, not on you.   "I want to die, I'm so fucking retarded. I have no purpose on this earth except for being a slut. Fucking hell, I wish I could die."  You aren't a whore or a slut. He's the slut. He's the one who is dirty and bad. You aren't. Trust me, you're not the only woman who wanted to get it on with a guy on the first date...I'm sure at least some of your friends have too, and if they haven't yet, they will! You aren't the only woman who has been guilted into a blowjob, either - just understand that you never, ever have to do *anything* you don't want to, no matter what kind of guilt-inducing shit the guy you're with is saying to convince you otherwise! You call the shots with your body, like you did when you kicked him off you for removing the condom. You don't owe anybody sex, or a blow job, or any other sexual favours that you do not want to give. It doesn't matter if that person is your date, your boyfriend, or even your spouse - your body is *yours* no matter what and nobody is entitled to its use without your consent.  This hasn't ruined your life. I know you feel like shit right now because he treated you like shit. But that doesn't reflect on you at all - it was all a reflection of him. His morals. His inability to respect women in general and you in particular. His total selfishness. Not you. You aren't a slut, you aren't worthless, and this has not diminished you. You have the same purpose in life right now as you did this morning, when the day was fresh and you still thought he was a human being. All the dirty is still his, hun, not yours.  As for your friends - if they would call you stupid and blame you for his disgusting behaviour, they aren't your friends at all. A true friend would see your pain and be supportive and try to help you deal with this.  &gt;And I have to sit next to him in Psychology class on Monday. What do I do????  You could talk to your school counselor about this, or someone like your mom if you two have a good relationship. I would suggest ignoring the hell out of him.
No, that's what you think a typical feminist sounds like. You should work on that because your perception is deceiving. 
That's really helpful, thank you.  After reading all these responses I'm starting to lean toward a pixie cut, though I'll definitely grow it out again after basic.
[deleted]
[deleted]
&gt;  People must not ever forget what a sick man leads MRM.  One man leads all of MRM? I really doubt that one woman leads all of feminism.  FWIW, I consider myself a feminist and a masculist and find this Paul Elam to be reprehensible.
yeah.. 'imawomanxx'.    sigh
If there is no brain, I question whether the child is "alive." A *body* can be kept alive after the person is dead, and this seems similar to a brain dead person on life support.  This applies in a way during earlier stages, as the brain (normally) is forming. The first cells of a person will divide and eventually form the brain. So for a zygote or embryo, you cannot yet say that it doesn't have a brain, as it's still developing, and too early to make such a determination.
I use my old panties as my period panties but I thought everybody else did that?  Please tell me I'm normal.
When your friend had his breakdown, did people stick around because they wanted to cuddle him and hold him and be there for him because they might get the chance to fuck? Did people romanticize and sexualize his mental illness to the point that he became "probably fiesty in bed" or "cute but crazy"? Did he attract girls who wanted to "fix him" because he was "broken" or had "baggage"? Generalizing is one thing, romanticizing is another.  Also It's not stress, lol. I know how stress affects my mental state and it's more via nausea than anything. And just a tip for future reference when dealing with mentally ill people, telling us to "get help" isn't helpful. 
I guess we have different definitions, then. I consider groping to be synonymous with getting a good feel, which three seconds is long enough for. It sounds like you consider it to be more synonymous to second base.  I agree that it sounds like she wasn't trying to work the bases to sleep with OP, but I don't agree that it's okay to just ~~grope~~ caress someone without at the *least* being very attentive to their reaction. I don't think it's unreasonable to be offended when someone oversteps like that, although I understand that you don't have that boundary about yourself.
Either way, the post and most of the others on this account reek of bullshit.  I guess I'm just getting tired of this influx of posts making sure we all know how whiny and wrong we are to feel objectified or belittled. 
As long as you feel confident in tank tops and boy shorts, rock 'em! 
My dad encouraged me to stand by my convictions; to question everything; and to support my conclusions with research, facts, and logic. He encouraged my interests, never preferred my brothers over me (or me over my brothers) and listened carefully when we spoke with him. Later in life, when I left the religion he raised me in and chose a different path in life, he told me he was proud of me and he loved me no matter what I chose.  He is an honest man. He is trusting -- too trusting. Trusting to a fault, sometimes. He is compassionate and forgiving. He is a pacifist. He is a farmboy and a rancher and a lawyer and an accountant. He has a tanned deerhide in a barrell from when he used to go hunting as a youth, but I have never seen him handle a gun.   I have seen him handle the dishes. He led by example. He helped with the dishes and the household chores, and never made a "thing" of it. He used to make Sunday dinner, every week. He would make holiday breakfasts and help set the table and prepare the meal for Thanksgiving. For valentines day and their wedding anniversary, he would buy mom a single red rose, every year, and take her out for a special dinner. He showed in the way he treated my mom -- and the way he expected us to treat her -- that he respected her and valued her. The only time I remember my dad raising his voice to any of us was when we were disrespectful to mom.  I remember once I kicked a teacher in home ec. I was 16, and an angry kid. They expelled me, and instead of going straight home I drove my car to the beach and sat on the dock staring at the tide coming in. I was crying and trembling with rage. I drove home, still shaking with anger, and came in ready for a fight. Mom and dad wanted to know what I was thinking, how I could do that. I was screaming at them, and mom started crying. She said, "Where did I go wrong? What did I do wrong?"  Frustrated, I yelled, "Nothing! I'm my own person, I make my own choices, my own mistakes! You guys did everything right, I'm just a fucking screw up!"  My dad said firmly, "Do not speak to your mother like that."  I said I would speak to her how I wanted, and then I raised my hand -- still not sure exactly what I was intending to be honest -- and my dad caught my wrist as my hand came down toward mom. He used the leverage of my halted blow to push me backward. I stumbled and yelled something about them hurting me, and then I called the cops.  They came and took me to juvey. Because I started the altercation, and because state law says in a domestic violence call, someone has to go in. I was fine with it. I stayed in overnight, came home, did some community service. Realized my little teen rebellions were getting out of hand and straightened up my act. Apologized to my mom a lot.  I'm really grateful for my parents. Before my mom died, when she was sick, my dad took care of her and the house. He stayed on suicide watch and prepared all her meals and took her to medical appointments and did everything he could to save her from the illness. But he never treated her like an invalid or broken just because she had bipolar. He adored her, he thought she was the strongest, most amazing woman in the world. And he showed that every day in word and deed, and he showed his kids that.  The best thing you can do for your kids is to be a good role model. To treat everyone the way you want to be treated, and to teach your kids to act the same. My dad can be patriarchal and occasionally sexist. He's a mormon man who was born in the 1940s and raised in small town Utah. But the way he raised me -- the way he raised all of his kids -- was to be true to ourselves, to question the world around us, and to never be ashamed of who we are. He raised us to expect to be treated with respect and kindness, and to treat others with respect and kindness in turn.   Also, even the best of parents raise brats. When I got into serious trouble -- like the juvey thing -- my dad didn't bail me out and save me from the consequences of my actions. He was a lawyer, he could have tried something. But he didn't. Instead, he would help me figure out what paths were available to me to dig myself out of the hole I got into (in my case, community service) and then he would support my efforts to improve (for example, my parents confiscated my license, but drove me to and from community service). Dad made sure I knew that my behavior had consequences, but I also had support and love from my family. 
Where did you get that $4.32, fat cat? At my wedding I served boiled lentils. If people wanted silverware they had to bring their own or improvise with whatever they could find in the alley where we held the ceremony. The lentils were of course harvested from my lentil farm I maintain at the abandoned lot next to the highway underpass I live under, which I fertilize using contents I borrow from the porta-potties at the construction site next door. By the way, can you believe how wasteful those folks are? Not only do they have such gluttonous diets that their bodies require bowel movements, they don't even do anything with the resulting waste!   Anyway, I actually made money at my wedding because I found a quarter on the sidewalk as I made the stroll back to my cardboard fortress. 
I have a pixie cut and trim my mullet in between haircuts. Eventually I'd prefer to just do it all myself but it's already pretty stressful to get my sideburns even.  I think it's worth it, though, to go to the salon less often.  so I don't think you're crazy for trying!
I mentioned before but people on the opposite sides are often exposed to the worst.    I can tell you that many mras feel the same. It's amazing how many criticisms are repeated from both sides.   The problem is you find people like krossen.    &gt;Anyways, just want to end this with I hope you have a nice and safe weekend :)  And this is him always.  Just this kind of thing isn't highlighted.  Instead you get 50 links to gww saying something she really shouldn't have said.  
&gt;On the note of male circumcision, sometimes it is a solution to phimosis.  And female circumcision can be used to treat clitoral phimosis. I personally am opposed to all forms of circumcision unless medically necessary (e.g. phimosis or cancer of the foreskin or clitoral hood).
Completely different levels of influence.  Seriously.
oh nooo :(  luckily i live with my husband but my cat always comes over and tries to creepily watch when we have sex unless we shut him out
[deleted]
It is entirely based on your mindset. If you think you can do it without getting attached, then I think it could be a really good outlet for stress and sexual frustration. However, if you do get attached, it could end up being a painful break. Just make sure if you do it to be safe and use condoms - seriously, I wouldn't bend on this even if you're on the pill. If he's just your FWB, he has no obligation to remain faithful. 
Oh yes. I actually fold my underwear all pretty and group them. There's period panties, daily wear panties, and *gettin' some* panties, heh. :)
&gt; or even better yet no sex so that she isn't put into a position of having to take care of a child by herself.   No. No one, regardless of gender, should be told "just keep it in your pants" if you don't want to have a child.
Even though you only had two days left, that's really shitty what your ex employer did to you. You are completely right to feel upset, and personally attacked when you did nothing wrong. Yes, you should learn from the experience and move forward. But I feel as though some people commenting in this thread are lacking in compassion. You were fired, had your feelings hurt, and were gained up on for reasons that weren't properly explained (even though you know why), and that freaking blows. The restaurant industry is an angry beast, and they will often fire people because they know how replaceable their workers are. Douchebags. I hope you have a better experience at your new job, and feel better about this shitty day! 
[deleted]
They didn't do that to any of the male students, only the females. 
[deleted]
I love /r/Frugal_Jerk , but don't bring that theme into other sub-reddits.  and why would you *borrow* porta-potty waste? Why not just take it?  Also, you still have to pay the fee for the marriage license, so your quarter won't cover everything. Furthermore, you paid to boil the lentils. You could have just soaked them for 3 days in a puddle and they would be nice and soft, *fatcat*.
I kinda know how you feel. I didn't get help for depression and anxiety until college because people acted like it was normal. I was just shy or being a moody teenager. And the other people I knew who had mental illnesses also trivialized my problems because I didn't self mutilate or attempt suicide. In some ways, even though I view self mutilation as unhealthy, it almost seemed necessary in that people wouldn't believe something was wrong with you unless you did it   People handle mental illness differently and those of us that appear "functional" by society's standard are often treated like there can't possibly be anything wrong, resulting in delayed treatment.  And I totally get what you're saying about people sometimes thinking anxiety is cute. My husband even did that when we first met. He said he could tell I was anxious but it was in a "cute blushing kinda way, not a crazy hand wringing way" which was hurtful because privately I do exhibit more extreme symptoms like occasional handwringing. That was a long time ago though and after being with me for so long he's become much more aware of what anxiety is like.
Regs don't end once you get out of boot camp.
Brain outside the body doesn't mean no brain, it just means no chance of survival outside the womb.    I thought a heartbeat and DNA was all that was required?  Now it's a functioning brain too?  Because if that's true, then abortion to about week 16 is OK too.
[deleted]
Keep her clean and disinfected, and she'll probably be fine.   We all fuck up sometimes. 
I wouldn't outright suggest a friends with benefits situation, just in case it's terrible and you regret it afterwards. Go for it, and if you like it, tell him you'd like to make it a regular thing. I'd share my experience, but it doesn't apply to your situation.
[deleted]
Aaaaand joining the military means she wants to be able to ignore her hair. Which is difficult if it falls into your eyes.  Did you miss the bit where she's not allowed to get a buzzcut because it's faddish?
Sounds like this sub is really disappointing for you. [I have a suggestion that would take care of that.](http://i.imgur.com/R7iImJX.gif)
If you decide to go for it and he agrees, be VERY straight forward about what you want, expect, and how you plan for it to play out once you move.  You don't want to crush him, so be honest that you want *just* FWB. Be honest that you're not interested in a serious relationship. Tell the truth about if you still want to contact him when you move -- making dates/trips to have sexy times, or if it'll be over once you move.  This isn't a fool-proof way of keeping him from getting attached, but it helps make it a *lot* easier. 
[deleted]
Good idea. I feel like he'd think about it all that night and be fired up the next day lol.
I don't think there's anything wrong with you.  Society has made virginity a big deal and sex a big deal -- you're wrong if you haven't done it and you're wrong if you have.  However, I think with you, you're lucky -- sex and the stigma hasn't been nailed into your brain and you're able to carry on with a normal, beautiful human function without worry or guilt. That's an awesome thing.  Keep doing what makes you happy and be safe. You're doing okay. :)
You deserve so much better than having to deal with those dweebs! Trich is no fun at all, and I know how you feel about feeling like it's an act. You know yourself better than anyone, but unfortunately others don't always see it that way. I'm glad you got to a therapist though! That's really brave of you and really badass. I hope I can get the guts to do the same hahaha.
[deleted]
&gt; You can't say that when you have not been in the army.  The difference is that there's an age requirement before going to the army.  There's no age requirement for being raped.  &gt; Also men get sexually abused too. It's not just women.  Are any male rape victims protesting the trigger warnings?  If I was a male victim of rape, I would want a warning as well.  &gt; Where do you get the idea that Libertarians view rape as an inconvenience.  The comment thread in the link seems pretty indicative.  Pretty much every single reader is complaining that victims of PTSD are being oversensitive.  Examples:  *"I went to Afghanland, so fuck these people who cry about "triggers" when they flip out because their Starbucks is 2* colder then they wish, and some word like "colonialism" forces them to reflect on Black Jesus' failures in Libya, Afghanistan, etc."*  *"The real problem is the inordinate number of folks who believe that they have survived trauma and are PTSD victims."*  *"its a big fucking sop about some fictitious class of 'hurt people'; everyone wants to be able to claim 'victim' of something. Racism, sexism, ableism, classism, fucking Meat-eaterism. Whatever."*  *"how people dealt with PTSD after WWII would appear to have absolutely nothing to do with the emotional problems of kids @ college who have no comparable incidence of 'trauma'."*  *"If there is in fact a real population (and not 'faux victims' or 'victims of convenience' as the situation merits)..."*  *"Are there actually frequent incidents of people being horribly traumatized? or is it just a sop to EVERYONE's 'feelings'? CAN it be used simply for the latter? Can I now make complaints to this intermediary board about anything that occurs in class that makes me have 'icky feelings' rather than actual *PTSD*-symptoms?"*  *"So you saw a movie in class and it had a rape scene and it gave you butt hurt ? Grow up child. Just try not to leave so much damage in your wake."*  *"I'll go ahead and say it, since no one else will... how many of these "rapes" are proven to actually be rape? Obviously, if there is a serial rapist around, he needs to be locked up. But methinks a lot of these claims on a college campus result from morning-after guilt from drunken hookups. We create this victim culture in women, and at the same time denigrate TRUE rape victims. Seems like every woman wants to jump on the bandwagon of "I've been raped too!" because of all the attention that we shower (rightly)on the issue."*  *"When your link declares on the front page touching is sexual assault you immediately lose all credibility."*  Oh, and from the youtube comments:  *"How about a triggered shotgun to the face instead?﻿"*  Not a single person complained about that comment.  Because threatening to murder rape victims for wanting a warning before being exposed to more rape is completely justified.  Especially at UCSB, the same week as the shootings.  &gt; We are the ones that believe women (and men) should have the power to protect themselves from rape (and any other assault).  So how would libertarians allow a 6 year old girl to protect herself from getting raped by a relative?  Because I know far too many women where this has actually happened.  In my experience, the women who are the most traumatized by rape are the ones who were victimized at a very young age.  Which makes sense, because part of PTSD is the total feeling of helplessness.  Pretty much every commenter is basically imagining that rape is, in their words, "morning-after guilt from drunken hookups."  They want to believe that the victim somehow brought it on herself, and therefore is undeserving of accommodations.  They refuse to acknowledge that it might happen to someone who is legitimately defenseless.  And even the ones who do acknowledge the existence of rape pretend that it's an anomaly of the school itself, and not indicative of American culture in general.
&gt; No one ever takes me seriously.  &gt; Are you seeing a therapist?  &gt; No, fuck no.  People aren't going to take you seriously unless you take your self seriously. Claiming you're mentally ill but refusing to go to a professional would be like me claiming I won the lottery without giving any proof. Like yeah there's more to it than that, but that is definitely a large amount of it.
You may be confusing "empathy" with "sympathy."
Press charges? The guy was a dick but he didn't do anything illegal.
My dad told me i could do whatever i wanted and wasn't shy about taking me hunting, fishing, exploring and what not. If i wanted to wear a dress, i could. If i wanted get dirty, I could (mom didn't like that so much!). He treated me like he would treat a son, if he had any. We also share a love of sci-fi and animes. So he'd let me stay up late so we could an episode of dragon ball z on Toonami. I was a tom-boy growing up but i've grown a lot more into my feminine side.  The hardest part for me was when i was going through depression. My dad thought that "its just normal teenage stuff" or "I was just being a big cry baby" but i scared him really bad one day with suicide talk and he came to me later and said "I was wrong. I recognize that you are having a hard time right now and i never went through this so i dont know how to help. What can I do" And i think that was a defining moment in his fatherhood. He admitted that he didn't know what to do but that he loved me. So if your daughter is going through something that you don't know how to deal with or that you don't have experience in, just admit it and say that you'll be there.  Goodluck!
[deleted]
As far as I'm concerned, you have to pick your battles. If it is not something you feel strongly about one way or another there is no reason to try to take a stand on either side. Anyone who is part of the LGBT community likely has a staunch position on the subject, so they may not feel comfortable being personally very close to someone who does not align with them on that level, but that doesn't mean they think you are a bad person. The best thing you can do it have an open mind and when you do take a stand, be open to the possibility that you may change your mind. I think "people are people" is a good mantra, but may fall short if they are people dealing with things you may not fully understand. Empathy is an important tool.
From my experience, anyway, you talk to someone with a different story and, bam, you see you've done things that hurt people too. Everyday examples might include... hmm... when I read things in my head, it's a male voice. I trust male voices more, and they sound more competent and more confident by default. I'm less likely to think men need help or guidance, and more likely to put up with a threshold level of cockiness. I've started discovering these things only after opening up to the idea that I might be part of the problem, despite actively fighting the types of sexism I recognize.   It's entirely possible I'm just projecting, but I also know women in technical fields who think women can't use tools. I had a female student teacher who called on male students first, and didn't know it until it was pointed out to her. I know a lot of women who self-identify as feminist but segregate Christmastime preparations and give gendered stocking stuffers.   I was thinking you were kinda harsh on OP for saying it's not okay for him to be sexist. He knows that; that's why he's here. 
[deleted]
Aww, try not to feel bad - accidents happen!  You are obviously taking good care of her.
Arguing morals in a law based state is pointless.  A mentally ill homeless man is required to pay child support.  This by itself removes any point in arguing morals.
Should have kept the mowhawk :(
You could bathe in sea salt water. I did that a couple different times when it was irritated "down there" and it really helped speed healing. I found sea salt works way better than the iodized kind. Salt helps prevent infection too.
From Implanon's wiki page:  &gt; Nexplanon and Implanon are a type of long-acting reversible contraception, which has been shown to be *the most effective form of birth control available*. The failure rate of Implanon is .05% for both perfect use and typical use because the method requires no user action after insertion. Prospective follow-up studies of Implanon, which include over 2,467 women-years of exposure, have found no pregnancies.   &gt; In comparison, tubal sterilization has a failure rate of 0.5% and IUDs have a failure rate of 0.2-0.8%. These statistics suggest that Implanon and Nexplanon are almost ten times more effective at preventing pregnancy than tubal sterilization.   Your arm implant is more effective than getting your tubes tied.   
Oh duh.  I'm silly.  I guess I meant in relation to when her period is.   What is it, something like 10 days after your period you would hypothetically be most fertile plus five days to cover that conception window?  I only tracked mine when I wanted to become pregnant and I nailed it in less than 2 weeks so I don't recall precisely.
My daughter has crazy thick hair and just went through BCT last summer. The sock bun is what got her through all of her training and continues to get her through her current duty assignment.
Something everyone needs to realize: Some people have urges, some people act on those urges. Some people realize what they do is wrong, and some people are in denial. In the case of these two people, I don't think it is denial or realization, but stupidity.
[deleted]
It is refreshing to come across intellectually honest arguments, well referenced where need be, as contained in your two ancestor posts. That's sincere, in case the rest of my post causes any doubt about it.  &gt; Her opinion before the coercion  That's question begging. At issue, among other things at this point of the debate, is the meaning of coercion.  Do you agree that "coercion" under NY law, [from the link](http://www.withoutmyconsent.org/attorneys/coercion-%E2%80%93-ny-penal-law-%C2%A7%C2%A7-13560-13565) /u/badlegaladviceabove provided, is significantly different from the "coercion" in your example from Clark University ...   &gt; Coercion is the use of emotional manipulation to persuade someone to something they may not want to do – like being sexual or performing certain sexual acts. Examples of some coercive statements include: “If you love me you would have sex with me .”, “If you don't have sex with me I will find someone who will.”, and “I'm not sure I can be with someone who doesn't want to have sex with me.” Coercive statements are often part of many campus acquaintance rapes. Being coerced into having sex or performing sexual acts is not consenting to having sex and is considered rape/sexual assault.  That is, under NY law it is not enough to merely persuade someone to do something they may not want to do (on some level). There has to be some kind of actual physical force, a threat of physical force, or a threat of another specific and listed kind ("damage to property", "Expose a secret or publicize an asserted fact, whether true or false, tending to subject some person to hatred, contempt or ridicule", etc).  On the OPs account none of physical force was used, nor the threat of physical force, nor a threat of the other specifically listed kinds.  &gt; Now, we can argue, ... over whether or not she truly changed her mind.  And you rightly quoted the relevant part of the account &gt; He pulls out a condom and puts it on. I told him I didn't want to do that, it was too soon for sex, but he kept insisting. I finally gave in ...  She "gave in".   And from your quote of NY law on consent &gt; § 130.05 Sex offenses; lack of consent. ... (c) ...  in which the victim does not expressly or impliedly acquiesce in the actor's conduct; or  That is, if the (alleged) victim *does* expressly or impliedly acquiesce in the actor's conduct, it is not rape under NY law. "Giving in" indicates she acquiesced in the actor's conduct. Noting the kind of acquiescence here is *not* simply complying with the actor's use of physical force, threats of physical force, or other specifically listed threats.  And your advice to the OP was ... &gt; Please, please talk to your parents, the police, and a guidance counselor, and get a rape kit done as soon as you can.   That is, since you are referencing the police and criminal charges of rape the relevant standard is what the law says, not bad interpretation of the law from universities, nor university policy.  You may want to argue that NY law should widen its definition of coercion to be in line with the conception of coercion expressed by the universities you cited.  But the argument against that is fairly well covered by /u/tomaytohtomahtoh in the present thread, [elsewhere](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/comments/26zkhg/i_just_got_taken_advantage_of_on_a_first_date_im/chw6zrk).   
Same, my mom was pretty useless when it came to relationship advice. The most she ever told me was "don't let men trick you into sex." She didn't put it in those terms, though; she was too squeamish to use the s-word. I guess she never considered that I might *want* to have casual sex.
And then when they complete their training, to celebrate they can untie their ponytails, shake their hair out in slow-motion and then run off across an open field and feel completely free.  Run, my pretties!
It's disgusting that only the men get access to the barbers... completely sexist. &gt;:( 
I find that surprising considering the fact that all lesbians are vegans. It's part of the lifestyle, donchaknow. 
[deleted]
Don't beat yourself up over that.  He lied to you and you didn't know.  Could you have been more cautious?  Sure.  But you were young and you learned from it.    If that was my boyfriend, I'd be angry at him.  Not at you.  
It's only used now in cases where the father is Unknown or unable to contribute to a satisfactory level.  Seems fair to me, abortions are covered by the health service the community pays for, I see no reason why men shouldn't be allowed to opt out when there's a system in place to take care of it.
Yeah! That never occurred to me, but would be very gross. I'm wondering if the mold would grow if your hair were being rinsed out every day in the shower. I can see it would be a problem if it was kept in the same braid or bun without washing or rinsing in between for long periods of time.
The idea is that men and women are equally as valuable as human beings and should be treated as such.
It makes sense that they say rape is all about power. I think he was only going to the wedding just because he could, he knew you would be there and that you'd feel uncomfortable.  Guess stopping him going and losing him his job really shifted the balance of power into something he couldn't handle.  Please update us this story, I really hope he gets put back into jail for a very long time and there is a happy ending for you 2 at the end of it!
Well, since I'm active duty Navy, I will admit to not knowing the standards for boot camp in the Air Force, however, I will say I cut my hair into a pixie cut for boot camp and did not once regret it. You have the option now to go to a salon and get your hair done professionally before you go and not let the salon folks at boot camp touch your hair, which I recommend.   However, I want to just put this out there, since I haven't seen anyone really address it yet; no one cares if you look cute at boot camp. As long you take a shower everyday and don't forget your deodorant you're going to make it through fine. Your first priority is to learn to be the best Airman you can be, and if you're worried about your hair, your priorities need to be addressed. Do your best to study and get through those tough couple of months, and then when you're out you can think about your hair again. Just my two cents, best of luck to you! 
not consumerism, not modern day life, not technology. Just the military. Learn the facts. If you want to stick to your facist patriotism, be my guest but don't come running to me when your poor and the government gives all your money to the military companies. You'll thank me then for the advice I give you now. They're fooling you and you don't even know. 
Because talking directly to a broad selection of people about Feminism, each with their own views requires no effort?  I'm sorry you are limited to only one source at a time. You have my deepest sympathies.
I thought men in the military were supposed to get standard buzzcuts (which is pretty close to a shaved head, IMHO). Or is that only the marines or something?
&gt; Rapists are like murderers in the way that they are both criminals. They are willing to break the law.  People who commit credit card fraud also break the law very willingly. There are different motivations and consequences for different crimes.  And Ideally you want to change the mindset of the guy who thinks it's OK to slip something into a girl's drink, or vice-versa. Or the guy/gal who think that people secretly enjoy rape even if they resist at first. Or the person who thinks "Well look at how they're dressed, they're asking for it."   A lot of people have the wrong idea about the consequence of rape. Feminism/ Men's Rights tries to speak up for the victim in all respects.  Also in general, the reason some men struggle with Feminism is that they simply don't like thinking that they're not as nice a guy as they thought. That despite their best efforts they aren't as nice to women as they think and that what they thought was a good thing to do is actually disliked by some women who find it offensive for whatever reason.
[deleted]
[deleted]
It is indeed giving consent.
[deleted]
Fuck him. I don't know you and chances are I never will, but you can (and will) do 1000 times better than that fuckwit. Chin up love, life'll get better :)
Are you actually blaming guys for going along with their antics? For fuck's sake, you're an adult. Act like one. If you don't like something, say so or walk away. But don't go along with it all fucking night, follow the guys to various different places, and continue to dance with them. If there ever was a case for "encouraging it", this is it.  
Shout on both sides of the fabric, rinse in ice-cold water, put Shout on both sides again, let it sit for ~5 minutes, then put it in the wash using cold water. Works like a charm every time for me, even if I can't get to it right away!
/r/askwomen, or /r/askreddit would be good. 
Thank you
&gt;However beyond disagreement on actual issues, and history (which is a whole nother can of worms people not me are better suited for explaining on), there are other reasons why the two groups don't get along.  I specifically was addressing the psychology.  That is what I am used to.  Looking at the two groups and how the common of the two interact with each other.  I am no professor of the history of both movements and I do not claim to be.     It may seem like I'm saying nothing but many people don't get this.  They think anti--fem or anti-mra and assume they are against those peoples rights.  There are sexists.  Sure.  But I talk to both groups everyday.  Anything from amr to anti-fem.  Most aren't that way because they hate x-gender.    I can't stress this enough many say the same thing.  Of course they will.  They are both people.  With large groups like this they are going to act like people.  I have far more in common with an mra or a feminist than the average person in my town aka an ultra-conservative.  But somehow I get more angry at a random mra.  Because petty politics and what I used above gets in the way.  People will assume the opposition has opposite thoughts.  But for the most part that's not true here.  They disagree on many things but compared to people like social conservatives most moderates have a lot in common.    Many would think it would be.  "I support equal treatment of lgbt." "Hey, so do I"  "Want to join together and fight for lgbt rights? " "Sure"  In reality it too often turns into this.  "I support lgbt rights, homophobia is part of patriarchy" "I support lgbt rights and am against homophobia, but patriarchy doesn't exist anymore."  "Yes it does." "No it does not." They fight enough, attack them for the other sides screw ups for x reason, and neither wants to work with each other even though they both stated they want the same thing.
Sorry, I missed that.  I still call bullshit on your scenario though.  It's so highly unlikely.   Doctors that give late term abortions are not baby-hating killers.  And worrying about the .0001% of women who would suddenly decide, at the end of pregnancy, to abort being "wrong" instead of the 99% of women aborting unviable and malformed fetuses is illogical.    It is amoral to force a woman to have a baby who's heart and brain never formed completely and will die a painful death within minutes of being born.  THIS scenario is many times more prevalent than yours and, frankly, women are already here. They have families and complex emotions and full lives...lives easily derailed and bankrupted by having a very sick baby or a child who will need life-long services.  To focus solely on the widdle babies is pretty offensive really.    And I've had 2 babies.  I never felt like other people should have a say about my belly and what was inside of it.  It was still MINE so, occasionally when you see a video of a pregnant lady doing something fun, but dangerous, and people are outraged, I'm very confused over their need to police women so strictly and harshly when they're pregnant.  The moment they're pregnant they no longer have full dominion over their body and that's bullshit.  So, even though I know doctor's don't abort perfect 8 month old fetuses, if a woman wanted to do that, it wouldn't be my business AT ALL and I wouldn't struggle with it for a moment.  
what should i do if my username is neutral?   should i start a poll to ask if my name is more (fe)male?
I went to all of grade school with this guy, M. He had some kind of developmental disorder. He would flirt with all of the girls and I was younger than him and he would hit on all of my classmates and get hugs all of the time. He was not as challenged as he played it up. Even if it was something he just did, the teachers let him. I was terrified of him and I would hide from him all of the time.  Mental illness should never be an excuse - if you let people get away with things then they'll escalate to see what more they can get. Ground rules are especially important for mentally ill individuals, consistency is the best protection you have from something like that outburst.  Mental illness doesn't mean someone can't be a creepy asshole.
[deleted]
MUAHAH! I do now, thank you :D
[deleted]
My friend is in the Army and she has super long hair that she puts in a bun for any Army-based activity. She also has one of those doughnut bun/sock bun things that she uses, that might be an easy way for you to put it up?
There are some newer machines with all metal parts. I bought a Singer Heavy Duty model 5532 and it's all metal. It was around $275 but came with an extension table (about $99 retail), case full of bobbins, and so many presser feet...probably another $75-$100 in presser feet.  I need to learn how to use them!  I had one of those cheaper plastic machines to start with and had a miserable time with it. Promptly sold it in my next garage sale.
My Ti (air force basic 2003) also would not allow white trainees to keep their hair in cornrows. 
[deleted]
You deserve to be shamed.
You equally cannot say they aren't feminist/MRM activities. Such activities are often run by such groups without acknowledging such.
Start a new thread on this topic and I promise I'll upvote it.  This comment has nothing to do with this discussion so I downvoted.
She has another comment lower in the thread where she clarifies that they were preventing her from leaving the situation, and she was afraid they would physically harm her if she did not comply. 
Don't use words you don't understand.
By knowing when to shut up and get back to work. I work in the automotive industry. There are a couple guys that I work with who will at least hold their tongue when I'm around to avoid pissing me off.   However, most of the guys in our shop think its completely appropriate to tell me jokes about abusing women or violent sex etc. I have learned that if I explain to them my problems with what they've said to me they roll their eyes and make the blah-blah-blah talking hand and walk away.  The first few times I mentioned it to my boss, I think he honestly wanted to help and communicated something along the lines of "if you've gotta talk to her, just keep it work related" but as it has persisted, he seems really annoyed that I'm mentioning it to him at all and seems to think I should just get over it.  So, I doubt this is in anyway helpful but, I've basically learned that I've gotta learn to deal with it or move on to a different place to work.
I think the difference is with women it's usually internalized misogyny.
I used to work closely with 5 men in a high stress environment and I mostly just kept my head down. I got along with them for the most part, we were a good team, but when they made jokes about rape/domestic violence/etc. I would just have to ignore them because speaking up against them wasn't worth the trouble it would have caused me.
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
&gt; I can see it would be a problem if it was kept in the same braid or bun without washing or rinsing in between for long periods of time.  That's exactly how it happens. If you redo your hair every day, it shouldn't be much of a problem. The red bumps from having your hair that tight WILL happen, but there is extra strength lotion you can get at the shopette for it. 
&gt; both parents have a moral and legal obligation to take care of him/her.  If that were true then we rich parents wouldn't be allowed to give their children up for adoption.   And, especially since child support payments scale with income (and sometimes "potential income"), then rich parents who give up their children for adoption would be obligated to make child support payments to the adoptive parents, if what you say is true. 
He doesn't just ask randomly, these contestant mostly likely get interviewed backstage as well as being initially selected for the show. I know they did that to all the contestant when I went on the "Price is Right".
Do you practice safe sex? Do you take any form of birth control? Are your periods usually fairly regular (schedule wise)?  I've had many irregular periods due to changes in medication, diet, birth control, and DEFINITELY stress. Stress does strange things to your body sometimes. But I would DEFINITELY see a OBGYN about this, ASAP. Pain is never a good thing. 
[deleted]
Incidentally, June 3rd is all-day gender flip day in [Manyland](http://manyland.com).
Don't beat yourself up. He's the one who had the moral obligation to not do anything. It's not your fault that he's dumb and his gf wasn't good for him. The responsibility is on him. I'm sorry if people are making you feel like YOU were in the wrong.  I just feel bad because being the "other girl" is no fun and won't help you get a long term relationship (if that's what you're looking for).   Time to move past this, chica! You got this :)
He sounds like a sociopath.  I wish I had some sound advice for you, but all I can offer is my support.  Thank you for sharing your story &lt;3 I'm so sorry this happened to you.   
Tiller literally saved human being's lives.  Might want to reconsider who the human being is in this scenario.
Yes, once you understand the point of military regulations, they're ten times as fucked up.
Pixie cut! That's what I did before basic and it was the best thing I could have done! I barely spent any time washing or fixing my hair which, when you don't have any time, is amazing.  
I've got a BS in physics with a math minor.  I'm a year into a PhD, focusing on nuclear astrophysics.
Whar do you mean you refuse to go down?
Interesting! I always correct people. If they start being rude, I always have my friends I play with who take my side or I just put them on ignore. Usually they shut up. They expect others to join in and get so confused when people actually stick up for girls online.
[deleted]
If every cell that makes up your body were to turn invisible, we could still see you on account of the bacteria on and inside your body. There are at least 10 times more bacterial cells on/in you than there are actual human cells in your body. The majority of these bacteria are only helpful, and will cause no harm at all if ingested.  I bet you don't eat yogurt, either.
Perhaps it is to help educate men rather than make them happy.
Actually, the regs aren't vague at all. There are individual regs for short, medium, and long hair. Your hair cannot be actually shaved. The shortest any part can be, excepting medical condition and injury, is 1/4". However, it is within the rights of any NCOs or COs to determine if your hair is out of reg, per AR 607-1.
No he was not and what are you hoping to gain from asking me this lol 
I've got clear Army allegiances, but wow, that's offensive. How many people only ever interact with just the people in their branch? If a Navy guy is training at an Army post, does he have to cut his hair? Can an Army guy grow his out if he's attached to a Navy ship? That's ridiculous. Of course it should be the same across the board.
[deleted]
I agree with other posters - a liberal use of the downvote to stick to comments that are relevant. I come here for other 2X thoughts. Maybe there needs to be an XYthoughtsabout2X or something so the guys can find a place to share their stories. 
is saying love sexist? where is the discrimination? in certain parts of the uk it is a really common way for people to refer to each other male or female...  other than that it looks like you're determined to be a victim here. sorry for the lack of sisterhood. hard truths and all that
Precisely. Everybody is different, but I think you bring up a good point about emotional maturity. I'm a man, but I tended to over romanticize everything in my younger days, so when I lost my virginity at 19 in much the same way as you, I was pretty underwhelmed and bummed due to the lack of emotional connection. Had I had the same experience at 21 or 22, I probably would have just shrugged it off more or less. But what I want to impart on you is the bright side of this situation. You said in your OP that you felt that you left your partners in relationships sexually frustrated and that your relationships tended to be on the shorter side because of this (perceived or otherwise). Now without the specter of virginity (lol) looming over every possible romantic entanglement, you can find yourself a nice, fulfilling ltr if that's what you want. Basically I just want to impart that even though your virginity is gone and it wasn't what you imagined it to be, a new door has opened up in your life, and ultimately this is a good thing. It wasn't ideal, sure, but I hope that your life will be impacted positively by that door being opened. Basically this is a new and exciting chapter of your life, even if the first page was underwhelming lol. Best of luck to you!   Sorry if this post was considered an "invasion" of 2X, I just thought I could respectfully add something to the discussion
I sense a Shel Silverstine book...
It's weird, isn't it? I don't make any real effort to hide my gender online. I even thought this user name would read feminine, since it's a nickname-ification of my feminine first name. But still, I get called man, dude, brother, etc.   I used to correct it, but I don't bother anymore. 
"There's no such thing as bad publicity."
You might be racist if you think a comment on color scheme (which hers was pink/grey/white) has anything to do with an interracial couple. ;)
Just be careful about meeting all these people that you met online!! It's easy to pick up creepers, especially from free sites like Craigslist and POF.
I just get really frustrated with threads like this where people bend over backwards to reassure the OP instead of telling her that she needs to buck up and be responsible for her feelings and decisions. Then someone tries to pile "maybe rape" claim on top, and it further removes any culpability from the OP for making her own decisions. Like, guess what, she wasn't forced or coerced into doing anything. His being a jerk has nothing to do with her decision making process, and people telling her she's a pretty, unique snowflake does NOTHING in teaching her how to be a strong, responsible, individual adult.  This shouldn't be a support group for re-enforcing behavior that leads to bad decisions, regret, and a pattern of actions that further demonstrates and builds upon their low self esteem. Building people up by petting them when they display weakness just because they *feel* bad is not helping them at all. How are women supposed to advance when we keep encouraging each other to do these sorts of things?
yeah, because racism is over
This is solid advice.
[deleted]
I don't regret it, but I remember freaking out when he tried to put his tongue in my mouth! We were in the sixth grade and he walked me home from school (d'aww!) then at my door he leaned in and kissed me!! I was so scared/excited/wooo.. then, his tongue came and he was moving it all fast like a lizard, it was poking at my lips, and I didn't understand what he was doing so I jumped backwards and probably looked at him like he was nuts. I had no idea people used their tongues in kissing!  He was very sweet about it though, he apologized for freaking me out then went home. We were 'together' for the summer (all of our kisses after that were very chaste) then he moved before junior high started and I never saw him again. :(
Which is why I said most jobs! Where you work sounds pretty cool though!
i totally saw a dude with a hot pink pompadour the other day so it is not just for girls! 
Avoid Planet Fitness if you can. They exist to cater to people who don't really want to get healthy. They tease members with less-healthy foods all the time (pizza, bagels, tootsie rolls) and the "lunk alarm" prevents members from pushing themselves to get results. Their business model caters to people's fears about being watched and judged, but it effectively just weakens and babies people. There's nothing you can do but grow beyond all that fear. Other comments here have done a great job getting into that.  Useful subreddits:  /r/loseit  /r/fitness  /r/leangains
It's less the posts and more the comments.  Really, on any given thread you can scroll to the bottom and see the absurdity that's been downvoted into oblivion.
I go to the gym every day. There are people with every body type imaginable at my gym, so I doubt you will be the only one there who doesn't look like a fitness model from a magazine :)  If the gym has group fitness classes like Zumba, Spinning, Yoga, etc., go and try the group classes. Particularly Zumba, it's great for all body types, lots of fun, and mostly women. If you're open to talking to people you may even make some friends at the gym. The most important thing is to enjoy and have fun!
It's basically about separating the intent behind an action from the action itself.  It goes something like this:  * If you step on someone's foot, you need to take your foot off of their foot. * If it was an accident, and you had no idea their foot was in the way, that's fine.  And you need to take your foot off of their foot. * If you only meant to get closer for a hug, and wanted to do something nice, that's fine.  And you need to take your foot off of their foot. * If someone else stepped on your foot once and you didn't cause a fuss because you knew it was totally an accident and not worth causing a bother, that's fine.  And you need to take your foot off of their foot. * If you were brought up to think that foot-stepping was just something that happened sometimes, and totally normal and acceptable between friends, that's interesting.  But you need to take your foot off of their foot. * If you hate people who step on other people's feet on purpose and would never do such a thing or tolerate it, that's good of you.  But you need to take your foot off of their foot.  All the justifications and reasons and questions of what was intended are fine, inasmuch as they can help the person whose foot you stepped on to understand you and not judge you as a bad person.  None of them invalidate the fact that you are still standing on their damn foot.  And if you keep stepping on someone's foot all the time, even after they've asked you to stop, you can't really complain if they start to wonder how sincere you are when you say you didn't mean it.    The drunk men in the scenario you described are like a foot-stepper who just keeps on stepping on someone's foot over and over again, and even threatens "jokingly" to step on their foot even harder if they don't smile about it and pretend to enjoy it.   
I was trying to remember the sub that is about men hitting their wives where they post videos/images. It was wife slapper, wife beaters, something, I honestly don't remember.  It's not about not clicking it. It's about it crumming up my content feeds.  Also, I really don't get how you're seeing NSFW posts if you aren't subscribed to those subreddits. Afaik they do not put NSFW posts in /r/all and you definitely do not see them when logged out. I don't see these posts you're talking about at all and I'm a daily user of the site. 
Considering I am the one who asked him to clarify what he meant,  I think y'all are after the wrong person.
I'm in OK shape, not super buff, but I feel comfortable at the gym. I want to assure you that I NEVER judge overweight women, especially when they are at the gym! In fact, I am secretly sending good karma your way and silently saying, "you go girl!" I don't say it out loud because I wouldn't want anyone to feel awkward. I think a lot more people than you realize feel this way.
I think we need to get rid, as a society, of the Christian-inspired notion that having sex for fun, or hell, for money, is something immoral. Sex is fun. Sex is a way to express love. Sex is one of our most basic human instincts. To declare it sinful is a not just misogynistic, but fundamentally misanthropic attitude that we should erase from our society. Women or men who have sex with whomever they want are not doing anything immoral as long as everybody involved is informed and consenting. Women or men who are prostitutes are not doing anything immoral; if they are victims of human trafficking or otherwise coerced then those exploiting them may be doing something immoral, but not the prostitutes themselves. Let's take away the stigma from actual "sluts" and "whores"; they do not deserve it. They do not deserve to be the inspiration for slurs against people who see sex as a source of fun and enjoyment. It's the shamers who should look at their views and ask themselves what they are so angry about, what they actually see as the moral failings of those they call by those slurs. It's them who are projecting their own shame, or fear of potential shame, on others as a way to hurt them, out of their own insecurity.
My friend did AF basic in 2011 too and her instructor made all the women put their hair own every evening to fully dry their hair to prevent mildew. It had apparently been an issue with previous classes. 
There's some problematic stuff going on in your comment that as a transwoman I'd like to offer some friendly clarification on.  &gt;  I can't help feeling them claiming to be trans is yet another one of their lies, because they do it a lot.  It's unfortunate that they lie about other things, but gender being internal/self-determined really the only choice is to respect what they state their gender to be.  &gt; They've also taken pictures of their hormone regimen  Given both the difficulty in obtaining hormones and the effect of hormones on one's mental state, it's pretty safe at that point to assume they have a reasonable sense of what's going on with their gender.  &gt; they just don't, or can't read female  &gt; Maybe they're either really deep into the act or just really bad at reading as a chick.  I don't really understand what you mean by "deep into the act," but rest assured social conditioning is a huge factor.  As you noted, the "years of growing up in a lie".  As someone transitioning in her 30s, I took on a lot of traditionally male mannerisms, attitudes, and ways of speaking that *aren't easily lost*.  In fact, while I do often try to shed them for the sake of being perceived as feminine, since it's a product of social conditioning *the idea that my expressed/stated womanhood can be brought into question by others because I am perceived to be more masculine is hugely problematic.*  Even the idea that I *should* shed all perceived masculine behaviour is an issue as much of what I do that is perceived as masculine is behaviour that is recommended to women as career-boosting and is the sort of thing that women are advised to do to be taken seriously.  That doesn't stop me or cis women from being written off as mannish on account of it though.  Additionally, not everyone falls into a simple binary, not everyone's gender expression aligns with their gender identity, and when it comes to trans people who suffer from gender dysphoria, not everyone's dysphoria is triggered by misaligned gender *expression*.  That is to say that the extreme feeling of gender misalignment in our heads can be caused by a variety of things.  For some, it's a misalignment of physical parts.  For some, it's being treated or addressed as the wrong gender.  For others, it's being perceived as the wrong gender by themselves (when they look in a mirror or speak) and other people.  The goal of hormone therapy and other cross-sex treatments is to shrink or undermine gender dysphoria.  The steps each individual needs to take to do so are entirely dependent upon their own dysphoria, and not necessarily a matter of fully passing or "reading" as their identified gender in the eyes of others.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Actually it's been pointed out frequently within the community that quite a few trans people do fall into the autistic spectrum.  Some recent studies if I recall have found higher incidence of autistic traits within those diagnosed with gender dysphoria than in the general population.
I spoke up once when a girl was punching a guy I didn't know repeatedly in a classroom, trying to pressure him into an action with permanent consequences. It wasn't just a tap, tap punch, but a sound that really filled the room. I said, "Domestic Violence!" and she stopped.   ~~HE DIDN'T EVEN GIVE ME HIS NUMBER, THE TEASE~~  But tbh, if she had started really swinging, he was easily 2-3 times bigger than she was. He could probably pick her up and toss her if she were bothering him too much, which cannot be said for most of the women who frequently have these experiences with men who should go away.
Honestly, yes. Having a particularly low libido is having something wrong with you. Yes, people have different sex drives within a range of normalcy, but not wanting sex at all is outside of that range.  As for asexuals, yes they are sick in the sense of having an illness, no they are not sick in the sense of "ewww they're sick!".
Yup. I rarely notice user names, the time I look is when I'm wondering if it's a troll account. 
I've been on Reddit for 4 years, and 2XC has always been the subreddit where I felt most at home. I appreciate the behind-the-scenes work that's been going on to make this place great, and I'd love to become active in upholding the sort of "comfort zone" that this place really is for so many.
Give it time and if he doesn't contact you reach out to him in a few days. We all make mistakes but this is hardly something to completely end a relationship over. Human beings are error prone and forgiveness is a basic necessity of dating.
I never suggested that the OP was under any obligation to take any sort of action, let alone try to be friends.   It was merely my own opinion, anyway.  That said, I'm the sort that's typically interested in what makes people tick and if I don't have to write someone off as a complete nut-job/sociopath/[negative descriptive] I try not to. There's enough hostility out there as it.  When all is said and done, I try to have compassion for people.   I do agree though with other people as well; if she's that toxic then cut your losses and move on. Don't let her poison get under your skin.   At the end of the day, there's many ways to handle a situation: you just got to pick what's right for you. 
&gt; So, please, calm down with the silly generalizations YOU made.  "some redditors" isn't a generalization. Nor is anything in the comment you're responding to.  &gt;Do you not see the irony in your OWN post regarding this topic?  Where is the irony? This is a sub for women's perspective whose posts are regularly derailed into men's. That's what the comment is calling out. If you think that someone trying to reclaim what is *actually* theirs from someone laying an unfounded claim to it is irony, that would imply that you don't recognize the original "ownership" to be valid.  &gt;the subreddits ambiguous state  Can you develop on how TwoX would be ambiguous?
I've had sex on the first date, and had a grand ol time.  There's nothing wrong with that.  The difference is that *I wanted it*, and the guy wasn't an emotional manipulative asshole.  Don't shame her because he manipulated her, and then try to make the situation her fault by saying he turned into a twat because she was "giving him negative emotions".  That's such bullshit.  
&gt;Dear Dr. Sexist Bastard,  &gt;Regarding the last test, why was my response to question x and y counted wrong? What would have been the correct answers?  &gt;Thank you,  &gt;Super Awesome Lady    Hahaha! Thank you for this, it made me laugh and I actually hadn't thought about asking him what the correct answers would be.  This is great. It puts the ball on his court, and he can't possibly tell me the right answer without reciting my own answer back at me.  And yes, other students answered just like me and didn't have theirs marked off.
Absolutely.  Sharing is caring :)
I'm really sorry you're going through this right now.  I've had a colposcopy and biopsy.  The are definitely not walks in the park, but they are not the end of the world.  It's almost certainly ectropion from what you are describing and from what your doctor is saying.  It's really personal and really hard to deal with news like this.  
Thanks for replying, I can relate to a lot of what you said here.
[deleted]
Can you make friends who are as weird as you are? That would be awesome!
If you are serious about staying on hormonal bc,I'm not sure, but I switched from the pill to the copper iud (hormone free) and I love it. I had a lot of emotional ups and downs while on the pill that have disappeared. I also don't have to stress about taking a pill at the same time every day. Insertion sucked, but it's good for ten years.
&gt;And the magic things was a total cop out....  Hello...FAIRY TALE here...  No the magic wasn't a total cop out.  The wheels were destroyed and the broken and burned bits were locked up in the dungeon.  The Magic lured her there AND unlocked the doors AND remade teh spinning wheel.  
If you're legitimately asking, PM me. This isn't what this thread was for. 
This is true, but it's a much lower dose of hormones than you would get in any pill. I don't know much about Mirena but it might be worth doing some research. 
[deleted]
Yeah, I've gotten three or four pms related to stuff here. Two or three were nasty, and one was whining about 2X being a default. 
Hi there, hope you get on well at the gym and everyone is right that there is no need to feel self concious. Just wanted to add that if you start working out at the gym for a while and still feel uncomfortable, to the extent that it puts you off doing any exercise at all, you could always work out at home. Doesn't have to be all or nothing.  Gyms are great because there's more equipment but with online resources you can do a pretty effective work out at home with little equipment. I'm actually reasonably fit and skinny but I just cant stand the feeling of people watching me (even though I know they aren't watching!) so I work out at home. I'm mostly doing weight training and my equipment probably cost about 4 months gym membership so a bit of an investment but not bad. Cardio you can just do outside, I like to skip :D.
Amazing. Your confidence really shines in the second photo. That's what really intimidates the people who won't look you in the eye. Because you aren't ashamed, because you love the look you're rockin', and they can't stand a confidant woman who goes against the tide of what's considered acceptably feminine. Bully on them, you know yourself. :)
She said mental illness, not mental disability. That's the only guess I have for why you are downvoted. Flying off the handle at real or perceived slights is something that reminds me of my step dad who has borderline personality disorder.  &gt;She brushed it off as being his mental illness  Doesn't seem like something her boss should be discussing. But we can tell her boss is incompetent anyway.
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
Thank you so much! I love it too; when my hair grows out I'm going to do a mohawk before I let it grow out again.
RAINN is staffed by volunteers, many of whom have gone through sexual abuse and violence themselves. 
Do you know any adults without kids? I was talking to my boyfriends aunt the other day and realized how rare it was that I interacted with an adult who built their life around just them or them and a partner. Talking to someone who doesn't have kids  might help you visualize how a life without them might turn out. 
My first kiss was by a guy I didn't even like who kissed me without my consent... so yeah, did not enjoy it at all, and I regret it even though I didn't even do anything. I wish it could have been different (with the person I like, for example).
&gt; actively fight  I'm not really sure how active making trolly comments in a twitch chat are. If this is what you define as active, we have different dictionaries. It is still fairly interesting how much stock people put into opinions of a chatroom that is frequently spammed with KAPPA and dongerino.  I'd equate using Twitch chat as representative of actual commentary on people's opinions as visiting that red head's Tumblr as an actual representative of what a feminist is. In this way, the extremes beget the extremes.  Edit: 107,000 viewers actively fighting feminism: [Riot Games LCS stream 8pm](http://i.imgur.com/Rq4AA0v.png)  So which one did you choose to be actively sexist towards women here? Syndra playing with her balls?  I'm enjoying the circlejerking here. I'm waiting for someone to link me that Twitch chat sponsored anti-women's event. I know it's really hard to follow the rules that you guys made for this Subreddit, but apparently the rules only apply if you're disagreeing with a circlejerked opinion. Hilarious.
&gt; So they actively push out men from feminism and really just do more harm than good all around. Why make even more enemies, right?  That's how I feel. Women's rights is a cause that matters to me, it matters to my mom, it matters to my female friends, it matters to every girlfriend I've ever had, and yet my male friends and relatives are often unwilling to call themselves a feminist. And when I ask why, they say, "I want equality for women, but I don't think they're better than men, and that's what feminists believe." And I can't do anything but sigh and what a huge misunderstanding has occurred.
I look at mine, but whatever. To each their own.
It's making me go off to other subreddits more, that's for sure.
Me neither - I was just always indifferent to it, I guess? I also have a sister who's super close in age and I saw her body, so I didn't really feel like it was important to look at mine (cuz they're all the same, right?/s).
when i srsed i got someone asking to watch my suicide but that was as bad as it got  i kinda checked out after that because i kind of got exhausted
Yeah, the wording is confusing. I read it as he groped her, and then groped two other women and that is considered rape in the province. If he raped two women then of course that is rape. 
This is absolutely the case.  I think OP gets that.  
[deleted]
Don't marry him until you decide. But there's no reason to break up now.
[deleted]
An honest question - not baiting.  Is that because there is a dispute about whether the rape took place, or does someone think a rapist should have parental rights?  Or is it because someone thinks there is such a thing as a partial sorta rape?
Is there any truth to the idea that Reddit's userbase is mostly male? I've seen people react to anything the tiniest bit feminine on the default subs (ex a post on /r/funny about period pain prompting sexist comments, people saying the sub isn't "for this demographic)
Crying is part of coming down off the adrenaline high, I remember I pulled my gun (chl holder) to stop a guy from getting killed in a very one sided fight while I had someone else call 911. Afterwards I went to the bar with a friend and even before I started drinking I was choking back tears. I'm a very big (6' 275 lbs) tough looking (mohawk, the kids loved it lol) guy and here I am at my favorite dive bar trying not to cry. It happens. 
Okay I realize I just said this, but I am in *that same fucking boat*. I feel like soul sisters with you now. I'm sorry, I'm not stalking you or anything, just... yeah. That coincidence, though. 
Where should these topics be discussed then, if having them discussed on a womens perspective sub isnt the right place? Maybe you dont appreciate it, but does that mean you cannot ignore it?  Not everybody has an agenda, sometimes people just want to share perspectives and learn. I hope you can take that.
What bothers me is that this sub is full of posts talking about awful, sexist things women endure, and insistence that women speak up and work to make sure men become more aware and understanding of women's experiences... but the minute we are successful and a few men start telling us they get it, the backlash is that "we don't care what you have to say."  Really? Double standard much? Also, without that discussion, what's the point? If the interaction isn't there, the sub becomes a woe is me/hear me roar circle jerk. Quite frankly, I found the sub largely boring before, and I only continued browsing to see if going default would help. Instead, it becomes a barrage of whining about being default. Still boring.   Yes, I have a choice not to read these posts. Indeed, I likely won't anymore. I have no desire to be part of an in-club that says "we are sooo inclusive, just as long as you sit back, keep your mouth shut, and nod and smile." No thanks.
Sorry, I had to remove this. There's PI in there in the form of phone numbers not blocked out.
Not me, but my parents. My mom is Caucasian (a mixture of Polish, French, and German) and my dad is Puerto Rican. She said they got some looks back in the day and some people said things to them about their relationship. They ignored it though and have been together since high school. (:   Ignore the haters and power on! They're not your friends if they're judging you based on who you want to date.
The mods can't be everywhere at once. If you see a creepy/offensive/disrespectful/derailing comment, click the report button. And if you get PMs do the same with those. If you're particularly concerned about a specific poster, send a mod mail with links to multiple post breaking the rules.  Personally I like the men, but the creeps are despicable! Unfortunately, we can't find the creeps until they start posting.
&gt;I hope he's thinking of me, too. That I'm not the only girl he should stay away from.   This was exactly what I wanted to tell you. You did good! sugarbooger is sassy!
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
I've never ended a romantic relationship over it (just because it's never come up), but I definitely would. I've ended friendships over that, for sure. Don't have time in my life for people who think less of me for being passionate about social issues, you know?
[deleted]
When practicalllity is the ultimate goal, why are we even mentioning braids? Or hair for that matter? Just downvote anything apart from the buzz cut. 
[deleted]
OP actually did say that in a comment: *"No he was touching himself. He was sitting on a car stroking his penis. I didn't see it but my friend in the pink and blonde wig did. She shouldn't have said anything to him but their assumption is correct."*   [(Link here](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/comments/271oyz/follow_me_with_your_dick_out_at_2_am_in_a_parking/chwoxsc) and another [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/comments/271oyz/follow_me_with_your_dick_out_at_2_am_in_a_parking/chwp0a1)
Sorry, I know this place is intended for women's perspectives but I can't help but throw in my two cents. I wouldn't worry about those things too much. We all have little weird things our bodies do that they "shouldn't". You said yourself people find you attractive, so anyone who you'd show your naked body would probably be thrilled you're doing so. They aren't going to notice little imperfections, their minds will be preoccupied by more *interesting* things.
First of all, sexism is wrong, no matter what gender.   But, [masturbating in public](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/comments/271oyz/follow_me_with_your_dick_out_at_2_am_in_a_parking/chwp0a1) is also wrong.
[deleted]
I had the same reaction when I first read it. 
[deleted]
My apologies. It must be so annoying to have someone tell you what you should feel. Pity its happening to a lot of women right now in 2X.  (Also its this kind of nitpicking that is doing anyone any benefit and sometimes i get sick of guys thinking they know how or what I am feeling as a woman. I understand how you feel because I have been there having someone on the internet tell me my life experiences are worth nothing and I really shouldn't have been so rude. Unfortunately I am over having this conversation with men.)
[deleted]
You didn't say "young people", you'd think if you were so concerned about the youth, you'd be equally horrified about the sexual behavior of the teenage boys. 
I kept a nail file on me at all times. I also got into nail art!
So that's a no, then? And here I thought that all it would take would be to copy and paste the link to that story into the search field. Don't worry, I did that for you, and surprise surprise, it's not there. Strange considering that AVoiceforMen is "the most popular, most widely loved site by MRAs", one would think that they'd be hailing that story as the divine word of Paul Elam.
Being as someone who has been on many pills at once for depression, anxiety, bipolar, addiction among other things, it's not as bad as people think.   When I was ten I got addicted to Xanax (prescribed) and after I finally got off I told myself I'd never see anyone else and I'd never take medication again. It was a miserable experience until I started marriage counseling eight years later. After my husband and I split my marriage counselor became my therapist. I see her once a week and have been for the past two and a half years. I've tried dozens of drugs and we've narrowed it down to a mixture that makes me feel human and capable again. Unfortunately I had to ween myself for a short period of time when I lost my health insurance. As soon as I get my new insurance reinstated I'm adamant on going back on the pills because they help me function like a regular person.  It sucks having these issues but you have to make the best of it and find what works for you. I highly recommend finding someone to talk to, and if you don't find anyone you like, keep looking until you do. It has been a positive experience as an adult after such a negative one when I was younger. If you really don't want to seek help through therapy, I've heard Chinese herbs can help a lot with anxiety.   Best of luck to you!! 
I dunno, maybe it's just because my husband happens to have an average sized penis but above-average sized hands...however, I'd been having PIV sex for several years before we worked our way up to 4 fingers.    4 fingers is A LOT harder for me to take than a penis or large toy - not only is it a bigger volume, but fingers are harder and pointer and not round. 
the first time it happened to me i was in 4th grade. a guy pulled over in his car and asked for directions to a nearby street and that's when i noticed his cock was out and he was touching it. i lived in a small town in a good neighborhood.   it's happened when i was out running at least 3 times. car pulls up in front of me, door opens as i'm approaching, furious masturbating as i pass. i now memorize license plates of people who pull over in front of me so the next time it happens i can report it. ~~once~~ twice it happened in the same small town and good neighborhood, and the other times it's been in good neighborhoods in seattle.   i also had to call out a guy who was masturbating on a seattle city bus right across the aisle from a lady with 2 kids. this was a high school student who was obviously out of his mind on molly or something so i didn't think he was dangerous, just retarded.   these things don't just happen in bad neighborhoods and at night. i've even been sexually harassed while in line at the grocery store at 4pm in a good neighborhood (no, creepy old man, i DON'T want to see the porn on your smart phone as a matter of fact). and as for why, i'd guess some people are just assholes and think they can get away with it. 
You should consider not having the exact same tests year to year.   Also, clarifying grades and potential grade discrepancies is most certainly not tutoring. Further, most college professors are EXPECTED to be involved in communication with students outside of class hours (whether it be via email or in person at office hours). This isn't considered tutoring.   It's really not tutoring if the test has been given on the information.   Also, you give NO correct answers? Even going over the test with a student? They obviously know the correct answers for the ones they got right. You make no sense.
She shouldn't be. I'm saying that this is taken seriously and have seen careers ruined over it.
[deleted]
One of my favorite things about running is that people who run tend to be non-judgy and really supportive.  When you see someone running, you don't know if they're on their first mile or their 20th, don't know if it's their first day out or they've been running for years, etc. The general idea is you're out there doing what you can do that day &amp; at least you got out there in the first place. I've never felt judged about where I am in terms of weight or speed etc, because every runner I've met just seems happy to see another runner on the road.  You're going on a journey. Don't worry so much about what others might think (haters gonna hate), focus on doing your own thing &amp; think positively-- you might just meet more cool people who are on that same journey. Best of luck to you!
It was with a guy that I thought I was in love with and it wasn't a pleasurable experience; it was very bland. The guy started getting very needy and wanting to be around me all the time after the fact. This lead me to realize that I didn't feel the same way for him, and I eventually broke it off. I am with a guy now that I have been dating for 4+ years. I know I love and want to be with him for the rest of my life. I know he feels the same way. I mostly wish that I had waited for him so that we could have shared our first time together. It would have been more meaningful and a better experience overall. 
Well that does suck but that doesn't mean that all child support sucks.   The penalty for late child support should be the same as the penalty for other kinds of late payments of taxes, bills, rent ect.   A small fine or something would probably have been more fair. 
Well, at least in my experience, none of us with short hair got any unwanted attention from the TIs. I had the shortest hair, with my pixie cut, but the TIs preferred to pick on the women with buns, pointing out every little hair out of place or popping out of the bun, etc. All I had to do was wash my hair and comb it a little. Every once in a while add a tiny bit of gel to my cowlick if it was being rowdy. It was fantastic!
Well obviously, nobody is obligated to take care of a child if there is an abortion. There isn't a child so no one needs to do anything.   In the event there is a child, the people who brought that child into the earth should be equally responsible. It's not fair to say that fathers aren't obligated to provide for their own children, especially when mothers are obligated.   I think adoption ought to be equal as well.   In many cases you can choose to have a child or not to have a child, but if there is a child, you have to provide for them. 
What the hell?If you said yes then it's not rape.
Misandry is the hatred of men, not the oppression of men. Not only that, but the way misandry plays out is not and has never been as catastrophic as misogyny. Sexism works to oppress women, and I continue to assert that men, as a whole, are not oppressed and never have been, as a whole, oppressed.
[deleted]
[deleted]
I love this perspective. It's similar because they (some male gamers) often believe that women are coming into a space that's just meant for men.   Personally, I sometimes mask my gender when playing online and even though my tag is ambiguous, people assume I am a guy. I try to do this as little as possible because I think that if more women were "out" in gaming that those male gamers would realize that this isn't their space, it's everyone's. 
[deleted]
Somewhat. Outside of work, I wouldn't say making friends with women is especially "difficult," but I find some tend to be very cliquey. Men are easier to talk to, but on that same token they usually take my friendliness for flirtation.
[deleted]
You should go to a clinic and get PEPs or post exposure prophylactics.  These are emergency medications that can block the transmission of some STIs, including HIV, if given in a short enough period.  They are not 100% effective, but can greatly decrease your chances of catching something.  You should also get tested.  However, many STIs have incubation periods - about 2 weeks to up to 3 months - this means the first test will not be 100% accurate.  If you test negative for everything, you still need to retest in 3 months, and then again in 3 months after that.  If you have no unprotected sex between now and the test in 6 months, you will know for sure whether or not you have contracted an STI.    Most places have free testing clinics.  Planned Parenthood is always a good choice.  The test itself is very short.  They take a blood sample for HIV and most of the common ones, and a vaginal swab (think really long q-tip) for chlamydia and gonorrhea.  I am not a lawyer, but I would *definitely* press charges against the aunt.   Whether or not to break up with him is your choice, but I would absolutely kick that asshole to the curb.  Good luck.
Hi. If the comment was as clear cut as you think, would people be arguing over the meaning? Come on now, people are suppose to understand ironic humor at around age 10. What are you doing? Are you arguing that it is OK to follow someone with your dick out as long as you honestly believe they complimented your dick, context clues be damned? Because that's what it sounds like you're arguing. 
Mostly, it was the top of my head that itched.  Maybe my scalp was just sensitive, or that I did it in winter has something to do with it?  I dunno.  I almost consistently have a mohawk these days, and the sides never bug me, but I remember the top of my head being really itchy.   I don't know if I'd ever shave my whole head again.  I'm not as brave as I was when I was younger.
What? I was responding to the person who was appalled and felt like a victim after a person she was rude to called her names. I don't give a shit if she responds or not, I just think its idiotic to be rude, and then act like its so crazy that somebody would be rude back.  People treat the homeless as if they are beneath them, and not even worthy of a look every day. Those people are assholes. Its frustrating when you see the assholes acting like victims because they got what was coming to them.
I think that this is an important response, so please bare with me here for a second. I am a guy, and I read this sub relatively frequently, but I feel like 99% of the time, it is not my place to comment. Like you ladies have posted, 2X isn't supposed to be a feel good sub where newly enlightened guys share how changed they have become. First, I do not see how me sharing my experiences, unless particularly appropriate to a specific thread, is either helpful, interesting, or entertaining. Secondly, even though chiming in with our...whatever, experiences? might be good intentioned,  it is, in my opinion, just not what this subreddit is supposed to be about. What are we supposed to get, a cookie for not being sexist pigs? I honestly feel like sometimes when men do post here it is almost a weird way of trying to be the nice guy and somehow strike up a conversation with women...maybe that is just me being extra cynical, but it sure comes off as a lot of white knighting sometimes...Anyway, I will go back to my lurking now, hope its OK I chimed in here...
Somewhere else - this is not r/genderrelations, and the purpose of this sub is not to educate men about women.
... You don't. Although you could solve your problem by respecting your boyfriend's taste and respecting his intelligence to see that lots of the lyrics in rap are retarded things said by retarded people instead of dismissing the genre as a whole.  I guess i get it though, all rap is super misogynist. Listen to this fucking hate speech, it's shameful.  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=hlVBg7_08n0&amp;feature=kp 
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
No! You're genius. I'm gonna tell him that Meghan doesn't allow him to play video games only Mommy does. :D
It has been awesome! Just like any job, there will be days you love, and days you hate. There will be superiors that are awesome, and some that are less so. Your attitude will make all the difference. As with anything in life, you will get out what you put into it.
I go back and forth. Sometimes I wax my legs and underarms, sometimes I let it grow out to wax. I'm verry light skinned with verry dark thick hair. It just depends on the time of the year honestly. 
First off, I knew saying "nice dick" was sarcastic. And dude was a total pervert and even if he thought she was serious, he should have put it away immediately when she made it clear she was not interested.  Out of curiosity, do you think if the situation was reversed, and a girl was being sleezy and exposing herself, and a dude scoffed at her and said "nice tits", you think people would respond the same way? Or would the guy be labeled a perv for saying that. 
I get that it must suck to be completely overweight. I mean it's understandable to not find them attractive but people definitely don't listen to fat people even though they should.   At the same time though, i don't see a problem with people striving to be skinny or lean. It's a far healthier lifestyle.
[deleted]
[deleted]
I'm just gonna pretend you're the real life Suzanne "Crazy Eyes" Warren for further hilarity :)
I'm in the US. I plan on changing mine. Mostly I just don't like the sound of my last name, but there are other factors too. It's a cultural thing. I've been tying my first name to whoever I "like" since I had my first crush - doodling Mrs. Blahblah in my notebooks and all that. I also see it as a big milestone of marking the two of us as one family. Sure, you could go for a combined name, but again- I don't like mine. And lastly, it makes it easier when naming kids. I've heard of people alternating the kid's last names and such, but that's just not for me.   My stepmom kept her maiden name as her middle name. So, for example, if she was Sally Lynn Jones and she married John Smith, she'd now be Sally Jones Smith. I think that's a good way to hold onto a well-established professional name and still uphold tradition. 
yeah, i can't really relate to joking about porn, lol.  I can relate to getting physically disciplined when i was younger though. But not with a cane. I feel like I came out better on the other side because of it, honestly.
I wouldn't have made the first comment but if some how I was on the recieving end of your reply, the look on my face would have been due to the 'on' accident part. 
But four times to one woman? That seems really extreme.
No chance of pregnancy, sperm isn't that powerful. Relax, it's just a day late. Paradoxically, stress delays menstruation. So you might be causing this yourself. Go and do something relaxing. Or put white pants/underwear on, periods love ruining those :D   &gt;I cant tell how long to wait to get a test, or even if the test will be accurate!  For future reference, early detection pregnancy tests can do that in 5-7 days, regular need two weeks at least. But there's no need for it considering what you've said here. You can buy them in bulk on Amazon if you want them cheap and easily available. 
I was out at a club once, waiting for my bf to get out of the bathroom, and had three guys pin me up against the wall demanding high fives. They didn't actually do anything, and I never did give them their high fives -- but man they were very aggressive in wanting their high fives.   So I guess high fives can be unwanted too! 
[deleted]
&gt; Late term abortions are only legal when (1) the fetus is not viable, (2) the fetus is severely damaged, (3) the mother's health is endangered by the pregnancy, or (4) there is another reason why the abortion is needed, in pretty much every state.  please provide citation for this for every state where it is legal.  &gt;Good for your wife for having an easy birth. Not everyone is as lucky as she is.  Who the fuck said she had an easy birth? 14 hours of pain, part of which with the baby turned sideways and a decent amount of blood loss.  &gt;And also you will notice that this entire chain of comments is talking about fetuses that are not going to be happily surviving in the absence of abortion. You appear to be arguing for prohibiting abortion in those cases here.  I'm arguing that human life is intrinsically valuable and its value lends itself the right to exist above another person's right to be free of pain for a temporary period of time. Or, would you suggest that as a treatment for excruciating pain that (if these were actually a thing) people be allowed to kill week old babies that are sick to alleviate their pain that would naturally go away otherwise.
From an archivist (almost) point of view, that must make things SO much easier for genealogy research!   &gt;Children are usually always given their mother's surname in their name, and their father's surname as their last name.  Can you give an example of that?
Fine, lemme go get my scarlet 'H.'   We're done, right? Okay, good night. 
Thank you! My period ended yesterday and the Diva Cup is supposed to get here in a few days. I'm going to practice getting it in and out. I just with there was a way I could figure out if it's in the right place or not before my period started. You know? Like I wish I could practice so I know when my period starts I can just put it in and never touch a pad again. 
GUILTY :)  http://i.imgur.com/JYU89BL.gif
I'm sorry that happened to her.
It amazes me that people of either sex assume the opposite sex can say what all men/women are all about. Come on. You know that you're different from other men, why would it be any different for us women?! We're not a different species, haha.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Seconding Guild Wars 2. Also the NPC's had awesome stories no matter what gender they are.
[deleted]
Wut?
It isn't a "pick up line," it's a show of power and control: *I want, I get. I can make you engage in this sexual behavior with me, and you can't do anything about it.*  Catcalls, dick flashing, unwanted groping, etc. etc.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Yeah that guy is such a tool.
Sorta?  In high school I dated a boy whose best friend was black. I was also very good friends with him, and he introduced me to my boyfriend. At one point some stupid high school rumor started that I was only with my then-boyfriend (of two years) as a cover because my parents wouldn't want me dating a black boy. People tried to make me feel bad both for using my boyfriend as a cover and for potentially dating a black guy. The three of us did no confirm nor deny anything, we told everyone to fuck off equally.  I thought the whole thing was stupid and mildly funny in that 'oh god' way. I went home and told my mother about the rumor who said: "OMG you're dating *best friend*?? We love *best friend*! Invite him over for dinner!"
I created an account specifically because I had a really horrible experience that made me stop going to nightclubs. I was at a bar dancing with friends and this guy starts getting grabby and trying to shove his hand down my pants. I got pissed and said loud enough so my friends could hear, "I don't know why you think it's okay to try and molest a girl in public, you come near me again and I'll tell the staff."   He didn't bother me again. The time for female empowerment is the moment you feel uncomfortable or violated. You don't just let anyone grope you because you don't want to be seen as a "killjoy." I'm sorry if this sounds harsh but you let this happen and you might feel bad about it but you have no one to blame but yourself. When you know you're putting yourself in a situation where things like this happen you have to be prepared to stand up for yourself and take control of the situation.   
Sorry, by friends, I meant facebook friends*   They don't actually hang out in person (or I don't think they have). They've probably chatted a bit, but that's not what I'm concerned about. It's him oogling at her and imagining to fuck her that bothers me, I guess. It's different from wanting to fuck a model, because she's actually a real girl. 
[deleted]
Honestly, I don't think relationships or partners should affect who you are friends with. I've had this happen before, when a partner ran into an ex while with me, and they were super friendly together, and it honestly did bother me a bit. I talked to him about it afterwards, let him know my feelings, but bottomline is that I'm not one to tell him who he can and can't be friends with; I know if someone pulled that with me I'd take it as a big red flag. It is definitely common for that stuff to cause reactions like jealousy. Talk about it though, it doesn't need to be super serious. I'd say bring it up with him in a half-joking/half-serious kind of way. Let him know you're feeling something, but also let him know that you're not telling him who he can and can't be friends with. You're very much most likely to get a response that'll not only quell any worries, but will also give you probably a boost of confidence when he tells you that he definitely want to be with you most. Absolute worst case scenario, you find out something that sooner or later would have really hurt your relationship, and you can deal with it before it gets any bigger. I mean, these kinds of things are almost taboo to talk about in relationships, tunfortunately, but too often these emotions go hidden because people feel they're not appropriate to talk about and build up pressure. I'm poly though, and also bi (so the whole "not hanging out with a gender thing" doesn't quite work with me), so take it with a grain of salt, I suppose.
the first several times it happened i lived in a small town in the south. 20,000 people, great schools. i lived in a good neighborhood. it was the middle of the afternoon. if you think it's a big city thing you're so, so wrong. it's literally everywhere. 
Hell, I'm proud of you! 
Although I'm not particularly looking for relationship advice, more of advice on how to deal with my abandonment issues, I really, really very much appreciate this.
I believe fathers are more protective bc they dont want their little girl to have a baby by some dead beat who wont support their child.  An ex of mine had a lot of drama in that department and it of course changed the way he looked at anyone who would take out his daughter
Ah ok thanks for clearing that up!
You are not responsible for being the victim of a crime while intoxicated.   You are responsible for any crimes you perpetrate while intoxicated.
I actually have a specialist but I don't get to see him for a while.  I've called my local suicide hotline two years ago and they made fun of me.  Surprise surprise, I then did attempt suicide -.- anyway so I'm terrified of calling the suicide hotlines.  I've been to a lot of therapist over my life, but I literally can't speak to them.  The same thing happened when I moved to my third primary - I become selectively mute and it's horrible.    I can't figure out what my potential is.  
I had this for a while. It still sort of comes and goes. Therapy and Exercise really help me a bunch. Exercise is seriously amazing. I swear the reason anti-depressants are perscribed so much is because we don't get nearly enough exercise. On days where I don't ride my bike to work, I am noticeably sadder, less in touch with my emotions, quicker to snap, harder to get motivated, etc etc etc. I can not stress this enough. Exercise, especially outside exercise in the sun, helps depression better than everything else combined. I also found a therapist who I actually click with. Usually I'd at best think therapy was a waste of time, and at worst dread it. Now that I have a therapist I'm comfortable with I LOOK FORWARD to it all week, and take every step I can take to make sure I don't miss it.  Another crazy thing about body image / self-esteem is... fake it till you make it. This seriously works. Look in your mirror every day and tell yourself you look good. Check yourself out from time to time, even if you're forcing it. Eventually, it'll catch up with you. This might be me, but feeling bad about my image was a sort of safety net, in that I could always blame it. Take these words for what they're worth, even if it might not make sense "Gain the confidence to deal with the fact that you might actually look pretty damn good"  That's all I got. Best of luck! PM me if you need someone to talk to!
[deleted]
I ended up going bra less under my dress and I'm a DD. I originally bought a strapless longline bustier to go under it, but it worked against the boning in the dress, which made the dress sag at the top. I had to be laced in super tight (and re-laced a couple of times during the day) but it worked. So give your dress a go without a bra/bustier. Also Hollywood tape is great to keep the top from gaping as you move around for photos and such. Hope you enjoy your special day!
It does, unfortunately, generally seem to be the case that men who want a target go for women, and women who want a target also go for women. Not 100%, but it's certainly more common.  That being said, I do think that there's something to be said for the sort of confidence where you don't need to go around praising yourself. But that's very different from saying, "I think I look fine and don't need to change myself in order for people to be interested in me." What I observe a lot of times, when people start harping on about the importance of "loving yourself," is that they're really only talking to themselves, and not to everyone. And, generally, I hear this sort of thing from very, very insecure people who choose to go the route of talking themselves up rather than actually having the courage to look at their flaws and become the person they want to be.
One of my friends says retarded stuff like this all the time and "hits on" women every chance he gets and he just doesnt seem to realize how fucking weird he sounds. I literally get embarassed when he does this crap around me.
Depends on the type of sexual assault. Rape? Maybe. But the onus shouldn' be on women to consistently fight off attackers with no societal attempt to prevent attacks from happening in the first place. Successfully fighting off a rape attempt is still traumatic.   As for other sexual assaults, again, it's something that happens after the assault. Maybe it stops it from escalating. Maybe you feel a bit better and safer. But you've still been assaulted. 
Men *can* be in favour of equality... but the trouble is that there are plenty of men out there who really do put up a feminist front as a way to take advantage of women. Hugo Schwyzer is one such well-known example. So unfortunately a lot of women have been burnt, and take it out on well-meaning men like yourself.   It sucks, but all you can really do is understand and keep fighting for equality despite such setbacks. Perhaps you would be interested in a visit to /r/srsmen for likeminded discussion. 
I get that this stuff is terrible. But what kind of search results do they expect when they type in 'women cannot'? 
[deleted]
Surely this is simply that women are far more likely to be raped, sexually assaulted and otherwise abused. Parents would worry if they thought their son was likely to commit such things, but of course parents always believe the best of their children even though given the high rates of women being victims they are probably overconfident that their child won't do such things.   Yes I am not denying that some parents still hold the very negative attitudes around virginity and purity but I doubt that is the primary concern for most. 
Worst comment ever.....
Equal rights are a clusterbomb of philosophical misguidedness and insidious bias from which nobody can escape in an age of permanent unfettered broadcast. Every demographic of every kind contains a writhing mass of ignorant individuals and cherry-picking them as representative serves no purpose other than to place you among their ranks. One cannot desire to be seen as different from the perceived male gender whilst seeing these people as the perceived female gender.  Personally though, I find the prose to be so comically speared with cherubic innocent as you come to face women coursing with the blood of evil harpes, I'm surprised you didn't afterwards frolick through a lush meadow before ascending directly to heaven framed by a speech bubble triumphing that justice has prevailed.  But, it's always nice to be proved wrong.
Another game series which is similar to Mass Effect (made by Bioware also) is Dragon Age, it's a fantasy setting instead of sci-fi.  I seriously cannot get enough of it.
First, the only thing you should feel after this sexual encounter is lucky that you actually had an orgasm. I remember my sexual prowess in high school and let's just say there was room for improvement. Sex is always that thing that everybody thinks will be a life changing thing and it never is.  Well your friend seems kinda lame to be honest. 17 is about the right age to be fucking people. If you don't see any problem with being sexually active, don't let the judgement of your friend stop you. That is just silly, what are you going to do, wait until he feels ready for you to have sex with somebody else? You gotta life your life in a way that makes sense to you.  As for the anxiety, what helped me for the most part was my partner's willingness to get an abortion. Now before the internet goes nuts on me, we are very safe but there is always that chance that something could go wrong. If you are unwilling to get an abortion, i really only see courses of action  1) take comfort in the fact that if you use condoms and the pill, the odds of you getting pregnant during a whole year of regular intercourse are 1 in 1/1000  2) Just stay away from PIV sex until you could support a child. Lots of guys are totally cool with oral and maybe anal if you're into that. If that's a deal breaker for them, then they weren't right for you.  And finally, just my 2c, i think your friend wants to fuck the shit out of you but is too afraid to do anything. I could be wrong but i can't think of many reasons why somebody would act the way he does.
Ok
That's ok, it's in the past and it doesn't upset me anymore. I was almost 13 when I got adopted and had spent almost two years in the foster system. Before then they would sometimes take me away for a while because things got too bad, until one day they never gave me back to them. My parents adopted me after my mother would see me playing outside the home and drawing pictures with chalk on the footpaths all the time. She would stop and chat to me a bit and we would have these long conversations. It's unusual for someone at that age to be adopted, people generally want to adopt a baby and when you get older than that you normally just drift around in the system until you age out and get put out into the world on your own. My parents are the most beautiful people and they adopted me with their eyes open and knew that there was probably going to be a lot of difficulty with me, and unfortunately I was old enough to remember everything from my earlier life. It's not a life I would wish on anyone and it had definitely left it's mark. It took a lot of time and energy to readjust to being in a normal loving family, where you are actually loved and people care about you. I never had those things before and I didn't handle it very well at first. I harboured a deep fear that it will all be taken away from me and would flip out if someone was a little late getting home. It got so bad that when I wasn't in school I had to go to Dad's work to be near him until he finished. Now I'm fine, I count myself so lucky and have a great life and I'm surrounded by the best people I could ever hope for.  Sorry I rambled a little, I never used to talk about it at all, but now that I find it doesn't bother me I find that whenever I talk about it it makes me just appreciate how happy and lucky I am. Plus I think if we as a society are more open about child abuse then we would be more inclined to intervene when we suspect something.
We say it to each other too. Women are not excluded in anyway. were just stupid as hell. We like to make each other laugh.  
[deleted]
I love getting to see everything new again through their eyes. Things that I've seen and done so many times are new and exciting to them. I love that I get to share in that excitement with them. 
Pick her!  Pick her! 
When you were in high school, did you have a very hot friend, or a cute guy you had a crush on? If you think of him, do you think about ''back in high school?'' Does that make you love your boyfriend any less, or make you any less attracted to him?  It's all the past, and you choose your boyfriend, just like your boyfriend choose you. You should trust him.
Generalizing things like this isn't good, and just makes the problem worse. I don't know where you other gals live, but I'm not afraid to walk at night and I'm not asking every guy who walks past me to let me know he's there. I don't give a shit if he's there or not. We're all human beings..... When did we lose sight of that?
Ali Wong
It was not a very good joke, but just because he used the word 'girl' doesn't mean he thinks girls using knives are dangerous, I could see a similar situation with a male employee and the customer saying   'oh no, a guy with a knife, maybe I should back up'  Is this sexist? should we only talk to people in gender neural tones?  It was a joke, he was probably just trying to be easy going at the sight of a knife.  edit: Can anyone explain to me why this is now a default sub? So many cringe worthy posts here....
This sounds like TRP advice except I am pretty sure they would frown upon women waiting until the elderly age of 27 to reproduce. 
You'll have to tell him you have a boyfriend and to cut it out. I'd say you could also make him aware he's breaching privacy policy.   It's probably uncool to take any further action though (unless of course he persists) since it honestly just feels like he was shot by cupid and not possessed by the devil. 
[This](http://www.hillsdesignawards.com.au/entry/indian-slum-toilet/) was a recent finalist in an Australian design competition and a great idea. should get behind it
Except that it's bullshit. It's written as fembait (just like articles written as nerd bait) it's just to get views.   Expecting rape culture to be explained to is has nothing to do with the person being a woman.   Rape culture is an accusation toward all men. The least you can do when publicly accusing someone is to explain what they did wrong.   Frankly,  as a respectable man who hates rape,  I don't owe you anything either,  but if we continue with this attitude,  nothing will get fixed.   But I will certainly not be inserting myself into personal situations I know nothing about and place myself in harms way so that you may feel safe.  This article isn't completely worthless,  but this guy pushes self-flagellation a bit too far in my opinion.   Though it's nice for once to be able to comment without derailing,  since this article is (supposed to be)  written for my gender. 
[deleted]
So hold on, he specifically got sneaky and took a cab so he could get with her drunk ass before anyone even had the opportunity to call him out?  Am I the only person thinking a woman was probably raped here regardless?  Guy sounds like he's even done it before.  I feel like your roommate needs to call the cops, not his bro out on some "shady shit."
[deleted]
If someone slaps her ass that is harassment, someone yells vulgar comments that is harassment. Someone stares then she just has to deal with it. It isn't about intentions or feelings, it is about the tangible. Society cannot progress while it is falling over itself to cater to every person who feels like people are staring at them. TBH I hate the victim mentality of even the way someone looks is some kind of objectification, it is just the internal caveman having a look, really this stuff needs to be excused.
Woman are not a minority in any sense of the word.
Really you can replace 'girl' with anything, on gender, race or religion, and it still would be really offensive. It was an simply an idiotic joke. And would have loved to see the scene and reactions.
Please remove the direct link to the magictg thread so I can re-approve your comment. :)
I think generally it's just not seen as a serious problem so, as an extension, the police don't give enough of a fuck to enforce the existing laws. 
I like that he says, "Now girls, feel free to crowd-surf safely," after the rant. He is encouraging the ladies to have fun, and not telling them to protect themselves or something. Instead, he puts all the onus on the concertgoers to not be pieces of shit and act like decent human beings.
if you think a ring is gonna stop a guy who sought her number out in the computer system you don't know weird guys
But you have defined putting the child up for adoption as a responsibility of the people who created the child, and a way to care for the child.   "Instead of providing them with money and care you are providing them with different parents. "  Why is it the male rape victim's responsibility to find different parents for the child, and care for the child until that point, when the male rape victim's actions didn't create the child? 
I'm using chrome on windows. And also works fine on safari on my phone. 
If it were me, I would have naturally used "girl" instead of "guy" in the phrase "there's a guy with a knife".  And meaning just generally a "there is a person with a knife, aahhh" joke
"Sorry, I'm not always aware of the sexist comments I make" is not an excuse for them.   Be aware. Realize what's you're saying is sexist and knock it off. 
ugh, this is so dumb. i'm one of 3 girls, and i was definitely a "daddy's girl" in that i bonded more with my father than my mother.  we never had a problem relating to one another. i don't see why men shouldn't be able to relate to women, and i think it's pretty sad if a guy can't do that.
I don't mean to nitpick, but that first quoted statement is not reliable (a report somewhere else quotes someone who hasn't done research as saying something).    As for doing something: if you want, donate money, but don't get the "white savior" complex.  For example, in the last two decades India went from less than one in five people having access to decent sanitation, to over one in three ([here's a chart;](http://imgur.com/jdPhL2z) I got the data from Worldbank).  If you go to [gapminder.org](www.gapminder.org) and play around with their data, you will see that this improvement trend is happening all over the world.  
[deleted]
Do a little googling. The "95% of rapes" statement has no studies or reports to back it up. Looks like someone trying to promote fear culture. 
=P I know. The reason I commented in the first place was that TwoXChromosomes pissed me off with all the women (rightfully) hating on men (douchebags). I've realized that I shouldn't be angry because i'm not a douchebag that does this stuff. 
I know it wasnt on your list, but You should make an effort to stop by Nordstrom if you can. Drop some money on really nice quality pieces and you'll be happy. Try to find business clothes too.   Good luck! 
[deleted]
[deleted]
Considering the boobs were a glitch that they left in because it was funny, I never found them bothering me that much.  I thought they were kind of funny too.  I even liked that Angelina Jolie had massive padded boobs in the movie because it was kind of a nod at how ridiculous it was.  I didn't really see it too differently from male characters who would have a comically large codpiece because her boobs or sexuality was never a part of gameplay or distracting enough to make the game a different experience.
Stand up for yourself.  You've got a room full of people who would take your corner if you just made it known that you aren't ok with the way this guy acts.  The reason these guys stay out of it is because they don't want to disrespect you by assuming that you are a weak girl in need of help.  This guy wants to play rough though?  Tap a few mountains, and summon up some goblins next time.    They are at your disposal, but until you put them on the table, they'll just be sitting in your hand wishing that you would let them help.
that doesn't mean the toy itself is gendered; it means the use of it is. to paraphrase a popular infographic, unless you're operating a toy with your genitals (in which case, it's not for children), the toy is for boys and girls.
Sounds like a plan! If he persists, maybe you should tell his employers at the gym.
We're actually going to be taking the middle name of a grandfather that my husband was really fond of as our last name. I really like the sound of the name and was the one who suggested it and he was really touched that I would suggest that we take that name.
Actually, that makes this even creepier - your relationships shouldn't be of any interest to a 30 year old married man, and the fact that he's actually inquiring online is super weird.  Be cautious, and if you still have copies of those messages, save them, cause they're worth passing up the chain if you keep having issues with this guy.
[deleted]
&gt; at the grocery store  You are funny.  I was never cat-called while grocery shopping. Who would cat-call someone inside a store?   I said "when grocery shopping" not "in the store". That entails walking back in daylight with heavy bags on my shoulders. You know, when you are sexy sweating and swearing outside of a store, having your determined bitchface on and your hot sneakers? Even *then* women get whistled after.
Just keep a cool head and take deep breaths. You're completely in the right here and even if you didn't have a boyfriend, you are completely valid in feeling uncomfortable by his actions.
that's not my logic at all, and if you don't understand what i'm saying by now, you're not open to giving up your own biases. i'm done. 
at least India has a space program though (their priorities are in the right order) :( 
He should be admonishing the girl for jumping on top of people, forcing them to either suffer injury from the impact or to catch you in self defence.
They need toilets and 45's.
Honestly, whoever is able to take care of it. In our society, it may be foster homes or adoption agencies, before it was maybe a church or assuming that a random person would take care of it. There's no concrete moral law that states that a parent needs to financial support a child from birth until age 18.
That's an extremely Ewokish picture of Archie. Props!
I think proper form considering the amount of content editing you did would of been to make a new reply. I have noticed you make a habit of editing your posts to make the replies you receive seemingly less valid. Stay classy.
Well, it has to do with the area you go to, and the time of day, and the power of groups.  A very similar thing happens to women who have to collect firewood in developing countries- often you go to an area that's more remote, need to go at an off time of day (very early or very late- need to start a fire early to get it hot enough to cook, need to pee when you need to go!), and the work is solitary.   
[deleted]
Yeah it was one of those things I regretted saying right away. I should have just yelled what he was doing so he would get scared someone would see. 
[deleted]
I'd like you to read your response, as if it were written by a man in response to the most common answer in the womens thread:  &gt;It's the same problem we've heard over and over. Women live in a constant state of fear over the aggression of men. That's an old subject. I'd like to get a little more, and that's why I read it.  If you can't see how trivializing that is to the argument being made by men, than you have exactly as little empathy as those men who don't empathize with your cause.
What you describes sounds no less "lacking in authenticity" than some of the sci-fi I've read.  Dragons that move a planet? I mean, come *on*.
A much more compelling number than the Bechdel test in my opinion. Also interesting since aren't like more than 50% of ticket purchasers female?
Nothing at all, i said i'm all for breast feeding. I'm just trying to understand the argument for the other side.   It is a thing that it's not cool to show your boobs in public. The question is whether or not breast feeding counts as an exception to that rule. I say yes, others say no. But is there really any right answer to that question? I feel like it's more a matter of opinion.
[deleted]
Outside of India, Australia. 
However, it would be cool to have a Dragon as a sidekick.
&gt; Because all those things women complain in their thread are another side of the same problem - communication issue.    No. Rape, murder, and sexual assault are not "communication issues".
No no, I totally agree with you. By discrete I didn't necessarily mean hiding under a blanket. Its possible to be discrete just by unbuttoning enough for baby to nurse and holding them close.   I've sat next to nursing mothers and not even noticed immediately because I've thought they were just holding their baby normally.  
[deleted]
It's not just one variable, the entire industry is heavily male dominated with certain ideas, theories, writing, producing, and crew membership geared towards mostly male everything, from characters to plots.   One of my biggest all time pet peeves is the constant need for female characters to always be hooked up with male leads. It doesn't matter the genre or the plot. And if the two do hook up, the woman completely loses her independent nature with everything about her revolving around the relationship and generally becomes a shrewish bitch.   Drives me up the wall.  The Bechdel test is a good generic test that does have some flaws, but anymore I see it brought up, a lot of guys start playing the "not me.... Doesn't apply to me personally so it has no relevance at all to what you're talking about.".  The "not me" game is also frustrating, and needs to be brought up against.   I got a little ranty, but I know this topic all too well.
contact the site's hosting provider
Because bathrooms are where people shit.  They are stinky and uncomfortable.  Public bathrooms, especially women's, are often much nastier than you might imagine (largely due to women who are so afraid of touching a toilet seat that they hover, resulting in spray going everywhere).    Toilet seats are uncomfortable to sit on for much more than a few minutes, and babies may need to nurse for 20-40 minutes at a time.  There's nowhere to prop your elbows, no way to lean back, and god forbid there's a line to use the restroom while you're in there.  They are loud, with people talking, flushing, and hand dryers going off.  Babies of a certain age are very distractible, and this can make them pop on and off and squirm around and just generally make things more difficult.  Infants have weak immune systems, and lord only knows what things are crawling around in a bathroom.  If the person in front of you did not wash their hands, just the act of opening and closing a stall door, then touching your bra to release the tit, could be exposing your kid to all kinds of shit (this is true everywhere, but especially true in bathrooms).  You can carry little sterilizing wipes and do your best, but still. Yuck.  The basic answer to this question is would you sit down in a public bathroom to eat your lunch?  Some bathrooms have little attached sitting areas with couches and whatnot -  those are usable and I have used them.  But in most places, not so much.  
I agree with you. The biggest budget ones are the ones we need to look at as they're the studios that are pretty dictating the current status quo.
That's what I had as a hunch but didn't want to just flat out say that it was so. It just feels that if marketers or whatever did that they'd only be shooting themselves in the foot.
Please don't compare feeding a baby to peeing. One is eliminating unsanitary waste from your body. The other is producing nutrition necessary for the baby to live. I get where you're coming from but this is part of the problem - we need to get past these comparisons and compare it to the only other thing it's comparable to - adults eating. 
Immediately contact whoever you host your site through. You can complain that there are nude photos, which can sometimes go against an end-user license agreement and they will take it down right away.  If you don't know who hosts the site, go to [whois.net](http://www.whois.net/). Type in the domain name and it will pop up with the host information and contact information. Call them and maybe they can work something out. It's a sticky situation, since your ex is the owner of the site.  I'm glad you called an attorney.
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
Ugh, please reread my statement and the context before you comment pleae.
Absolutely. So are you a captain? 
You suggested women's issues were more deadly than men's issues, which is untrue, not sure why you are trying to argue against facts but carry on if you wish. 
But it's about as not comparable to adults eating as it is to peeing. I don't have to put my junk on the table to eat. So it's not really the same thing. I know peeing isn't a perfect metaphor but neither is eating at a restaruant with fork and knife.
&gt;... by no means should the use of training or personal protective measures be used as a response to societal issues. When your society gets to the point that large numbers of people need personal protection something is deeply wrong. The world is a pretty shitty place a lot of the time and we should be working to make it better...  :-/  Where I disagree here is that the world has *always* been a shitty place.  In fact, it's much better now than it was.  I agree that it doesn't fix the underlying problem, but it can't hurt to mitigate risk in the short term.  I don't think it does damage to the march of progress.  People have been hurting and killing each other for millenia.  That's not about to suddenly stop, but it's certainly been decreasing.  The rest is spot on, though.
[deleted]
I've noticed my body takes much longer to warm up to sex than it used to. Masturbation almost never happens, but I absolutely love sex and want it! Weird.   I'm not sure if this is a factor of the connections I have with my partners, hormones from the NuvaRing, my anti-depressant, being 31 and aging more rapidly... or all of the above! 
I didn't say there was a problem. I said there was a difference.
OMG *high five* this is great. had similar at work a few years ago: a guy i worked with CONSTANTLY made rude and actually somewhat funny comments about my boobs. i laughed, called him an asshole, and just kept on with my day.   one day he wore shorts to work (casual dress). he is a runner, he has pretty nice legs. i checked them out and said "hey legs, you should wear shorts more often so i can check out those calves all day."   no response. :D
I've worked with Indian, Nepali and Sri Lankan guys in hospitality. As a rule they were great to be buddies with, but the moment they'd talk about girls they'd get a bit creepy. Lots of inappropriate jokes, lots of staring and obsessing. Even had one particularly creepy guy decide it would be okay to make what I can only describe as 'kissing noises' at a young (~14y/o) female guest. He was talking to me about her and I told him that she was a child and he just goes 'It's okay for me.'  So yeah, generally very friendly and a bit awkward/creepy, but there are a few who really stick in your memory and create a bit of a reputation for all of their people.
Could it be that it isn't just the bathroom?  Could it be that anytime young women or kids leave home unaccompanied, especially in the dark, they are seriously at risk?
I didn't see this so if it has already been said then sorry!   The time outs etc. are great ideas but if he needs attention he is going to get it any way he can. Maybe in addition to the time outs you could set aside some specific time for him to be the center of attention. Then he would hopefully be getting his attention needs met but they would be at appropriate times.   Also then time outs could work as more of reminders rather than straight out punishments because you could say something like "ok you had Thomas time at (whatever o'clock) right now it's time to do this" or "now it's my time or brothers time" so then he's learning to share time with everyone.   You could even make a little chart for him to check if he's driving you bananas so he could see when his next "Thomas time" (or whatever) is coming up.   Kids that need that much attention can be SO hard and SO irritating so if you could find a way to make some of it positive for you both that might help relieving some frustration for everyone involved. Just a thought.  :) 
[deleted]
Yeah, I know they meant well. It sucks that they executed their plan to help so poorly. But I was really shocked by the venom is the driver's voice when she said "Fine, get raped you dumb bitch." Like getting raped would inevitably happen, and like I would deserve it.
I was just in Goa, India. Great place. Kind people doing their best. I lost my wallet on the beach, two dudes from New Delhi found it, tracked me down, gave me directions to where I could pick it up, refused to accept any money for gratitude, bought be a beer.
I'm wondering why they don't just find a container like a bucket and do their business in an unoccupied room in their home, then just have the father/older son take it out and toss it in a field later on.    
And that's the takeaway you've got from this terrible story?  A latrine would not have solved the problem, it would still be away from the girls' home.  
I think they mean that, when the web designers of that site were testing... checking the display and the buttons and all that... they might have only relied on older versions of the IE browser.
It's called deadpan. If I were him is have just thought she was committing to the joke. 
[deleted]
The reason you're having such a hard time finding it is that menstrual huts and latrines were abandoned long ago in India, if they ever existed.    The article you linked to says nothing about menstrual uncleanliness (a concept very common elsewhere, but not so much in Indo-European speaking areas at the current time).  In the past, menstrual taboos were widespread and they still exist in pockets in India, but the nation long ago grew too large to strictly adhere to these customs.  I'm not saying that girls and women aren't embarassed by their periods in India (something that TwoX is combatting here on reddit), but denying toilets/latrines to women during their periods is not common.  Women are supposed to sleep in a special room in the house during their periods and *banned from temples* but not from toilets.  
What does your comment even mean? If more women around you liked Mean Girls "they" might get somewhere? What are you even talking about?
Contact your webhost  to remove the content. File a police report too.
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
[Santa isn't real?!?](http://justincaseyouwerewondering.com/wp-content/uploads/2011/04/Macaulay-Culkin.jpg)
"Approval" probably would be an odd look if you are clearly misogynist.
Lying about who you are and assuming a different identity gave you a confidence boost? That does make sense as you've effectively removed your actual identity from these behaviors. It's the equivalent of spouting things you wouldn't in person on the internet. While I'm glad you said something, I'm kind of concerned about the fact that you didn't inform the authorities or have this person taken into custody. As of now, you yelled at a guy who is obviously disturbed but do you really think that would be the first time? That's a very unique kind of attention seeking behavior and you fed into it. It would have been wise to get him off the streets through legal means because those behaviors can escalate.  
[deleted]
well no I don't think it is better, personally I'm not particularly strong physically so don't I rate my chances of defending myself against a determined attacker highly, and call me selfish but it's not better from where I'm standing for me to receive bodily harm than for not me to experience harassment and be at risk of assault, the chances of them turning violent on me should I intervene have all appearances of being higher than them engaging in sexual assault  In theory it's great but the reality is that I will preserve me and mine before giving a second thought to anyone else. Were it to be an assault happening before my eyes I hope to high hell I would help, but if it's only at cat calling or creepy behavior so far theres no way I'm risking my neck
In the case of male coworkers 'joking' that handling an instrument in your workplace is a 'man's job' is incredibility sexist, and I sympathize.  In OP's case, its a customer she has only seen once that made a joke about her pulling out a knife in a retail setting.  There is a difference.
Mods - are we SERIOUSLY not doing anything about this guy?
I am not saying that your overall point is wrong, but you did use a bad example. You have to remember that the avengers are based off of characters that were created in the 60s and 70s. At the time maybe 1/5 of the characters were women and about half of those were the female counterparts of their male version (e.g. she-hulk, wasp.) Either way, when creating a series of movies based off of characters from the 60s and 70s ( Avengers atleast ) don't expect any kind of equality. I mean sure they could have brought in someone who wasn't originally supposed to be there, but that alienates the diehards and people who grew up with it.     X-Men is probably the best use of both female and male lead characters and that did hold up in the X-men remake movies. Sure wolverine gets most of the attention, but he would get no where without all the help he got from the female characters. I think one of the main problems is that it is incredibly hard in that genre in general to make a new superhero of any sex popular at all.     As far as identifying with female characters, some I do, some I just can't. This is not limited to on screen characters either. As a matter of fact I think that many movies make it easier for me to like a female lead than many books I have read. I have read both the Hunger Games series and Divergent series which both have strong lead female characters. I literally despise Katniss Everdeen (though not as much in the movies so far as in the books.) Now I can't speak for everyone and by no means do I want to, but for me its not whether they are male or female that makes the character relateable. No matter what the sex of the protagonist is, if I can't see the world through their eyes and still like myself, I am going to despise that character. 
Limiting the opportunities for opportunists does work.  That's why there are inventory control tags and cameras aimed at shoppers in nearly every American mall.  
&gt; Most women have this primitive idea that "what they do is ok" and men are primitive sexist pigs.   Again, I think this is anecdotal evidence, and not helpful to either side. That being said, I don't really think you provided an answer other than we can't do anything now besides let men open up emotionally. It is a great start, and I think it should be one of the first exiled gender stereotypes.
Rape culture has a broad definition and varying degrees. I don't think that we're on the same level but I don't think we should necessarily be patting ourselves on the back either. There are still things we can do and we can shift our society and the way we think. Setting aside the boys who were involved, there were still the bystanders who stood by and watched or took pictures. All of that is symptom of the overall problem. Think of it as "degrees of rape culture", maybe. 
[deleted]
Look, I never said ANYTHING about her response. I never condoned it, I never sanctioned it, said it was funny, or ANYTHING. I ONLY said that what HE said was NOT a joke. How hard is that to get?? 
I'm sure they'd be stoked if you went ahead and made one for them. 
Buses are a big problem, too.  
I don't see why this is a problem.  A company should be able to follow it's religious beliefs as it sees fit.  Granted, I have yet to see a company ever go to a church, or a mosque, or a synagogue.  I've seen employees, and shareholders, and owners worship, but I have yet to see a company practice a religion......
How do you figure?
[deleted]
He could of been doing anything. If you were walking around shirtless I wouldn't say nice tits. I'd go on about my day. And if he was masturbating her friend is a fool for saying anything at all. I'd rather not have a guy chase me and keep off than be witty. 
Actually, the fact that it involves a boob is what makes it natural. Bottles and formula are unnatural. Before they were invented, breast feeding was the norm; whether the baby was fed by his own mother or a wet nurse. Breast feeding isn't rude, it's how many babies eat. Would it be better for the moms to starve their babies and allow the babies to cry instead, or can these moms do what nature intended and breast feed their babies? 
So we're not allowed to discuss offensive material on this sub? It's not as if it were posted here. How can we argue against misogyny comments then? I will message them when I get to a computer. Im on my phone ATM. 
[deleted]
Honestly, I'd like to see a poll showing what percentage of women would rather not be approached by men they don't know, ever.
I was actually thinking about Victoria's secret. Is Nordstrom's better? O:
AHH I'm apparently built weird or something because I have to pull Old Navy pants up to my damn nipples for them to fit -_- But you're right, now that I'm thinking about it, their shirts and activewear are nice as well as affordable. 
BUSINESS CLOTHES — I really would have forgotten. You're a fuckin genius.
Should she also take screenshots or anything as evidence to give to the attorney or anything? Or is there some kind of audit trail to changes to the site she should try to get from the host?
But... why even assume your potential son will be into sports or fishing? There's no more guarantee of that, than there is that your daughter won't be interested in those things. 
[deleted]
I'm male...
http://india.blogs.nytimes.com/2013/01/16/indias-man-problem/?_php=true&amp;_type=blogs&amp;_r=0  The high ratio comes from primarily gender inequality which results in sex-selection in favor of males. So it just a symptom, not the disease.  
[deleted]
It's sad that this is even an issue.  I love the way that family handled the situation and allowing their child to wear whatever the hell he wants.  Our society has such a long way to go.
thanks for the tip. everyone involved in that situation with the crying child was a woman (women's clothing store), many were mothers and were also concerned. 
I'm 36.  Happened a lot more (and hatefully - I was not an attractive  young woman) when I was younger.  I probably haven't been catcalled in over 10 years, but I will occasionally get a more polite, personal, "You lookin' mighty fine today, Miss," from an older gentleman now and again.
&gt;Jesus christ, what a bunch of bastards.   I think that sums up the whole scenario nicely.  Be cautious, though. Your acquaintance seems like she caves easily, and who knows if these guys might end up finding out where you live or work from her or some other way.
&gt; I was taken aback when I read it.  The problem here is you admit to seeing and understanding that a threat was made, but you chose to ignore it. And instead focus on the sexism bit.   Simply put: from here it looks like you jumped to blindly defend someone based on gender and a compelling story.  This makes you appear not as a casual sexist, but an *outright* sexist because of your conscious disregard of the threat; and the subsequent decision to focus on the gender conflict.   But you know what--I don't think you are an evil agenda driven hypocrite bent on distorting the conversation.   I think you were just plain inattentive and let your mouth run before your brain engaged.  You know, just like the oaf who started all this with the girl-got-knife-must-be-try-to-be-charming schtick.   Don't be so judgy--people are generally trying to do good by one another.
I'd like to see info on how often black and mixed women get roles that aren't something along the lines of "sassy best friend."
It's quite clear that there are a lot of men out there who think rape is perfectly acceptable, this is terrible, but you will have an INCREDIBLY hard job convincing them otherwise, imagine someone trying to convince you that rape is ok? What they are trying to do, by working on improving sanitation, is to make it at least harder for women to be prayed on and reduce the amount of rape going on. Not only this, but also giving them healthier cleaner lives. It seems to me that your argument is not against rape, but against rapists. Being angry at rapists might not get us as far as taking a logical standpoint.
Good for you. I don't really care either, it's just weird thee reminder was automated. I'm 30 years old and it was just a first in my life.
Thrift store!
Can we ever talk about a specific group of people without having to mention everyone else in the process? It detracts nothing from the issues men face to mention the problems that women deal with. 
Illustrates the historic aspects of the problem.  In order to talk about something, or find solutions, it's often helpful to know when and how something arose and how long it's been around.
&gt; I guess the drunk ladies had good intentions, but alcohol doesn't help you execute them in the best way.  If it had been an SUV full of drunk guys, I think the outrage would be a lot more pronounced.  What the SUV full of women did was nothing short of attempted kidnapping, it was totally inappropriate and probably illegal regardless of what their intentions were.  
It sounds like you said - "why do you think porn is healthy? Do you believe bad things are good for people?" I'm not saying I downvoted you for this, just that it might be a reason for the downvotes. 
I attribute this to a few things:  1. Movies based on stories written decades ago/movies based on history.   2. Male writers/producers/directors ... telling stories from a perspective that feels natural to them.  3. A lot of movies involve people doing terrible things. 9/10 it's going to feel more believable if those awful people are men. Why? Because that's how it goes in life. Men commit most violent crime... men become powerful dictators... you get the idea.  4. It's difficult to change culture overnight. I actually think things are headed in the right direction though - I can name dozens of TV shows led by women. House of Cards is very equal across genders and allows women equal nuance and complexity. In terms of movies... YA blockbusters are currently dominated by women which is normalising female led stories for young people.
Seriously. Even in a thread for a post like this, people are nitpicking. 
They committed battery by touching her, which is an even more serious crime.
One of the issues is in incidental or minor characters.  The top two leads in many pictures are split equally, man/woman (although male buddy pictures far outnumber female buddy pictures).  If we were to take a subset of pictures where there are joint male/female leads, we'd see that often, the minor characters are disproportionately male.  It's changing, but it's still true.  Same is true in television.  Many current shows make conscious efforts to fix this and are still popular, btw.  
No, I believe that it's tragic when a woman is brutalized. I think it's awful. But I do believe in the old adage, two wrongs don't make a right. I have many friends who have had abortions, including my ex wife. I'm really not judgmental of women, because I believe none of them that get an abortion believe they're doing anything wrong. Society has made it about women's choice when that's a diversion from the real issue, which is that we are terminating a human life. If you want to look at it from my point of view, try imagining any pro-choice argument you can think of, but switch the word "fetus" for "Michael J. Fox." That's how ludicrous I find pro-choice arguments. Being small and helpless doesn't make the fetus non-human. I thought all people were created equal? Or is that only if they aren't inconveniencing a woman?
Alot of times neither person in the relationship realizes that some of the problems they are having in their relationship are caused by too much porn.
They have to go to the bathroom more frequently and it's probably in a much more isolated area of the woods. 
Quotas will do nothing to solve this. This is akin to the [Fairness Doctrine](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Fairness_Doctrine) and is a bad idea.  Who determines the quotas? Will transgendered people be considered and given equal footing?  Also, this will have the same issue as schools trying to meet Title IX quotas by slashing sports programs for men because they don't have enough women that want to be in sports. It turns into reverse discrimination. Movies can't be made because they can't find enough women that want to make movies to keep it balanced.
I think the hardest part for me to wrap my mind around is not the food; I see images every day of starving, dying children all over the world.  The hard part is really the plastic container.  Plastic containers are so ubiquitous and so worthless here that we pay people to get rid of them.  We leave them out in bins on the side of the street.  It's so crazy for me to think that something so worthless to us that we pay someone to have it buried under the ground could possibly be scarce in other parts of the world.
[deleted]
Im not sure what exactly the example of not discreet would be.  Is the idea that there are women taking their shirt off,  because I've never seen that. 
So sexism really does claim lives. Holy shit! O_o
[deleted]
Woohoo! I got vouched!
I really wouldn't. Making dismissive statements is not the best way to get people to agree with you. 
Nice, so you admit to being as scummy as me. Ill take it.
I can't suggest what already has been suggested but what do you run?
In general, I think porn can be healthy and fine.  However, i think too many people -- especially young men -- grow up in an environment where porn is their primary source of information for how sex and relationships work, and that can be really damaging because of course it's nothing like real life.  And, of course, a lot of "porn moves" that look good on camera don't actually do anything for a lady in real life.  So young men get this idea they'll do X, Y, and Z, and have a lady bouncing on their dick moaning like a banshee, and that's just not real life.  When I was in my late teens/early 20s, I used to watch porn, but I don't anymore because it just seems gross to me now.  However, I do still enjoy erotica.
Try Remember Me too! Similar types of game play, but it also plays with the ideas that our memories are malleable. And the protagonist is badass!
[deleted]
[deleted]
What's your title referring to?   Also, Matt Fraction's Kate Bishop is totally missing from this list.   And also W. Haden Blackman writing Batwoman as a kick-ass, guilt ridden, passionate, headstrong, ex-marine lesbian.    And also Kieron Gillen writing Kate Bishop (again) and the incredible America Chavez.
Hey! This was really informative. Thanks for responding and explaining it. I've definitely had a very jaded view of CPS, and this has helped change it a little. Thanks. 
Christ, this thread is nothing but strawmen.
I checked you are right that was someone else.    &gt;It strikes me that you have never really been held to account for any of your actions in life. It is quite likely that the concept of complete, selfless accountability is just completely foreign to you.  This is what he says afterwards.  This really isn't different.  I don't see how a person who makes a place like register her who knows their members harrass and threaten those they post.  Does nothing about it and shows no sympathy to those who get threatened.  Then demand that an entire movement show they aren't like the people who do the same thing by donating to his side.  And if they do nothing about it they are like those that threaten, but that doesn't apply to him or his side.  Is a good person at all.  Even if I forget what he has written many times before.    Nor do I not see how someone is not responsible if you know your own users can and have harassed people you post about is not responsible when you when you right it in the most emotional way possible and don't do anything to speak out against it.  Even if he wasn't being hypocritical with his recent post.  
Please take this elsewhere, it's not welcome here.  If you want to discuss the removal of your comments message modmail.
Plenty of people leave their homes with newborns to go places way germier then a wedding. Like the mall or a restaurant. Honestly it wasn't like people were pawing over her or breathing on her. No one even held her except myself and my SO. She was a perfectly healthy baby and I didn't see any reason to stay in a bubble the whole time.   She's 2 now, so she survived and I'm pretty sure she's normal. Well as normal as a toddler can be... 
[deleted]
No.
But this study was done recently.  There's no evidence that people were this stupid throughout the entire span of time studied.
But faster is better in this case. Or are you just trolling? I work in development and shit doesn't get done as quickly as it should, period, and people die as a result.
As well as there should not be.  There is nothing wrong with personal preference.  My wife for example always talks about wanting 2 girls where as I would prefer a boy and a girl.  Just because she would prefer 2 girls doesn't make her sexist because I know she would treat a son just as well and love them just as much as a daughter.
It's like you didn't even read the first sentence of my comment. Yes, education is the most important thing. Yes, toilets will not solve the problem. All anyone is saying is that not having an indoor toilet forces women out of their homes at times when they may not otherwise choose to go out.   Obviously it would be better to make the outdoors safer, but adding toilets is something that can be done to help in the meantime.
[deleted]
Midwives kept saying that to a friend of mine when she told them she couldn't feel her son moving any more.      Turns out her placenta had stopped producing amniotic fluid, so her son had no room to move. He was born with a number of issues that blessedly resolved.
It honestly doesnt matter who made the study, the only thing that matters is that the study is based on false logic that sounds rational to an average person and feminists will spread this like wildfire to support their claims.
Wow thats some arrogance there.  If you don't believe what I believe then you clearly just don't know as much as me.
Mods of subreddits don't have access to IP adresses, but admins do.   &gt;I wonder if it makes a difference in terms of deletion of accounts since you say these accounts were harassing you versus just sending you one stupid message.  No, they were one stupid message, I wasn't being stalked or anything. I think the way they handle it has changed ever since they got community manager admins. Tell others about the proper procedure: modmail the admins at /r/reddit.com for some stupid reason the report button is not enough. 
Thank you so much for the encouragement, yes sometimes I do feel alone because no one I know in real life has this, usually it's the cramps and couple days of grumpiness but I get the feeling no one wants to hear about my feelings anymore so I don't tell them. It's wonderful to know that women are overcoming this and I'm happy you found something that works and that motivates me all the more to find something for me
[deleted]
In this case, it's absolutely true.  The person who got the No True Scotsman rejoinder never said that the set of persons known as feminists doesn't include extremists.  She didn't commit that fallacy, but was nonetheless accused of it.    
Lol! You downvoted all of my post's!!! haha thats great.
Okay, yes, we're just letting you know that that's how it came off. Though, from your post history, it looks like you DO actually seem to be anti-porn? So I think your opinions really are actually showing through accidentally.
&gt;Your link details common tactics of attackers. If women can recognize these behaviors, it should send up red flags.  Rapist target vulnerable people, that we won't change. So rape prevention can't focus on the victim, because **there will always be a vulnerable person.** I can't make that clear enough. If you read the article properly, you should've taken away from it that the people around the rapists are the ones that can prevent rape, not the victim. Because by the time they become a target, they don't have any way to defend themselves against it. They're too drunk, or too scared, or physically isolated. But the people around them can interrupt this, by not allowing people to push alcohol on already drunk people, disrupting boundary pushing, making sure that they aren't physically isolated, if they're drunk, making sure that they are with good people, they have a safe place to get sleep it off etc.  
&gt;I said and suggested that women's issues are more deadly       Yeah, more deadly... So deadly that men suicide at 3-4x the rate of women. Not to mention      &gt;Offences with a higher proportion of male victims were murder (67% or 171 victims), attempted murder (71% or 114 victims), robbery (71% or 7,584 victims), and blackmail/extortion (71% or 301 victims)      [From the ABS publication *4510.0 - Recorded Crime - Victims, Australia, 2012*](http://www.abs.gov.au/ausstats/abs@.nsf/Lookup/E850B8189D9F2A44CA257B88001295CF?opendocument)      Yep, **way** more deadly to be a woman in the Western world.
Would **you** be afraid of Hurricane Woody Woodpecker?
The "woman out of control enough to physically assault someone" was assumed a priori as the relevant scenario. My only point is that women who get to that point aren't just going to go ice cold the way some men do when they are plotting to destroy you. I've never seen it happen, and I've never even heard about it happening. But that must be because I hate women and I'm so closed minded.  While we're on the subject of things not looking good, though, I can take 3 guesses as to why your such a raging man-hater yourself....
Ehh. You picked up someone off reddit and you expected them to not be a pathological liar?
How does that experiment not establish causation? It's a controlled experiment in which the only difference is the name of the storm. Therefore, the only possible cause of broad differences in behavior is the name.
/r/AskWomen 
for what it's worth, jailbait and the original creepshot weren't deleted due to lack of traffic. there's enough trash on this site now that it might need another cleansing shitstorm.
But if I can't spout whatever bullshit I want all the time, I'm being censored! It's literally 1984! Literally fascism! Doesn't everyone want to debate with me all the time about every issue?
[deleted]
you have a very good point, but it still remains a problem.  I guess the point of this is to highlight the successes than complain about the problems.
I know a guy in an interesting, but related situation.  His wife (my good friend) pushed him to open up their relationship about six months ago and she has been pursuing side-relationships ever since. He has been eager to do so too. However, whenever he is out and about and has an interested woman, when he lays his cards out on the table the majority of women run away. They are not willing to be the other women to a guy in an open marriage.  The only women he has managed to connect with either know or met his wife. I suppose women just don't trust him. 
What? Is that against the "Rules of the Intarwebs"? Does it offend you?
[deleted]
I hadn't considered it before, but  it's a great idea so I'm gonna talk to the judge, and possibly just the store owners so it's on record. Thanks :)
She was holding his leg whilst you were also holding a leg? Man that's a strange visual. I know that people have different ways of showing their affection/different views on what is acceptable.. but damn, that's weird! And he's 29? Wow. All the other stuff seems relatively normal apart from that (in my opinion and personal experience, anyway. ha).
&gt; If 45 people die as opposed to the normal 23 people, that only implies that maybe 22 people in the whole population are raging sexists that wont take a hurricane named after a female seriously.  Are you serious? No, that's not what it implies. Not everyone who relaxes the precautions they take against female storms is certain to die as a result.
&gt; I don't see how claiming that they "directionally replicated those in the full dataset" "is a bit of a fudge". They found the same trend, but p was not less than 0.05. Anyone who has done statistics before knows that decreasing n removes statistical power. In any stats class, they teach you that if you want to achieve confident statistical significance, increase n. To analyze hurricanes pre- vs. post-1979, they had to chop their dataset in half, thereby decreasing n, and lowering their statistical power. Setting p to 0.05 is arbitrary anyways. Sure, it's the most common threshold that's used, but I've seen many papers where p is set to 0.1 (90% confidence). If the authors had used that metric, they would be able to say that there was a statistically significant difference with post-1979 hurricanes.  The initial dataset is biased by a naming convention dichotomy, and should not be conjoined for proper analysis. The post-1979 directionally confirmed a fundamentally flawed analysis. Given the p and eta values reported, I'm a little more curious to see the actual full dataset before I draw any conclusions. You're right in saying that anything hitting p&lt;0.1 is interesting, especially for a limited data set but be wary.
[deleted]
From the [other article:](http://www.theguardian.com/world/2014/may/31/india-gang-rape-katra-sadatgunj-fathyer-speaks)  &gt; Few Indian villages have proper sanitation, so half the country's population use fields instead. For women this poses particular problems, as strict traditions on modesty mean they can only go in the dark. This leaves them vulnerable to harassment.  So for a woman in particular, taking a poo might be the only time she's forced to go outside and walk through less-inhabited areas at night.   (And also what cherrycherries said) 
It's bad if you think it's bad.
No, he kept his name the same.  My surname is different than my husbands and my kids
Oh no, I agree completely that that man should not have had a gun. He had documented mental issues and he still could perfectly legally purchase a gun, wtf! I expected better of California, of all places. But, you know, when people make it all about the guns, they aren't addressing the reason he wanted to go out and kill a bunch of people in the first place. Because without a gun, he'd still have killed ~4 other people because women wouldn't sleep with him. That's still a problem. 
Some research suggests that not only do they think it's "okay," but they think that girls who are out by themselves at night are supposed to be raped; that those girls don't know their proper place, that their mere existence puts the world out of balance, and that all women should be protected/under the supervision of men at all times (or raped).  Rapists in the U.S. sometimes express similar ideation, which gets them locked up in hospitals for the criminally insane.  
don't.  YOU didn't do nothing wrong. HE did. Me, being vindictive type, would post his name everywhere I could and on every cheaters website I could.   he deserves everything he gets...
I haven't been diagnosed with PMDD, but my gyno and I agreed I had the symptoms (I became prone to having panic attacks, especially around that time of the month) so I went on birth control. That was when I'd just turned 16, and I'm 17 now and the birth control worked wonders, my anxiety issues died down a lot within the first months alone. I haven't had a full blown panic attack since last November. I suggest talking it all over in depth with your doctor. To diagnose PMDD you need a medical as well as psychiatric evaluation, or at least that's what I was told.
If you are staring at a nursing mother, you are being rude.  And yeah, you should expect to be called out for it.
[deleted]
[deleted]
We never fight around him around but only time it will happen. I have to figure out something because she has ran all of her family with her lies.   From the sounds of it you were in the same situation as I was... But mine last a 4 years an got married. Then started to find/figure out she is not who see said she is.   But honestly my problem has so much to it a tl;dr would be needed.   But in your situation. I hope you actually find some one, that isn't a shit bag. You did the right thing an can only hope his wife have him the punt. 
In my opinion, had the author addressed more directly the underlying concerns of money and free markets in order to make the point that our cultural expectations may be wrong, I think the article may have served as a better flashpoint for a discussion on why we expect equality.  That is to say, in the entertainment industry, there are a number of women who've earned a great deal of money and who have, presumably, a more direct interest in affecting this change.  But, overall, the expectations of producers about what will sell is based upon the perceived (and measured) expectations of the audience about what will entertain.  Those expectations are very likely highly influenced by cultural ideas which are out-dated and male-dominant.  This, to me, is a very interesting conversation.  To affect this change, we'd expect a lot of people to risk a lot of money, time, or effort on taking that chance.  Also, it will draw a lot of criticism about "why entertainment"?  People will wonder: why not expect everyone to purchase smaller, more manageable garbage bins and demand a sex-based quota for garbage collection services.  They'll take offense in the implicit argument that garbage collectors, who work hard, apparently don't serve as positive role models.  Despite having statistically high salaries in a high-demand industry -- which is what they assume the argument about closing the income disparity is all about.  For me; I think these conversations which evaluate and question the expectations of our modern culture and society are fascinating.  I'm thrilled to explore the underlying assumptions and to challenge those ideas.  But, I wish this article were longer and more involved.
The pendulum may be swinging away from patriarchy (it's not so long ago that it was fully patriarchal, just look back one hundred years) but that doesn't mean that it's all the way out, yet. Politics hasn't come all that far from the boys club that it used to be. Just because we've made improvements doesn't mean that we should call it done. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
Similar situation happened to me. We were perfect for each other and had both agreed to keep it casual as I wasn't looking for a relationship right away because I had just come out of a 5 year horrible one. But we kept getting closer and closer and he kept treating me like his girlfriend. I was determined to be single for a long time so I never really moved it to the next level. I was in university full time and working full time and he had a very demanding job so we ended up seeing each other only on and off for almost two years. When I finally told him how I felt he pulled a disappearing act. My friend ended up dating someone who knew him who told me he has been in a relationship for the past FOUR YEARS.   I was furious. He started texting me again and I never confronted him as I knew now that he was a completely manipulative asshole and knew he would find some way around it. I struggled wondering if I should tell her or not, but I had no idea who she was. Somewhere inside I was kind of relieved though. I at least had a reason for him bailing instead of blaming myself for being too forward or wondering what was wrong with me.  Luckily I am now in a happy, fulfilling relationship. But shit, thinking about it still makes my blood boil. 
[deleted]
Not my article, just thought it was relevant with the recent 'is this still intended for women's perspectives' thread. It was actually posted two days ago, but it got downvoted and like 6 comments by people who seem to be the people the article is calling out. I just hoped it would get some better responses a second time.
http://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Child_support  Check under criticism. Because you need you hand held the entire fucking way  No what makes it sexist is also sexist judges giving women custody an overwhelming majority of the time.
A.) Considering I just said I make 30% less than you a few comments ago, yeah, I'm pretty sure you DO know that.  B.) $120k a year is chump change on the scale of being rich and having nice things. A doctor making $120k is going to be in general pediatric care or some other low totem pole position.  C.) I am actually surprised that feminist would freely define "professional success" as how much money you make. That's a decidedly male viewpoint on things. 
Really? So you think that when hurricane Katrina was approaching, people were thinking, its ok everybody, this is just a female hurricane. Its not gonna hurt anyone.
This isn't evidence. It's barely even an argument. It's just wishy-washy question-begging apologetics. 
I have had problems with anxiety that I have been working on for quite some time now. I did not make him stay with me. I have gotten through anxiety by myself many times before. I had the attack  due to all the stress from traveling all day then feeling uncomfortable because of the circumstances. It's my own battle.   I was not able to sit in the middle in the back while he was driving. I would have been totally fine with that, had I been given the option.   His mom is usually a very independent person and it just annoyed me that he had to constantly care for her like a child. 
[deleted]
Hi!  As a college student who goes to UCSB, I do carry  pepper spray, but only when I know I will be walking alone in isla vista (ie a late class in iv theater ).  And no I've never had to use it. 
&gt;Your point was I hadn't conceded that men face oppression.  No it wasn't. Just like a feminist though to straw man it up.  &gt;Also, sorry to hear about your tiny penis.   I just want a confirmation for the record that an actual judge is actually asking me to send her a dick pic. Can I get that in writing please? You know, just for security purposes?
Everytime I think I see the craziest headline ever Reddit comes through again.
that is not factually correct. rape is [common](http://www.americanscientist.org/bookshelf/pub/despicable-yes-but-not-inexplicable) in non-human primates for both reproductive and dominance purposes. it is not even vaguely a human-specific trait, and the rates of violence in chimps [far outpaces](http://www.economist.com/node/16422404) that in humans.   there's literally no reason to think that chimpanzee wars are a new thing. territoriality is not a new thing. chimps evolved in variable habitats, rather than stable ones. competition for resources is a basic principle of ecology. when you say "many" are skeptical, well, i don't know who you're referring to but the [researchers](http://www.nytimes.com/2010/06/22/science/22chimp.html?_r=0) who actually study the phenomenon, such as Richard Wrangam and John Mitani invoke long-term evolution to explain it (Wrangam suggests an aggressive common ancestor of chimps and humans while Mitani focuses on group selection).  
I saw some obvious TRPer manifesto-y stuff in a couple threads, though the comments were later removed (by the mods?).  There will likely be a fair bit of this sort of thing here and there until things normalize.  The default status thing is still going to have an impact for the foreseeable future (in my opinion).  On the bright side, just keep truckin' and the trolls will fail at their game.
[deleted]
Actually, a comma there would be incorrect.  The way to disambiguate this phrase isn't with punctuation; it's to move the modifier "only" next to the word it modifies: "hurricanes were given **only** female names between 1950 and 1978."
Ugh, that's disheartening.   I'm really hopeful that we can reach the younger generation of boys/men and show them the world shouldn't be like that. I'm looking at the GLBT movement as an example, ie you won't find too many 70 year old people in favor of same-sex marriage, but the 18-30 crowd is highly supportive. 
[deleted]
~~buku~~ beaucoup^(I'm sorry!)  More on point though, I agree with your point that a nursing mother is not trying to provoke. It's normal to initially feel some visceral WTF when you first see a women breast-feeding. My SO says that he definitely felt that way as a kid when he saw it. But his parents explained to him that it's how babies get their milk, so he stopped freaking out about it.
&gt;  I was mansplaining/derailing/whining/ruining a "safe space" if I ever bought up mens issues in a feminist space  I hear you. I got the same reaction when I brought up checkers at a chess tournament.   I don't know why they don't change the name of chess to Chesseckers. I mean, Chess is so radical.
Not in a specific movie, but there should be more movies geared towards women roles, issues, and actresses than there are now in general. Women make up 50% of the population, but only a fraction of movies feature women as anything other than love interests or mothers.
Male, and [survivor of the 2004 hurricanes](http://unquietwiki.com/photos/events/2004%20Hurricanes/). Charley went off its expected course and roughed up everything from Ft Myers to Orlando: I doubt making it "Charline" would've changed that outcome. Had no power for about a week where I was: course Disney had their lines buried and power back pronto, but some places had no power for two weeks. And then Frances and Jeanne followed up.  I looked it up, and excluding the mudslide-nuke that happened in Haiti with Jeanne, there was no real difference in the storm fatalities.  * http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hurricane_Charley * http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hurricane_Frances * http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hurricane_Jeanne
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
I think the issue is not that hitting JayZ is okay. The issue is that it is not as serious a concern as JayZ hitting Solange.  Solange requires protection, JayZ does not.  If you do not know this, you have never been hit by someone bigger than you.  Go pick a fight with a bouncer - then report back here with your newfound perspective.
[deleted]
I don't think those particular stories are good ways to introduce someone to feminism.
So, the female named ones had as much of a death toll as the male named one that was a total outlier and surprised everyone with it's path.  You're seeing the flaw right?  The female ones were not respected, the male one was a surprise.
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
Presumably, it should have stopped ovulation, depending on where her cycle was when she first took the Plan B. All you can do is wait until her period comes and/or take a pregnancy test.  Stop having unprotected sex. It is ridiculously, absurdly easy to prevent pregnancy. There is no excuse. Buy yourself a box of condoms so you don't have just one.
Thank you, *30 Rock* historian!
We could name them after various evil historical figures, maybe.  Who the hell wouldn't run away from Hurricane Hitler?
Yeah that's fine. But god forbid they don't. It's not that big of a deal either way. But if it is an option it should be an option for both genders, which in many US states it is not. 
No, interpretations really are not almost always biased.  Political morons lying to your face about statistics are almost always biased.  Numbers are numbers.  But go ahead and dismiss all science based statistics and facts even though it's far more accurate than anything you'll ever do in your life.  These people don't have a feminist agenda.  This is someone who looked at the numbers and realized a significant statistical data set, laughed about it, and published the results.  Of course it's possible that the statistics are just random and over the next 100 years they'll even out.  But if it's statistically significant that storms of the same power with women's names kill more people then storms of the same power with mens names, that's not something you can interpret.  That's simply a fact.  Explaining WHY more people die with storms that have a woman's name is the part that is biased.  But the fact that they do is not biased.  That part is fact, black and white, yes or no.
what they didn't do is account for other factors.  The big one:  Before 1979 all Hurricane names were female.  Since 1979 communications systems, and forcasting tools along with weather science has vastly improved.  This is not accounted for in the study. Nat-geo explained this. This is just piss poor science.
Hurricane Ass-Blaster would have me quickly grabbing essentials and heading for safety.   In reality, just the Hurricane part of the name fills me with dread. I live in a tornado area; they don't even name those and I'm crying while hunkered under a doorframe watching dopplar radar. 
Haha it's complicated.  He didn't want two rings, but wanted a ring pretty much immediately after we got engaged.  So we ordered his wedding ring early, and he wears it most of the time although he's a little bashful about it, so he only wears it around some friends.
back in time 1000 years and tell this story?  1000 years ago they were burning women for .... ya know what, never mind.  My bad.
I mean did you call specificslly a child protection agency,  they might give you advice,  sometimes police can be dismissive. 
That's the one!! I have no context for it but it is a great line. 
You should also feel like shit for not telling the wife. Be real here, he's gonna just lie to her and keep cheating and she will believe it because she has a kid with him. Not sleeping with him anymore and allowing him to continue cheating on his wife is not "doing the right thing" it's doing the easiest thing to get yourself out of the situation. In a year his wife might find you and you'll find out he cheated on her and gave her a horrible STD because she didn't know he was cheating, and you could have stopped that by simply telling her you were fcking her husband. 
I'd actually prefer the actual journal article that lists how they account for all the factors, if you have it?
I designed my ring.  He had someone create it and paid for it himself.  I actually have no idea how much it cost, but it's nothing ostentatious.   We split the cost of the wedding between us, but I bought my dress and wedding jewelry by myself.  I believe it mostly evened out.
I think you missed my point. Please read my other post in this thread. 
But why should the number be equal? Not everything has to be 100% the same. Isn't it more indicative of the types of movies people like nowadays?  For example, super hero movies, which were written a long time ago and mostly follow men, or action movies like James Bond or the Diehard movies where the main character is very physical and aggressive and there is plenty of hand to hand combat? Not saying women can't be physical and aggressive, but, on average, women are much more petite and it makes the story much less believable 
It's not wrong to stay friends with her, but you are totally within your friend rights if you want to tell her what you think of her behavior. Chances are she's telling herself that it's not that big a deal, or that she's somehow justified in doing what she's doing, and since her friends aren't calling her out on it they are only reinforcing that idea. You're enabling her by not being a voice of reason.
Hysterical is a sexist comment.  He might not have intended it as such, but it doesn't change what the word stands for or that it is commonly used to explain women being "over emotional."  On that note, saying that he meant you were overreacting might not have as much of a gendered punch, but is still dismissing you.  Overreacting/hysterical/over sensitive/crazy are all [gaslighting](http://thecurrentconscience.com/blog/2011/09/12/a-message-to-women-from-a-man-you-are-not-%E2%80%9Ccrazy%E2%80%9D/), which is disproportionately done towards women. 
When I was a kid, the custom was that girls had both ears pierced and guys had one ear. Is that not done anymore? (Or does your son really have his heart set on both?)
[deleted]
Please explain
Well, I wasn't specifically talking about you in my reply-- I was still focused on that certain type of commenter that wants to come in and completely sideline the convo because they want to talk about themselves. I understand that that isn't your intention.   I don't have time to address every point in your comment, but I'm gonna say it straight up that you're right about a lot of it. I don't like admitting it, but I've been thinking about this a LOT the past couple of days, and I guess what it comes down to is that I don't know how to express how important it is to me that women come first SOMETIMES-- mostly in that they shouldn't always be having to include men in the discussion/solution-- like, in cases when it feels like they just want to detract from it-- without coming off as minimizing, like you've accused me of. How to express that without leaving men out of the discussion entirely, or making them feel unwelcome.   It's something I and a lot of the women on this sub need to figure out. But I swear to god, I did not mean to 'denigrate' you or your gender in trying to fight for space for women. I'm just trying to figure out how to make sure my sisters are heard, and how to balance the belief that we need our own spaces/activism, with trying to support men, too.   So basically, I'm sorry. I AM hearing you, and I AM taking what you're saying to heart. I'm trying to do better-- I think THAT is what this sub is about. At least, it is for me. 
This seems a somewhat immature understanding of how the world works. There are always going to be assholes, there are always going to be perverts, there are always people that are going to be different than you. Saying all men need to be feminists is like saying lets solve crime by having everyone not commit crime. It's just not that simple. 
[deleted]
I would add that I want to be treated respectfully.  But otherwise,  spot on.
Not in a story, in films in general. And why? Because women make up half the population, they also make up half the stories and experiences out there. Sorry.
What an extraordinary position to take.  Duly noted (learn something new here every day).  You want him to say more before you pass judgment?  Fascinating.    
wat. 
Being polite is a trait that people want to be able to stop?
Misery likes company. It sucks that they are taking out their insecurities on you. That's not healthy and, personally, I wouldn't consider people like that friends -- at least not if they continued to do it after I had told them that such comments were mean and not o.k. Really, though, that shouldn't even have to be said. Stuff like that isn't funny. Good friends are happy to see others happy and succeeding. Good friends lift you up instead of putting you down. 
You dodged a bullet, The first question I ask myself before I stick my dick in a chick is would I want her to be a part of my life for the rest of my life. If I knock that chick up and have to deal with her for the next 18 years + is that pussy that good. accidents happen and I have dealt with some real cunts. count yourself lucky and keep an eye out for Mr. Right and not Mr. Right Now.
You may or may not be bipolar II (it's thought to be always-inherited, which gives me pause).  At any rate, if the meds help at all, that's great.  I'm negative on pharmaceuticals too (and after weaning off anti-depressants, am pretty careful to avoid thought patterns that would lead me back into depression - so far, so good).  
Except some of us have to take it for medical reasons. 
thanks for the thorough response!  no, landlord will not be living with me. :( i wish. he's a pretty cool + chill dude.  and it's literally just me and him. if i had a third roomie around (regardless of gender, since people here seem to be harping on this), i think the situation would be significantly less alarming for me. 
This IS a valid comment, I dont want to see you downvoted.   I considered this carefully and went into the situation with that in mind. She has told me story after story about this guy, but I know the personality and didn't take anything on faith. Certainly, her weaknesses have made the situation much more complicated.   However, the fact that the man was watching seniors struggle to lift heavy furniture while sipping an icy drink says a lot about him. He was incredibly overbearing and controlling, as were his sons. I was careful to be firm but not disrespectful, and he viewed any opposition and resistance to his control to be cause for anger, threats and spite. Was certain what I was dealing with when he made a vague threat about knowing my name, i.e. being able to track me down.   She has issues. He was scum. 
I appreciate you more than you know. 
thank you attakburr -- you got it!   and cruise, i don't think you understand what "privilege" is. a bit of ageism? probably, and i admitted to that much in my original post; i'd definitely feel more comfortable if my roomie was around the same age as me, because it's not as odd. also, i don't like that he's living 80+ miles away from big city where he supposedly works, because affordable housing (the reason he gave me) is a shit reason. i'm from that area, and there is affordable housing MUCH closer.  but "privilege"? no. more like i don't want to end up at the police precinct with someone screaming in my face about how stupid i am and how i deserved it and how i should've "protected myself". 
[deleted]
M &amp; C sucked, in a hilarious way.  The period costumes were so overdone and, well, off, and the acting was so wooden.  The books are much better.
[deleted]
Reminded me of that Donald Glover sketch- why men always have crazy-ex stories and women rarely share any.  Men's bad experiences with women = mostly funny and harmless.  Women's bad experiences with men = traumatizing and dangerous.      Not to say either gender doesn't encounter the other situation, but when we're speaking in upvotes and generalizations it holds true.
In the 1930's, there were tons and tons of movies heavy on female leads, costars and choruses.  It was amazing.  How to Marry a Millionaire did really well at the box office, as did many other similar movies.  They were considered "dating movies."  
You're absolutely welcome to post any advice for the younger crowd, or things you wished you'd known at that age.
...oh shit... you're serious...   Oh fuck, I laughed at this for like... way too long before I realized this wasn't satire...   Shit.
Hey Mazvi, definately go for it!!! as a guy (23 M), I can reliably inform you that most guys are ***monumentally*** thick about this sort of thing.  Ask him out for a coffee/tea/cocoa/meal.  Stuck for a line? How about "Hey, I was wondering if you wanted to grab a coffee together this weekend?"  You have a lot going for you:  1. You've already talked a couple of times, so he's not a stranger. 2. You and he seem to share the outdoors as an interest, so you two have common ground. 3. You do interesting things (like cosplay), which make you an interesting person.  So go for it girl! :D
Thank you. Having ANYONE there, gender optional, would have been really nice backup, but it wasn't to be. Did the best I could. 
I don't know of any articles, but it occurs to me that he already knows. Would he think it's ok to not call out his peers if they were racist or homophobic?
True, but if the next set of young men isn't as into comic books, those stories will go away.  It'll be interesting to see how that goes.  There will always be some comic book movies, of course, but the current glut of them is probably temporary.    It's almost unbelievable that we have a new Godzilla movie.  You'd have thought that at least one of the military brass roles could have been converted to a believable woman, but I guess that would have ruined the fantasy.
A small percentage of hurricanes contribute to the vast majority of deaths. A couple of Katrinas and Ritas can really throw off the average. I realize Katrina itself was excluded, but you're still left with a couple of hurricanes each season causing most of the deaths, so there's a huge margin of error from a small sample size.
[deleted]
Let her find out in her own way.  Don't go wading in.   Sorry, but after 15 years of working with police, I'd say that getting in the middle of domestic shenanigans is the main reason not to date married people.  If one of them is a liar, even more reason not to be involved.  There's no reason to treat the man's wife like a helpless little lady.  
It's not what I am referring to, and you're not going to be able to understand Behaviourism from an info-graphic.   Your link is a very, very summarized version of Erikson's stages of development. [This](http://m.simplypsychology.org/Erik-Erikson.html#collapseFour) is a slightly better one. If you expand stage 4 it gets into more detail about how children need to have freedom to express agency, and if their agency is restricted they begin to feel inferior.   It touches in social pressures, but if social pressures are enough for him to decide he doesn't want to wear dresses anymore than he simply won't wear them anymore. No one is forcing him. So far that hasn't been an issue so why would I force him to stop now?   You also completely ignore Rogers humanism theory, which is much more specific to this exact situation of expressing agency and idealized self were Erikson is more generally related. 
I don't really care either way. I'm married so Mrs. is fine but I'm cool with Ms. and Miss too.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Where I'm going is that it is weird for OP to take such a narrow and rigid view of one a aspect of her NSA fuck buddy's apparent moral trespass when there are probably a multitude of other things in his past that she would presumably find equally reprehensible if given complete disclosure.   Would it matter to OP if she were complicit to violating the trust of her fuck buddy's parents, or religion?  At a certain point, it seems to be an arbitrary line that has been crossed. 
It may have been his attempt to signal to you he is a harmless guy. Or some people are just super into talking about their SOs. Hard to tell without seeing the interaction.
The audience numbers aren't the ones to look at (I'll link when I'm on a desktop computer).  Hollywood is 15% female behind the scenes workers and that stat hasn't budged since 1998, a female director only just won the Best Director Oscar for the first time a few years back, only 7 black women have ever won Oscars, most of those roles were maids or slaves or fulfilled the "Magical Negro" trope, an Asian woman has never won an Oscar, casting shows an 80% bias towards white/males and most importantly, prominent figures within the industry echo my point.  Cate Blanchett took the opportunity in her Oscar speech to clarify that female led films do in fact sell nowadays, despite what Hollywood believes.  She's A list, she could have any role she wants and also risks upsetting powerful friends but she still said it, which means things are shitty even if you're massively successful.  You have Joss Whedon and George R.R Martin looked upon as groundbreaking, progressive writers (and their massive flaws completely overlooked) for simply not sidelining their women characters as is standard for most male writers to do, and they express annoyance when asked about it like its some radical movement to have women characters actually operating as the male characters do by default.  I don't understand your question, though. 
I totally get where you were coming from with your original statement, but my response was meant to quickly point out how it wasn't entirely applicable. Other people reading through the comments could easily see it as "explaining away" Angela's actions, like plazmid pointed out.  So while your original point is very true and somewhat relevant to the discussion of groping among friends on the whole, in this instance, it may have only served to derail the conversation OP started and possibly fuel statements of conjecture.  When people come to this subreddit to vent, I think it's important that we discuss the situation at hand in respect to the OP. It's not about all the 1000 different explanations this groping COULD have been, it's about what she's dealing with as is. 
I was talking to a couple of friends of mine last week about this same topic. They were coming up with schemes about how to get out of a bad date (we are all female btw not that that makes any difference).  Hair brained schemes such as emergency phone call and the like. I said that I'd always ended bad dates with a 'thank you for a lovely evening.  Unfortunately I'm just not feeling a spark and don't want to takes things further romantically, but I've enjoyed meeting you' or something similar. Both my friends were shocked and had the gall to tell me that would be rude and it was much better to just not return his calls 'he'd get the idea pretty quick'. I immediately called them on their bullshit.  It's fucking cowardly to do 'the fade away'  but quite a lot of people are cowards. I'm sorry that you are on the receiving end of it.
[deleted]
No one's keeping you here
Thats exactly what I was thinking. I will go to the leasing office tomorrow and talk to them about hypothetically getting a name removed off of the lease. I guess worse comes to worst, I can do what you did, I just cant stay here any longer.
[deleted]
I just want to say that I think bringing up the practice of extrapolating a societal level issue to the individual is quite brilliant. I feel like so many discussion about privilege break down because of this practice.   &gt;  I still think most of them are weak, especially when they are extrapolated to encompass everyday individuals.  
Where I live, grooming a child by sharing sexually explicit, teasing material with them is considered "real damages."  Inappropriate *sexual* comments from a 30 year old man to a 13 year old girl, in which he discusses or teaches about various sex acts is considered grooming.       
[deleted]
thank you!
I think the tone and language style of this message undermines the message it is trying to portray. It was very difficult to read the entire piece without feeling that the writting style actually reinforces the stereotypes it is trying to dispel. 
This is a load of garbage. Sorry, but to draw a correlation between the sex of the name of an inanimate object is just laughable.
He lied. He told her he was single when he clearly wasn't. OP trusted him, and he broke that trust. The end.
Well, maybe he won't break up with you either. Or maybe you don't really belong together and this event is evidence of that. Either way in cases like this honesty is the best policy. 
And rape.
Your post has been removed due to rule 5 in our [sidebar.](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/about/sidebar) You are welcome to repost on Friday during our [image fest](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/comments/y8k2m/mod_post_we_are_launching_an_experiment_image/), or you may repost now as a [self post](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/submit?selftext=true) with the story behind the image if you're looking for a discussion. Thank you!  *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FTwoXChromosomes) if you have any questions or concerns.*
No. I was saying that he says nothing new. He adds nothing to the conversation about rape culture.  The only thing that is any different about this article is that it is written by a man. Which doesn't automatically make it good.
&gt; The problem is that we've established elsewhere in the thread that characters like Black Widow is going to end up this way. They're already set characters. Somehow changing Black Widow would fundamentally alter the Avengers which is a story written in a time that definitely was less progressive and we're going to get a less progressive character. We have to accept that these characters exist if we want to see these storylines true to their original form.  I'm confused.  Black Widow is awesome, she doesn't need to be changed.  I'd be very mad if she was.  I actually briefly thought they had changed her to a typical stereotype at the beginning of Cap 2 and for a few minutes I seriously considered walking out.  Luckily, she was back to her normal self after the opening act and was great for the rest of the film.  Female Marvel fans love her so there's absolutely no problem with her now.  My focus was on the audience/critic reaction to her.  She is a hero, as desexualized as possible, still allowed to appear feminine though, her outfits are tight sure but so are Caps, she established a strong platonic relationship built on trust with Steve in Cap 2, she is/was in an extremely high up position within Shield, and her body isn't subjected to longing camera angles or any intense focus.  She was a key component to saving the day in Avengers and was a central character in Cap 2.    The problem is critics and fans **didn't seem to notice any of this at all**.  What they did notice is: she wears catsuits.   Male fans say Black Widow did nothing but flaunt her sexuality in Avengers and some don't even recognise that she *basically saved the day* (along with Tony).  They also don't recognise that while she doesn't play as central a role as Tony or Bruce, neither do Thor or Hawkeye.  Both those male characters do nothing as well, but only *she* gets singled out for not doing enough *even though* she's actually more active than both of them.  So I have no issue with Black Widow, she's one of the better written and presented female characters and about the only superhero female around right now.  I am talking about audience reaction to her (and others) despite the fact that she subverts most sexist trends.  If audiences and critics can't even recognise subversion when its presented to them, Hollywood is going to assume based on reviews that nobody actually enjoys Black Widow for how she's written, which is pretty depressing.  This really just means constant representation needs to become the norm.  People seem to notice it just fine in a Disney film, maybe because adults go into those films aware that a clear and classic story is going to be told so the subversions in films like Frozen and Maleficent are much more obvious, but when it comes to action films, the only "type" that's ever really noticed at large is the "strong female character" who is just a female character fulfilling masculine tropes and reaffirming the heterosexuality of the male cast.  &gt; I can't even tell you what the answer to this is. Especially when there are stories around like Harvey Weinstein trying to make cuts to Hayao Miyazaki films despite the legendary director's status. So even if you're a powerful, legendary man in the industry, but a minority one, and having to butt heads against the older white men, I don't even know how we could affect a change for women or minority women while the same people hold their positions.  TV viewers have sort of inadvertently caused some change.  It was found last year that shows with racial diversity actually rate higher nowadays, so it was the hot topic within the industry, and now a bunch of racially diverse sitcoms are coming this year.  Fresh Off The Boat is the first one, and is the first sitcom about an Asian-American family.  Only problem is it's completely stereotyped, racist towards black people and there's the issue of how they ever got away with that title.  So one step forward, two steps back I guess.  Sleepy Hollow and Orange Is The New Black are far better examples of intentional diversity in TV.  Film is harder because so much has to be established in a small amount of time.  The main thing people can do is boycott stuff that just plays into the usual shit (like anything with Seth McFarlane's name on it) and keep talking about what they want to see and what could make media better.  Eventually the head honchos will need to stop and review what people want (as they did last year) so it's just vital that representation is always being discussed wherever possible.  &gt; What i'm saying here isn't that the 2013 Oscars were representative of change or that because a black film won it fixed everything, what i'm saying is that it's so immensely hard for me to view the Oscars as something meaningful knowing what we know about the industry because of how clearly phony and corrupt it is. It goes along with the last bit that unless the older people give up power or die off, I just don't see change happening without the public recognizing the sham the Oscars is and shifting focus to other, less tainted awards (are there any? I don't know).  Yeah, I agree.  I think the best thing to do is just openly and overtly respond positively to representation.  Acknowledge it, talk about it, make it seem like the best thing the production did and they'll want to do it again to get the same response and attention.  There's a reason the VMAs always has one Truly Shocking Performance each year, its what gets them the headlines.  Essentially we need to trick these productions into doing the same for representation.
&gt;There comes a point where demanding empathy from strangers because you have deemed them "more privileged" is just obnoxious. No one is owed a listening ear, and it becomes absurd to rant about how awful people of privilege (POP) are while at the same time demanding they listen to and empathize with those deemed less privileged.  Couldn't agreed more with this really.  It also highlights the problem here.  As much as feminists say, and they are right here, that women don't owe men anything, white men don't owe feminists or women for that matter any thing either.    &gt;I still think most of them are weak, especially when they are extrapolated to encompass everyday individuals.   It seems most feminist theories are macro level and not micro level, and so most if not all fail at micro levels.  Tho may hold some ground at macro level.
When eliminating other variables, in studies of 100-356 people, it was found that people would take more precaution against a hurricane that was "masculine". People can and do assign genders to inanimate objects, and it does affect the subconious - e.g., the gender of the object in your language affects your description of it. 
Well try looking at it like this: a few decades ago, before computer technology became such a big part of everyday life all the lonely male nerds sat at home in front of their screens while the cool guys dated the pretty girls. You are that nerd now. Finally, equality.
[deleted]
There are going to be as many answers as there are women. And keyboardists. Personally, I am unlikely to find a person attractive *just* because they play keyboard.
I know it sucks but you have to let your bosses you have a temporary medical problem if getting dinged for bathroom visits is a worry. If you don't want to say UTI, say you are on a medication that makes you have to pee a lot for a couple days for an infection. (It's technically sort of true, right?)
People who want to minimise the death toll in hurricanes.
[deleted]
[deleted]
I'd say try complaining to the Minister for Women, but... :/
[deleted]
Some of the links you used as examples are a year old.  Over that sort of time scale I am sure some NSFW content would be posted and upvoted.  Looking at the 6 gif examples you used the most recent is from a month ago.  One gif in 30 days is surely not enough to ruin a subreddit is it?
I also recommend trying for a summer course, maybe through another CC that offers the online course.   If you've been doing well at your job, I can't imagine that they would not keep you on because of one class that you have basically completed except for it just being "official." They have already trained you and you know the job. That is extremely important in terms of time and cost to an employer. I think you'll be pleasantly surprised if you speak with them. Please keep us updated and good luck!
[deleted]
[deleted]
Justify it all you want and pretend like you can "fix it."  A smart female does not dive in to a crowd at a concert, because she knows it is filled with drunk men that don't give a fuck.  It will never change.    The arrogance is astounding in here.    
&gt;FROM THE SIDEBAR OF /r/gifs[14] :  &gt;"Nudity and obscene material goes into /r/nsfw_gif[15] - No exceptions. If it can get you fired then it should not be here. Failure to comply will result in removal of post and banning."  There wasn't nudity or obscenity in any of those gifs.
Well it's a change from porn and crappy blogs I suppose?
&gt; He'd threaten to rape me if I didn't trade cards with him.  Go to the police?
a madman with a ridiculously high IQ, he makes some good points. would be foolish to dismiss the arguments he makes, one of the few things that kind of crazy gives you strength in
&gt; These women couldn't give less of a shit if she got raped.  Do we have any reason to assume that they themselves couldn't be out to rape her? They were certainly acting like it.
I think having a link to the freenode's webchat in the sidebar would help a lot (and maybe having it up higher in the list.  Right now it's burried so far down it's easy to miss/forget about. Not only that but every so often if I have time to chat, I usually don't have the time to find/figure out how to join said chat. 
No, MALE hurricanes are violent.
Men learn from other men.... that's kind of obvious right? After all where would they learn that since women refuse to talk about it?  See this is the whole nonsense of human matchmaking: Women are all secretive to see what guys "really are" and guys end up lying through their teeth to get into their pants!This is like one of the worst (or best) jokes nature plays on us. The incentives are all in the wrong place because in most cases guys are interested in the very short term and women are not. Yet their all efforts effectively do nothing if not stimulate the best short-term scammers!  I don't have to tell you that in the case that those "scammers" are successful (and they often are) where it matters to men (young men especially) **that** will be the behaviour that other men will emulate. And it doesn't help that said scammers tend to be most successful with not very intelligent or principled women. This makes it even worse because other men - deprived of clear and honest communication with other women - will only judge the physical results. It doesn't matter that the five women Jack had were dumb as a garden shovel - it worked ergo *it has to work on every woman*. Because why wouldn't it?Talk about "men's logic" :D  Therefore the standards for male behaviour in the absence of artificial social strata (good company vs bad company, upper class, lower class) are partly set by the least qualified women to do it. And correspondingly  by the least qualified men.  I think the only way civilization still works is because those dumb people haven't figured it out yet :D  In reality the whole system is very complex men, women, tv, magazines, parents, friends etc etc We all are partly responsible but the reason why I focus on women is this: Just consider the idea of "friendzone" as a shoddy example. A girl tells a boy that she really would want a friend and the idiot does it hoping to get her only to find that he would be much luckier if he was a selfish asshole. That's a good - if anecdotal - proof of the impact miscommunication between genders has in our lives. Either the girl should tell what she really likes if she's interested. Or she should make a clear distinction between "friend" (like a girlfriend) and boyfriend. If you leave it to men (and god forbid young boys!) to figure out what the emotions mean you're always getting "you want to have sex with me". Remember a teenage boy would have sex with his dog if that would help. All that emotion...that's unnecessary overkill.   That's why I'm saying. Women need to (1) figure out what they want and (2) communicate it clearly. And then the complex sorting process will start to adjust.It will be easier on everything because the ultimate verifying mechanism (the only one that matters in fact) will back it up. Scammers will lose their monopoly on proving how good they are with women.  As for women being taught of being romantic I kind of disagree. It's not "taught" entirely. After all even when you compare pornography for men and women it's very different. As genders we have different wiring and respond to different stimuli. The "romantic" myth is a by product of what is misconstrued as simply exciting to women - in a sexual way. The true "romantic" requires higher brain function on proper level and is also common among men. Perhaps not so common but believe me. It is absolutely not unheard of to have a thuggish brute watch a romantic movie every now and then. Otherwise why would there be such things on their hard drives right next to BigTitsandAnal XXXXXX vol 3? And believe me - the novels for slightly older boys (meaning young men) get very successful when there's a good old romantic conquest involved...only below the surface of robots fighting, treasures being found etc etc...  As for friendship... friendship is a difficult word in English language. Just like "love" is. Since it's not my first language I always had some degree of discomfort because in my mother tongue both love and friendship are very very strong words describing amity and intimacy.  And those words have meaning that cross-over into each other. You're supposed to *love* your *friends*. So I don't think a man and a woman can really be friends if there's not a sibling-like stable relationship developed. If a guy wants to be friends, face to face and not as part of the group - in the common sense of the English word - then there is physical attraction and it will get complicated unless there's something to stop it - like a partner for both of them.   I do agree that there are plenty of men who could provide good models. They're mostly smart men that managed to figure out the mess among women. But because of that they're (1) very few (2) usually exhibit other characteristics considered "attractive" and therefore most men will go "yeah but you're rich" or "yeah but you're smart" or "yeah but you're...". And no explanation that what makes us think "he's hot" is a really primitive part of the brain that can be easily overcome (in most cases) to make way to normal human interaction.  You have no idea how difficult it is to explain to other guys what it is they need to do to not look and act like creeps. Or maintain relationships.   I do agree that it's pointless to consider societies with existing traditions of arranged marriages. Although they do have a degree of social success you have to remember. It comes at a high price of social development but again...we're just animals with brains. Sometimes it might seem like more stupid things work better just because we havent figured out the correct approach to what *we* need at our stage.  Anyway, considering my experiences on this subreddit you're due my thanks too. That was a good talk. Take care.   
Agh - you're right. It was a massive generalization. Both men and women can be prey and predators: I was rash in suggesting otherwise. 
[deleted]
I was there :P It was so cool to see how much the crowd got hyped up by it everyone was smiling and cheering him on!
So they attempted to account for it, and when they found out there wasn't statistically significant evidence for their hypothesis they.... Published their paper anyway? That's even worse. They're basically saying "All evidence be damned! I know sexism exists everywhere, even in how people perceive hurricane names! Let me publish a paper and get famous!"
You're doing the right thing. I suspect that a lot of it, is jealousy, and frustration at their own fitness levels... If they continue, bring it up when someone says "I hate the new healthy you" and ask them why?  Is it because you've taken steps to lead a healthy life, so you can be there for when your grandkids come?  Say you think the "I hate" is done as a joke, but it's starting to hurt your feelings a bit.  If they aren't willing to hear you out, and change, then they aren't worth having as friends.  Surround yourself with positive people, not negative ones who sometimes seem like their only purpose is to suck joy from your life, to make you as miserable as them. Keep on that health kick, I'm tryin to get on mine!
I think your husband accepts the idea that your child would likely get made fun of in school for having painted nails.   Is it worth one moment of fun nail painting for lots of potential emotional trauma? Probably not. Will your son remember "the time you wouldn't paint my nails" for the rest of his life, or "the time i got bullied for having painted nails"?  I'm not saying it's right, but I guess you have to accept that some people are assholes, and painting your 4yo son's nails as a political statement is likely going to do him more harm than good.
I am very curious about the psychological studies they did. Where were those people from? What was their experience with hurricanes? If you are used to tracking the hurricanes you know better than to give two shits about the name.   I think the bigger issue for people who are used to hurricanes is complacency about TS's and lower number storms. A storm that is "only" a TS or a Cat 1 can still do a ton of damage. 
[deleted]
Look, if I make a NSA sex agreement with someone that lasts more than a one nighter, I will want to know what the guy's situation is, and I should tell him mine. OP had every right to know, and every right to be pissed off because she should know the situation she could be getting into.   If the guy had been up front about being married, she would at least be walking into the situation with open eyes. She would know he's already committed, and would know that an ill times text could result in what actually happened to OP by surprise. Instead guy lied to her, actually started go court her like they were dating. He was manipulating OP to get her to want him &amp; feel for him, telling her what she wanted to hear, stringing her along with a sob story from the very start, all because he didn't want to be honest because of the possibility OP may not have been down with him being married (plus he couldn't pretend he may want to date her someday).   FWB and NSA regular hookups are relationships. In order for everything to go well you should be honest about what your situation is. There are women that wouldn't have cared that guy was married, OP did, and she had the right to know she was fucking a married guy. 
[deleted]
True, but based on the confused response(s) to OPs text culminating in "who are you looking for?" in all likelihood the wife was unaware he was having sex with other people. Otherwise the implication that it may be a wrong number makes no sense.   Of course it's always possible he had an open marriage and the wife just didn't know about OP, but that seems like a stretch just for the sake of argument to me.
[deleted]
Thanks for the reply, not sure why my question was downvoted, it wasn't an accusation, but a request for clarification. I would say those guys were never your friends to begin with. 
Haha yes me too! I was like thank god I was upgraded from cubicle, I am not ready for these feels.
Not really. You know what sort of insecurities would come from a sentance like that. Guys worry too and that sort of answer would lead him to doubt a great many things. Imagine if a guy (or girl) said it to you. Your first thought would be, 'But why? :('   'I'm not comfortable with that because [x].' is way better. Some things you need to explain. 'I dont want to do anal because I dont like poo.' 'I dont want to give head because I gag horribly and I dont want to embarass myself by vomiting all over your crotch'.   'I dont want to do that', isnt a very good way of doing that. She did say she wanted to not offend him after all.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Do you mean that you don't feel like it now, or you never want to do it?
I don't believe the police would be required to do that- it's not their job. Their job is to investigate, not to spread information. I can see how CPS or a court might have to, but not the police. They are not trained to follow intricacies of the law like that. If they had to tell someone who made a complaint or provided info, why wouldn't they have to tell a murderer who turned them in while investigating? Heck, we hear all the time how people guess who it was who "told the cops" because the police didn't explicitly say who it was. 
This is incredibly beautiful. I love the author's perspective on Robin- she seems so strong, generous, and graceful to view her husband's former wife with such compassion. I hope that I would have the courage to be as open and welcoming with my heart.
I really hope for your sake that your comment was bad sarcasm.
there's a difference between holding someone up and full on ass groping.
I feel like if this were your kids or your nieces or nephews or whatever, you wouldn't be thinking quite so much about keeping that guy's family together, you'd be up all night worrying that your kids are about to be raped and have their lives ruined forever by another man, *and there's nothing you can do about it*.  The last thing you would be thinking about is: "huh, maybe I should just leave this creepy criminal alone with the people I love most in the world, and y'know, see what happens, better make sure he actually rapes my kids before I do anything about it."
[deleted]
Your last statement just explained the type of mentality you have.  Let me guess, a girl walking alone in the middle of the city at night dressed provocatively gets raped. She shouldn't complain because she was dressed like that, alone, in the middle of the city at night?  
You will never be.
[deleted]
Thank you. I'll try and remember to do this unemotionally. I suppose that's the key word when it comes to confronting someone about this.
Definitely an interesting topic that I often find myself thinking about as well. I've always joked that I'm a wallflower, and that I drift invisibly through life.   It's not terrible, I guess - but I certainly don't experience all of these advantages that the men on reddit ascribe to the female experience. As far as I know, I've never been hit on, I don't get free drinks, I always had to pay cover at the clubs - the majority of my dates were from me making the first move, and I've got a strong enough personality that if I could get that foot in the door, I was usually okay. But I also had a lot of guys who wouldn't give me the time of day, and that's alright - there were definitely guys I wouldn't give the time of day to either.   My 20s were a bit difficult - I was so desperate to validate my sense of self-worth that I made some poor choices in how I handled my sexuality and experiences. I felt like I couldn't be really valued as a person unless men wanted to fuck me. I got past it, but it was a hard go for awhile. Rejection would often plummet me into the pits of despair, and I cycled through some heavy drinking and the party circuit for a bit. I wouldn't change the experiences, because they've shaped me into the woman I am - but life was no picnic, certainly not the way that online guys seem to think (I say online because I haven't encountered many men in person who have expressed this sentiment).   With all of this in mind - I don't know whether I'd change, given the opportunity - would I rather be invisible or hot? Hard to say. I think that had I been a hot girl, I wouldn't be who I am today - and I kinda like me, you know?
There's getting touched by people just supporting you, and then there's groping and pawing.
&gt; but I felt like they focused so much on what feminists say and do.  Yes, I agree.  I can get behind some things, but when you try to make feminism out to be this sinister organization that is working to tear you down, you've lost me.    Although that's also why I don't appreciate this article, and lumping MRA in with TRP.  TRP are their own special brand, and I think it's dishonest to associate together (especially when you only litter your article supporting your TRP portion, and nothing that illustrated "uncomfortable truths" from MRA.) 
I am not a big fan of the article, but The Red Pill is essentially an enemy of all women (any group that subscribes to such a rigid philosophy on gender, saying women are inherently not fit to lead, be friends with, have meaningful conversations or relationships with etc).  It's completely relevant to talk about groups that attempt to misrepresent women.
They probably think that you getting thinner is some sort of commentary on their bodies, which is ridiculous. You've decided that your body should be thinner... doesn't that extend to you thinking that their bodies should be thinner? The logic doesn't work, but that might be what they're thinking. 
Seriously, wtf this thread.   Going to the police over a *public* facebook posting?  Stranger danger is getting really out of hand.   Love all of the little non specific drops from the OP too about how he's a career criminal (but it's never mentioned what he did) and a felon (but never mentioned what he went to jail for) and using these as reasons why he's obviously a rapist and child molester.      Pretty sickening, although if what she says is true the guy is likely a scumbag, and probably isn't a great influence on the nieces to begin with (considering the FB post that started it all), but that doesn't make him a freaking child molester.  I just don't see why the hell she brought the cops into it.  She literally has zero proof that *anything* has occured.  Going to the cops instead of her sister could only ended up tearing them apart and successfully getting the sister to ignore her, which is unsurprisingly exactly what happened.     
I just read your story, and I'd love to give you a hug and a cup of tea! That was scary and frustrating even just to read about. I know that times when I have confronted someone for inappropriate behavior, the confrontation leaves me upset and fed up. You went to the police for help - something we are taught to do from a young age - and they couldn't help because how do you find the guy without his plate number, etc, which you obviously know, but you could have done with an escort from the state of things at the very least. I'm so sorry again :(
I HAVE NOTHING TO PLAY
They're a rock band, girls crowd surf all the time at their shows probably so there'd have to be serious inappropriate groping for him to take notice.
Yeah, I think he became discouraged quickly. It is frustrating, but not applying certainly won't help either. 
If you're constantly bringing this up I would say that you are being a nag.  Having said that, I think that all of the points that you've raised are entirely valid. I would feel the same way if I were planning to move in with someone immediately. Are you sure that he feels the same way about that? It may be that he feels that he should be able to enjoy a bit of downtime having graduated from college and so doesn't feel any urgency to get a job/move in with you.
I prefer Ms.
That's funny, because that's what a lot of anti-feminists say too.
Nope. I think it's a great idea, and something I've considered myself. I have a few plans up my sleeves for a network of women who have a place to report this kind of behavior. People don't realize HOW OFTEN this happens. 
[deleted]
I've seen both at rock shows. I recently went to an Against Me! show and some skinny neckbeard tried to start a pit but quickly got shut down and then the next song tried to get his friend-girl up in the air to crowd surf..it was a small venue and you could see the grimacing faces around him. 
did anyone get beat up?
*Bravery As we've all seen on TV Explosions and swords Hot girls in reward*  *And in the games you play You are the hero of the day But outside that land Your head's in the sand*
There's a difference between, "oh she is in a weird position where I have to touch her butt to hold her up" and "aw fuck yer, now I can squeeze her ass and maybe slide a hand between her legs and she can't do anything about it!"   How can you not know the difference between holding someone up and molesting them? 
It's ignorant to make blanket statements about what other people should be doing with their lives.
You simply never know what's going to happen. My biological mother suffered from certain mental illnesses I will not name, and she took her own life when I was very young. From what my dad told me, it really changed him, and I could see how much it hurt him when he told me the truth many years later. He did remarry soon after my mother passed, and I am incredibly grateful that he was able to bring someone into my life that was able to be there for me as a mother figure while I grew up, and I'm happy that he was able to find love again after that sad time because he was basically just taking care of toddler me and my baby sister for a while, which is hard, especially considering what he had to go through and how young he was at the time. The woman he married after that happened is the mother I know today, no questions asked, and I love her dearly, not just for taking the time to raise me and my sister properly, but also for being there for my dad when any other woman could have just left once she found out he had kids. Just thought I should come out of lurkerdom to give you another perspective, this article really resonated with me for obvious reasons. :)
[deleted]
Riots kill people. A person with a microphone, threatening to sick a mob of people on someone is never okay. I'm pretty sure it is a felony. 
And look at you:  smart, empathic, caring, loving.  
This video is Age Restricted, **[here's a direct link](http://www.youtube.com/v/HPFcspwbrq8&amp;amp;bpctr=1401816721)** if you'd rather not login.
Gotta crack eggs to make an omlet! Amiright!? :D  Note to self- replace the batteries in Reddits sense of humor. 
I think the most important issue this article raises is the one of insecurity. I am in a wonderful relationship, but I am also an inherently insecure individual. It can make you think in the worst ways, and after reading TRP fundamental beliefs, I understand how they can be appealing to people.  There were a couple girls who liked me in highschool, I got asked out several times, I was given numbers and mine was requested. I couldn't believe they actually liked me, I thought they were making fun of me or trying to pull a prank. I thought they were miles out of my league and if they actually wanted to date me they were just trying to get something out of me.  I forgot where I was going with that story... My point is that maybe I am more like the strawman of a woman that TRP has built, and it is too easy to project my insecurities on other people.  I think this article is good. We need more from the other side, not more flame for the flame war, just simple refutations of TRP's basic points. Women don't love pragmatically, they're not machiavellian, they can love unconditionally; at least not any more or less than the general population. Call me weak for needing that, but it is a *daily* battle against my lizard brain.
Cant remember the last time i cried- cried all through the article and at half the comments before i stopped. I will try to learn from this and never take anything for granted. I know im not in the situation of the person with cancer, but if i was the surviving partner, i would be as deathly afraid to be without the person- as the person who is leaving is to leave. We are all beautiful originals, never forget.
[deleted]
Customer also said "girl", when if a male was assisting, I'm betting it would be "man", regardless of whether knife skills / safety was questioned.  I get called a "girl" at work and I'm almost 32.  It gets tiring, especially in a professional environment.  Even "lady" would be better than "girl".
Oh, sorry. I'm a feminist. My friends and I use the term "feminazi" loosely when talking about women who are overbearing about women's rights and are rude to others who are not as gung-ho. This includes being shitty to other women for wearing makeup, shaving, etc. I grew up in a punk scene and have met a lot of women like this, and know that they are not real feminists. I'm sorry for my ignorance and thank you for teaching me something new!
[deleted]
I don't have any guy friends. In the past I did but one by one they became interested in me and it was hard to maintain a platonic relationship. Very frustrating.   Also I have been working at this place for two years and have always stood up for myself whenever any little comment like this has been made. This is a lot of the reason why I don't wear makeup or spend time on my outfits for work, even though I enjoy doing these things. My co-workers are very dense and do not see women as equal human beings. They are also racist but deny it when questioned about it.  EDIT- Also, I understand he wasn't trying to offend me. My offense was taken at being cat-called in general, let alone while I was at my desk working.
 “I’ve become famous not for the peace treaty between Israel and Egypt, but as the number one toilet builder on Earth,” Jimmy Carter joked,  http://blogs.desmoinesregister.com/dmr/index.php/2012/09/13/jimmy-carter-it-takes-more-courage-to-preserve-peace-than-make-war/article
I'd hardly call this article brilliant.  It equates reddit forums and TRP with men's rights movements.  Legitimate versions of the latter are simply concerned with divorce proceedings in mostly southern states, while the former is a sith lord wanting to supplant misogyny for confidence.   The article simply needs to be retitled.
Me too T__T
Don't worry too much about it. I definitely said stupid and deriding shit about feminism when I was younger and I wish I could go back in time and slap myself upside the head. Try not to doubt your own feelings or think that you're over reacting.
Yes! And check out [r/2xlite](http://www.reddit.com/r/2xlite) as well. It's been around awhile, but is picking up steam as an alternate sub since the default.
I don't understand all these posts about people, whether they are male or female, that get bullied or harassed at their LGS and do nothing about it, then ask reddit what they should do.  You're almost an adult now. This guy is obviously a total ass hole. If his harassment is as obvious as you say, why don't you just report it? I don't understand what's complicated here. Who cares who he is? Nobody can act like this and get away with it. Report it to your LGS. Hell, why don't you tell him yourself to shut the fuck up and show you some respect? Why do you need to be told to defend yourself? You could also easily press charges against him for his rape threats.  If everyone there is as bad as you say, you should simply not attend the place.   Yeah, I'm going to get downvoted into oblivion, but this needed to be said.
Thanks. 48 hours of waiting now. And ice and Tylenol. And more Tylenol...
Stop. 
SRS has about 50,000 subscribers.  
I never said one is worse than the other. Nor did I say two wrongs make a right, quite the opposite infact I called MRA "batshit insane"
I'm reading this as a tongue-in-cheek way of poking fun of Lean In (and how the book downplayed the societal and systemic issues involved in female advancement in the workplace). 
Not a PUA. PUA get women through manipulation. TRP more preaches that you should get yourself to a place where women will be attracted to you. While it may not be as well put as it could be, there is a difference. 
Responses like this are a little nuts.  He threw her on the bed because he was being held against his will.  Her hitting the computer was an accident.  That is not abuse.   However, the fact that he drinks then drives and calls his ex to punish OP is grounds for more than an immeadiate dump.  This guy has some serious issues and doesn't need to be in a relationship or on the road.
&gt;To address this caveat, future studies should be conducted on people who live in coastal, hurricane-prone towns. Problem solved.  Problem not solved, unless you are going to interview people from 1950.   Names often change over time which gender dominates.
I get crazy perm/poof ball head if I have short hair, that's why! No need to be annoyed.
What about the menzing right here. We're talking about women who are invisible and women who have experienced rejection. 
I don't see how this article is about the MRM at all.  Other than a link to /r/mensrights at the beginning, there is no reference or link in this article to any MRM individual, thread, website, statement, or act. The closest it gets is a single quote *about* the MRM by sociologist Michael Kimmel.  (Note, the quotes from Frank Meeink might also be about the MRM, but it's unclear.)
[deleted]
Yeah I'm curious too. I have short hair and I don't plan on growing it out when I get married. If you don't like it, why are you making that concession? Because other people do it? Because it's so not necessary if you hate it!
I would say the same thing about feminism, you're deluding yourself if you don't think feminism has elements just a batshit as the most hateful MRAs and in equal numbers to the whole MR movement.  Which is why I'm neither a MRA or a feminist, because quite frankly I don't feel like aligning myself with either end of the spectrum (or really, where the horseshoe meets). And please don't whip out the "not a true scotsman" fallacy.
Whistling and saying "Whoa, baby" is something I (sadly) expect from cat-callers on the street, calling that merely "blunt" is disingenuous. That really isn't appropriate in a work environment. To me it has an obvious sexual undertone, whereas saying "Hey, nice haircut" or whatever wouldn't.
My calling them assholes wont change what I encounter. Seriously. Where was the reality in your post?
Laci isn't really the best and nuance or connecting the dots.  &gt;The response to Elliot Roger's massacre has widely focused on the fact that he's a "psycho" and a "madman". Glossing over the fact that he has a string of twenty videos where he repeatedly stated where the reason why did this is because women wouldn't sleep with him.  She seems to gloss over the fact that those videos are evidence towards his psychosis and goes on to show her complete lack of knowledge of how a mental illness can warp the world of the sufferer.   I mean mental illness is widely misunderstood in the US and Canada. So I don't expect her to be very knowledgeable on the subject. But speaking about it from a point of authority is intellectually dishonest. 
Okay. Will do that.  I'm new to this whole waiting thing. Usually it's the guys waiting on me to text back as I leave my phone places or  just am busy in general. The anticipation is killing me. 
I would love to be a moderator because 2xc has been my favorite sub for years, and I want to help keep it fun and positive. I visit on a daily basis anyway, and if I could help out that would be a bonus.  Changes are happening rapidly since we went default, and I want to help make those all good changes. We should be mainstream rather than special interest- hell, we are the majority (51%) of the population! We can normalize women's interests with dignity while keeping this a safe place for support for those who need it. 
I would ask yourself why you don't feel you deserve a real relationship and are willing to be someone's side piece and dirty little secret. You aren't her main thing, you are a potential piece on the side.  Is that really what you want for yourself?
[deleted]
[deleted]
Pepper spray.  He'll never call you a whore again.
I used to be the same way, but as you get older I think it's easier to make female friends and keep them.  You get more and more rules as you get older, lines that shouldn't be crossed.   When you were growing up the world was genderless but as you age you realize that isn't true anymore. There are limits between the friendships of men and women. Limits that aren't there for like genders. 
Basically, all of it stopped when summer hit.  It's hot and uncomfortable, plus odour is more detectable.  I was also getting pubes caught in zippers and the friction of them would irritate the surrounding skin.  In winter, it seemed to serve a practical purpose, not so much in summer.  Bf doesn't care if I let my bush puff up, nor about my legs getting spiky.  He did briefly think my armpit hair was a bit...  unsettling, so I kept shaving that for him.  It's the least involved process, so I was willing to compromise.
The problem with the name egalitarianism is that it implies that men and women face equal amounts of institutionalized oppression, when in practice they do not. The fact of the matter is that people use egalitarianism as a method of silencing women in discourse (but men! And "not all men!" Come to mind). You can't make real change when you're constantly being bombarded with the message "your rights don't matter because they don't take into account my level of comfort!"  Feminism is an institution for helping raise women in society up, and in doing so they destroy a lot of gender roles that will inevitably benefit men (for example, breaking down the mainstream worship of hypermasculinity benefits male victims who are now able to speak up without being called "pussies" or other feminine diminutives associated with internalized misogyny), but men are not the primary (or even secondary) victims of the societal pressures that harm them.  That's why feminism is called feminism; like triage, it's about providing care to the people that need it most first.  Eventually we'll come to a time where men and women will be on equal footing and we can combat gender rights issues together and concurrently, but that time is yet to come
Just thank him for the amazing time and that you'd love to do it again. :)  
I think you make a better point than my point with the dancing thing...I guess it is such a seemingly socially acceptable norm sometimes that we don't consider it to be wrong.   Either way for the downvoters I would be curious to hear why, other than the massive wall of text...I hope to promote some open discussion and get some better understanding
&gt;TRP considers itself part of MRM  Can you actually find any reason to believe that?  Or did you just assume it, or read it on another crummy blog post?  Some members of TRP may consider themselves a MRA, or sympathetic to the movement, but TRP is *not* a part of the Men's Rights Movement.  Unless something has changed, which I hope you can show where they have said they are apart of it.  For the most part, from what I've seen, they aren't that keen on the current MRM.  So I'm pretty skeptical that they would not consider the subreddit as a part of the MRM, and the majority also wouldn't consider themselves a part of it.  I don't know what PUAHate is, but I don't really feel like I can take your word for that one either.    
&gt;Oh I've freaked out. If it wasn't for him being so patient with my freak out  You seem to be perceiving this as him doing you a favor. Shouldn't he at least be compromising if he respects you? Even if he doesn't logically think she's flirting inappropriately and knows in his own heart that he wouldn't cheat, the fact that hiss disregarding your perceptions and feelings isn't okay.
I wouldn't describe myself as a jock but i have an above average level of fitness.  I play MTG extensively and have never seen any sort of negative feelings.  If anything most of the players around judge people purely by thier skill in the game.  I might get some looks initially not being the 'stereotypical' mtg player but after a game or two I'm just like everyone else there.
oh and yes everyone got treated very nicely the rest of the day :P
As a rules advisor...I would probably not do much in an official cpacity. I might, however, unhinge my jaw and swallow the offender whole.
Because TRP doesn't consider themselves a part of the MRM, and many actively reject it.   What other groups like TRP identify as MRA?
[deleted]
This is true! I should just text him and be like "Yo what is that comic you suggested to me" Because I really want to know because I really want to read it but I was worried about looking like a clinger. I really really just don't want to fuck it up.   It's just like MAN I really like him. 
[deleted]
Yeah! Exactly. You are not being a clinger by asking him about this.
If it happens a lot, carry a picture of a penis or man on man porn to block his view
We're conditioned to recognize the opposite gender. I think all he means is that until he formed real, non sexual relationships with women it was tough to not naturally just treat them differently, because A LOT of outside forces tell us men that we should. Once he has some girl buddies he realized just how similar they were to him and other men, he could break this conditioning and not use their gender as the primary identifying trait.  
I agree. Also, when these conversations take place, the #notallwhitewomen group tends to feel the need to defend themselves or their group--just as some men tend to use the #butnotallmen argument. The point the author is making is instead of trying to explain ("Whitesplaining") just be quiet and listen. Consider for a moment that the other group (WoC, MoC, etc.) is not asking you to answer, but asking you to listen.
Hijacking your comment to point out that the author (Emily Yoffe) also writes as Dear Prudence. I've always found that her marriage situation gave her an interesting perspective to some of the letter writers.   Thank you for posting - such a beautiful read, every time. 
You never fail to make me think and appreciate everything that is beautiful in life, and impress me with your grace and humour. Thank you for posting and sharing with us! 
Also, but WOW how rude to not only demand that of you, but spring it on you only after you arrived?  It's not like they even gave you the opportunity to plan ahead and (if formula and/or expressing into bottles are things you're comfortable with) make other arrangements for feeding.  They basically dictated that you and your infant would be hot, uncomfortable and hidden.
please do expand!
where does it say in the article that this kid thinks his body is wrong or bad
[deleted]
Not really :/ I know that's part of the problem. I'm generally either at school (32.5 hrs/week) or at work (15-30 hrs/week). I don't really have time to go out and do much, or the money, unfortunately.  How do I say I want to talk more without being needy, or at least coming off that way? I've tried to just be honest with how I felt about it before and I don't think it did anything but upset him.
I'm honestly a bit dumbfounded at the amount of policing that goes on in "female-safe" spaces on the internet, where stories of strong women are shouted down and narratives of being a helpless victim are promoted incessantly.  Maybe it's just where I'm from and who I was raised by but myself and all of the women in life are disgusted by the attitudes I see here.  I certainly hope the community can grow more positive over time.
I usually just say, "excuse me" to get someone's attention.
I can't believe how strong you are. My grandfather passed a year and a half ago from esophageal cancer. He was diagnosed Easter time of my 8th grade year, and that fall had surgery and was cancer free as of the following Easter.   Come my junior year of high school, he's diagnosed again at Easter time. 3 tumors, two on his esophagus and 1 on his lung. Following summer full of treatments, the one on his lung and one on his esophagus were gone, and the last a tiny speck.   My grandparents spent winters down in Texas, and at Halloween we had a family get together to celebrate thanksgiving and Christmas. They left Michigan the next day.   He had to know he was dying. They got there 3 days later, and my grandpa was admitted to the hospital the following day with pneumonia. The first hospital, the one he always went to down there for treatments and such, refused him because my grandma forgot their insurance card. The next hospital took him immediately, no questions asked.   My dad planned to head down and help out my grandma while my grandpa recovered. As the day progressed, the fluid in his lungs mysteriously disappeared, his skin and eyes turned yellow. His liver and kidneys were shutting down.   He was on oxygen, a mask. My was losing it because they wouldn't let her into his room. My dad called their friends down there and they went to be with my grandma.   The doctors decided to put him on an oxygen tube. The second they removed the mask he was gone.   That day of anxiety and grief was the worst in my life, and probably my grandma's too. She was consumed with grief for a long time, we all were. But she knew that he wouldn't want her to waste away in bed in grief, and continues to live her life with his memory by her side. She is there for all of her grandkids and great grandkids. She still misses him terribly, and we all do. He will never be forgotten.   My grandpa had planned out his own funeral, knowing that my grandma would be too consumed with grief to plan anything. He loved her so much.   Even the great grandkids will know what an amazing man their great grandpa was, even never having met him. 9 months after he died, he was blessed with 2 more beautiful great granddaughters. They have his eyes. 
actually fishing was the #1 cause.
Yeah, fair enough. Hopefully there would be some positives you could share!
[deleted]
"Sister, I love you and want you to know I'll always be there for you if you need me. It's important that you never let people treat you disrespectfully, whether it's a boyfriend or any kind of relationship. You don't have to, and should not, put up with disrespect from anybody, now or in future relationships. You deserve far better than that. I'm here, I will make time for you no matter what. anything we talk about will be strictly confidential between us, I won't tell anybody else."
I was just trying to explain why you were down voted because you asked.   People on this subreddit generally consider it disrespectful to trash talk feminism in general. Since a lot of this subreddit discusses problems with the patriarchy the rape culture, saying you don't believe it exists isn't going to win you approval and internet points.   
You really just have to be the bigger person here. **DO NOT ENGAGE.** She's gonna flaunt her crazy, and you just have to let her do it.   The next time she makes a scene/you're around her, just ignore her as much as you can. If she refuses to back down, *calmly* say, "This is not the appropriate place for this; please leave us alone." If she keeps screaming, say *calmly* that you'll have to call security if she won't rejoin her own group.   You really just have to let it go. You can't reason with the irrational. 
If he never watched much before, it could just be the novelty. There's a LOT of porn out there. Like, I don't know, discovering you like sushi and then going out and trying all the sushi you missed. It doesn't mean you'll never want pizza again, or whatever. It's just new and exciting. It happens whenever anyone discovers something new they enjoy. Things will probably wind up balancing out. 
The force is strong with /u/crassified. Heed her words 
&gt; I'd enjoy watching them get flustered and angry for no reason  Well, the "no reason" is according to YOU, because you're in your own head and know it was an accident. The other person doesn't know that, so your use of the phrase is subjective and assumptive. And enjoying it, well, that just continues being petty and adds schadenfreude into it. So, you know, feel free NOT to say hi to me!   But since you also apparently can read well enough to notice the part where I said it would depend on many factors, and that I would perhaps try to make a joke or at least be civil about it, not just go straight to bitch, there's probably no point in continuing this.  
Really? That's what you got out of that? 
A store owner can, but is under no obligation to, ban a player from their store.  The DCI can ban a player from all sanctioned events.  The ball should get rolling on a DCI ban once she reports this to a judge.
What I find funny, (funny meaning incredibly facepalm worthy), is how often I've made the *exact* same argument about feminism and tumblrina social justice warrior psychopaths, and I've gotten the same exact answer that "they don't represent the mainstream feminist views".     So which is it? Do extremeists on *any* side of the debate represent the moderates? If not, then why attribute the actions of extremeists on an issue you disagree on to the moderates you might share some common ground with? 
[deleted]
Has there been any indication that your sister's boyfriend treats her like shit? 
[deleted]
How could you tell that's what they wanted because of the outfits? Are you sure they want to be told "say nasty sexual things to me?"   Maybe they just want to be able to pick up dudes. 
Women feel a sense of duty and patriotism just as men do, and, as a general rule, the military takes *very* good care of their soldiers, and that can be very appealing. It's a solid job with a regular paycheck and benefits that last long after you get out. Of course there are exceptions to the rule, so please don't think I'm making a giant generalization, but the military isn't all bad.
Cool, I figured the first little while would have a few side effects. Are you on Paragard or Mirena? How many days do the bad periods last for? :O Thanks!
&gt; Often feminists will then oppose the mens group when they go it alone as they feel they are taking attention away from their interests.  Can you give any examples of that happening? 
It's hard because my kids are so young. This is almost completely out of my control. I *think* I can trust the people in my life to create the memories they will lack. I am trying to leave bits of myself behind... letters, baby books, the story of how their dad and I met. I hope it will help. But it's hard because the future is so uncertain. There is no way I can know. It's undeniably the hardest part for me (so far).   I'm sorry you had the experience you had. It would mean so much to me to know I had a child like you, honoring me after my death. 
2 out of? There is no argument that they arent out there. I just havent found one. It's like 2 dead pixels off the viewing cut. I certainly am not looking very hard I admit.  
[deleted]
Thank you for sharing. Just out of curiosity, how old was her daughter when she died?
&gt; What are you talking about?  Your comment history.   &gt;I am a woman offering my perspective on the MRM and this subreddit.   Yes.  That's why you're being downvoted.  This subreddit isn't intended for that.  What you're looking for is a sub devoted to gender relations.  This is not it.  Don't push the MRM bullshit here.
That is a cute idea. I've done a couple of letters. But it's hard to get myself to commit to as many of those. It might be fun to torture my husband with that a little, too.
[deleted]
I just locked the door to my office so people won't see me crying to my smartphone.
Yeah I'm in the same boat with cheap jewelry (but I'm cheap and paint it with a layer of clear nailpolish!). Overall I'm not hearing that IUDs are causing emotional/psychological changes, so that's great =)
Ehh, the way she put it makes it sound like she wants you to find a man who will be subservient to you.  But it's also possible that she really meant that you should find a man whose devotion is powerful and true.  My own mom is guilty of saying well-intentioned things in ridiculous ways, so I guess you should judge for yourself what her true meaning may have been.
Venus or Boohoo. 
&gt; Maybe my views will change and maybe they won't, **but who cares!**  Actually...I care.  I'm sad for you that it turned out so badly. The rest of your relational life doesn't have to, though. Whether its friends or soulmates or whatever, we weren't meant to "Go it alone". PM me if you want to talk. 
Without context your comment makes little sense, but I'm glad we've agreed to disagree.
Not all birth controls, as you've seen are made alike. I was on Ortho Tri and developed massive bruises all over my body. On Lo'Ovral (Cryselle is the generic) I've had zero issues.
&gt; Sex-positivity Does Not Excuse All Consensual Acts From Critique  This goes against the inherent nature of sex-positivity. Being sex positive means respecting the decisions people make about their sexual lives; it's about educating others on safe, consensual sex between adults; it's about celebrating sexual diversity and not shaming the ways consenting adults choose to be sexual. How can you be sex-positive  *and* critique and judge the way two consenting adults decide to explore their sexuality, at the same time?   &gt;That does not mean that all sexual desire is inherently good. I definitely believe in pathologizing what is known to be unhealthy (in the sense that it causes or is likely to cause physical, personal or social harm)  Who are we to decide what is inherently good or bad or wrong or disgusting or harmful or unhealthy when two adults are deciding it for themselves? This makes no sense.    
Mind you, I don't live in the US. I live in a country, that has equal, if not more institutionalised discrimination than the states. I'm well aware.
Did you know that less than 2% of all rape accusations were determined to be evidently false, and that of those 2%, most don't name a perpetrator?  False rape fears are grossly over exaggerated
My point is that we're not here to support him, or to talk about whether that's good or bad, or any of the shit you keep bringing up. OP is asking for emotional support. You can give that without agreeing with OP's actions - if you really can't bring yourself to, then you should not be in this thread.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Sure! As long as it's not between a bunch of 14 year olds and the 50 year old leader of a religious group, like it often has been in the past. A bunch of adults want to have legal responsibilities towards one another- go nuts!
I've had a Mirena for about two years after trying numerous different types of pills. I'm shit at keeping track of pills, first off, so just that was enough to frustrate me. Every pill I tried turned me into a moody, sexless shell of a woman. They did actually help alleviate some of my issues, however (super heavy flows, violent PMDD, painful ovulation). The positive aspects didn't outweigh the negative, though, so I went completely off all hormonal BC for several years. During that time, I dealt with some seriously fucked up heavy cycles coupled with PMDD and a slew of doctors who told me to either get on hormonal BC or deal with it.  I've had the Mirena for about two years, and I couldn't be more thrilled. I had a rough insertion and recovery period. The insertion itself wasn't too terrible, a very sharp pinch and a 30 second cramp that radiated throughout my entire lower body. I bled like a stuck pig for the next 3 months. I mean, it was constant. My gyn just kept telling me that everyone's body reacts differently to it and just give it a little more time to settle in. Then one day, the bleeding completely stopped. 28 days later I had a super light cycle, and ever since then I've been period-free. I've noticed lately that my sex drive has dropped a wee bit, but I think that has more to do with being 30 and busy as hell. I really haven't experienced any negative side effects from it, once things settled in.
Unlike you. 
Here's a question that is not asked enough - where the hell are the good guys who want to support men through their struggles with dating and sexuality?  Why is it all MRA, PUA, anti-PUA and TRP?  What is it about this issue that generates all villains and no heroes?  It seems that the men victimized by these ideologies have a legitimate need -why havent we created systems that better address it without slamming women or appealing to the darkness in poor, mislead men?
Yeah I don't think the conversation would be very productive either.
&gt; well ofcourse with a sub like /r/radicalfeminism, you know what you're gonna get  TERFs?
&gt; There have never been any cultures with general polygamy,  My neighbor two doors over would disagree. He is an Iraqi refugee married to two women. While perfectly legal and accepted in Iraq, this fact has caused him all sorts of problems in Germany. German bureaucracy simply treats his second marriage as if it does not exist and if his second wife was a single mother with no husband. They even went so far as to forcefully seperate the family and the children from their father, bc they required the second wife and her children to reside two counties over.     
I wrote that last comment on my phone in 5 or so sessions without being able to change or read what was in it so it was a bit incoherent but here, let me explain.  &gt; Not "can." Does.  Always? No. There are many forms of FGM, go read up on it. Some are much more severe than others. Some leave the clitoris intact, some only partially remove it, others remove every external sexual organ, so there is great variance between person to person. So while FGM on average may do more sexual harm than MGM, the case isn't black and white, there are definitely variations between cases. Also, the vaginal canal is left alone. The vagina has erogenous nerve endings as well as the g-spot. These are always left intact just the same as the glans is on a male. Some women can achieve orgasm through stimulation of the vagina and g-spot. So there's some sexual function left in all women who've undergone FGM, do you condone doing it to women since it doesn't destroy *all* sexual function? This is pretty much your idea of logic for the male version because hell, men can still achieve orgasm, so it must be fine.  Let me remind you that male and female orgasms are also completely different. The male orgasm is necessary for the survival of the species, without it there's no conception and no future generations. There's a reason men can orgasm much easier than women, and this is that reason. It doesn't mean the act of sex up until/before orgasm is the same between an intact and circumcised man, it just means they can both reach orgasm (~5 seconds).   Also, my sexual function is greatly reduced. You may call it an outlier but I can not orgasm through vaginal intercourse. It has happened maybe 4 or 5 times in the past 10 years (1000+ times having had sex, at least). I am not the only person out there with this issue. I've spoken to men on forums who've had this issue. I have also seen women complain about their partner not being able to orgasm through vaginal intercourse on /r/sex. Don't believe me? Google it.  &gt; We vaccinate children without their consent as well, and if there was a clear and demonstrable overwhelming social benefit to performing some sort of body modification then you can bet your butt we'd do it.  Seriously man? You're comparing vaccination to the amputation of a body part... the genitals at that! I don't even want to begin arguing this because it's absurd at best.  As far as your father's account, that's a personal account and he *chose* to get cut. No one strapped him down to a chair and chopped off his sensitive bits. He was also likely left with most of his frenulum/frenular delta attached. He likes it, that's great. Forcing it on a child is a completely different thing. There are no medically compelling reasons, like there are for vaccination (which literally prevents death). It is not a necessity by any means and is a permanent alteration of the human form without the consent of the individual involved. It is morally wrong on every level.  &gt; FGM, being mostly illegal and underground, is not. Moreover, even if it was done in a proper clinical environment we would still think this was bad. Complaining about rusty tools is an argument about poor access to healthcare, not about FGM.  FGM is performed underground because it is illegal. If MGM was illegal, the same logic would apply. We give people access to hospitals and circumcision, so obviously it is much safer to perform. If the legal issues surrounding FGM disappeared and hospitals were allowed to perform it, it would be just as "safe" and done under anesthesia in clean environment. So basically, the acceptance of MGM is the reason it is done in a clean environment, nothing else.  &gt; Or does your world-view only admit stark binaries based on your own, deliberately fuzzy definitions?  You're comparing **someone else** forcibly removing a part of **my** body, to someone taking drugs and hurting *their own body.* These are not the same, nor will they ever be. **CONSENT IS THE ISSUE.**  &gt; I mean this as a manslaughter::genocide kind of distinction.  You are grossly dismissing the severity of MGM. FGM is more severe than MGM, does that mean MGM is by definition not severe? Do you think this way? Comparing manslaughter (killing of one or a few people) to genocide (the killing of an entire group, usually millions) is the "ratio" of comparison you draw between male and female genital mutilation? A million to one difference, practically insignificant?  Again, this comes down to *basic human rights.* There is no reason any one person deserves a basic right more than another. The right to bodily integrity is a right that every human being should have, male or female. You are dismissing the act of cutting a man's genitals by saying the female version of the same act is more severe. So fucking what? Does that mean a less severe form of it is fine? So then why not allow labiaplasty (definitely less severe than circumcision in terms of erogenous tissue loss) on minors? Do it in the hospital, under anesthesia without the consent of the female in question? If you can justify reasons why that is wrong, the same exact reasons apply to circumcision. If you can't connect the two, it is sexism, nothing more. To allow the genital alterations on minors with no medical necessity is wrong on every level. The fact that the law specifically protects one sex and specifically encourages (by making circumcision more readily available for any parent who wants it done to their child) the same act on another sex is immoral and wrong. The hate and anger that flows through my veins every fucking day I think about how someone forcibly removed a part of my body that I wish every day I had, that kind of emotional pain is something no one deserves. Being male or female has nothing to do with it.
Thank you! The second point is something I am not reminded of very often. While I usually steer clear of MRAs because of their reputation, I do firmly believe that men also have issues related to their genders, and that some things are biased towards women. It's not any more right than the opposite.  Gender roles are terrible when they're forced. There should be a lot more education on that, that would help lessen (if not solve - the world is not perfect) a lot of problems for all genders, including transgender, non-binary and genderqueer people.
A long bob is more a medium length than a short one. I don't think you'll get the same comments.
Is he an imbecile? Is he kind and caring? Does he love his car more than he can care about another human being? Is he funny? Condescending? Immature? Entitled?  The car has absolutely nothing to do with whether or not I would date someone.  Edit: car - care. Tired.
No. I only date other women.
I cut for the pain. I actually hate the blood side of cutting, so I usually cut in the shower. I would like to say though, I started cutting at thirteen and stopped at nineteen. I've had one little relapse during nineteen to now, so I know I'm strong enough to not cut, it's just that I can't stop obsessing over it. I've never obsessed over the idea before. Ah. 
You already got answered, but essentially it's because it reinforces certain ideas, like that women shouldn't/wouldn't have knifes. Obviously the dude didn't think that women could never own a knife, but the underlying message from society still can reinforce certain ideas.
[deleted]
Definitely- which is why it would NOT be okay unless I knew my boyfriend was secure enough to be okay with it. And we have such open communication, that neither of us feel the need to be uncomfortable with that.   And, to be fair, I know my boyfriend is flirting with girls when he's with his bros and I'm not around.   We're equal about it, which makes it work. 
how are you going to verify who's female and who's male?   but to answer your question, no. 
[deleted]
No, we as a society believe that men who choose not to drive, play video games, dress a specific way, live with their parent for too long, are immature children who wont succeed in life. We also look down on men when it comes to fatherhood. We treat and depict fathers like an older child that the mother also has to take care of. We treat guys who are passionate about sports(jocks) as dumb brute douche bags, etc.  Thing is, believing that women can't drive stick doesn't have any bearing on their ability to comprehend the mechanical workings of a transmission and it's relationship with the clutch, shifter, and engine rpms. Just like believing a guy is too childish to raise a child isn't going to stop him from being an amazing father.
[deleted]
I'm a graduate student, so of course I'm thinking primarily of academic research (of which there is a ton dedicated to sexual identity) as a form of critical analysis. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
Boohoo.com. It's a UK site, but they do international shipping to the U.S. I'm from California and I bought the most gorgeous dress for my birthday last February. They're well-made and incredibly inexpensive (including their shipping). Now that summer's almost here, can someone let me know of a good bathing suit/bikini online store?
Do you REALLY think so? Honestly, I think you need to look at it a little bit more objectively. I see just about the same amount of assholes in both of them. I have encountered far more asshole, condescending "feminists" in real life than I have asshole, condescending "MRAs," but I am assuming that it is because I am a man and feminism is more widespread, so I wouldn't say that there are more asshole feminists. But when I look on the Internet, I do see a lot of assholes from either side. There is easily the same proportion, if not at least a comparable proportion, in either of them.   For the record, I am not an MRA. I consider myself a gender egalitarian and I really think the increasing polarization and propaganda spewed by both groups is burdening the gender equality movement as a whole.
Damned if we do, damned if we don't.
Well, I guess her... opinion can be beneficial for women who might see things the same way. You can also not take her "advice" literally and still learn and consider things differently. Even if you disagree with her point. Strongly.
while not strictly feminist, here's an organization that is targeting the racial (yes, racial, not gender) disparity between black men and everyone else in prisons.  There is no "gender-based" disparity in prison sentences, really. The real issue is one of race, not gender.  EDIT: Forgot the link HEH http://www.sentencingproject.org/template/index.cfm
That would have to change, I think.
[deleted]
I went through a very similar situation, and I ended up not only leaving and going to play at another shop (which may or may not be possible for you), but also reporting the player to the store manager/tournament organizer. Still, its turned me off playing tournaments - the amount of sexism and rude comments was completely demeaning and meant FNM was no longer fun for me. I hope it works out for you -- I can't really suggest anything outside of what's already been said in this thread. Don't let it get you down, and keep your chin up, girl! Find some good friends to play with regularly and don't be afraid to stand up to assholes.
I only need to state 1 movie.  Divergent.   That movie was a waste of my time and everyones time.  Who the hell uses free will as a super power that saves the world?  That movie had a 'strong' female lead that was weak and just made you feel like smacking her and hope they will bring point to a story.  Written by a woman, directed by a woman.  It almost rivaled twighlight, with their 26 full minutes of pointless staring, as one of the most overrated series ever.  So why have more female directors?  There are plenty of bad male directors.  Quit with the comparison of the sexes.  This just creates sexism and ignorance that one sex is better than the other
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
Random men don't have to say ANYTHING to a dolled up woman. That's the point. We shouldn't have to walk around being yelled at and  stared at like meat just because we dressed up.  Why do these men have to say anything? Just leave the girl alone.
If I dress in an upscale suit, rather than casual, I get comments on my appearance immediately from male peers.  If you do anything out of the norm, people will remark on it.
[deleted]
My therapist recently told me that 40% of relationships begin online now. He told me this because he wants me to try online dating again, but all I could think was "oh no, nobody wants black women online, what a disaster" (a little hyperbolic pessimism I admit).  Yeah, there is a big stereotype about black women and girls having all kinds of sex when we're not. I doubt many are as untouched as me, but starting from a young age we can be raped and get called "fast tailed girls" because it's assumed we are inherently sexual. Or the fact that the higher teen pregnancy rate gets brought up, but not the fact that most of the time the fathers are significantly older, in their 20s and up, and these are largely rapes, sometimes violent. When it comes to "settling down" or having healthy sexual relationships these can be in short supply. I'll think about posting something, but I'm sensitive on racial matters and worried about the default nature of the sub. It's a good idea though!
You mean to say CURVY. under 300 lbs isn't fat, its just more to love.
Hi there! I am currently on my second Mirena IUD ( year 6) and can tell you that insertion isn't too scary.  I went back to work a few hours after but I waited a few weeks so I could heal. There is cramping and spotting. My periods went from being really heavy in the first two years to  regular every three months. I now have very light periods. My skin is fairly clear I still have mood swings associated with periods. It's been very reliable contraceptive wise and I trust my IUD completely. It is a very reliable alternative. 
I tend to believe that rising standards of living allow for more GSM friendly societies, so while I generally support the social goals of the left, I am more likely to vote for Liberal(Classic conservatives) parties that generate higher degrees of prosperity in society as a whole. 
"Generally, if you have to ask if it was rape..."  That phrase you said rubs me the wrong way because I know a lot of women, myself included, who thought uncomfortable, forced, unwanted sexual attention was normal and WE were the weird ones for not liking it.   I understand what you are trying to say in this context, but harassment, coercion, entitlement, and sexual assault have become normalized to a shocking extent. 
What you said was perfect. I did and do deserve better. I'm working hard to realize that everyday. :) 
You will wait forever for examples. The denial that the MRM is completely reactionary and only exists to oppose feminism is hilarious. 
The men you know aren't marginalized. The men you think about aren't marginalized. Some food for thought....  though: Are homeless people marginalized? Are the impoverished marginalized? Both populations are overwhelmingly male.
I'm late to the party so I hope you don't mind if I chime in.   Given all the good advice you have in this thread,  I have only one thing to say,  vote with your dollar.   If you have a player base of 100 players then you should have more than one store.  I understand if it's too far away or you have some other reason for not going there.  I say this as someone with a decade on you but had I been your gender and age i would have hopefully complained to the owner and judge then noped my way over to the other store. Give them all my business and every time the question comes up of why you play where you do let them know why you left.  Unless I had a very good reason (gpt/ptq/that one card I need before the scg open and nobody else has it) I wouldn't buy a single die there. We may be the largest TCG in the world but we are a tiny community.   I have seen first hand how much it affects a store to a good group of people leave to another store. If you and your friends bring a good vibe to the store your presence there is worth almost as much as the money you spend.   Lastly every owner wants female gamers in the store.  More females the more females feel welcomed the more people come to hang out and spend money. If I knew I couldn't reasonably bring my gf (haha... One day :'(   then I have no future at the store.   P. S. If it was my store and my best friend was pulling shit like this he would be in some serious trouble. I doubt it's the case but maybe to owner is naive to your situation.   Have fun kicking ass. 
My dad has been faced with stats like that twice with cancers stemming from the  lymph nodes, and he is fine today. Always always always stay positive :)
If you are in to anything involving yarn, Ravelry has perhaps the best community I've found online in a long time, aside from the small geeky forum I mod. There are a lot of groups that have nothing to do with yarn there and people who hang around mainly for the community.  Personally I am a fiber addict, though, so I am there for both functions. :)
In some states that wouldn't be admissible evidence and may actually be violating that woman's civil rights.
Unfortunately, it is also as succinct of boiling down of these things as I have ever seen.  Yes, there can be a lot of bitterness and hate on trp, but that really isn't the point.  
It's definitely not the *worst* thing that anyone has ever said to me, but it was at a time in which my self-esteem was already low. In high school I was a very active athlete, so I was by no means fat, but I was developing quite quickly, and along with a big bust came a little belly. I wasn't fat, I don't think, but I didn't have the super skinny flat six pack either.  (But I mean for fucks sake, I wore like a size 3.) [For reference](http://imgur.com/XInfD7Y)  Anyway, my boyfriend at the time had gotten into an argument in class with some other guy, and the guy said "at least I don't have a girlfriend who's so fat she looks like she's pregnant." I had to find out from people at my lunch table what had happened, and it just really fucked with my already terrible body image. I guess what really upset me wasn't the fact that it was said, it's the fact that it was said very publicly, and the whole (400 people) school had heard about it and snickered away. It was the first point in my life in which I felt very very alone, as if the whole world stood against me and everyone was in on the bullying.   Now, I love myself every day. I know that I'm beautiful both inside and out, and I don't let the opinions of spiteful and hateful little people bring me down. 
HOW ARE WE GOING TO BRING THE WORLD JESUS IF WE DON'T KEEP OUR MODESTY?  Those comments were hard to read. 
I do agree the bullies will not care regardless, as bullies do. And yes, she should be praised for eating healthier. What concerns me though, is she is now pursuing a career (loosely) that is based almost solely on appearance.  The bullies' comments who formerly drove her to lose weight, those comments are still ruling her life. And I'm not trying to single her out. I see this kind of thing all the time, including with my friends. I think it is a feminist issue that kind of gets overlooked. It's like eating disorder lite. Girl/woman loses weight after being insecure about her appearance, then creates a lifestyle dedicated to "health and fitness", possibly even making a blog about it, becomes slightly obsessed with her appearance and her personality is kind of demolished in the process. And this girl took it a step further and got involved in the pageant circuit, which is one of the worst places for people with body image issues. Don't get me wrong, it's great to be healthy and active, but appearance is still ruling their lives.  It is likely this comment will get misinterpreted so I will emphasize that yes, I do think it is generally a good thing that she got healthy and she should definitely be praised for all the effort.
Will anyone argue that they should go to jail?
That stinks. I hate the pressure to talk to a stranger like that, and it's even worse when you approach them because they sound like they just want directions to Macy's or something.
[deleted]
[deleted]
I have felt invisible, and still do at times. I was a chubby kid, but not unpleasant-looking. I am fairly introverted, although I do like being around people. In high school, I had a consistent group of friends, but wasn't close friends with any of them. Guys had absolutely no interest in me other than fracquaintanceship. I only got asked to prom my junior year because my date's original date cancelled at the last minute and I was the only female in our social circle left to ask. The next year, I got sick of waiting and asked someone who only went with me because his crush was going with someone else. Similar things happened in college. I just wasn't noticeable. I know the blame for that lies on me as much as anyone. I had an incredibly low self-esteem and had difficulty interacting comfortably in social situations. I finally found a group where I really fit in during my first year in a master's program. That's also when I met my first bf. However, that group dissolved after my first year and the end of my relationship. I have not since found a close group of friends and even the friends I do have are just as busy as I am, which means we don't talk to each other much. I did meet a great guy and I'm really glad he noticed me when other men looked right through me. I've realized that I'm noticed most when with odd people :) I interned at a place for mentally ill adults and they constantly tell me how much they want me to stay and work there full-time. That's such a contrast to my previous job where my efforts largely went unnoticed and I was asked to give so much more than I could handle. I often equate my desire to be noticed with the Avatar notion of "I see you." I want to be known and wanted. That's been missing from much of my life. It even got to the point where I didn't even know or want myself because I had tried so hard to be what I though others wanted me to be. I'm thankful to be past that part of my life, but I still have work to do in making the effort to form such relationships.
I love words. I love the construction of words, and I love just how *fluid* they are. The following is my specific take on the word, and some abject theorizing on a practical sound. I do respect your view of the word, and you most certainly don't have to take me seriously if you don't want to.  Rapey can be a word. People are using it as such, to denote behavior that is more disturbing and misogynistic than the word *creepy* can describe. Rapey is a word that makes us conscious of danger. Rapey is a word that subtly shifts the balance of power away from rapists, when we recognize and call out such behavior.  I have an issue with a point the author makes, in the piece you linked. Specifically, he suggests that the word *rapey* infantilizes the very serious subject of rape. It trivializes rape, he says.  Why would the addition of an informal suffix, the -ee sound, trivialize something? We need an adjective to describe the more-than-creepy and quite-possibly-dangerous people we encounter. Many adjectives end in this long E sound, so it seems natural as part of English, to substitute this particular sound.  I did some theorizing when I was still writing, and I encountered an idea that this long E sound is considered feminine in many languages. How many feminine names end in -y or -ie? Kimberly, Hailey, Brittany, Marie. I knew a lady who continually battled people to use her name, Julianne; people shortened it to Julie and expected her to respond.  The long E is also prevalent in little boys' nicknames. A Bobby will become Bob, or Rob. Willy. Joey. Johnny. These are all names to be shed.  By using this sound, by using this word *rapey* with its beautiful long E at the end, it may well recall notions of triviality, but only because the sound itself is patterned so into our language. We associate this sound with people easy to dismiss. But of course we should not dismiss anyone for their name.
[deleted]
[deleted]
&gt; something a bit off about a white woman talking with an Indian accent.  There is something disturbing about a person who is ignorant enough to say something like that.
[deleted]
excellent point.
There are many differences. On that I think we can agree.  On a different topic, there is no way you could know how he felt about what he did later on.
He's a bit forward but he hasn't actually done anything wrong - sounds like he invited you to a party and asked if you'd like a lift over there. Have you explicitly told him you aren't interested in him? Younger guys in particular seem to need being told more than once. 
Where the actual fuck did you even get that idea from the comment above yours? One in no way whatsoever implies the other
It's been a very slow process, so slow I didn't even really notice it until your post made me think! I've been feeling really down this week and a year ago I would have been obsessing about all the horrible things that have been done and said to me in the past but this week I haven't.
&gt; but it's not just a female issue.  Right, don't see anyone claiming that anywhere. Regardless, we are discussing women's issues right now, in a women's subreddit, about OP's story as a woman. Discussing apples isn't a statement that oranges don't exist, if that helps you understand.   I also don't get your points. I get from what you've written that "shit happens so no sense getting upset about it", which is unhelpful to anyone, and that there's no point in telling the police, which is again unhelpful. Offer solutions please. 
[deleted]
Be sure to bring a good sense of humour and use the modern version of clubbing, not the caveman version. Good luck!
[deleted]
Modern feminists can't admit that woc or discussions of race were ever part of the movement before because it destroys their whole divisive platform that feminism is and always was only "white middle class feminism" and therefore intrinsically hostile to woc.   This lie keeps the internet drama going and the clickbait flowing, but it's disingenuous and makes it seem as if there really is a "war" between "white feminists" and woc, when really it's just a few people on the internet who have a dog in this race.  I am getting tired of the generalizations about "white middle class women" though. If they are talking about specific people then fine, but respect goes both ways. You can't demand respect while insulting people.   
Yeah for sure I was speaking in very general terms.
Okay,.. wow.  I forget.  By watching this video one thing I surely forget is how the young really do have to re-learn "the wheel".   I forget that I have, as with many others, strolled out of that youth into a different and stranger place called age.    I do and can forgive the impecunious of youth... but it comes at the great cost, that of experience.   So men don't experience sexism? -- Watch TV and tell me how many commercials depict men as complete imbeciles when dealing with children, the house, or anything really.  Tell men that isn't sexism.  Tell the men that regarded as a whole they're so ignorant that if a woman can't come in and save the day with her wisdom within MOMENTS of leaving the house children will instantly die, and the house will burn down.  Tell me the constant influx of "men are just idiots and dumb" isn't sexist.   (I'll bet most women have never even thought of this, because it is SO natural and funny and "harmless" to them)  Tell men that the slapping, hitting, violence against them from women "because they probably deserved it" isn't rather blatant sexism.    My God this list goes on... but "that's not the issues here" is it?  Fine- okay, make sure to define what sexism is so we all know what and who is the victim, and who apparently it never is.   Age will show you that you are not fighting men vs. women, but truly a good vs. bad psycho-social phenomenon here.   I understand this woman is young, but really what is her point?  That if a women looks hard enough she will be able to find sexism against her and how big an issue that is?   That a turn of phrase overheard in a pub that seems sexist is really just rape and mass murder waiting to be had at any moment?  Life is fearful enough without having to look for it.  Yes, women die because some men/women do horrible things.  Ever heard of World War 2?... or ANY F'n war?   How many men get sent to the slaughter in attempt to protect or defend some morality.  Men die horrible (seemingly) meaningless deaths too, and by the hundreds or thousands at times no less.   Not big on history?    Fine.  Look out the window you have now and see if men don't live and die equally horrific ways just because they were there and trying to have a go at life.    But really, and I mean really, to just shrug-off and dismiss the reality that this is not just "some men aren't like this", but that MOST ANY AND EVERY man you meet is not like this is more inviting of disdain for a woman than an "I didn't get laid and therefore flipped out" type moronicy.  I know humans love a good fight... but really.  A few crazy men do crazy things, and now 3.5 billion of them are the "real problem".  Wow, what a leap (what a very youthful, un-insightful, inexperienced and tremendously hate-filled leap) .  I know a few women who fucked men solely for they're money or accused men of abuse just for spite... so I should assume 3.5 billions females are just like that?  Of course not, but I could convince men they are if tried real hard.  That's easy.  That's what politicians and preachers are best at... generalizing and mob-mentality.  But that is VERY deconstructive, and really the work of suspicious peoples.  You are going to be offended in this life okay?..  YES, it is.  (I'm not even the slightest bit sorry if this is brand-new information to you)  Mostly you'll be offended because you're looking to be offended.  Your anger at and in this life begs you to be offended.  But the lions share of this offense is really just the God awful truth that you're stuck in a world we barely understand, changing moment to moment due to circumstances out of most all of our control, and it will be replayed and revised by the next generation in it's own ways.  What is not going to help is to assume that bedeviling men with every little offense you can find with who they are, or how they behave is going to change it.  As matter of fact, a caged person can become quite the reverse of "fixed".  If men feel that they are always to blame, always a criminal and must always be muted, I think you will not experience great harmony, but great discord.  No song, just sound.    So for any human:  Try to be honest and honest people will probably help.  Ask for help when/if you are able, it might (and I pray it is) there for you.  Inform your neighbors (life-neighbors) if you are troubled or vexed, and good neighbors will shine.   But, this whole mess of men v. women, especially amongst us gutter dwellers is bull-shit where bull-shit isn't needed.  Men will not always see things the way a woman does, and believe me... as hard as it may seem... believe me.. that's why men are here to balance the women.  I don't always want to see this world solely through a women's eyes, "god" must have use for the eyes of men too, and very much the visa-versa.      
I usually go with bike shorts or tights if it's cold out, I've never had an issue with anyone seeing my butt!
I wear tights under if it's cold, but otherwise I go without. This isn't really about what I wear though, because you should just wear whatever makes you feel comfortable - if you want to wear leggings or tights, wear them; if it's too hot or you reckon you can rock it, don't. Whatever you feel comfortable in, the booty shorts sound like a good choice!
You're probably getting downvoted, because you added nothing useful to the thread.   
Economic Left/Right: -3.38 Social Libertarian/Authoritarian: -4.10   I'm basically a dirty hippy. Hahha. And although I have a personal religion I prefer the company of atheists and have HUGE problems with organised religion.
Yes!   It's also not as old fashioned as some may think.   In high school I had quite a few friends at an all boys school. They were taught all sorts of manners like that. I noticed they'd shake an elder woman's hand (older=respect, and an elder is generally supposed to offer their hand first), however with their peers they never ever offered their hand to a woman without them reaching out.       
wwww.uniquevintage.com  They do a lot of pin-up style stuff and have some cute one pieces.
I cried as well. "you're beautiful" really captures how I have felt after reading all of his responses. So beautiful.
I've left a comment upthread about why they creep me out. Answering your other questions- we live on the 2nd floor of an apartment complex where the stairs lead to my apartment and two others shared by one family. They're usually crowded on that small platform outside our doors smoking and drinking so I see them roughly half the time I key into my place. We make small talk and nothing's gotten out of hand (I moved in 2 weeks ago) but I'm not oblivious to how they feel about me. It's hard to explain but while there haven't been any outright threats there's definitely some hostile/sexual air which is a really unsettling combination. 
Fair enough. She's not done anything ridiculous, like touch him or kiss him or slept with him. So is it just my mind set? Do you have any advice on how to look at it differently?
This is a HUGE over simplification. 
Comments like this are why rape and violence against women is normalized in our society.
&gt; The style of this message reinforces those stereotypes that have proven to be a barrier for structured, frank and constructive discussions on how to improve our society to it a welcoming place for everyone. This language style is offensive and distracts from the message this person is trying to convey.  Very well said.   
I feel like they are mocking me as a woman.  I mean, if I were a Native American and watching someone dress up as an over-the-top Native American and *perform* for fun, it would be offensive.  If I were a black person, and watched someone put on whiteface and pretend to be a black person and *perform* it would be offensive.  It's a poor mockery of being a woman.  Im a woman, not a costume.
[deleted]
Living in a hyper-conservative community, I used to change the way I dress according to where I am and who I'm with. It completely sucks because I feel like I don't have a specific sense of style, but I've found it necessary for my sanity because I got stares, heckles, catcalls, whispers, reprimands (whatever you can think of) if I didn't fit into a predetermined dress code that felt like it was written by men and enforced by women. At one point, I changed a shirt because *it showed too much of my collarbone*.  Needless to say, rape and sexual harassment is rampant in my region. At some point though, I decided that enough was enough, and tried out new looks just for the sake of personal exploration. I don't cover up as much anymore, but I'm also not "sexually enticing", so to speak. There's more than these two looks, OP. Get uncomfortable and try new looks. For fun. Because why not?
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
truly sorry you had to go through all these shit.   hope you're better now   edit: formattings
I'm sorry this happened to you. I'm a male and I would have called the cops for you. Saying something repeatedly like that is beyond vulgar,  I try not to be violent but this is the kind of thing that warrants it in my ptsd head. War is a humbling experience makes me realize no one should be mistreated. Especially with out cause. Karma will get back to them.
I'm so sorry that this happened to you. You are completely right about the victim blaming, especially because if a girl doesn't know any better, she will blame herself, too. That's what happened to me - I was forced to give my then-boyfriend a handjob when we were 13. I felt dirty for a long time. I'm glad that you recognized that it wasn't your fault.     Also, you said SLO, so possible shout out from a neighbor, as I go to Poly :)
&gt;Female inmates are much, much more likely to become the victim of rape or other forms of abuse then males.  Got any stats on that?
Hahaha that's awesome!  Mine jokes about that as well.  
...And that's how you end up dead.   I don't know how you could possibly take on a group of people with just a knife. Are you Rambo? 
I agree that maybe you should find better friends, unfortunately other people will always be a pain in the ass, theres not much you can do about that, but you can control your emotional response. Protect yourself by finding more reliable, less bitchy friends. By being the bigger person your friend will come back to you, try to find a way to rise above it and not get dragged into their bitch contest.  Now as for the bitter thoughts, have you tried meditation? (warning: extreme hippiness coming up)  I got into it by accident as I had a friend who went to hypnosis for anxiety. I tried out some of the techniques to help with my own anxiety which it has really helped.  Lately, as an extension of help with the anxiety I've been trying to banish negative and bitter thoughts from my mind, literally just letting them go. Everybody has negative thoughts but the trick is to not dwell, or judge or get angry at yourself at having them. But just relax your body, breath calmly and let them pass by.
/r/Egalitarian but it's not nearly as active as other gender related subs.
I'm so sorry you went through this. And I'm sorry your managers could not understand what you went through. People can be so selfish.   I know this sounds really dorky, but your story reminded me a lot of an episode of Law and Order: Special Victims Unit. But the catch is, it was the detective (Olivia Benson) who got assaulted. She suffered PTSD for several months after the experience even though she didn't actually get raped (almost did though). She got out of the situation fast, just like you did. And she STILL needed counseling and therapy because of how traumatizing the situation was for her.   Anyway, I appreciate your courage to tell your story and bring about awareness. It really is unacceptable, and people can't take this lightly. It just makes me sad for all the girls who go through what you did and DON'T speak up. So thank you. 
*citation needed*
[deleted]
Really? I've had people kind of do a weird nod at me occasionally instead of shaking my kind (only once or twice) but there's a difference between not shaking a hand and not introducing yourself at all. 
To be fair, having the clitoris closer to the vagina than the urethra makes much more sense. Perhaps you are one step ahead in the evolutionary process.  Does the clitoral hood interfere with your stream?
Incorrect. There are specific statutes against harassment.   Furthermore, OP's case is an elevated situation of a threat (and specifically, sexual abuse in the UK), which carries heavier consequences. 
I have no idea why the above was downvoted, as it's spot on. The exception might be something local like a city's Economic Development department or an incubator.   I've written, awarded, and managed about $60 million in fed and state grants in a past career. There were some grants for businesses, but these were typically for established businesses, not start ups. In many cases, the solicitations were written so specifically that they appeared to be earmarks for someone's pet project.  Many of these grants give extra consideration to women and minority owned business,  but that's less of an advantage than you might think. The strength of your proposal (how well you he'll the agency reach its goals) is most important. 
/r/TumblrInAction is that way ← ← ←
I don't feel unsafe here, it is super tiresome having to listen to dudes come into threads to talk about themselves then get annoyed when they aren't instantly validated. There are more trolls, there is more butt hurt. I think more traditional or conservative women do not feel welcome here, I have to be honest, I don't care because I live in the Bible Belt, and I get to hear the conservative/traditional viewpoint pretty much daily.   I think 2XC did not and does not have enough diversity in age/color/culture/economic status, or that is my perception which might be completely inaccurate.  I would still prefer it not to be a default but that horse left the barn and moved to another state a long time ago.
Almost as if there are innate, biologically determined differences between genders, and gender differences are not entirely due to social conditioning.  
Anyone who sees behaviour like this should just pull out a phone and record a few minutes of it.  It makes conversations with the police much more interesting when there's both eyewitness and video testimony. 
Although I agree that it is very sad, think about how much better things are.  I am always concerned when people never look at how much good has come over the past hundred years. Yeah, it is a shame some people are still assholes, but be happy about what has changed in society.
I agree that would be a better way to handle this case than the way this case was done, which was by criminal prosecution. As for separating innocent mistakes from ongoing neglect, I think that without a history (as in this case) and without harm, police should probably err on the side of innocent mistake.
what /u/Shmaesh said. Emotions and the experience of relating to them are significantly more complex than you are making them out to be.
I never really wanted kids. I'm a pretty selfish person, always was, I'm very able to care for someone and love them, so I knew I'd want to be in a serious relationship or get married but I had a lot of trouble thinking that I'd have to sacrifice myself for a child.   So anyways, I met my math tutor, he was great, became best friends, fell in love and within 3 years we were married. After our first year of marriage it kind of hit me "I want kids." I thought about it for a year, we gave it some thought (he agreed with a child free life or a parenting life) and we decided we'd like to be parents. So we started to conceive.  We got pregnant, has our first son, it was hard but rewarding. Then I got pregnant again within a few weeks. We had our second child. It's definitely been by far the most emotional and demanding years of my life. I learned so much and I feel like I'm growing with my children. Let's just say that my fears of being a "selfish parent" are inexistent at the moment.   I do understand couples and women who don't want children. It can be really obvious or really challenging to figure out if you do wish to be a parent or not.
Was watching a Spanish quiz show with wife and mother, they asked which right did women get the latest. They both went with "voting" I went with "having a bank account", I won. Imagine the consequences of not being able to have a bank account.
[deleted]
You're the second person to say that! I applied earlier today.
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
That's why I get angry when people say women don't face hardships in today's society. We are expected to tolerate sexual harassment on the street, and we are discouraged from fighting back, because people think we'll get killed over it.  Personally, I won't allow myself to be harassed. I'll speak up when someone harasses me. No one has ever tried to hurt me after I called them out on their harassment. And even if they did, I'd be prepared to defend myself. If I did get hurt, i would accept that over a lifetime of being harassed and never fighting back or standing up for myself.
[deleted]
That is the other end of the spectrum..being rude. Unless you are friends and this is how you pal around. This is how my boyfriend communicates with buddies of his at work. I joke about how he is flirting Helga-style
Terrible.  Just awful.  I'm so sorry this happened to you.  I know this sub just had a huge freak out over the " #YesAllWomen " but honestly, this is what it's about.  ALL women (don't give me some statistics bullshit about how it's "not possible" for all women, you're entirely missing the point if you want to pick at that) get harassed and it's NOT OKAY, especially when it reaches this disgusting level.  Intention doesn't matter when someone says something like that - rape is absolutely NOT a joke.
I've never come across this, even in Oklahoma.  I'm usually met with a handshake when I meet someone for the first time whether they're male or female.  Diff'rent strokes, I guess.
[deleted]
&gt;"Your hair cut is nice but I would never wear my own hair that way."  I don't really see what's wrong with this. I love the way pixie cuts look on 99% of people, but I have really ad bone structure and would look terrible without some hair to fall around my face. I *could* cut my hair short, but I never would, because it would look terrible on me. But it looks great on a lot of people. 
Way to be dismissive of someone's legitimate concern. Very helpful.
Why wouldn't someone who marries into the marriage get a share in the community property by default? I don't see that as a bigger issue than in a marriage between two people.  The tax stuff is huge though, and in combination with prenups to limit property issue, I could see plenty of marriages of convenience just to bring down the tax bracket.  It would pretty much require the elimination of joint filing. Which would be great actually.
I have to agree with /u/FarFarAwayToday..  I think it's irresponsible to have kids just to fulfill your own desires.  Parenting is about caring for another life; I do think it would be better to adopt or foster over having your own biological children for several reasons.  Obviously, we 7 billion humans are not going to stop reproducing any time soon.  I just think in the grand scheme of things, it is more moral and responsible to adopt or foster.  That doesn't mean they're better parents or better people; I just think the act in and of itself is admirable when they do have the capability to reproduce and actively choose not to because they realize there is a child ready to be cared for waiting to be taken out of their situation.
I remember there was a serial groper around Davis Square about two years ago.  I found out after my very worried mom called me up and told me to be careful if I went there at night.    Major sickos.
You don't hug men! You shake their hands!!
Hon, TONS of women have violin hips. I'd say like half the people I know do.
I always knew I didn't want kids, but at 31 I had an oops baby. I love him but I think I'd be happier without kids and I definitely don't want any more.
I have hips like that. Except I also have a pouch of fat under my bellybutton. 
Congratulations on your engagement, just enjoy how things are now.  If issues arise, you can deal with them as they come.  For now, bask in your lovely circumstances and appreciate each other because there are many people whose relationships are nowhere near as harmonious. :)
No excuse. A 4 year old doesn't want to get out? You can usually pick up a 4 year old and physically remove them. Leaving them in the car is just unsafe. If the keys are in the ignition, someone could steal the car with your kid in it, or the kid could get out of their seat and take it out of park. If the keys are not in the ignition, at least here in AZ, a few minutes can be life or death.   There's no excuse for leaving your kid (or pet for that matter) in your car. If you don't want to bring them into the store/doctor/wherever, hire a fucking babysitter.
[deleted]
I guess, but my gf is a very mentally-fueled-attractiveness kind of girl. She will always get more attracted to someone as she watches them more and gets to know more about them over time. This does, of course, lead to attraction to 'characters' over actors, due to characters often portraying the paragon of masculinity and such.  In contrast, the physical attractiveness of a woman does not change over time for me, unless I happen to see a camera angle that I hadn't seen before...
Perhaps emotions are more complex than anger and sorrow, but most emotions in men aren't discouraged. Nobody says don't laugh or don't be amused. The only emotions men are generally expected to restrain are anger and crying. Besides those two things, I have no idea what "psychic self-mutilation" is referring to. 
First, I am glad you are ok and I am so sorry that this happened. Your writing made me laugh out loud...you have a really good attitude. Keep rockin', girl!
Power to you! I always worry I'll clam up and not be able to stick up for myself.  On another note, and I don't mean to diminish what happened for you at all, but is it at all possible he thought you were someone else? Did he seem overly comfortable doing it (ie think you were his gf or something)? Obviously you would know better than I but I know if I tried to surprise my bf with a butt grab only to realize it wasn't, I might poop myself too! Granted if this were the case, maybe he shouldn't run around greeting people that way if he's going to fuck it up so badly.  That being said, guy probably was just a creeper and you are awesome for having some ovaries! (Lady balls)
From about the age of 7 until like 15 I had day dreams of waking up a guy. Though a lot of my childhood either involved sexual abuse or heckling from the men in my life, for being a girl. My dad would even prefer my brothers' company because he felt they could relate better. To this day, I still get "jokes" from my dad when he visits.   "Oh right you don't care about airplanes, women aren't into that BAHAHAHA" Funny, dad.   So yeah, for a while I wanted to be a dude, not because I felt like one, but because I just wanted to be treated as a personality, and not like a gender. 
Your post has been removed due to rule 5 in our [sidebar.](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/about/sidebar) You are welcome to repost on Friday during our [image fest](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/comments/y8k2m/mod_post_we_are_launching_an_experiment_image/), or you may repost now as a [self post](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/submit?selftext=true) with the story behind the image if you're looking for a discussion. Thank you!  *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FTwoXChromosomes) if you have any questions or concerns.*
I think it's a possibility, and I'm sorry for him if that's the case, but I think it's unlikely that this thirty-something year old guy has a girlfriend that's in their early 20s and wears the same clothes as her 14 year old cousin (we traded Adventure Time t-shirts two weeks ago).
[deleted]
[deleted]
If I would get to go back in time and pick my sex, I would pick male.   As a kid I was content with my sex, but I really disliked becoming a woman and wished I was born as male (this had a lot to do with internalized misogyny and I was that special snowflake not-like-other-girls-girl. I'm happy as a woman now, though, and do not wish to take any steps towards becoming a man. Although I still get annoyed with when my personality clashes with what is considered to be "typical woman" - more so than ever now that I'm getting married.  
At the same time, though, it's pathetic that in order for men to treat women well (i.e. not sexually assault them on the street) they have to think of the other men connected to those women. As in, they can more easily see and respect the humanity in the random guy who may or may not exist than the humanity in the woman standing right there. 
[deleted]
Society sets a basis for people to assimilate into.
All I could think of was the giant Hippo Lady from Rocko's Modern Life, saying "HOW DARE YOU" in her deep booming voice. Awesome. Glad that you're okay and rock on for standing up for yourself scucessfully!
&gt;"whether or not I should rape you."  DUDE WHAT IN THE EVER LOVING HOLY FUCK. RUN FOR YOUR GOD DAMN LIFE.  You made the choice to talk to him, Which is TOTALLY FINE and HE made the choice to sexually assault you. THATS HIS CHOICE. NOT YOURS.  Now you have to make the choice to never interact with someone like that again.
Well, babies get adopted fairly easily most of the time-assuming they're healthy.
I'm not really against the advice (though its ironic given feminists' objections to other people giving advice on avoiding rape, to do it themselves), as long as the risk isn't overly inflated.  Way I see it you ought a know the risk of something happening, and after that you can still be very cautious.  If someone presented me with stats showing that locking your door didn't significantly affect you chances of suffering a house robbery, I'd still lock my door...but I wouldn't object to the person giving the stats or pretend he's lying.  Some people act like even bringing this stuff up is wrong.
[deleted]
They'll care once they face the consequences, I can assure you that.
[deleted]
what bugs me most about this is that the patient could have been raped, and given the STI that way for all the nurses know. 
I wish that were true but if it was then half the UK's social problems would be fixed over night
I would probably pee myself if I went for a booty grab on my SO and it was a stranger. I would die of shame.
[deleted]
I always hate the ex by default, honestly. I don't know her so I have no grounds to trust her. I'm in a long distance relationship, have been for almost two years, with a period of a few months where we lived together.  My boyfriend has a basically non-existent relationship with his ex, they were friends before they dated and it was a bad break-up (for her anyway, he told her that he wasn't in love with her).   Anyway, they still have mutual friends and eventually I met her. She turns out to be just this normal person, who I would probably get along with very well. She turned from this 'girl that slept with my guy at some point in the past and how dare she' into a face and a personality.   If there is any way that you could meet his ex, I personally believe that it could help with the jealousy, because meeting her and getting to know her could help you trust her (or ar least form some judgement about her being trustworthy) as well as your boyfriend, and if it's just a friendly relationship between two people you trust, there's no reason to be jealous!
He really had a dog with him, but it was in the passenger seat and I was outside the car. Now that I think about it this could have gone a lot worse...
That's not what happened at all. When that happens, the offending person is embarrassed and apologetic.  When women post stories here of being groped/harassed, the offending person obviously did it on purpose. They wouldn't be posting if it was an accident.
Do you have a concept of what mentally ill REALLY means?  Or is it just something that means "bad"?  People get locked in horrible places in their head and need really crazy things to feel good.  Sometimes it's power over another person, sometimes it's killing animals, sometimes it gets worse from there.  That's a little unfair, as mentally ill people aren't more likely to commit violence or sexual assault.  The truth is, we're all fucked up.  If you're 22 and saying this, then sure you're just lacking experience and wisdom.  But if you're 40 and saying this, it would worry me.  You have an obligation to the rest of humanity (and to yourself quite frankly) to learn about the human condition and understand what they are really feeling and why they do these things.  I dare say most people who have set morals are lying to themselves as often as not about their own morality.  Men and women who are raped/molested by men often try to "master" the situation by recreating it.  Women often recreated it by inflicting it on themselves over and over again with men then trying to change it/do it differently.  Men often recreate it by, you guessed it, inflicting it on someone else and mastering it that way.  That's how it was explained to me by a good shrink anyway, and I've found it to hold true.  I'm not sure about those who are raped by women, but that has other effects/consequences.  There are many other reasons why men sexually assault, and all of them need to have the cops called on them.  I don't believe in excuses, but I do believe in understanding.  Many of them should go to jail AND get treatment, not just go to jail.  And we do a terrible job of protecting and helping those truly in need, and then call them filth instead of victims, as if they are mutually exclusive. 
I hadn't heard. That would be interesting to know!
This woman is quickly becoming one of my favorite humans.
[deleted]
Dead pixels? Sure :)
Yeah, I generally enjoyed Halo (sucked at it, but still) but this character was really annoying.
Oh man, "And I'm slightly irked that everyone who told me, "It'll be different when you meet the right one" was right when I didn't believe in love anymore." Hello other me. I definitely am feeling you right on this one. I keep wanting to say "OK OK you were all right you win" but then that would mean I didn't win and then in the end, we're all winners because that's love :)
[deleted]
I did - and then I cut them out of my life completely. 
Exercising together especially outside.  Even just walking. 
I don't get it she looks like the same character that have used in the game for over a decade.  Honestly this thing looks pretty cool and I am interested to see how it will shape up over the next few years.
[deleted]
Because I am reacting to their marketing strategy. 
Thank you so much. I look back and wonder how I thought that clearly. I am really proud of the way I reacted. I don't think I did anything wrong and now that it's been 5 years - I scoff at anyone who judges what I did. I think that's pretty awesome too. That I have enough distance to not really care anymore what people say. 
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Brown_note
What scum wow. Good job on scaring the shit out of him,
did you not read the whole thing?
[deleted]
In 100% of the cases where I have had sex while too drunk to remember, I did not proceed to get fully dressed again afterwards... It's way too easy to just pass out immediately after sex. It's a possibility, but my gut feeling is that you probably just made out and went to sleep.  What if you knew for a certainty that you did have sex? What would you want to do? Likewise, what would you do if you knew for a certainty that you did not have sex? What would you want to do? Or is it that you just want to know one way or another?
[deleted]
Brian Banks signed a (false) confession and pled guilty. So no, it was not as simple as someone making a claim and off to prison. There was evidence...a confession. That's no different from any other crime and young black men are routinely bullied and tricked into pleading guilty because they think it will be easier.   What I'm not buying is the idea that rape is especially easy to get a conviction and stacked against the defendant when all evidence points the other way! It's much harder to get a rape conviction!
[deleted]
Thank you.   (And isn't it sad that i feel compelled to thank men who think like you? Aka are decent and respectful human beings)
Please go get a rape kit done just in case. That can actually help determine what happened.
Oh believe me, she'd definitely stab a guy if things got that far. I don't think a knife is the best self-defense option either tho for the same reason. I wasn't trying to tell OP to get a knife, or a taser or gun for that matter. Just an example. The ex who had a knife also had mace as far as I recall. The knife was an SOG Aegis so multipurpose, not just self-defense.  As for the conviction of attackers, guys who say, carjack at gunpoint, or do home invasions probably have a bit more conviction and readiness to harm someone than say, a creepy guy who slips in an ass grab in a bar thinking no one will notice and the girl will be too shy to call him out on it. 
I understand where you're coming from, but for people uneducated about trans issues and trans people, pronouns can be quite confusing &amp; they're not setting a good example
I witnessed a grown man shit himself in line at a Wal Mart.  The look on his face to everyone around being able to smell it was a matter of a few seconds. The guy in the OP was touching her... she would have been able to smell it really fast due to proximity. 
Not caring about your appearance =/= being obese
[deleted]
Sure, and it's our right to call them out on it for being poor designers. In any other artistic industry, the artist would be able to work within the constraints of the project and still put out good art.
My cat chirps.  He's a weirdo.
[deleted]
I don't think she likes that look :/ I think long spandex bike shorts would be great though.  She lives in a small town without many places to shop, so I invited her to come to Austin. There is a specialty bra store that sells bathing suits that are perfectly sized for your chest... I was thinking we could get her properly sized there, find a tankini top or bathing suit dress, and then find a cute color/pattern of long spandex shorts. It's just that is a pretty expensive route -- I think it would definitely end up being over $100, plus the gas money to come to Austin. Hopefully we can find something that works!
Those also include facebook games and mobile games which increases the representation of female gamers.  Console/PC games which still has more male gamers are where most of the AAA games are being published to due to the better return on investment.  Without further breakdown of genres by gender the stats you provided don't add too much to the conversation. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
Because you took that out of context, and the next fuckin lines she explains that she consented 
When I've been groped in public, my first instinct was to get the fuck out of there. Not in the same league as catcalling, but it's the same reaction: escape. In that split second moment right after it happens, there's no telling if there's more coming or if it's just some asswipe temporarily getting over his social retardedness to act out, so the best solution is always to just get away.
How many times a day is this question going to be asked?
I don't think you belong here. Nobody asks for harassment based on what they post, how they look, or what they've done.  If someone harasses another person it is not the fault of the person being harassed. And if you think a majority of people lie about rape in order to fish for sympathy? The unsubscribe button is to your right.   Good day.
[deleted]
[deleted]
I'm sorry, some people are bigoted and need a good kick to the shin. Keep rocking that confidence!
[deleted]
Yeah, I never understood it or rape, guess we never will
[deleted]
This is something that's been on my mind lately, after the recent surge of "how do you know you're unattractive" or "what it's like being an unattactive ___" type topics popping up on reddit. Reading them really bummed me out.   I don't think I'm ugly, really. But I'm not naturally pretty. With make up I sort of pass for pretty if no one looks too closely. But I also really struggle with my weight (my new doctor thinks I may have PCOS which would explain how I can eat so healthy and still be overweight). Unless I have cleavage showing, no one looks at me. I walk around, no one sees me. No one approaches me ever. I've tried politely striking up conversation here and there when someone seems interesting and I see this sort of internal recoil and they don't respond or give one word answers while looking away.   I've never had a boyfriend. I've tried. I've pushed myself out of my comfort zone to try and see if anything changes, but nothing does, aside from me being hurt by rejection. I met one guy last year, and I have never gotten along so well with someone my whole life, ever. It was amazing. But after hanging out a handful of times, he told me he isn't romantically interested in me or attracted to me. Ouch. I didn't know how to handle that. I've been lead on a lot, or "fuck zoned" by guys I was really into, then forgotten about when they found someone better.   What's really highlighted it for me recently is someone new at work. She's thin, quite pretty, from a very well off family and wears lots of cute outfits (the two months I've worked with her, I haven't seen her wear the same thing twice). Seeing how people treat her is such a contrast to my own experience. She's isn't outgoing or friendly, but people just throw themselves at her, fawn over her, she can make *no* mistakes, people do her favors. It really bothers me that just because she's blonde and pretty, she gets a vastly different reaction from people. Then there's things like we'll be working at the same desk and my boss will be directing a customer to her and tell them "you want to talk to the pretty one" pointing in our direction. Or customers comment things like "oh, you're smart *and* pretty." I've never heard that, it's always just "you're smart" or "you're good at that" but never "you're great at this and so gorgeous, look at that smile!" It's sickening and totally fucking with my head.  I've always just told myself I don't see myself how others do, like dysmorhia. But I'm becoming more aware that no, I'm just not pretty. I try to put effort into having nice hair, cute clothes, but a lot of stuff in stores are horribly unflattering (what the fuck is with this tent trend) and I'm really limited budget wise. I try to be nice, interesting, confident, but if no one will look at me that doesn't change anything.
That is not what anyone was implying. I was just saying that a lot of good has come over the past hundred years. Yes, there are few who are still thinking the same way we did a hundred years ago, but for the most part society has changed for the better. 
well i just about crapped my pants on the other side of the interwebz :X hahaha well done sound like a possessed person 
I don't believe this story at all.
Call the police?  Thats how you start the process of reporting every crime and rape is no different.
At risk.   Doesn't mean you get it.   My lab results are proof.
Thanks! I really didn't want to come off rude :O  I was talking about public groping, but as long as your at a party or more appropriate area consensual public groping is even ok in my book ;) Consent and respect are just the number one rules
Plot twist:  It was an honest mistake.  You looked like his wife/gf.
The Bene Gesserit was a female only group in the Dune universe by Frank Herbert.  They underwent rigorous and special training.  One such training was a special vocal inflection which could command someone to do something, even against their own will.  It was called the Voice.  not getting the Connery reference.
oh, that's a great idea!
sounds fake
I honestly believe it depends on how the person is raised and the experiences they have in life. Some men only see women as sexual objects. I can never understand this way of thinking. I don't get why my some of my peers can't afford to give women respect.  I wouldn't like the idea of random women I don't know grabbing my dick or groping my ass. Makes me scared to go outside at the thought of it. 
&gt; His solution was to talk on the phone or play on his phone to show that his focus isn't on those around him  So the solution to women feeling like they may potentially be victimized is to open men to victimization by purposefully distracting their focus? 
Yes I would. If we're going to treat depression and other mental illnesses as legitimate illnesses then we need to treat them as such. I wouldn't give someone medical advice over the Internet and I don't think we should give them mental health advice either. 
Hey!  You look lovely!  Not at all fluffy or fat or anything like that.  I tend to stress over &amp; overanalyze how I look when I have a big event coming up and have to look nice.  Maybe you're in the same boat?  Congrats on the weight loss as well!  I started keto about two months ago and I know how hard/rewarding those kind of commitments are.  You look great in your dress and you deserve to feel gorgeous.  
Take an aspirin 1 hour before, and another 30 minutes before. Shower before you go.  I'm one of those people who are incredibly uncomfortable with nudity (well, with being nude in front of other people), so I usually keep a steady stream of chit-chat going.   Keep in mind that this is their job. They look at these bits all day.
I, a woman, often suggest violent self defence and am called every name under the sun for it. I agree, we need to get violent. 
[deleted]
I am a gay man and I find it INCREDIBLY flattering and gratifying when a strange man gropes my ass.  I just thought I would provide that perspective, for whatever it's worth.
Isn't that...18 months? Wow. Just wow. That's an abortion-ban tactic I don't believe I've seen before. You said it best - that's sickening. 
And I appreciate it. I think you're right that people seem less threatening when they're preoccupied with something else. Thanks for the suggestion (and not comparing me to the KKK).
my thinking wasn't that it was affluent liberal hipsters doing the groping  but rather,  that their tolerance for different types of people,  combined with urban density, was somehow a contributing factor in this.    idk,  don't mind me :)
his account wasn't blocked.
I don't really see how this is comparable. 
Basically, your pill is made up of estrogen and progesterone. A drop in progesterone levels will make you menstruate.
So happy this comment was made. and good for you OP!! You scared a guy shitless
are you sure he already didnt smell like shit before you yelled at him? I've been around the Park Street station (hey I live in Cambridge too!) and there are many homeless people who just smell that way. I'm glad it ended the way it did regardless of the cause of his shit smell. I'm also sorry on behalf of the Male population for scumbags like him.
Ok I figured that you'd probably had enough people volunteer, but I've just read a comment in another thread calling a woman a liar for claiming to be threatened with rape and I don't have the ability to remove it myself, so I'm throwing my damn hat in.  Rabble rabble rabble!
It's the glasses and the Star Wars. That's all it takes. You can thank *The Big Bang Theory.*
You look amazing! The dress is beautiful, that detail at your waist is so flattering to your figure. Don't forget too, that you'll probably be all made up/have your hair done, etc. day of, sometimes when I'm having trouble with a certain dress for an occasion it helps to think about how different I look when I have the appropriate makeup and hairstyle to go with an outfit. 
It's way more important to go to a hospital, btw.  The police can make people wait a long time before responding and evidence can be contaminated.  Going to the ER is equally good advice and provides an entirely different environment for the beginning phase of the investigation.  You don't really think the police actually do the physical examination of the victim, do you?  No.  They tell her/him to go to the hospital.
If you gave them a taste of their own medicine...wouldn't you be groping them back? Ewww
Of course it's their right.  But we don't have to like it.
As a person who practices demonic and monstrous voices, this is the most awesome thing I ever read.
That is so awful. I hope you have a good support system wherever you are; lots and lots of Internet hugs either way. 
Interesting comparison.  In the first case, the person harms only themselves.  In the second, the person not only harms but kills *someone else.*  Unusual way to use comparison in an argument.  If you find that a useful comparison, though, go for it.  Being too thin is equally associated with diseases, btw.  And having certain genetics is too (next you'll be proposing we ban people from reproducing, I suppose, as certainly having a child with bad genes is harmful to the child, right?  Same as drunk driving to you, I'd imagine).  Definitely guessing you'll have an uphill battle equating obesity with drunk driving, but if that's your gig, vote that way and go fight your fight.  The amount of resources needed to arrest all the fight people might quickly become an issue, I'm guessing.  
That's weird, because when I read the location it sadly made sense to me. I'm also a smaller-stature girl, and I've been bothered quite a few times outside of Loews and in the section of the Common that she was in, even during the day. There are always tons of people hanging out just outside the movie theater, and they all seem to have something to say to you as you walk by.
i like the quote you inserted about slapping asses.  where the fuck did that come from.  because is affected a 17 year old me is reason enough.  who gives a shit that it would not make you feel uncomfterable.  I never said that i knew what it was like to be a women, just that it gave me a glimpse into how my female friends feel walking thru a crowded club or party.  Pass judgement on whoever you want... oh, and go fuck yourself
&gt;There are support groups, and professionals that are better equipped to deal and help with those situations.  While this is certainly true, the stigma surrounding rape can make it difficult for women and men to seek out that kind of help. In which case, posting here anonymously (or non-anonymously) may give them the boost they need to begin overcoming what they've been through and seek help from the pros.
I've heard that before. Interestingly, the thing that bleeding to start back in August was that I had been working to loose weight, and had lost about 25 pounds. The incessant bleeding make it very hard for me to continue my exercise, and I fell off the path. I'd definitely love to get back on the routine once this passes. 
As a man I encounter lots of 'mainsplaining' about how catcalling isn't threatening, women are overreacting, they would enjoy being complemented by strangers so they don't understand why women don't, etc. These are often normal people who lack perspective. People like the ones in OP's post are a different breed, however. 
I've actually asked him to tell me his flaws, like what he sees as bad about himself. He says sometimes he gets really angry. I've never seen it in 6 months. I really do look for flaws. It'd make him so much more relatable and real to me. He just DOESN'T HAVE ANY. I kind of could that as a big flaw, myself. 
Holy crap! Where were your friends, damn.
nice story but i seriously seriously doubt a predator would crap his pants that easily.
Sadly, this is a normal period for some people, so allow me to welcome you to the club.  :/  I always had incredibly heavy periods and horrible cramps, but both got worse as my uterine fibroids worsened.  I had them surgically removed last year and got a Mirena IUD, and a drop of blood has barely left my body since.  If you don't have fibroids, ask your doctor about taking Seasonique, which only gives you four periods a year.  However, if you don't have fibroids, your doctor should still be looking for a reason for the sudden increase in bleeding.
I'm so glad it helped. I understand you feel ashamed. But use it as motivation to never make the same mistakes again. 
[deleted]
Good girl :)
[deleted]
Lol I know. Let it have it's fun.
Yes, it takes time and money, but there are more plus-sized stars than just Melissa McCarthy. I get that it may not be what the primary designer wants to do with their time, but they aren't the only person designing and sewing the cloths, and they don't have to make a practice gown out of high quality fabrics with high quality seams to see what shapes work for different body types. They don't have to be embellished like a finished gown. They have the ability to do those things which is really the most important part of figure flattery, and there's no reason not to. There are a number of plus-sized celebrities, from Gabourey Sidibe to Adele to Amber Riley, and there are sure to be more as the Western world becomes more obese, so it's not exactly like there's no market at all.
No, I'm saying if you think disagreeing is labeled misogyny, you may have some views in the past that were misogynist.   What, may I ask, has gotten you called misogynist in the past that you don't think was fitting?
Have you thought of taking self-defense classes?  Most martial arts gyms give you 1/2 free lessons.
How little logic does he possess that he can't figure out "I don't like when she does this to me (as seen by how he removed her hands and explicitly said he doesn't like it), so I can understand how she doesn't like it when I do it to her.  I should stop."?  He really doesn't have a right to get offended, the golden rule is a pretty basic aspect of social development. 
I hope you find some wonderful friends throughout your journey of life.
I'm sorry for accidentally contributing to the spread of misinformation. As a person with autism spectrum disorder, I know exactly how frustrating it is to see certain things mistakenly attributed to a disease or disorder that you (or a loved one) have. I'll edit my comment.  I was thinking of a friend with PCOS who has always struggled with her weight despite a healthy diet. I mixed up the two conditions in my head in my rush to rebut the comment I was responding to.
I remembered a link to a site for Muslim women who wanted swimsuits, but couldn't find it. However, I did find [Hydrochic](http://hydrochic.com/). They look like they have a number of selections. I looked up orthodox women and muslim women swimwear and came up with [this](http://www.orthodox-jews.com/modest-swimwear.html#axzz33i8wKgC1), too. 
It can happen anywhere and everywhere. In small towns, in cities, all over the country. You seem very fixed on wanting to not think it happens where you are but I assure you it does :/
That is awful and those poor excuses for humans need to be taught a fucking lesson. Report it to the police on a non emergency number at least then they will know there is a problem at that location- you are probably not the only victim of their verbal assualt and by alerting them to the situation if they do it to another female and then SHE reports it the police will have to take it seriously and one way or another these fuckers will get whats coming to them. Awareness is key- don't keep it bottled up and don't let them get to you. Shit like this makes me so made I want to go a rip them a new one for you!! These fuckers need to be put in their goddamn place!
He is a psychiatrist. I told him that my dads whole family is bipolar but he is sure I'm not and he is a doctor so I guess its true. After that phone call I have 0 faith or trust in his ability to diagnose me properly though. In fact, when I asked more questions at the appointment and tried to ask what the process was he literally got up and used his body to walk me out of the room and told me to see a therapist. I had always thought that it was the psychiatrists job to diagnose stuff, it seems to me like he is just shoving off work onto someone else. It kinda felt like I am just a crazy to him and that I'm not really a person or competent enough to understand medically what is going on with me.  I felt really good yesterday and for a few days two weeks ago (2nd week into a 150mg dose) I felt like I was on top of the world, invincible, my energy was back and I felt like I could go on without ever stopping. All of those feel like distant dreams right now. Except I know they must've happened  because I emailed my boyfriend how much better I felt, and the one where I felt really amazing I spent several hundred dollars (that I shouldn't have spent...I'm totally broke now) on stuff that I'm not sure why I thought I needed it. I think I'm going to call the doctors office back and just see if they can have me speak to someone else.
I have this body shape! "violin hips" Never heard it called that before, although my "upper bulge" isn't as dramatic as what is in your picture.  I think it is a lovely shape. My boyfriend loves it and the inward curve is the perfect place for my pants/bikini/skirts to sit.  I do have the issue of my tummy sticking out a little under my belly button. It's not really fat (I've squeeze and it's really only skin), but man is it annoying.
Wow. Fucking. Wow. I am not a huge guy, but I would personally volunteer to just protect someone from that kind of shit if it were possible. I like to think I have always been very polite and respectable when approaching a girl, but I am starting to think a lot of it is perspective, if I was ugly then probably much of what I have done in my life would be viewed differently.
Uncovered fresh human shit just sitting out in the open air has a smell radius of a good 10-20 feet. Anyone who has had to crap outside knows this.
&gt;Just two weeks ago for a few days I was queen of the world and nothing could kill me or touch me and I knew I'd achieve all my dreams.  Another commenter, u/jxj24 mentioned bipolar disorder. The sentence above sounds like mania to me.  Source: first-hand experience with mania, hypomania, manic psychosis and also dysphoric mania which sounds like what you are experiencing.  Doctor put me on Wellbutrin a second time even though I told him that the last time I tried it I stopped sleeping or smiling and wanted to assault everyone around me. Sure enough, I stopped sleeping and spent hours folding and refolding my pants. I distinctly remember stopping to rest because I was passing out from exhaustion and only getting up to **fold more pants**. Your doctor is shit; it might be a bad idea to stop cold turkey but if you are on tablets and they aren't extended release you absolutely can cut your pills in half.  If nothing else I have spent more than a decade trying not to kill myself and I know what you're going through. PM me if you need to talk.
I'm just a realist. Just because you're a good person, doesn't mean every one else is. People are obnoxious and make bad decisions when they're drunk. Letting the enemy win? I'm sure that's what all the people I know that I went to school with were thinking when they went out alone and got  raped. Enabling someone to hurt you (via walking alone late at night) is letting them win. And its not just rape. This is a common safety precaution for anyone. I'm not being condescending... you're just ignorant to the facts of life. Get real. Putting yourself in that situation is STUPID.
Where are you going?   A lot of advice could sound over the top/inappropriate if you go somewhere you're familiar with. i.e. you'd appreciate traveling with a man in India instead of alone, but if you're in Vancouver, Canada you'll be all fine by yourself.
I created an account just to post this, long time lurker here.  Men who do cat calling are already not normal and possibly unstable. No normal level headed man cat calls a random girl on the street. That is why a normal guy might say, "hey, just tell them to go fuck themselves." Because in their mind they wouldn't think that another normal man would attempt to do anything after that, but to someone who is unstable that can be dangerous.
Ugh, this. I don't fit into their large clothes, I need an XL, so I have to go to the plus sized section, and that is a collection of some of the ugliest, least flattering items I have ever seen. It's so hard to find flattering items for bigger girls, and when you do, it's like $40 for a shirt. I can't spend that much each time I need something better than a baggy tshirt.
How about the remote possibility that this happened to begin with?
Not all insults are arguments, sometimes they're just truths.
&gt; Relevance: Please submit content that is relevant to our experiences as women, for women, or about women.  I was assuming that op was following the rules and submitting a post relating to an experience as a female.
You're definitely not alone, and I'm sorry you have to deal with those kinds of things, sweetie.  But remember this, you can't control what other people do, all you can control is your reaction to it.  So if you are okay going through the next 20 years of your life getting frustrated or angry, then do nothing.  But if you want to be a happier person, then you may need to work on ignoring when others slight you, or spinning it more positively.  That's why your friends are telling you to take it is as a compliment - they're trying to get you to calm down and be happy.
you are right, it does frees your intestines and not your stomach but i still think it's the same principle.  it is not a matter of being lighter (although you can loose up to 4 pounds of waste this way) as much of not having something there that may constraint your movements. I think it also means that your body can send blood and focus solely on your leg muscles.  Another theory is that the smell may repel some predators
[deleted]
[deleted]
This is awesome. It sounds like you guys were stylin' without all the expense.
You are a far better person than I am. Someone texts me in a series of semirandom letters instead of words and it goes ignored. 
I don't understand this comment. Don't like the content? I can understand that. What I can't understand is writing a long post about how the posts that you have no requirement to read or comment on are depressing you and should go elsewhere.  You are basically saying "man, all you people who are having a hard time are bringing me down. Can you post where I don't have to see it?"   
[deleted]
I think if someone large enough to do it grabbed me by the waist unexpectedly from behind and moved me, I would be pissed.   I would not feel violated, but for sure angry.
Are you sure you need a referral? Not sure how your insurance works but you may find a list of psychiatrists on their website. And anyone who answers a phone will work better than this idiot!
Either you don't get it, or I don't get you. Halp :c. 
I would like to have fewer rape posts, because I don't want people being raped (I know, I'm so edgy). Do I want people to be able to talk about, process and get support after being raped? Is that even a question that has to be answered? What are we here for if not to listen to and support each other?
And if his kids were about to be run over by a bus, I'd agree with you. They weren't. They were in a park with their mother. All he had to do was apologize, but instead he acted like a fucking asshole. Why you're wasting your time defending him is beyond me.
Yeah, but if she got raped obviously she was a slut and asking for it.  /end venomous loathing.
Just wanted to toss in here that I work right down the street from that theater and go there regularly. If she was walking through Boston Commons towards Park Street (the subway station) at 9pm, that is a bad sketchy place to be. For those saying she made this up, eff that. Absolutely believe that happened - much worse has been happening there in recent months. And I'm not trying to blame her either - she's a free woman and has the right to go wherever she wants. Especially on a Friday night. All I'd say to OP is sorry this happened. People are aholes. That area of town is harsh because the food kitchen is right around the corner on Boylston and the Church/homeless shelter on the other side of Tremont. That theater is right between both those hotspots of the best humanity has to offer. Just be careful. Glad you could think on your feet!
TwoX is for women and women's experiences first and foremost, but helping to improve the lives of the men who visit us here is also something that we're here for.  Thank you for taking the time to become a better person through the use of our sub.
[deleted]
What i mean is that you used him like he used you.  If you feel insulted or something, that means it was for him too
I think you handled the situation well. he may not have escalated things with the woman he was with, but he may have escalated things with you had you tried to intervene, and that's a whole new can of worms nobody wants to open. had they been physically arguing it would've been a different story of course, but I don't think stepping in to that scenario would've been necessary. 
&gt; I wear glasses. I like **books (depending on the books)**. I like **Star Wars**. I have a **dorky sense of humor**  Things in bold are nerdy things. Therefore you are a nerdy girl.  Statistically people who like the things you like also like gaming. You might look like a sexy librarian or a hot nerd or Ramona Flowers, I don't know...  ... the point is these things are happening because you are a nerdy girl who can be compared with other nerdy girls/nerd girl stereotypes.  This is the case for almost every. single. person. on. Earth.  If it's not nerd it's jock. Or goth. Or anarchist. Or posh. Or poser. Or whatever.
Hopefully OP will never see it, because that comment was removed.
I use a Windows phone god damnit. And there are dozens of us.
Hey off topic as fuck, can I ask if you went hormonal or copper?  I'm incompatible with a lot of bc and would rather get hormonal...but worried it'll be a repeat of the hormone issues I've had with pills and the ring.
Isn't it just that they are bad at judging a woman's intentions and they are poor judges of who might come to be attracted to them, and rejection hurts their feelings so they get mad.    Occam's razor - your explanation assumes very convoluted cause and effect reasoning.  This is a far better explanation - it fits what we know about men, particularly romantically unsuccessful men - they mature more slowly, they are socially a little clueless and they are prone to infatuation, and they process emotions through anger first.    The way to combat the red pill is not to try to tell men that the friendzone does not exist and that they were corrupted by Saturday morning cartoons. You will never succeed at convincing men there is no friendzone.  I am amazed you can convince women of such nonsense.  The issue is what to do about it.  The red pill says to cynically view all women as things to be conquered.  I think that is a perversion - the better message is something like this:  1. Women put you in the friendzone because they are not romantically interested in you. They are not playing hard to get. 2. You cannot make someone love you.  So stop trying. 3. Being rejected hurts.  You liked this person so much you were infatuated with her - you are not mad, you don't hate her, you are sad.  Stop ranting and deal with that emotion.   4. If someone makes you feel bad, stop hanging around them. 5. Women like confidence, just like men.  You will never make her love you by being obsequious. Do you like women who cling? 6. Talk to women. Some will like you.  Some won't. Deal with it. 7. If someone loves you, you will get too much sex. Pickup artistry is crap, the love of a good woman is  heaven - go for the big prize, but next time have some dignity and pride.  7. Welcome to manhood. Sometimes it hurts.  Here, have a beer and a backslap, let's tell some fart jokes and talk about how wonderful and awful women are.
I just can't figure out why. I mean, what does it matter that they control other people? What do they get out of it other than some kind of perverse pleasure?  I guess this is why I'm not a politician. 
Yeah, and if you don't have those social skills you deserve to be called out.  For what it's worth, we nursed publicly for a combined 4 1/2 years, and never had anyone be rude about it.  
"was densely packed with a lot of people, so we were going single file for a bit"  I have no idea why he didn't apologize, that's not the point. Someone moves you, sure that can be a rude thing, I've had people moved past me before, but calling it groping or "coppin a feel" sounds like a huge stretch. Which is why when she came up to him and started a confrontation he shut her down, like seriously lady just trying to get by. Can't have crazy right in front of the kids.  This story looks, feels, and reads like needless drama.  Edit: came by this on r/all, TwoX, now I understand how something like this can be blown out of proportion.
Please don't feel bad about going to a wig store, they are for people who are losing/have lost their hair! There will be customers there asking for the same thing as you! Many have a "private fitting room" too, where you spend one-on-one time with a wig-fitter (I don't know their job title).
Have you checked the laws on [kitty keychains?](http://www.amazon.com/Safety-Cat-Womens-Defense-Keychain/dp/B004LUXICC/ref=cm_cr_pr_product_top)
An interesting study. Thanks for sharing. 
If you think about it, reproductive control is a huge part of the change that's rippled through our society over the last forty years. Birth control means that women have excellent control over their bodies beyond abstinence and other methods. Excellent control over our bodies means that we feel free to have sex, that we can decide when and how or if we have children. The ability to do that means that we can focus more on work and earn more. Earning more means that we're not as dependent on men and that we can advocate for ourselves.   It also helped to shift American culture away from its puritanical roots - women are more open about sex, they're not ashamed of it, they feel that it's okay to have multiple partners.   It really was part of a big shift in our society and a lot of traditionalists or religious people don't necessarily like that. They may not be thinking on the big scale like I just laid out but I think that a lot of traditionalists are very uncomfortable with how our society has shifted, and shifted within the span of one to two generations. 
That's a terrible comic, it's whining about other people supposedly whining while managing to say nothing. Buzzwords don't make a point by themselves.
If you think the decision had anything to do with money you're naive.  It's about brand management.
... You could have said that a little nicer. 
That scenario sounds a bit different, though I'd probably still throw someone a dirty glance for touching my lower back or hip. The way OP sounds, the guy grabbed "enough" of her that he was able to physically move her. That can be an insanely intimidating gesture even if it wasn't sexual. 
&gt;As far as the pill, taking it a few hours off doesn't actually make a difference. If I got pregnant on it, that's what I would assume, even if I didn't remember taking one late.   *Thank you.*
I'm glad you were able to react in a self-preserving way. I don't know how I'd have responded, but likely not with the presence of mind to say anything about how the groper was wrong.   I mainly posted 'cause the tl;dr was epic to me. :D 
Not necessarily.  The pill even when taken perfectly is not 100% effective.  Nothing is.
Nah, I grew up  over 40 years ago. People did not leave 4 year olds in cars on their own then. 8 year olds yes but not 4.
I just got back from it a little bit ago. And everyone's words we're right! Not so painful in the rear, painful but brief otherwise. And I came home turned on too. Unfortunately she recommended not having sex (or doing anything that might cause extra friction/sweating down there) for 24 hours. Did you receive the same instruction? 
[deleted]
I am not entirely shifting the blame.    But by telling a person that you will be the one responsible for the birth control and then not using it properly is a complete and utter violation of trust.   Imagine if a man used expired condoms without a woman's knowledge and got her pregnant....would you be so sympathetic?
Same here, it really hit the topic spot on.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Ummmmmmmm. What?
[deleted]
  &gt;&gt;Have you ever forgot to take them altogether then gone to the pack and they're gone - so you didn't forget but have no recollection of doing it.  &gt;No.   The  you are like no person I have ever met.     &gt;What the OP did was be late on a pill (my guess is more than a little late and more than one)  and HAD SEX ANYWAY.  At no point did she inform her boyfriend that she was late on a pill.   And you know this how exactly? Because that is not what she said. You are making assumptions. Really nasty assumptions about the character if the OP who is a 19 year old kid with an 18 year old boyfriend who has come here looking for a little support.  Most people on this thread are explaining to her that her bf is probably also scared and is entitled to his iwn feelings and are trying to help her. You OTOH are assuming the absolute worst about her, berating and blaming her. Does that make you feel good?   &gt;this isn't some dalliance that doesn't have long term consequences.    You think she doesn't know that? Why assume that? I'm pretty sure she is fully aware. She's the one thats going to be having the baby. It's all very well being all patronising and stuff. But it doesn't seem appropriate to me to do it in a thread like this.   
Ah, typical life. I was with my boyfriend for a year when it happened. He was so, so supportive. I felt like a troll when my hair was falling out - I had to strategically comb it over and wear headbands to hide it, but when I looked at myself in the mirror, pre-hair styling, I would cry because of how ugly I looked. He would reassure me that I was beautiful, and my hair didn't make the difference.  I felt free when I had it shaved. I didn't think I was ugly after that. Just.. out of place. I was more concerned that people would think I was a punk, or gay (nothing wrong with these, but more worried by the fact people could judge my character based on my hair).  I was terrified that my boyfriend wouldn't find me sexually attractive. Now, I wasn't conventionally attractive to begin with, but I was happy with my appearance. I wouldn't spend hours on my look, didn't use fake tan/heaps of make-up/hair curler or straightener, nail polish etc, and I wasn't into the clubbing scene either. Basically, I didn't 'dress-up' on a regular basis. I kept myself somewhat plain, but presentable. Still, my boyfriend thought that THAT was sexy. I can see that he genuinely isn't bothered that I'm bald.   As far as I can tell, he looks at me the same way as when I had hair.   I can't help but wonder what it'd be like if I were single when I became bald - I have a feeling it would be much, much harder to find a date, which I believe is a very unfortunate reflection of our society. I don't feel like I'm sweet-talked by random men any more (not the it happened a great deal in the first place, but it happened.) In the end, though, my sexuality is not of major importance outside of my relationship with my partner, so I'm okay with it.   Finally... I do think that I am beautiful - but not in the way that people talk about. I think I'm beautiful because I am human, and I am projecting my attitude as exactly as I want to the public. I am being real. I'm not pretending. Not hiding behind anything. I'm not beautiful *because of* a physical attribute.  It's also given me the realisation that people are entitled to think whatever they wish of you or me, or anyone, and it is not my responsibility to tell them if they are right or wrong (which is something that I've struggled with since I was so young. I'm 23 now).  
[deleted]
Uhh, why would you assume you will be groped again?
Did he know the condoms were expired and use them anyway? Then he's at fault. Did she intentionally skip pills? Her fault.   If he used them accidentally, then no. Still sucks, still should have checked, but people make mistakes. They still have to pay for them, but accidents happen and blame must reflect that
Sadly, it is very true. 
I feel like this would be my response. (The shrieking, not the literal can of whoop ass) 
I got them at Nordstrom Rack! I think the brand is called Amanda and Chelsea. 
By this reasoning, jerking off is also abortion. Ban jerking off! Ohio is getting too [Monty Pythonesque.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=fUspLVStPbk)
Both can happen. The ones where you fall straight away, are passionate and exciting, but tend to fail more often. The ones where it grows out of dedication and commitment tend to be stronger and more stable, but may feel less passionate.
[deleted]
Nah, that was a legit brag (no false humility) and she had every right to do it!
I have this noise I make (my boyfriend calls it my pterodactyl screech), and thinking about it now, it'd probably be good to scare someone off with.  Here's a recording I did of it:  http://vocaroo.com/i/s1OYv2vlLynB
i am a guy and kinda like it to be honest. when girls i don't find attractive get over friendly it can be uncomfortable but not a big deal because they are not physically imposing and i am confident enough to stop them - still take it as a compliment though. when a girl i find pretty does it i am really chuffed. if a gay man grabbed my ass i would probably find it funny as long as it wasn't a big man in a dark alley  just adding my two cents, groper creeps like in the above post are scum and i would gladly get violent if they touched my friends/family
Buy her a pregnancy test. She's late enough it will work. The dollar store ones are generally just as good...also remind her that she is in charge of her body. While I would never get an abortion, some people feel ok with getting one. If she isn't, tell get that's ok and she can get through it. Adoption is another option if she doesn't feel she can support a child. But before making decisions she should take at least 2 pregnancy tests
Mmm... OP, this is the finest piece of erotica I've ever read.
I'm a woman who is capable of getting knocked up but not capable of carrying a pregnancy to term; I use an IUD because I cannot take the pill. Many women in their 40s are in the same boat as me, body able to conceive but incapable of healthful full term pregnancy. I'd like to know what people who are against IUDs think I should do. Stop fucking my husband? Die trying to do what every doctor says SHOULD NOT be done? Exactly what is supposed to happen to an entire generation of women who are now in the dangerous part of their reproductive lives? I was an ovarian egg donor AND I gave birth to and raised twin boys. I gave at the fuckin office, yall.  
Your mother says that thirty years ago she was parenting according to the standards and expectations of today. That's one possibility. Another possibility is the one I presented.
The Republican Party is completely incoherent to me.  On the one hand they want to spend hundreds of billions of dollars prosecuting and imprisoning drug addicts, and deny women and LGBT persons basic choices in the way they live their life.  On the other hand they want the government out of our homes.  No wait, I get it, you're allowed to have whatever guns you want, but you the person you love can't be legally recognized.  WTF?  I have issues with the Libertarian party as well, but at least they have a coherent policy.
I wouldn't worry about it. You always get people like this on the internet. They take literally a couple of lines  what you wrote and then construct this whole story inside thier own head. 
By far the easiest solution to all of this debate, but unfortunately also incredibly unlikely in the foreseeable future. It's been this way for so long, there is just tons of inertia.
100% honesty is key, obviously. You got it.
We're in a long-term, exclusive relationship, share strong trust, and are both free of STIs. Knowing that the pill is the most effective contraceptive, we didn't feel the need to use condoms. We have some in case I mess up on my birth control, but we don't use them otherwise.  I might have forgotten a pill. It was exam week. *I don't know.*   I didn't blow it off. I said what I could on the issue, and then moved on to the fact that I don't want a baby, which I only stated to say that I'm not trying to babytrap him and I know I'm not ready to be a mom.
Isn't this part of the ongoing saga where the guy asked you to please let him a lone and you forced the issue?  No means NO.  Why can't you get that?  This is starting to border on stalking.
Thanks I will call them right now.
Could it have been possible that he thought you were someone else? And literally crapped his pants when he realised you weren't the person he thought you were?  Edit: generally I say "hey" to people I know, and "Hi" or "Hello" to people I don't. Then again, not sure how it works when you're a guy who goes around groping people.
I'm definitely not well versed on IUD's so thanks for the insight!  She's not here currently or I would have an awkward, random conversation with her to inquire.  Good luck with figuring out your IUD issues friend.
Please go troll somewhere else. 
&gt; whats your sisters job?  She works in a small retail store as a general associate, meaning organizing, cashier, stocking, etc.   &gt; some retail jobs require being able to be mobile at all times (stock room unloader)... others (like the cashier) can be reasonably accommodated to sit.  For the most part all she does is stand, help customers and ring them out. Aside from stock days, she really doesn't do a lot.
I've gone back to exercising more thankfully! I have the time but more importantly, the mental stamina to begin. I was starting to risk injury! I've gotten hives on occasion sadly. Yoga though is something that I need to do!
It doesn't matter if you've only just met and are wearing jeans and a jumper.   It doesn't matter if you're wearing a string bikini and g-string.   It doesn't matter if you don't show interest.   It doesn't matter if you do show interest.   It doesn't matter if you initiated it, or if you didn't.   It doesn't matter if it's in the middle of consensual sex.   If you say **no**, **stop**, **I don't want to do this**, or anything else, or if you're unable to speak, if you make it known that you are **not into it**, then they have to stop.  If they say or do any of the above, then you have to stop.   I don't give a shit if you were wearing a mini skirt with no knickers, and a see through tube top with no bra.  I don't care if you're a prostitute.  I don't care if you change your mind midway through.  I don't care if you're male, female, trans, androgenous, gay, bi, straight or anything else.   **No** means **no.  There are no ifs, buts, or maybes about it.  If someone says no, or is unable to do so but makes it known that they aren't wanting what the other person is pushing, you stop.    And fuck the idiots who say you should have known.  The people who do this know you won't willingly go with them if they act this way initially. It's a bait and switch.  You get into a car/house/area with these people because they *seem* normal.  They don't say "Hi, I'm &lt;name&gt;, it's a pleasure to meet you! I'm going to rape you in... say, 45 minutes? So make sure you stay hydrated!", they act charming, sweet and intelligent. Kind and gentle.  No one gets assaulted because they're stupid, they 'asked for it' or anything like that. They get assaulted because some complete arsehole, some god damn oxygen thief of a waste of space, decided they were going to get what they wanted from you whether you agreed or not.   The blame is solely on the aggressor, not the victim.    One other thing:  I am so, so sorry that you have to include this in your story:   &gt;  I wore a zip up hoody, a shirt, jeans, and converse tennis shoes   It shouldn't matter if you were naked at the time.  If you say no, it fucking means no. We need to stop placing the blame on the victims when the only, *only* person at fault is the fucking lksajdfhkjdshaf* who decided that you don't have a say in the matter.    I'm so sorry this happened to you.  Not just the assault, but the aftermath. You are a stronger person than I could even hope to be, and you deserve all the happiness in the world.  I hope he has left you alone and that you're in a good place now. *hugs*  *I couldn't think of a harsh enough word to get my point across, I hope my keyboard smashing does the trick.
&gt; There's A misconception that first time sex absolutely has to hurt, but it's not true.  From what I've read, one of the main reasons first time intercourse sometimes hurts is because the woman believes it's going to hurt and is apprehensive about it and tenser and less relaxed than she would otherwise be.  Don't expect it to hurt.  If it hurts a little but also feels really good at the same time, keep going, but if it hurts more than it feels good, just move to doing something else until you're enjoying yourself, and try again later.  Or next time.
I actually have a really high pain tolerance so while the insertion did really suck, I had a tylenol afterwards and rode my bike home 30 minutes later.
Firstly, if you read many of the other comments, a lot of them are saying the same thing. You're not exactly adding much new.   And secondly, there is no excuse for groping a stranger in public. None. Whatsoever. If a romantic partner is ok with you groping them, then it's your responsibility to make sure that it is only your romantic partner that you're groping. Stop excusing this abhorrent behaviour - your behaviour isn't welcome in this sub, which is why you're getting downvoted. 
[deleted]
I'm pretty sure it was [this TED talk](http://www.ted.com/talks/colin_stokes_how_movies_teach_manhood?utm_source=reddit.com&amp;utm_content=ted-androidapp&amp;utm_medium=on.ted.com-android-share&amp;awesm=on.ted.com_dOOv&amp;utm_campaign=)! :)
Googled it and couldn't find anything beyond some comments from the end of last year. I hope he follows through, I like his style. 
you are a goddess :)
[deleted]
 AWKWARD SILENCE! Bum bum bum bum bum.
You might be surprised at the variation in tastes that guys have for different figure types, let alone boob types.  If a guy has a strong personal connection with you, and is otherwise attracted to your other aspects (both as a person and otherwise), and if he is a decent guy he wont mind you boobs (or may even like them!).  I hope you find some peace with your appearance. Self perception of perceived physical inadequacies can be very isolating romantically.
I agree with this to an extent, but I've also met very stable men who have been taught by their fathers to do it. It's complicated to say the least. 
Rubbish, practically no one agreed with her.  
[deleted]
When right to life becomes an uncontrollable fetish.  Edit:  OK.  Can I name it "Third of Five"?  A tip of the hat to "Hugh" from Star Trek - The Next Generation.
UGH. So. disgusting. I don't blame you for quitting the hobby. I would have done the same.
Replace the 9 with a 1. She be in Auckland.
This argument doesn't make much sense to me because designers seem to have no problem designing for other women who don't fit the typical "model" physique (very thin, tall, small bust). If they can design for Christina Hendricks or Lena Dunham, then why can't they make something for Melissa McCarthy? All 3 of those body types are very different from the designer's usual model, so they would all require significant modifications in the pattern. I don't buy the idea that those incredibly talented designers can't get past the extra inches of fabric. 
[deleted]
I didn't even know this was a problem. Do women's pants really have shitty pockets? I would lose my fucking mind if I had to deal with that.
I'm disgusted by this in my state. I'll make sure the governor knows my views on it the next time I run into him.
[deleted]
Maybe don't go up to some random drunk guy at the bar. Maybe point out to the bartender or security what is happening. Be part of the solution in whatever way you see fit, but don't sit on your hands and say there's nothing you can do. You can speak up, be proactive, and not get pummeled.
ya that what a solution i thought was a better option. What is stopping a women from doing that though?
It was at a convention. I saw him a few times in that context, but I didn't know him or the ladies personally. He was a musician in to perform at the convention. I'm sure the women wanted to get with him for whatever reason but god, he was just so wasted.   I was a little worried about the women but mostly I worried that he'd get upset by the insinuation he needed help. Sitting here now, I think, "Well damn, I could handle that a hell of a lot better than the guilt I feel now that I didn't intervene."  I hate when I don't trust my gut. 
That's what I'm afraid of. I worry I really failed that guy. I hate it worse that it's because I had some dumb notion that a man would have control of the situation because it was a crowded bar. There were people to reach out to. But I fucking well *know better*. 
What does she do for her job?
I get hit on a lot at work and, in my head, I think it's funny in a way.  When they wont let up when I'm obviously uncomfortable or if I mention my boyfriend, I get mad.  But I still am amused by their boldness for hitting on me at work.   I used to tell my boyfriend about it but it usually put him in an unpleasant mood.  Also, girls tend to not like me.  But I'd rather be pretty than not
Thank you!  I suspect that the clothes are not worth the money, but to some people, having the brand is worth the money.  While I myself do not understand the desire for Brand X, Cosmo told me it was a thing once upon a time in highschool.
I'm curious how this will be reacted to. So far on this sub I've only really seen discussion about the fact that bad things happen to women, and next to nothing about what to do about it beyond complaining.   Also the section on how feminists can be dismissive of racial issues was interesting. 
Left pocket - sand, right pocket - canned veggies.
&gt; A liberal female will demand the freedom to do what they want with their body, but will force you to pay for their birth control.  Um, excuse me so you are saying that a woman who is poor and cannot afford birth control is doomed to have child after child.  What should she do, just close her legs? Then she has no choice but to go on government benefits, because she can't hold down any job.  That would cost more than offering free birth control.   Also, who is forcing you to pay for her birth control?  Why is she considered liberal?
[deleted]
With electrolysis, each session gives you definite results, but only in a small area. Your electrolysis tech will do a patch of your face, and practically all the hairs in that spot are gone forever. Laser or electrolysis will only leave scarring if the person doing it has no idea what they're doing.
I can too give up!  I'm disillusioned with the absolutely everything about the whole deal. I don't know where feminism fits in with an era where everybody has an equal voice. I don't know what feminism means any longer. "Pro-woman" is not enough when people can have directly opposite views of what form that should take. If the majority of women have one view and I have another and both call it feminist, what then? If I espouse my opinions under the banner of feminism, am I poisoning the well? What is the distinction between me claiming my own definition of feminism and everybody else doing the same? I don't know how to hold an opinion with either sticking to or abandoning the label, or being somewhere in between without *other people* seeing me as sticking to or abandoning the label.  It's all noise, all the time. Like one person turns up their radio to drown out the crazies, then somebody else does the same, then somebody else does, then everybody is drowning out everybody else. It's endless tension going around in circles and nobody benefits. You can start out sane and rational and end up howling at the moon because you don't know when to just walk on by, no matter how strong the inclination to argue back. It's chaos. And it's not representative. So why do it?  Just... everything about it is wrong. I don't even know how to cope with the amount of information levelled at me by something as trivial as conversation on reddit and I don't think other people do either. So many perspectives, biases, sources of data. I can't check my own thought process, I can't check other people's. I can't even check who these people are. How often have people discussed complicated adult subjects with somebody barely into puberty and completely wasted their time? How often have people been erroneously swayed by the opinion of somebody like that?  So what I can do is wash my hands of all of it and pick my battles wisely, maybe somewhere out in the real world, where your opinions would matter and the people you're sharing them with would matter. Unfettered vox populi is the death of debate.
I'd say that personally I can generally handle myself but I'm not every guy.  It's also tricky because it's always possible that the guy likes the attention but it's less about the attention being uncomfortable and more about the execution, I've come across quite a few women who after a few drinks too many try being more forward but just do it in a slightly obnoxious way (meaning I didn't mind them being forward, just the hamfisted way in which they did it yet to some degree it's excusable because they're clearly inexperienced when it comes to being the more forward party).
[deleted]
Sorry, I thought it was more clear. The way I see it the woman bears the burden of both pregnancy and childbirth, as well as infant care. Therefore it is ultimately her decision. I also believe that I am totally unqualified to make any legal decisions (through votes) as I will never become pregnant. However as we live in a democracy, I may eventually have to make a decision, and I want to understand as much of the issue as I can. I have two daughters, and I need to try to make the right choices based on understanding and education. Am I making sense?
"It's medically necessary because it would be very bad for my health to have 16 babies  in 30 years".
He did make a choice, when he put his penis inside her. That's a choice.  I don't even know what "genetic interest" means.
I used to hate mine but now I kind of love them! Kudos my hobbit sister!
[deleted]
I've never had heavy periods in terms of the amount of blood, but I did used to have very painful/problematic ones. It was basically several days of diarrhea, like when you eat something that REALLY doesn't agree with you, but with the addition of blood coming out of the vagina and cramps in the pelvic region as well as the mid-abdomen.
He's not legally responsible for child care though - at most, he is legally responsible for paying a percentage of his income towards the costs of raising that child, if they are not adopted.  Most parents would be quite rightly offended if you suggested that all there is to their job is throwing a percentage of their income at their child.  No one is legally forced to care for or raise a child against their wishes. If you do not want to do it, you do not have to. All you have to do is make sure someone else is going to - another parent, the state, whatever.  Pregnancy and parenting are two separate things. Once a child is born, the playing field is evened out (at least legally) in terms of responsibility - the parent who is raising the child gets to apply for a percentage of income from the parent who isn't.
For those who were asking in the other thread about why people don't always retaliate or respond to catcalling, this is why. You can never really tell what the response is going to be and sometimes that's enough to land you in serious trouble.  Glad you're ok OP, it's so ridiculous that this still happens.
That in itself is no bad thing. But I agree in OP's sister's case it might not help, other than by getting some justice.
I heard they often have a stench problem depending on the user. It completely directed me away from it, but hey. If the cup works, right?
I was thinking that too.  Like.... wtf.
There is not anything to fight for. The relationship is over. Letting her go will allow you over time, not right away, to heal. Right now you need to distract youself with work, hobbies, friends anything that is is not destructive. There is no magic cure for heart break.
If you have seen the movie "idiocracy" the entire basis of the movie is on smart people not having kids because of stuff like overpopulation / finances / etc.  Therefore, Logic dictates that you`re smart!
It's almost as if chivalry (and the expectation there of) is the female variant of misogyny. 
The 100.
&gt;He shouldn't be making medical decisions for ANYONE.  Fixed.
&gt; They don't get extra breaks and they aren't allowed to sit while working.  Being able to sit on a stool while checking people out (or between customers) sounds like reasonable accommodation to me.  You would do that for a person with a disability, right?  
I got cat called yesterday by this group of thugs sitting by the basketball court at my apartments. One man yelled "yo girl what's your name?" And his friend says to all of them "Miss Messy Hair" and they all laughed. It hurt worse than I thought it would. :( Sorry you had to deal with creepers.
See, 30, 20 or even 15 years ago, I could of been a Republican. Like a Nixon, Bob Dole, heck even a Reagan Republican.   But not now.   It feels like the party is now made up of super conservative OWGs, old white guys. They seem super out of touch with any concerns that a younger, different gender, less rich, less white person might have. And it feels like a lot of their policies are based around the idea that women and mother's should not work and any deviation from the nuclear family should be punished. That motherhood is a punishment for having sex unless you're married to a rich man who can afford a single income family. And they use their brand of religion as a bulwark, like they have a monopoly on Christian values. (Which, as a Christian, I find insulting.)  There is also a younger generation of Republicans coming into power, but they're mostly libertarians, which is another extreme. They kind of remind me of some friends in college who loved Ayn Rand and never took anything past Econ 101.   What irks me the most is that I know that old school Republicans exist and some of then are still in office. But they can't deviate past this new party line because then they'll never get reelected. I just hope they come back someday.  Sorry for the rant.  TLDR: Bob Dole! I need you!
My point was that we should acknowledge that the copper IUD may provide this kind of contraception, secondarily to its actual purpose of disrupting sperm, it doesn't make sense to deny that it can stop a fertilised egg from developing, because we don't know that it doesn't. Whether that counts as "abortion" is a separate question (and the answer is somewhat subjective - like you, I don't think of it as abortion).
I don't disagree with you, i just disagree with the term discrimination in this case.   dis·crim·i·nate verb \dis-ˈkri-mə-ˌnāt\  : to unfairly treat a person or group of people differently from other people or groups  : to notice and understand that one thing is different from another thing : to recognize a difference between things   The court in this case is indeed discriminating in order to achieve equity. If the court wouldn't acknowledge a difference between disabled and abled people, they would be treated the same by the law and this would disatvantage disabled people.  
If you're talking about sexuality at all, please mention asexuality. I'd never heard of it for the longest time and it's been hard coming to terms with it. I feel broken and like something is fundamentally wrong with me.  If you can emphasize that not having sexual desire is okay, too, you could very easily save some girls a lot of head and heartache.
:-\ I'm confused as to why you'd think that. I really appreciate the outpouring of support. I guess you could think that since I view porn subreddits? I'm honestly perplexed why you'd rush to such a judgement.  I'm sorry if I offended you in any way, it wasn't intentional. But on the same token, I also don't appreciate you invalidating my experiences either and would appreciate an apology as well. 
As a 5'4 male, I've had atleast two occasions where the Amazonian aspects of a woman, coupled with an intelligent wit to defuse a situation, has saved my hide from an unprovoked beating/bottling/stabbing. I can't take you enough, you guardians of the small folk.
Isn't it more realistic to acknowledge that women are as capable of being obnoxious as anybody else? There's nothing innately intelligent or moral about being female. The author seems disappearing down a rabbit hole into a utopian future rather than confronting the obvious.
Actually, I understood the point and disagreed.
I just bought  a dress for my Summer Ball this Saturday - already liked it, then put it on in the changing rooms and realised there were pockets! So obviously I immediately went and spent more than I should have on it.
[deleted]
I did too.  This is primarily why I don't use the men's stuff.  Itchy, dry pits!  Even after just a day!  I had forgotten my stick, so used some of my SO's deodorant one day on vacation.  Not a good feeling.
She refers to the choice as a mistake in the article. 
I don't like carrying around a purse or any type of bag so these jeans would be awesome to have :D
6'1 300LBS guy here, I was often asked by female friends in college if I would walk them somewhere, (to a store, home from class, etc), just as protection. I was always happy to help.  
That's why I stopped labeling myself as a Republican and started calling myself a Libertarian. I've always liked the idea of smaller government and states rights over federal government.   I know people think of Libertarians as crazy people who wear tin foil hats, worship Ayn Rand, hate every single government institution and only want political freedom so they can do drugs and oppress people. I've been to many Libertarian conferences and events and there are definitely way too many Libertarians who are like that. 3rd parties have a way of attracting the strangest most radical people.   I wish there was a label that conveyed moderate well adjusted people non-bigoted who happen to be fond of smaller government.  But yeah, the Republican party of today supports many bigoted controlling policies, and is completely alienating towards women and minorities, and spends more time complaining about abortion than about real financial or monetary problems.  Every now and again, they'll be a Republican candidate who seems reasonable and I'll vote for them but in general, I don't associate myself with the GOP.  I really hope the GOP will get it's act together and sort itself out.
our olfactory system plays a big role in attraction, so without actually reading up on it, I'd guess our brains make connections between smells and potential partners, so because we mask/minimize our natural scent having a distinctive smell for either sex gives our sense of smell something to work with when it comes to attraction. 
You're being naïve and heavily confusing personal responsibility with victim blaming.  Everyone has a personal responsibility for their own safety. The world is not a safe place no matter how hard we try to make it. Notice how the user you're arguing with never actually said:  * The woman was wrong for what she was wearing or how she behaved * That it was her fault * That the people shouting at her weren't wrong * That the woman should **limit her personal choices** or **places she goes**  In fact the user is encouraging her to remain independent, and that here are some tips that will allow her to feel safer when she's in those situations. It's really that fucking simple.
Is there any evidence that they prevent implantation of fertilized eggs, though? From my understanding, an IUD would prevent fertilization altogether.   &gt;It isn't precisily known how IUDs prevent pregnancy but the general assumption is that they prevent the sperm from fertilizing ova (eggs). The IUD is a foreign body which creates an environment not hospitable to sperm. The Paragard releases copper ions which impair sperm function. In addition, the Mirena and Skyla release progestin which causes thickening of cervical mucus which blocks movement of the sperm, thins the lining of the uterus, and ovulation may be suppressed due to the systemic effect of the hormone. [Source](http://brown.edu/Student_Services/Health_Services/Health_Education/sexual_health/safer_sex_and_contraceptives/iud.php#2)
I don't allow my husband to grope me without my consent. And I love him. Unwanted groping is for me a violation of my integrity no matter who preforms said groping.
Not quite six-foot, but am a tall, less-than-quiet lady. I generally get called amazon for being tall and tough and I don't like it that much. But I also try to appreciate the intent behind the words. Its just not always easy when I feel pigeon-holed and like I can't be the dainty flower I also want to be.
Where does this happen? I've seen guys get knocked out at parties for raising their voices at their girlfriends. On more than one occasion. I can't even imagine what would happen if a woman was punched in front of anyone where I live. It would be likely the last thing the guy ever did. I feel like all the scenarios like this I read about on here have to be happening thousands of miles away from me because it seems so foreign that no one would lift a finger when someone is punched on the face in front of them. Not saying I don't believe that it happens. I just have to imagine it was in Australia or some culture vastly different and far away from mine. 
&gt; You could have easily replaced "my girlfriend" with "my boyfriend" and everything on that list would have made just as much sense  I could see that in a lame presentation slide for something nursing related. I don't believe I ever have, but it wouldn't be out of  place for a woman that is a nurse manager, nurse educator or DON to give a presentation and put a slide in there, meant to be funny but really just lame, about "husbands" or something.   I don't think it warrants a public apology. At most the boss should have talked to the presenter privately afterwards and said something like "please keep your presentation serious and professional, and don't make jokes about gender/race/ethnicity/religion/etc. even if they are very mild and light-hearted."
As a Christian I disagree with that assumption... There is an entire field (apologetics) dedicated to logical arguments in favor of the Christian belief system. Besides, there are illogical and ignorant people of all faiths (or no faith).   If there is proof that the IUD acts as an abortifacent, then we should reevaluate then. But for the time being, from my understanding it's all hypothetical, so it's better to focus on the actual act of intentional abortion rather than diverting time and energy to something as misguided as limiting birth control.
Basically because this isn't /r/DebateATwoXer.   This sub-reddit is like 95% personal experiences that aren't very debatable anyway, so it's a little annoying to read someone try to tell someone else their personal, subjective experience is wrong because they had a cousin who went through something sort of similar once and their cousin felt differently so that's how they should feel too.  Oh and also, this sub-reddit has a subculture. One for women, about women, by women. You don't go to /r/hiphopheads and argue for how great rock and roll music is in every thread do you? And likewise the people in /r/hiphopheads don't necessarily hate rock music, they're just in a sub-reddit that's not about discussing rock and roll...so they don't discuss it.
Don't worry, we men have moved on to pants with 6 or 7 pockets. And that's just the front. 
I am an Amazon lady on the inside, as I'm 5'2 on the outside. I've done the same thing with a full on I-will-cut-you Bitch-face^^TM *or* Does-your-mother-know-what-you're-doing You-should-be-ashamed-of-yourself-face^^TM and a confident attitude. I also throw a mean (and surprising) ambi hook. You can't see it coming because who expects a punch to come up from your abdomen?
Calling it offensive is what tipped me off
It's nice to hear some positive stories like this.
My husband and I waited. He was a virgin, and I had sex with two previous boyfriends but then decided to wait for any more sexual involvement until marriage.  I think it was one of the best decisions we made for our relationship. It allowed us to make sure we were otherwise compatible without the complication of sex. We knew that we were with each other because we genuinely loved and cared for each other, not because we just wanted to keep having sex. Similarly, I knew that he wasn't using me for sex. We showed each other that we have self control and restraint, which helps me trust that he would never cheat. Etc...
&gt; You're so scared of losing your imaginary internet points that you made a throwaway? That's kinda sad.  You think that's appropriate? Really?
People don't get banned for expressing an opinion.
The bystander effect is very powerful, you would think that good people would interfere but it's much more likely that they won't, especially if they are in a large group.   Even when you know about it, it's *very* hard to overcome it. I can do it but it's *hard* to take that first step. The best way to get past it is to call out individuals. "Jerry, stop the bleeding. Rhonda, call 911. Sam, make sure that Susan is ok."  I've been on a bus where a blind woman's guide dog vomited and no one moved to help her clean it up. I've been on another bus when a woman had a seizure and I had to elbow through people watching her to get to her and help her. I've seen crowds of people walk past an obviously injured man slumped on the sidewalk without even looking at him. I've seen a group of intelligent, educated 20 somethings stare agape at a kitchen fire while someone was standing off to the side, bleeding from a cut on their forehead. I intervened each time but it's *hard*. My husband used to try to stop me--that's how strong this can be. Don't get mad at people or think less of them, understand that it's a thing and know how to get around it. 
Not OP, but like somebody else mentioned, very good possibility of being banned over having the wrong opinion in this sub
So you assumed the manager is overweight and unable to form a lasting relationship, based upon the fact that she doesn't have children and has bad knees.  Gotcha.  I'm single, with bad knees from an accident, and no children, therefore, I must be unattractive and unable to attract a mate.   Still offensive, but thanks for realizing it. 
&gt;“Do you think it's less of a thing for guys because they don't have to walk around in fear that this could very much happen to them?”  I do. I know that for me, I used to use the word “rape” in flippant ways when I was younger. It just never occurred to me that someone would be hurt by it because rape seemed to me like some distant, dark concept that didn’t happen very often. It felt like any other kind of hyperbole. It wasn’t until I was older and started learning a lot more about the experiences of women that it clicked for me why it would be wrong to use the word “rape” in that way.
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
That's not a different view on the situation, you weren't there, you don't *have* a different view on the situation.  When someone tells you they were afraid, that is not the time to explain all the reasons they weren't afraid.  That is the opposite of adding to the conversation.    
[deleted]
I agree, I wish we knew who turned her down.   
You have been through a lot more than I have, but I can relate to being catcalled everyday (blonde American living in Santiago.)  Just leave me alone dudes. Leave me alone.
[deleted]
[deleted]
&gt;You're always welcome to share your opinion, but please take a moment to pause and understand: telling women that they're crazy and that you're a better authority on our lives than we are is likely to be met with extreme contempt.   Uh... what the fuck? I never said they were crazy nor did I express any sense of being a better authority. I simply said it MIGHT NOT be as bad as it was. This isn't an attack in any way, it is simply a thought. This isn't invalidating lived experience it is just another view on what happened, for that person to consider. I didn't say it was fact, I didn't say it happened that way, and didn't say it should have happened in any way. I just offered up another way to look at it.   Whisperingmoon's comment is an excellent example of the hostility and backlash I receive. It is almost textbook. Even in the gist of a comment example Whisperingmoon tells me that 1. I think she (in the story) is crazy which I never even remotely mentioned 2. That i was attacking or invalidating her views, which I wasn't. 3. That I was trying to control her life in some way or impose my own views on her life in some way, which is simply not true. This is completely untrue, out of line and uncalled for yet it is extremely commonplace.
I think shafonfa might be wondering why someone is so invested in appearing like a group of people rather than just the one guy having a discussion that he seems to really want to have.  Edit to add that really I'M wondering that and just throwing it in conveniently. 
we have a problem with posts that ARE relevant to the subreddit getting downvoted even before anyone comments.
Would it serve as a trigger for you if someone was uncomfortable with your use of the word and asked you to stop or maybe just hinted at their discomfort?  Genuinely curious.  Edit: I ask because I once asked someone if they could stop saying "so-and-so totally got raped" in a gaming situation.
&gt; I never said they were crazy nor did I express any sense of being a better authority. I simply said it MIGHT NOT be as bad as it was.   Right-- just like the car crash might not be *quite* as bad as Person A reported? Because Person B, the gaslighter and non-witness, ultimately knows best?   I'm trying to help you out here. I'm trying to explain to you why your behaviour is not well met. I am by no means trying to be hostile-- I'm trying to teach you something. 
&gt; There is also this problem that even though she is acting grown up about a lot of things, but she is kind of childish about some other things and I don't know how I am supposed to tell her that I think she is acting childish?  You *can* tell her flat-out that her behavior isn't mature, but I would've been offended at her age if someone had told me that.  &gt; What do you think about relationships with an age difference like the one I am having?  I'm going to be honest with you, I don't like it. Most of the eighteen year olds I've encountered are more like children than adults, and I can never understand what someone twenty-one+ would see in them other than them being naive and easy to manipulate. The age difference also means pretty different life stages, and that can make it hard on the relationship. I'd also like to add that I've personally seen very few relationships like yours work out in the long run, *but* that's not necessarily an indicator your relationship will fail.
It's hard to know what you did and didn't say when you're using a throwaway and won't quote the actual body of the text.  &gt;  I simply said it might have been different than she thought.  Can I ask something of you? Describe an unpleasant experience which you've had in your life. It doesn't have to be traumatic or scarring or anything, just tell me about something unpleasant which has happened in your life and I'll try to demonstrate to you why people find your behaviour inappropriate.
I grew up in Ontario, Canada, and it happened frequently. Moved to BC and it's happened a few times but not as often. 
Unfortunately our first-past-the-post voting system makes it a really, really bad idea for people you like to run as a third party (because it just splits the votes and guarantees a win for the people you hate).   I don't know whether Elizabeth Warren has enough of a history in public service to run for president yet (I know her views on things like the economy and education, but there are lots of things I haven't gotten to see her voting record on), but I'd be happy to see her on the Democratic ticket at some point.
I see a number of comments here about whether people might enjoy sex with attractive people, I feel that's completely missing the point. What if this guy doesn't? What if he has a girlfriend or a wife? What if he's gay? And even if all that doesn't apply, why do *you* get to decide for him whether he wants to have sex or be groped?  The point is, in my opinion, very simple: **Intimacy should not happen without consent from all involved parties.**  That doesn't mean you can't have sex. That doesn't mean you can't have drunk sex, or sex you will regret the next day when you've sobered up. In OP's case what happened was beyond that, though, and that's wrong. That guy didn't consent to anything. All hypotheticals about how others think they would feel in his situation aren't relevant.
Palin ~~proved~~ showed that there are many women in the US that do not conform to the portrait of women that some of the more militant members of this sub assert.   There are all kinds of women, including traditionalist / conservative women who believe in traditional and / or conservative values. Why should they be marginalized and be called as /u/Vio_ puts it   &gt; idiot cheerleaders
This pertains to all weapons... I don't see why you are singling out knives, and I don't see the point of keeping it hidden. Weapons serve TWO purposes and two only, the first is as a visual deterrent, if it's hidden you are negating that ability. And the second is as a force multiplier.
I realize that people use the word that way and that word has been used  the past a lot in the past. I just don't think they should do it anymore. It's not that they're using the word incorrectly so much as they're using it in an insensitive manner.   Saying things like "I was raped by the IRS" seems really insulting to people who have been victims of sexual assault. You might not think the tax code is fair, but comparing paying taxes to being raped seems insensitive to me.  
On that note, anyone know of a good brand for cargo pants?  With actual cargo pockets?
[deleted]
You mean you want to fit more than a couple of quarters in your back pocket?  Pfffft.
[deleted]
How long did it take from the time you got your iud to the point where you are now? I've had my iud for almost a year and I still have somewhat of a period (lighter than before the iud) and then just a few days of spotting. The doctor that put it in said it could eliminate periods or just make them super light but it depends on the person and could take about a year. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
My partner and I are poly. He has another partner. I'm vaguely looking but I despair at the poly dating scene in this town.
Thank you so much for taking the time to write this out... it's exactly what I needed to hear.  This makes so much sense and it helps a lot. Seriously, thank you so so much!!!
I get so angry every time I hear about waiting periods. Getting an abortion is SERIOUS and if these morons don't think each and every woman going to get one has thought about it every day since they found out they were pregnant, they haven't bothered thinking at all. 
[deleted]
This just goes to show that sexism only matters if you're not the one having sex, haha. Basically, why would you complain if you're the hot "slut" or whatever, you're basically getting a status boost if anything. Same for guys, if girls call some guy a manwhore, it just makes him seem more attractive because he clearly gets laid all the time.   College is basically full of sex-hungry kids and the hot ones aren't complaining.   Source: a guy who got laid in college a lot (never dealt with Greek life though)
My boobs have definitely gotten bigger in my later 20's (Source: 29 year old male) :-/
Haha, exactly! 
[deleted]
[deleted]
Sounds reasonable.
Well, that's true, but if you came up and said, "Oh, there you are! I've been looking for you!" he's gonna be like, "Umm, what?"  Edit: Do what feels natural!
[deleted]
Unless someone explicitly tells you they don't really like to celebrate birthdays, I would think it's assumed that people like to celebrate them.  If not, this wouldn't even be a big enough deal to make a post about in the first place.
[deleted]
Everyone. 
[deleted]
Really happy to know that my story has a positive impact on others. I wish that being bald didn't have that kind if stigma that makes us worry what others think, though. When patients ask, I just explain it's an auto immune disorder where my body is telling my hair not to grow. Actually that's the response I give anyone who asks. The other day I was at the supermarket and these two boys (who looked about 5 of 6) came up to me and go "ummmmmmm... My brother wants to know why you're bald" and then after I explained, he goes "oh....so cancer?". Very cute. But actually the worst thing I've noticed is people tip-toeing around the subject, as if I'd be offended if it was bought up.  Hair or no hair, you'll be fine in the workplace :) apart from my hair loss, there's nothing about me that remotely resembles a sick person, so now I can see that my fear was kind if irrational to begin with :p
It sounds like you like to put people in boxes. Maybe a world full of individuals is too much for you?  There are multiple, clear ways of committing to someone that don't cause confusion. If someone is not communicating clearly there is a reason. At best "until further notice" means "I'm still a bit wary of being tied down", at worst it's a way of stringing someone along. Whichever it is, a bad communicator is a bad partner.
Saying the clothes are distracting is a bad choice, but is it really wrong to expect some degree of professionalism from women in the nursing program? 
[deleted]
Exactly. The School is just preparing students for the real world. 
Nope, not even a little bit. Not even the semester long human sexuality course I took in college did.  Pretty ridiculous, actually.
I think he's saying that the tepid sex was an indicator of their non-chemistry, so it's pretty unlikely that they would've had awesome sex before marriage if it was lame during.
Don't mind him or really anyone else on this thread saying the same sentiment. Can you imagine how shitty and pathetic their lives must be if they spend their time seeking out threads on Reddit to write nonsensical bullshit putting down the OP for no logical reason? What pathetic pathetic lives. 
I have a punch dagger that my fiance forged for me in blacksmithing class. It's legal to carry and looks scary. Couple that with the crazy lying *just* under the surface and it's usually a good deterrent.
Why is there even a need for a **talk**? I'm pretty sure I never got one but I also know what I needed to know, like with anything else just explain it along in normal talks.  The idea of the talk is kind of weird in itself. It's something so sacred, weird or shameful that we can't talk about it as anything else and need a special talk about it. I might be over interpreting the expression though.
Especially because chocolate is awesome and I would totally eat it. Fuck, we don't even have to negotiate the 5-second rule in that scenario, that's an easy nom-nom.
Well I mean, normal smiling yes -  [Normal father daughter pic](https://www.google.com/search?q=father+daughter+dance+pics&amp;safe=active&amp;espv=2&amp;source=lnms&amp;tbm=isch&amp;sa=X&amp;ei=SKqQU_TRLc2gyAScmoCwDA&amp;ved=0CAYQ_AUoAQ&amp;biw=1920&amp;bih=979#facrc=_&amp;imgdii=_&amp;imgrc=2h6FcTxAUFEyfM%253A%3BJHUtRlxYz9abvM%3Bhttp%253A%252F%252Fjkjme.files.wordpress.com%252F2013%252F05%252Ffather-daughter-dance-2013.jpg%3Bhttp%253A%252F%252Fbeing5.com%252F2013%252F05%252F16%252Fbeing-the-father-daughter-dance-2nd-grade-edition%252F%3B2448%3B3264)  Edit: I mean, that looks nice and not weird. Maybe I should find more formal ones, though? Hold on. I might be back.  Edit2: Here, [this one](https://www.google.com/search?q=father+daughter+dance+pics&amp;safe=active&amp;espv=2&amp;source=lnms&amp;tbm=isch&amp;sa=X&amp;ei=SKqQU_TRLc2gyAScmoCwDA&amp;ved=0CAYQ_AUoAQ&amp;biw=1920&amp;bih=979#facrc=_&amp;imgdii=_&amp;imgrc=5J-PcvxHECKGiM%253A%3B600ci9dslxq2sM%3Bhttp%253A%252F%252Fwww.finchhaven.com%252FFather-Daughter_Dance_2009%252Fthe_Portraits%252Ftn%252F5905_Father-Daughter_Dance_2009.med.jpg%3Bhttp%253A%252F%252Fwww.finchhaven.com%252FFather-Daughter_Dance_2009%252Fthe_Portraits%252F%3B480%3B600) is more formal and she's in a white dress and he's got his arm around her. Still way less creepy.  Conclusion: Those dads are creepy, want to marry their daughters, dads.
Jesus you're all coming out of the woodwork today.
PSA for USians (and probably others): in the work situation your employer had a legal responsibility to put a stop to that. Employees are protected from sexual harassment from customers just as they are from fellow employees. Anyone in a similar situation (now or in the future) follow the procedure for reporting sexual harassment and contact the EEOC if it's not resolved. 
[deleted]
What the actual fucking fuck.
That's exactly it. I don't understand how the father cannot worry that one day his son is going to do this to the wrong person.  Luckily, I don't work there anymore so this is no longer an issue, but it would be nice to have advice for this happening in the future, and outside of work where you have no one to stick up for you.
&gt; Why do they Care so much whether their daughers has it or not?  Because they're Christians.
The admins *are* taking a clear stance on things: Vocal and hateful misogyny and racism are entirely appropriate to host on reddit.com servers.  Let's not pretend like choosing not to ban hateful content is any less of a conscious political choice than banning it.
Really? Maybe. The dude did shoot on film (large format), so I guess I mentally allowed some slack room for that. But I thought they were all overexposed like that on purpose
[deleted]
Yay for contraception!  May I also suggest you give your daughter a safe place to do said fucking? Sneaking around is crap. My brother always was allowed to have girls over, and his door shut, but it was made clear to me that I was not to have my door shut when my boyfriend was over.  And I've only ever had the one boyfriend, only ever slept with him, 12 years together, since we were 15/16. I couldn't tell you how many girls were in and out of my brother's room all the time.
[deleted]
Mirena is awful, imho. Gain an unreasonable amt of weight but haven't had periods in over year (the only good thing). Getting it removed soon and can't wait
These guys sure seem to spend a lot of time thinking about sex and their daughters...
A long and thoughtful telling of one bipolar &amp; autistic man's journey through pain, doubt, and finally instrospection and personal responsibility.   This paragraph especially resonates with me, and for all the times that women are encouraged to defend themselves instead of addressing the problem from a larger, societal standpoint.   &gt;Predatory males do not view their victims as people. They are a means to an end; in this case, getting their dick wet. I can’t tell you the number of times I’ve seen the “Tell a guy you have a boyfriend because he respects another man but not you” quote going around. It’s not about respect. It’s about ease of accessibility. That statement assumes that the man you’re dealing with is capable of respecting you in the first place. Spoiler Alert: They do not and cannot.
I am so sorry.  It doesn't do you any good but I wanted to say it. Your courage and strength, already displayed by posting, is inspirational.
So very weird.  I was pretty sure that a redditor's worth as a human was directly proportional to how long it had been since they officially joined.    And pants-crapping is definitely hilarious.
Great response.  And notice that the "we" in #1 seems to mean "people who post here regularly" as opposed to..."we men" which is a violation of the suggestion given in #1.  Merely restating "as a guy" into "we think X" and then making it clear you mean "as a guy" doesn't change the fact that #1 is a good suggestion.  #2 is admittedly hard, because giving support is hard, but obviously saying mean, negative or critical things is not supportive.    #4 is good advice; implying women like harassment from "hot guys" is ridiculous.    #5 is appropriate because TwoX is about women's perspectives.    /r/SocialJustice is indeed a great place to hang out to begin to grasp some of the premises that underpin (most of) this subreddit. 
Yo that doesn't say if the victim or the perpetrator is doing the penetrating 
Perhaps you would prefer living in theocracies then.
Are children conceived through rape worth less than children conceived through consensual sex?
[deleted]
Don't bother, someone let the terpers out of their lonesome playground. 
While were at it let's not post any pictures of the Empire State Building because ugh we've seen pictures of that before too
[deleted]
And that's the point. The manager is acting outside of her legal rights in the way she is treating this woman.       Also you seem to not be understanding things like anti-discrimnation OSHA standards, also [this](http://www.eeoc.gov/laws/types/pregnancy.cfm) would most likely cover her position.       This is fairly easy. A woman, who is pregnant, received a note from her doctor saying that she needs to rest a certain amount of time per day. Her manager is refusing to let that happen and is attempting to strong arm her into either working as if she has no physical differences from any one else, or to take maternity leave earlier than she needs to. This is called discrimination.        You must not know anything about living with or being around pregnant women but most of them need extra rest, and the closer they get to D-Day the more rest they need. Especially in complicated pregnancies like twins. Their are many women every year who are given orders to be in bed rest for entire months during pregnancies due to complications.        I imagine you're probably about 12 years old or at least reasoning at that level because any adult would be furious if someone tried to get them fired from their only means of income due to health reasons. There are multiple laws in place to prevent this from happening and this manager is violation of at least one.        
I chose those words very carefully, to make a point.  The point is that whether your kid says "I pledge to do X" or "okay, I'll not do Y" or "I agree, I should do Z," or whatever, it's all the same thing worded different ways: That you say your kid should (or shouldn't) do something, and they agree that they'll do (or not do) that.  The only difference is that some people use a ceremony or an object to signify the promise or pledge or *whatever you want to call it.*
Well, they are an equalizer.   However, one should really *really* be comfortable with their use, safe handling/storage, assembly, and maintenance/cleaning before carrying.   I'm personally much more in favour of pepper/bear spray as a more viable alternative, and I'd sooner see guns prohibited entirely.   The sad fact of the matter is, even a woman with a gun can potentially be overpowered and have the gun used on her. Same with the pepper spray, but it's not lethal.   And, while it goes against most instincts, there is a point where cooperating with your attacker becomes your most viable means of survival. 
Lol....Purity balls.
yeah i dont know how I would put up with shit like that on a daily basis.   But its not about you.  you are rights, its because you are a female and there.  good luck and be strong.
I needed that thanks! 
Holy shit - eww.   How about they go to a mall and casually recreate these poses. I guarantee you the cops would be there within minutes.
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
I'm in Canada and have been catcalled many a time! I was even catcalled by a grown man pushing a stroller. I was 16 at the time.   My experience having been harassed as a teenager has actually changed a lot about my whole life. I dress differently, I avoid going to certain places at certain times, I don't make eye contact with people in public. I fake phone calls and texts frequently!!
Some more details came out from various acquaintances- he'd dated a close friend of mine because we looked similar. He'd been into me for a long time, and realized when we left for college it was his last chance... and when I struggled, something in him broke and he got violent. 
Sorry to be the bearer of bad news, friend, but sometimes when women come out of the closet to their male relatives, the response is that a male family member rapes them. To fix them. I've also heard of similar things happening to gay boys. Homophobia is some severely fucked up shit.
Good to know. I never know if I'm using the right lingo since I wasn't sexually active during my teen years when I would have learned all this stuff, haha. My friends typically avoided the topic with me.
It was a generalization, and more of a joke than anything.  I hope that answers your rather abrasive comment/question.
Ever since I read [this article](http://www.washingtoncitypaper.com/blogs/sexist/2010/03/24/why-rape-isnt-one-big-misunderstanding/), which basically talks about how guys use (and thus of course understand) the same kinds of subtle non-verbal methods of communication that women do ("young men evidenced an understanding of and even a preference for nuances and diplomatic communication to refuse sex"), I have utterly stopped buying into the company line, so to speak, that the menfolk are just bad at reading body language or reading women or picking up on subtleties, or whatever other nonsense they constantly trot out. Unless they've been diagnosed with Asperger's or something, it's just a convenient excuse, and a piss poor one at that.  
...If I knew anything about Margaret Atwood I might take that as a compliment.  The name does sound familar though...
No, but I feel the woman should get the choice if she was raped.  IMO if you have consensual sex, you should be prepared to face the consequences of your decisions.  I shutter at calling a life a consequence, but it is what it is.
It would be a great analogy if he didn't forget to mention that this is the reason why you should use condoms.
Try using italics rather than all caps for emphasis.  Just a thought.  Just a suggestion about another way of doing things.  If you weren't negative in the post you're referencing, you're being really negative now (with your choice of user name, the thread itself, and posts on this thread).  The only reason I'm responding is that I suspect others will read this exchange.  I suspect that's why most of us are responding.  
The appeal for me is within the definition of the word "Romp." It lets me be active without worrying about showing my ass to the world. Bike riding, rough housing, getting wasted and not worrying about flashing people... cartwheels.... Haha It's just an active dress type outfit. The downside is going to the bathroom in one :/  
&gt; It's not a tradition for fathers to walk their daughters down the aisle.  That tradition is explicitly called *giving away the bride*, lol. Deconstruct much?  &gt;You're exactly the type of fanatical partisan that gives feminism a bad name.  Fanatical partisan. Sure. That or I like to engage in critical thinking from time to time. But you can keep using your definition, -I certainly won't lose any sleep over it ;)  P.S. The bar for being labeled a fanatic is getting lower by the day. Next notch down: Preferring peanut butter and banana sammys over PB&amp;J.
Why, because it's his fault he got raped and he should have been prepared for the possibility?
I can almost guarantee you that if you're too drunk to remember consenting, you were too drunk to consent. Even if you said "I want to fuck your brains out", that is not consent
They only struck down the maximum money that a person or group could contribute during an election cycle, they did nothing to the amount you can donate to an individual group or organization. Now instead of being able to give the maximum to say 5 politicians, you can give the maximum to each politician.
It's a first step. The gendered aspect should be removed all together, really. [Freakin' 'Disney princess' and 'Friends' Lego featuring women, and all kinds of cool stuff featuring guys?](http://www.lego.com/en-us/products) What's up with that? Bullcookies. I mean, "Girls" is a category. We're a category. 
creepy and sick
[deleted]
&gt; you just said you chose the words carefully, and then blasted them all out of the water saying that its all the same.  You seem to have missed the entire point I just made. I'm not sure how to reword it for you.  &gt; ignoring the fact that these kids are promising things they probably do not understand yet.  If a kid is old enough to learn about condom usage, they're old enough to learn about abstinence. Is that fair?  &gt;this is an attempt at coercion and controlling your child's sexuality  Then so is teaching your kids to use a condom. Is that fair?
&gt; There's nothing wrong with not wanting your children to have sex and teaching them that it's an important thing and that waiting until marriage is completely acceptable.  I'll respectfully disagree with this. Sex is pretty fundamental to being a human being. Developing a good understanding of your sexuality, what it means, and how you relate to it, is an important part of being an adult human. From that perspective, it's quite wrong to prevent your children from exploring and understanding their sexuality, or teaching them that their sexuality is immoral if expressed and that there is virtue in abstaining from it.  People can make whatever individual choices they want, but I'd like to jettison the holdover from Christian morality that "waiting" is somehow virtuous.
Hah I just tried posting a very similar post until a mod deleted mine because yours already existed. That piece of data definitely jumped out at me as well when reading that blog entry.  I found it interesting that the Reddit staff chose not to address the obvious inequity in new comments per default and instead simply said many moderators were reporting an improvement in submission quality. Hah. Hahaha.
I admit, it does sound crazy to me.  That's the mindset that I think someone who catcalls like that must have.  He literally must at least subconsciously hold the beliefs that 1) The purpose of women is to please men; 2) Women know that this is their purpose, and should welcome feedback from individual men on how they're doing towards their one true goal.  In this midset, there is possibly even no limit to when and to whom this can be applied.  Yeah, he might still catcall a woman who is completely covered up, but just to let her know that he'd like her better if she'd show some skin.  The girl in the bikini is clearly looking for feedback.  Not that she did it *just* for him, but that he is in her target demographic (men) of who she's looking to please.    With that in mind, you could even tell that guy that it's wrong to catcall, and that he could be arrested for disturbing the peace.  He might even stop doing it.  But that wouldn't stop his underlying belief that women are there for his enjoyment and need to be judged by him.  He'd just get resentful of those "crazy bitches" who get angry at him for no reason.  I know, I know, I can't really put myself in that mindset either.  It's deluded and narcissistic.  There is no point, other than to feed the narcissism.    
I'm really surprised by the considerable amount of downvotes this thread is getting. Clearly this is a real issue, even if it's a touchy subject. Is it really offensive to simply ask an honest question?
it's weird when somebody breaks up with you and slips into a new relationship so easily, like they were just changing shoes
[deleted]
Please see rule #3 [in our sidebar](/r/twoxchromsomes/about/sidebar).  thanks.
Feminist husbands FTW. Mine is sometimes more of a feminist than I am.
[deleted]
Creepy and gross.
[deleted]
&gt; If you want to let sex be special to you, then that's a fine choice. I've only ever slept with my spouse, after all. But what I fear for these girls who take a purity pledge is more peer pressure, or a false sense of superiority.  Your post, overall, seems to be pretty rational and I think you have reasonable attitude about the whole thing.  But I find the quoted section above interesting.  You, apparently, have chosen to only have sex with your spouse.  So, in a sense, haven't you done the equivalent of taking a "purity pledge"?  Have you not pledged to yourself (and, perhaps to your spouse) to be sexually "pure" by only having sex with him (assuming him)?  Do you feel that making that pledge results in peer pressure being placed upon you?  Do you feel that it gives you a false sense of superiority?  I doubt that it does.  So I just find it interesting that you think that is the result of pledges that other people make.
Where's the fun in that?
&gt; [...] When men are not around (there's lots of research on this, btw), women may return to their "default," woman-to-woman ways of speaking.   This sounds interesting, do you have a link to a good study to start? or at least a concrete google query (I don't have any idea of how to title such study or what keywords to use) would be helpful.
&gt; Sometimes it's actually not good for a teenager to have sex.   I don't disagree.  &gt;Sometimes teens actually don't know what's best for them.  I don't disagree. But deciding to have sex is probably not that much bigger of a decision than signing a contract that says you won't have sex until marriage. Regardless, my main point comes in here:  &gt;I don't think they should be able to have control over it once their children grow up  Making the contract until marriage IS trying to control the child after they have grown up. Typically in western culture, people get married when they are grown adults. Then, when you combine this with the fact that these fathers theoretically get a say in who the girl marries (the fiancé asks the dad's permission to propose), it definitely becomes more than reigning in a teenager. The combination of all these things makes it creepy, especially considering the age of these girls.  The idea of waiting till marriage: not creepy   The idea of parents putting some limits on their child's dating: not creepy   The idea of parents controlling their child's sex life into adulthood: creepy  This, unfortunately, is the third one.
Obesity is has just one cause.... over consumption of calories. period. No disorder puts on fat or ever will. Your body cannot go against the law of thermodynamics.  For whatever reason you eat too much is a different issue... but fact is.. you can't get fat without excess calories.. PERIOD
Amanda Palmer and Lily Allen are two of my favorite music-making women with feminist sensibilities.
Gah. Now I don't want my father to walk me down the aisle...
I don't mean to sound cheesy, but you're a Phoenix. Keep rising. :) Lots of love.
Ours ran about $800, mostly for rental of a horse.  :)  We held it in a gazebo in Boston Common, asked college friends to clean their fraternity's front room as our wedding gift, had the reception there, and baked out own cake.  We had a great time.  Last week was our 21st anniversary.  
I don't know, I think she's very small for college ball, and unlike the guys, not likely to pack on meaningful amounts of muscle year on year.  Sure, there are a couple of young wide receivers on the team she can practice with for a year or two (I don't know if they cut players or not at Campbell), but all the WR that actually suit up and play the game seem like they are either over 6ft or around 180 lbs.  As a defensive player, presumably she's occasionally going to get hit by a blocker or make a tackle on a runner at some point as well.  I looked at the footage of her signing (not obviously broad or muscular, small arms and skinny forearms and wrists), and the pretty small guys playing on her high school team and I can't help but feel uneasy looking at the pictures and stats of the big guys on the university squad.
it's about halfway through the file buried in with a bunch of other odd stuff,   do a search on "MiniDumpWriteDump" it starts there. seems pretty isolated to one section. probably just one of the translation guys being stupid =/ and it's the only section with discernible text like that, pop the maintainers an email and they'll probably clean it up.  someone set this stuff as static constant strings, compiler would scrub comments.   edit found this on it http://sourceforge.net/p/notepad-plus/discussion/331753/thread/82c80250/
If you're going to lose every election every time, by having only the two worst candidates up for a vote, you're better off losing one election with a good candidate, and start building up support for a future victory.
to BAD YOUR BOYFRIEND IS THE ONE MAKING THE SANDWICHES IN RELATION SHIP IF YOU EVEN HAVE ONE!
I'm sorry that you can't wrap your head around the idea that obesity has a complex set of causes and that individuals are not as in control of their thoughts and therefor their behavior as you want to believe. Everything you feel is determined by chemical and electrical signals, and you can only interact with the world based on your brain's ability to interpret those signals. They are not irrelevant and it is not as simples as you seem to think to reverse leptin resistance.   You need to try to understand that what I'm saying is not "It's ok to wolf down ice cream by the gallon and survive only on Big Macs and large pizzas. You can't control any of that at all." What I'm saying is that a sustainable lifestyle is not years of constant hunger, and until we can address that huge problem, I'm not willing to treat obesity as a character flaw. I'm saying that treating obesity as a simple overeating issue is like removing the thorax of a tick but not its head, and that insulting fat people is not the way to handle the problem.
A hygiene problem? I don't understand. I've never had any issues with mine, nor have the friends who have one.   Spillage happens sometimes - when I leave it slightly too long - and like any new thing it takes time to get the hang of how to use it.  Plus, it's a wonderful environment saver.  Give it a try sometime, if you get the chance. Might change your mind. (You can go swimming, hiking, scuba diving...)
Yeah!! Like, I was super sad, like almost crying. Which is EXTREMELY abnormal for me. Then I was angry, then super horny, then sad, then like zoned out or something. It was strange!!! Felt like I was on drugs or something. Not sure about this. 
Why are you here then?
&gt; Forcing your child to make the right decision takes away the beauty of making the decision.  Maybe you misunderstood me. I never said I could *force* my children to accept Christ. But I can teach them about Jesus as a *fact* without qualifying it as "just my opinion."  I will say to my children that "the sun is bright" and "God is real" and I will treat both as factual. I won't say "in my opinion, the sun is bright," and I won't say "in my opinion, God is real."
&gt; In fact they're genetically programmed to. And unfortunately marriage, or "having eyes for only one woman" was not programmed into their DNA. So it happens often, with everyone.   Now I know you're talking bullshit, since that particular chestnut is based on a discredited 1989 study that men were more likely than women to say "yes" to sex with a stranger. Funny how prior to the Victorian era, women were culturally viewed as having higher sex drives than men in the West and that it was up to men to stave off the advances of wanton harlots.   &gt; Also, like I said, please read some of these TwoX posts from "ugly women." They don't get the kind of attention from men you're talking about, on the contrary they yearn for it.   Maybe they yearn for positive attention, but not all attention is created equal. And the idea that men don't give unwanted attention to "ugly" girls is just not true. We're told to take it as a compliment, or that we must be mistaken, because why would that good looking guy be paying attention to us? It's like saying that only beautiful people can be raped - it completely erases the experience of a whole subset of the population.   &gt; What's the difference between innocent attention and hmmmm.. "guilty attention"? (I'm honestly curious.) And I'm hoping it doesn't fall under the whole "Well, if he's gorgeous then he's just admiring my femininity, but if he's ugly then he's a total creeper obsessed with rape!"  I have spent lovely times flirting with ugly-to-average looking gentlemen who were charming and fun to be around. I have been completely repulsed by men who are devastatingly attractive because they assumed that a smile and a bullshit pickup line would be enough to get in my pants.   Furthermore, I am under no obligation WHATSOEVER to educate you on what is and is not proper social etiquette. You have access to the internet - Google that shit. Your ignorance isn't excusable, and just because it exists, I'm not required to remedy it. 
I don't care about comment Karma, there are just as many fools as intelligent thoughtful people out here.   Playing devils advocate is super constructive, are you kidding me? In a post where everyone decides to pat OP on the back, no one ever discusses the other side of the story, which is sad, you might be patting the back of a psychopath who is warping the story to make them look better.  I vent about stuff all the time on here, and people are both not supportive, nor are they quiet.  some people are hypocritical, and I will call them out on it. You yourself were hypocritical. you say to speak for yourself but then reference reddit as "the rest of us". You state that by personalizing my post will allow them to better offer advice and yet you spoke on behalf of reddit; I wouldnt do that when you're trying to tell someone not to speak on behalf of people.   9. I'll do that any time I want. OP is there to defend themselves, the person they are talking about is not. In a world wrought with misinterpretation I would think that to be a more welcome thing. I should support what the person said or just shut up, but at the same time I should be ok when other people call me out and don't support me. Got it.  10. That was an attempt to get more negative Karma. Note that it was an edit. I have a fine grasp of feminism. I don't personally like it, but that's because I think in today's day and age women shouldn't have to classify themselves as something or start a movement in an attempt to raise awareness about the lack of gender equality in today's world.  I hope everyone misinterprets what I mean by this. LET THE NEGATIVE KARMA FLOW LIKE WATER.  I wish I had more time, I could write a novel. Some of what you said i totally get, and taking some of my posts out of context was nice, but a lot of what you said unfortunately (to me) sounded quite pompous and therefore i think lost the meaning you were trying to impart.  enough though, i have to leave work now.
No I don't have a sandwhich. I'm so sad. I'm sandwhichless. I had a sandwhich once, oh my god it was a glorious thing,  but then I ate it. It's an ex sandwhich now and im forlorn.  Oh and peckish.  
To christians, there clearly is a difference. Purity balls are overwhelmingly about young women, not young men. Google it if you don't believe me. Christianity is also where a lot of slut shamming comes from, so there's that, too.  And I stand by what I said, pain during sex is absolutely *not* a normal thing - you have condition that causes it, so do I. But that's because of a medical issue, one that should be treated by a doctor. That's the rest of that paragraph, in case you didn't read it. If we tell people "sometimes sex just hurts" and leave it at that, people with legitimate medical conditions may never get checked out. Other women without medical conditions who are experiencing pain may never discover the reason, either. Pain during sex can and absolutely should be treated. It isn't just a "ho humm" thing - it's damn important! It should be taken seriously, because it's a sign that *something is wrong.* And in your case, and in the case of many women with endo, it may never completely go away, but it can and should be treated. What you wrote was that "sometimes sex just hurts" with *no* indication that you were referring to cases of medical conditions. What I'm saying is no, that's not an acceptable way to view sexual pain. It happens for a reason, that reason should be found. It should be treated. And while some conditions can only be treated but not cured, we should always be searching for that cure. Because sex should never hurt.
I agree it's stupid to look for signals, one should instead just go for it when one finds someone they like.  But such is not the world of those living in insecurity. It's like with religious people constantly looking for signs of their faith.  It's not rational, nor is you wanting to control other peoples minds. It's kind of ridiculous to be angry over peoples thoughts.
&gt; No, OP is complaining about her every interaction being sexualized because  Oh really? Because it definitely sounds like she's specifically talking about lip-biting and other equally sexually ambiguous behavior. Feel free to link to her comment where she said "I slathered mayonnaise on a sandwich and I got a tentpole remark about it" though and prove me wrong.  &gt;  the people around her can't tell the difference between normal, friendly, polite social interaction and well, I'm not sure.  Or they're just incredibly typical 20 year old men who sexualize everything. But sure, keep piling that hyperbole on.
Ugh. Are you kidding?   I know you literally aren't, but that is such a gross thing to say. I'm insanely liberal when it comes to humor, but the second you start to malign my gender, I recoil more and more. "Sloppy seconds" just because you don't fuck a virgin? Like. What.   Earlier my fiancee realized that he was friends with someone who I had previously slept with, and he was really cool about it. He approached the other guy and was like "Oh hey, I hear we're eskimo brothers." They had a laugh, and there was no other deal made of it whatsoever.   *Sloppy Seconds.* I fucking hate that. Gah. 
what size is your bed? double is fine when you're starting but you need a king eventually for space
I am shy, so I don't like being singled out, like everyone is looking at me. It makes me VERY aware that I am being watched. Also, the guys that cat-call are not complimenting me...they usually say things like "nice tits/ass" or "I just want to talk to you!". And if I ignore them, I get called a bitch, they get immediately hostile...so I imagine in some cases, flipping them off could enrage them even more than ignoring them does!   On top of that, there have been times I was grabbed or followed. So yeah, you never know what a persons intentions are. A cat-caller already is showing they lack social awareness or grace and are reactive. I wish I could read minds but I can not. I assume they are hostile.
Happened to me. My parents didn't want me to have a purity ring or pledge. My church youth leaders felt differently. 
That's actually easily explained away as long as a few women are sleeping with a lot of men.
Actually, thank you for speaking out from a male perspective. I went to an all-girls Catholic HS myself and we were the sister school to the all-boys Catholic HS. I knew guys that were in your similar situation - either just chose not to have sex, or had poor luck of the draw and couldn't get laid, and they were taunted, maligned, whatever you want to call it, just for their own circumstance. I was personally always friends with those guys because I felt the least threatened and more appreciated as a human being by them, but eventually they all got girlfriends and I was just the loser female friend that was always awkwardly hanging around that maybe just drank a little bit too much for other people's comforts.   And men definitely get super weird about another male virgin, and often times, besides the "well lol you must be a fag" jokes, they're also full of shit, themselves. Chances are they also haven't gotten all the blowjobs and all the pussy or whatever they brag about and they haven't gotten nearly all the sex that they claim you aren't having. Regardless, that's really shitty about your school and I'm very sorry that happened to you. I personally was endlessly bullied *because* I was having sex and I was one of the "slutty" girls simply because I happened to sleep with another girl's ex-boyfriend and had violated "girl code." Mind you, this girl was really not my friend, we had a couple classes together, and I had never talked to her outside of class and when I needed to ask a question about homework.   But yeah. I just hope for the day where everyone stops caring, for once, who has boned who and how many times. There's so many other things that are way more interesting about a person besides who they've stuck their dick in/spread their legs for. 
Probably best anyways to just assume they're hostile. Good instincts and thanks for your input! 
babybumps and beyondthebump are two places I'd recommend. They're friendly :)
could have.   What does could of mean? 
It's not the idea that's creepy, it's the way that they're going about it. If a girl wants to stay a virgin until she's married, great! Paternalistic father who think they're 'guardians' of whether or not their daughters decide to have sex? Not so great.
I can't believe no one has mentioned Law and Order SVU! I love Olivia. Especially in the later seasons where she is assaulted multiple times. She's an advocate for women (and men!) and she's tough but human. Very relatable.
Now there's a happy alternative. Be stuck to your husband's arm like brand new duct tape. Think, girls, think.
Hey, you at least ask me for a dance, first. 
The agreement doesn't sound binding or like it would hold up in court if an employee sued for wrongful termination.  &gt; entering into a marriage not recognized by the Catholic Church.  Is that code for same-sex marriage or do they plan to fire any employee who was married *not* in the Catholic church, regardless of gender of partner? either way, that won't hold up to anti-discrimination laws.  How would they even know an employee had an abortion or had sex?
[deleted]
Because to give the father any right to choose an abortion or to keep the child eliminates the woman's choice.  Right think of it like this, man wants to abort, woman doesn't.  Does the man get a say? Who breaks the tie?  The other way, if the woman wants to abort but the man doesn't, how does the man get to decide without violating the woman's right to her own body?  An unborn child doesn't have MORE rights than the mother does it?  It doesn't have the right to essentially force it's mother to share her entire body and metabolism for 9 months and the man can't take over that role.  The only way that it's a truly free choice is if it's the woman's choice alone.  It's her emotional burden regardless of her choice and the mans emotional burden only if he chooses it to be.  
[deleted]
It's unfair, but it doesn't constitute punishment. The man isn't doing it to punish either the woman or the child, he's doing it because it isn't what he wants.      If she has choices, why can't he?
Push has now come to shove and you have just got a real peek of what he's truly like.  Sad. 
And the solution is to keep the status quo and fuck over men? Give women all the options and men none?
Oh come now. We were having a reasonable discussion. Where have you been the past um.. however many years you've been alive? 
Le Tigre!  Bikini Kill has already been mentioned.  I also enjoy Jack Off Jill, The Dresden Dolls and My Ruin but it depends on what genres you like.
Because Elizabeth Warren is extremely polarizing.  She actually reminds me a lot of Hilary from the 1990s. Even seven years ago, I wasn't much of a fan of Mrs. Clinton. But she has changed a lot in the last half decade, and is someone that many different folks can support, not just north-eastern liberals and rank-and-file democrats. Furthermore, she has Bill Clinton, which is pretty well liked everywhere (and is a GREAT campaigner).  Elizabeth Warren will probably run for President, and I will be campaigning against her. Not because I disagree with her, but because I'd rather have someone that can unite than divide, and Clinton will be better playing political chess than Warren.
I have been kept dry when caught in the rain at the expense of  many a tall chap. For that I can't thank you glorious beings enough. If you're ever near London, UK give me a shout and we'll go for a pint to celebrate diversity and if it rains...well I'm covered.
Sorry, but I also wanted to ask a question: what actions of yours would indicate you were interested in a guy?
So.   At thirty years old I becamea father. At twenty five was married. At twenty four I had changed  lot about myself including my faith.   What I have learned as a father and as a husband and as an individual who represents a lot of people.  These pictures aren't creepy. Not everyone wants to live a life of sexual  exploration.  Maybe these girls aren't conscious of what they're doing. But as a father to my daughter it is my job in life to help her make good decisions about how to lead their lives. Personal experience when I made the error of just finding anyone to be with makes me realize that I don't want my daughter making the mistakes that I made.  I wouldn't want to make a pact with her but I can understand why these guys may want to. I think that the pictures are beautiful and father to daughter love is something to be celebrated. But we should also be conscious that not everyone lives their lives with the same values.  Maybe this is their way of expressing their desire to protect and to cherish.  Anyone who has had a little person grow up in their lives knows that they're not your possession but your responsibility.  You don't own the child but you can try to explain and inculcate the values that you grew up with.   There is no such thing as a leitculture but there are intolerable behaviors. This is just a manifestation of fatherly love.  Maybe misplaced, but Not creepy.   
hahahahaha are you fucking kidding me  "don't tell me what I shouldn't do, THAT'S BEHAVIORAL MODIFICATION/MIND CONTROL!"  Did you react that way when your parents told you that it's rude to sneeze on people?
Does a gynecologist's office discriminate against men?  A sub for women =/= a sub against men
&gt;You say, "have you considered that maybe it wasn't threatening, and you were just confused?"  That is literally proposing an idea.
[deleted]
and a bunch of people all "oh well she was asking for it... did you see how she was biting her lip????"
No, you are not.  Please heed this example:  1. That didn't happen and you felt inappropriately for the situation.  vs.   2. That happened and you have feelings about it. But what if the situation was different that you perceived?  OP did not tell (AFAIK) anyone that they were wrong for feeling the way you did. If you do not examine why you feel the way you do about things, you end up with knee-jerk reactions. If no one ever added perspectives to the narrative, art, science and culture would all be out the window.   I'm not saying it was a particularly useful thought to add to the conversation, but its seems like people are trying to say OP devalued someone's feelings and experience when he didn't, just tried to delve further into it.
This is why lego is so awesome--you can totally do that!
[deleted]
no. I don't think it's creepy. 
I've used several different kinds of birth control and only recently (at 24) found one that actually WORKS for me, and I like!  I've tried several versions of the pill (if you want specific names I can try to remember) and each of them really threw me off balance emotionally. My periods were regular, and lasted one week each month.   I've tried the patch, which made me feel very, very sick, so I only managed to use it for about four months. I was told that the sickness goes away after about that much time, but I simply couldn't take it anymore.   The Nuva ring grossed me out too much. I didn't even last a week. I hated how it felt putting it in, and knowing I had to keep it there constantly.   NOW I am using the implant, Nexplanon. I am in LOVE with it. I just so happened to be one of those people whose period was stopped after it was put in (I had spotting for the first MONTH though...). And to be honest with you, I'm surprised at how I FEEL. Most birth controls I was put on I noticed that I became more emotional...but this one makes me feel more BALANCED then ever!   I think the only one that had a noticeable effect on my libido was the nuva ring...and that was only because how grossed out I was.   But to be perfectly honest with you, every woman's body is different and I think testing out birth control until you find the right one might be your only option. Have you talked to your doctor about your breast pains? Good luck! 
I think the headline is misleading.  I believe it should say  "East Ukraine Women's Battalion Helps Support Rebel Cause Against Their Homeland".  I'm assuming, of course, that "Ukraine" is the homeland instead of "Russia".  If "Russia" is the homeland, then the headline is still wrong.  Instead, it should say  "East Ukraine Women's Battalion Helps Push for Secession in Effort to Join Russia"
In the dark, in missionary, covered as much by blankets as possible, and you ask forgiveness after. (credit to Jon Stewart)
...nope...doesn't ring a bell. But I've never been huge on fiction either, unless it's historical based. Caesar, Ghengis Khan, etc.
Slut: (noun): Someone who thinks sex is fun, but not with me
[deleted]
I think the thing you're missing is that moving out of your parents does not make you an adult. You can still be moved out and still rely on them financially, make childish decisions. In fact, living with their parents is a way a lot of young adults in this economy are trying to save money. I completely understand why OP would like to be independent from both parents and BF before moving in, though, she should have communicated this more clearly. All this being said, I understand what you're saying. I think maybe just try and give advice instead of judge. 
I never got it! :D :(
&gt; Christianity is not true wether or not you believe it because religion in and of itself has not been proven scientifically.  I disagree.  &gt;But you can't just go around telling people YOUR religion is THE religion when it very well might not be.  Remember when I said that you sounded like you have doubts? Well, there it is in a nutshell.  There is no "very well might not be." I **know** that Christianity is true, and I won't teach my children otherwise. It would be sinful and evil of me to teach them that religion is subjective.
&gt; How the hell is it sidetracking to include male victims in a discussion about rape?  In a female centered subreddit, unless otherwise stated you should assume that any discussion about rape is a discussion about rape with female victims. Just like in a male centered subreddit (ie, /r/OneY) you should assume any discussion about rape is about rape with male victims.   Also, I am not dismissing men as victims of rape or arguing that they are less damaged. I am arguing for the self awareness to understand what a discussion is about
[deleted]
&gt; You knew it was there.  I downloaded the source code after reading this thread.  &gt; Did you laugh when you saw it  Some jokes were funny, like this one:  &gt; {"Darth Vader", "You don't get to 500 million star systems without making a few enemies."},  Some were insightful, like:  &gt; {"Anonymous #11", "We stopped checking for monsters under our bed, when we realized they were inside us."},  A lot of them are really sexist.  &gt; did you think the guys who put it there were juvenile and insensitive at best?  Yes. According to svn blame, it was the user "donho" who added all the quotes in revision #853. You can see the commit [here](http://svn.tuxfamily.org/viewvc.cgi/notepadplus_repository/trunk/PowerEditor/src/Notepad_plus.cpp?r1=846&amp;r2=853)  The commit has no message, so I don't know if Don Ho added the code, or if someone else submitted the code and Don Ho just checked it in. Either way, Don Ho put the code inside Notepad++, so he's a dick.
Ah, that's right, I remember, thank you. I was in a Christian commune in the '70s and for some reason "Bride of Christ" jumped out at me in the other poster's comment. There were long bloody wars fought, in England I think, about whether or not the wine did turn into the actual blood of Christ during communion, or was just a metaphor. 
[deleted]
Lots of Christians are circumcised.
I just re-read the article thinking I must have missed something if so many people are getting that but I still think the article is saying that the young ladies chose this path and their fathers are supporting them. I just don't ser what's so outrageous about that.
I see no "slight sexual tint". What are you talking about? This is this woman's story and no one has the right to say its fake, no matter how it is told. And what about the diseased whore part?  My abuser told me, "Thanks, Rey. I had a good time" after he raped me.
That's a good way to put it. It's not about a fear that their daughter will be despoiled and won't be able to find a good husband, but fear that their child will commit to someone in an important way and then have their heart broken.
[deleted]
[deleted]
What does anything have to do with anything? It was a higher than normal percentage of porn. That is noteworthy.
[deleted]
Religious people are creepy.
Do you have PCOS?
Oh man, I hadn't even considered those things until now. He has always been in close contact with them no matter what they've done, so I'm not sure what his limit is.  If they attacked me though, that's another concern. A few of his friends are pretty passive aggressively rude or just ignore me. Despite me telling him I'd rather not spend time with them, he still makes me. Taking this into consideration, I could definitely see him forcing me to be around his family if one of them attacked me.
This kinda shit causes sexual repression up to the levels that spurned that super-douche to kill those people in Santa Barbara. 
Right, but the question is, what do we do when a guy says something that ambiguously can either mean "I would like to date you" and "I would like to hang out with you"? Because if you straight-up ask if it's a date and it's *not*, you look really conceited. But if you just assume it's platonic and the dude thinks it's romantic, then that's obviously a bad time all around.   Whether or not the dude asking her on a date is interested in being friends with her is not, in fact, the question. 
If you want to hang out, go hang out. If he makes a move, tell him you aren't interested that way. Offer friendship if you want, accept it if he isn't interested.  Everyone is looking for shortcuts past those awkward honest moments in life, but those are the moments that define what kind of person you are. Be an honest sensitive person.
&gt; Whatever they were, they wouldn't happen in the office.  We agree. I assume that nothing in at work has any ulterior meaning.
Happy and serious are not mutually exclusive.  The photographer had to of have said something much worse--these are funeral faces.  Maybe this is the face you get after a long day of talking about your virginity with your father.
Ehh... They can be mutually exclusive. Or maybe he said somber. Take your pick. It makes no difference 
[deleted]
This is secondhand information from a couple of years ago so maybe I misunderstood or maybe misinformed. A coworker was trying to talk me out of implants and he cited his long term girlfriend's discomfort with hers.  I've always wanted implants though! You make it sound very attainable (and I'm glad to see someone else who got a natural look/size) so thank you for your input :))
It's because it's a field that requires a LOT of dedication(meaning you don't go out) and does not require you talking to other people. In health care, you have to be some what personable and you have to like dealing with people to some degree. In tech, it's rare if you have to deal with people if you purely stay tech.   However, the dumbasses are rare in tech too. I'm in tech and I haven't really noticed socially awkward to the degree where people think sexism is ok. I seen some really callous behavior, but it was from one or two people, it wasn't an epidemic. 
This girl could have stabbed his sister earlier in the day. You don't know.
[deleted]
&gt; Women can go into those courses just as easily as men,  I just want to say that it's not that easy, I had it ingrained in me early on that I was bad at math and science. When my mom and dad talked about my career choices they liked emphasizing humanities and my people skills.  I think that if I had more confidence in my math and science skills I would've gone into engineering, instead I'm planning on being a social worker. Nothing wrong with it, but keep in mind that we influence children too and that they observe early on what's probably "most appropriate" for them based off of their skills level.
Ah, that makes sense. I am aware that circumcision can be related to religion, but in most of American society that is not why its done. People do it for cleanliness or as I stated because it was done to them. Its cultural here not religious. 
[deleted]
Thank you SO much!! I'm so glad to hear all of this!  I actually do have another question--what is the transition like for friends and coworkers? Do you just show up with a new bod? Schedule it while you're between jobs? Let people think what they may?
Review her on Yelp.  Leave the practice.  I would not - in any way, shape or form - leave my health in her hands from this point onward.  Find another GYN.
And you know what?  If you're that one woman, you have the choice to be called a whore (if you date someone), a cunt (if you kick their butts), or a cold bitch (if you refuse them all).  It's good times, really, being the only one in a class of 100 men.    But of course this has nothing to do with the fact that so many women *leave* technology.  Nope. /s
Wait,are these "Christians" doing that? Because not only is that counterproductive,I don't think that Jesus would approve of rape for any reason. I mean,I know there are hypocrites,but *damn* !
A parallel is the female-dominated workplace my daughter is in; she is so tired of women picking each other apart and causing drama.  Fortunately, she's worked several other places and knows not every workplace (whether male- or female-dominated) is like this.  
&gt; I am wondering how your injuries were never reported.  I wasn't a minor when I hit the hospital.
You generally don't get morning sickness until you've been pregnant for at least a month. If you've been pregnant for a week you've not been pregnant long enough to get it. You shouldn't even bother with a pregnancy test until your period's a week late. This is on top of (you probably already know) that getting pregnant from what you described is incredibly unlikely. Chillax man, you can't stress yourself out. 
If he would do all of that to you I find it hard to believe that taking you to a purity ball that simply signifies your commitment to waiting until marriage is somehow way too much for him.   If you're going to call this "creepy as shit", "huge huge cringe" it's no different (IMHO it's even less offensive than what your dad said to you) from what you endured.   As bad what happened to you is, don't you think your father (and these guys) honestly think they have their girl's best interests in mind?
i am so glad you asked this question because it happened to me today! :( no butt/breast-groping, but he grabbed my hands as i was sitting on the bus. uncomfortable and startling (i was actually reading reddit on my phone), to say the very least.  as i was tired (happened at 7 AM), my reaction was to snatch my hands back and vigorously shake my head "no".   after i got to work and had my morning coffee, i wished that i had spoken up to somehow tell him that his behavior was completely inappropriate. i'm pretty sure i'm not the first nor the last person whose hands he will grab.
[deleted]
[deleted]
&gt;For all other observers and the peanut gallery weighing and measuring my every move: it's nothing. Nothing. Meaningless. Not about you, not for you, not on any level.   I think this would make you a fairly unusual case, because I think that most people, both men and women, tend to put on performative masks in most social situations, and especially at work.   'Professionalism' is just a word that means 'acting unlike your normal self in order to follow implied behavioral norms at your workplace,' and any deviation from that script is generally seen as meaningful in some way.
[deleted]
[deleted]
I think just about **EVERYONE** finds this whole concept incredibly creepy.  Slut-shaming with an incestuous air to it.  
Men who call out other men for their disgusting behavior are "real men".
fyi: you can buy pregnancy tests for like a dollar at places like walmart  the damage has been done. if you're pregnant, you're pregnant, and worrying won't help anything. your symptoms can be explained by a million other things. take a pregnancy test. calm down. distract yourself. and don't have unprotected sex anymore!
Seriously. This guy must feel terrible, I'm sure he hears OP crying. I feel bad for him and if I were him, I'd want to say, "Give me the ring back please." OP, be more appreciative. He went through the trouble of proposing to you! He proposed. I'm sure he was nervous, too.
I will definitely be better off without them. I accredit my current job as the place that made me feel more of myself. I have a great circle of friends who care for me (and were immediately on the defensive when I told them about this scenario) and it's the place where I got to know my current SO. I'm glad that I have a getaway where I am still viewed as a good person. I frequent my workplace even when not working because it's a coffee house and provides a nice 'hanging-out' atmosphere. Thank you for the response.
my wife just switched to the Shick Hydro 5 after 'borrowing' mine several times.
I like your mantra. I will think of it next time I encounter a former friend or become wrapped up in my head. I'm glad things are going well for you! 
I know this says girls/kids, but I wonder if it's okay for someone older to do the free classes? I have been wanting to design an app with someone, but maybe I can take the initiative and learn how to do it on my own. 
Does anyone have her highlight reel?
The fathers will become self aware, they will come to the realization that the only way to truly protect their virginity is to DESTROY IT!!!!
[deleted]
Disrespectful comments, like that one, are against the rules here.
Thanks:) I read through a tiny bit of his comment history and it blows my mind that he's not banned here yet. 
I'm terribly sorry that this happened to you. Reading your account put me in your shoes, and catching that glimpse of insight into how life changing and traumatic being raped is has changed my perspective (I thought this past week was miserable having poison ivy in my crotch, never mind beer bottles). I hope you continue to change yours and live on and be strong in your life. Surround yourself with good hearted people. Find your passion, clearly envision your dreams and conquer them. You are still so young with so much life ahead of you! Gentle hugs
And what superstitions, exactly, can you tell OP holds from his post?  Do you think he avoids black cats, throws spilled salt over his shoulder, wishes on the clock when it hits 11:11? 
[deleted]
[deleted]
How to get involved – foster care  My foster kids were medically fragile, so they always started their trip at the hospital. A medically fragile kids is taken away and has to go to the hospital for some reason - So now you have a baby/kid who has no one to sit with them for hours, as their parents can’t come, since they’ve been taken away. It gets put on a nurse who has 3-5 other patients.  So you can either volunteer to hold the baby, visit with the child or there are actually paying jobs to hospital sit. You don’t have to be medical.   The other ways that they start their journey – they are sent to a child advocacy center. Where they are interviewed over and over again, by cops, doctors, social workers, to find out what was going on. Thankfully, this is an improvement from how it used to me. Child advocacy centers always need help. They do have staff and they also need volunteers to go to the fairs and help the kids do crafts and the like, spread the word. They also ALWAYS need supplies and donations. These kids come to the center with maybe their backpack (if they were picked up from school) and sometimes nothing at all. They get a few things from the center, then it’s the foster family’s job to fill in the holes in their belongings.   There are women’s crisis centers everywhere. Women (often with children) who have run from an abusive situation or something similar. They have nothing; they need friends, support, and interview clothes. Child rising classes and tips. They need a babysitter occasionally so they can take a walk, read a book or go to an interview.  I was on call for two years for a crisis center. Whenever a women would come in to the hospital alone saying she had been sexually molested/abused, etc. they would call us to come sit with her, hold her hand and then help her get settled at the center, if she needed it.  These are the people who are trying to not let their kids end up in foster care, or worse.   My crisis center has a thrift store. Donate stuff to the store – the women who come to the center are given coupons to use there, to rebuild their lives, get the kids clothes, etc. They also need volunteers and workers at the shop.  When all your friends are done having children and start giving away stuff, offer to gather it up and give it to a shelter or a foster family. Any supplies are welcome.   Casa advocates are people who get involved only to add a completely unrelated view point to the foster case. They visit the foster child occasionally and talk to attorneys and social workers and go to court and say “this is what I think is best for the child….” It is volunteer, but I know CASA often has job openings as well.   If you want to work for CPS, they always have job openings. Transporters – their job is to pick up kids and take them to their visitation with family.  There are also jobs for people who monitor family visits.   There are group homes for the older kids in foster care – often the last chance they have to change their lives, learn how life should really be – go teach them how to balance their books, how to cook, how to pay bills. Make a friend and be the one to check on them when they do go to college.  Offer rides to work, so they can work. (and of course, there are jobs there too)  Another place for jobs is the Foster parent agencies. They are the middle man between CPS and the foster families. They are always understaffed and are directly responsible for licensing the foster families and monitoring the care the foster families give the children.  (This is the set up in Texas, I don’t know about elsewhere)  Join big brothers, big sisters. These kids need guidance as well. Just having a friend or an adult to ask adult questions to can make such a difference.  In Texas, we also have a similar program that is just for older foster kids.   As for fostering children – this completely changes and often takes over your life.  It is a very hard job, and you will spend much more money on the kids then what the state send to cover expenses. However, it can be amazing, too. If you can’t foster, you can become a respite care giver. We wanted to go visit family, but we couldn’t take all of our kids out of the state, so a respite caregiver could just watch them for a few days for us.  “time off” from being a foster parent is important and almost impossible. Burn out is huge because there aren’t people to give us a break (you can’t just leave them with a babysitter).   I know I missed several others, but there are some great places to start. Let me know if you have any questions.  
&gt;Whenever someone starts a sentence by saying "I'm not racist...", they are about to say something super racist.  but that's not racist, it just mentions race.  &gt; "If you were born in Israel, you'd probably be Jewish. If you were born in Saudi Arabia, you'd probably be Muslim. If you were born in India, you'd probably be Hindu. But because you were born in North America, you're Christian. Your faith is not inspired by some divine, constant truth. It's simply geography."  Maybe that's racist?  I couldn't find anything else in that particular source file. Maybe someone else can scrutinize better. There's certainly a lot of anti-religious comments though.
[deleted]
The author is pointing out that criticizing someone for having a certain body type isn't a good way to improve the difficulties that women face in regards to having a positive body image. I honestly don't see how you could even begin to disagree with that.   It's not about "fat girls have it harder" or "skinny girls have it harder." That's the whole point. The pissing contest is counterproductive. Overweight women shouldn't view thin women as enemies, and vice versa. If it's all about body acceptance, how does it make sense to criticize any woman for their body? 
From one student midwife to another, I hope that being part of and seeing how an empowering birth experience can heal trauma for many women also brings some further healing to you. Have you read When Survivors Give Birth and Survivor Moms?
Aaand...your point? Eliminating gender disparity in computer science, or any field for that matter, seems like a pretty good priority to me.
So you can still have your case decided by this dumbass until December? Fantastic.
You do know that the quote you're critiquing is a paraphrase by a news agency, right? The actual law is almost certainly much more clear and specific.
All I can think is pedo. Fucking pedos.
Depo provera (I believe that's how you spell it). I've been taking it for four years through injection every three months. I almost never had my period. I would spot maybe a few times a year, but it would only last a few hours or just a day. And it was also free at my health department.
I'm glad you are healthy and doing well! This was *your* decision, don't ever let anyone tell you otherwise! Best of luck!
Link for those who don't want to fill out the stupid survey:  http://www.cbsnews.com/news/judge-who-sentenced-rapist-to-30-days-faces-suspension/
Yeah I read that but "don't want a third child" is vague - would it be undue financial stress and they'd go bankrupt or it was just inconvenient for them to have to take care of a third child?
I feel one of the more "jarring" things for redditors when 2x became default was how women discussed topics with other women.  I don't think I'm stereotyping negatively if I point out that it's a common point of humor that men and women communicate/"argue" differently (comedians tend to point this out).     Therefore, it shouldn't be a big stretch that 2x generally works differently than some subs, but is a normative for 2x. It just seems abnormal if you have never been involved in [what was] a highly female concentrated sub.      What I say next is NOT meant to mean you should leave or not visit or even suggest you are unwelcome.  But if the theme of conversations and responses are frustrating you, then there are only a few options:  Stay true to yourself and your comments, and take the downvotes as a personal testament of trying to communicate here.  Don't comment but continue reading to gain insight (your post shows you have done some of this.. and your question is valid enough).  Or basically leave 2x to it's own devices realizing it is it's own little place and it walks to the beat of it's own drum, for better or worse.     Sorry you got attacked, especially when it didn't seem like that was your M.O. with this post.  But I learned cacti were ouchy when my kid-brain thought it would be softer.  lesson learned.  
I've seen this question asked a lot on forums like this and I know that your response comes from a place of concern for those who read this and may want to try it as well.   But frankly as someone who waited (and knew it was a risk) it still feels a lot like judgment. I'm not downvoting you, just letting you know that this sentiment could be phrased better. 
[deleted]
Same. My dad is a pharmacist, but an old fashioned one.  "It's for girl stuff" *nod knowingly  Him: "Yeah, that girl stuff can be really bad.. maybe you should be on the Pill too.. you know, so you don't have any girl problems.." [100% serious.]  (I have an IUD and he's still warming up to the idea of them, since back when he was learning, they were crazy new and unsafe in a decent amount of cases)
I don't know, I think you're perhaps taking it too negatively. To me (and of course they can correct me if I'm wrong), it just sounds like he hopes everything goes great for them and he would just rather not be put in a position of having to explain or teach about something extremely personal to them. Particularly a something he has not experienced himself before. I can see it.  I mean, my father is a pharmacist and it still makes me cringe super hard having to ask him about anything bowel-related. Never once did I feel like pooping was unnatural or shameful, but I'm a private person and so is he, so it's sort of weird.  Though, as another commenter suggested below, I think perhaps directing them to some readily available resources for that sort of thing would be great .. 
Why is it so simple for us to comprehend the absurdity of this is ridiculousness and the 'lawmakers' not to?  Over the past few years I've been watching/listening and honestly do not understand - are they truly this stupid?  Because some of the bills/actions have zero and I mean ZERO to do with common sense.
For those in the clear no abortion consensus, do you think the male should have to pay child support?
&gt;We're constantly measuring worth on how much sex we've had/haven't had.  Man has a lot of sex: Jerk  Woman who doesn't have a lot of sex: Frigid  Funny thing about insults, there's no escaping them ;)
If she can't care for it, take it into care, or let the father have it if he wants it.
When you get home from work, you say "Where's my baby girl?", take her from your wife, change her diaper if necessary, then play with her for as long as you can. Your wife has spent all day counting down to your arrival, so she can pee alone and fix a snack without a chorus of crying in the background.  Help clean up. Your wife is doing her best, but she's exhausted and frazzled after chasing baby all day. Helping may also mean taking care of baby so your wife can do the cleaning up. I found it relaxing to wash dishes once baby was someone else's responsibility. Sometimes I'd rather do the work, since I just spent most of the last 20 hours on duty with a baby.  It's going to be emotional. Your wife may cry a lot. She may cry over seemingly silly small things. This is totally normal. She may yell at you in frustration, she may micromanage your parenting.  And if you're feeling really generous, get up as usual on Saturday morning and take the baby directly after a feeding. Let your wife have the next few hours completely alone to nap and catch up a little on a week of missed sleep.  The first few weeks are tough, but you'll settle into a routine. And it won't be long before your return home is met by excited screams from your little girl, a big hug, then an hour of wrestling in the living room as your wife finally gets to prepare dinner. 
Watching this now....terrifying that adults are pushing this kind of agenda on young girls.
Non-Catholics sometimes send their kids to Catholic schools.  Liberal Catholics sometimes send their kids to Catholic schools.  Both groups do so on the assumption that their kids will get broad, high-quality educations.  If the schools have begun to prioritize idealogical conformity to conservative politics over education, parents can (1) be forewarned and change their decisions, and (2) put pressure on the schools themselves.  Catholicism is not a monolith, no matter what some in the hierarchy would like it to be.
I took plan B a couple of times. I took the two pills all at the same time, so the results were definitely more intense for me, although it will probably be different for every girl regardless. These are the few side effects that I experienced:   Nausea - felt a bit like puking on the day I took the pill but not quite right away.. sort of felt like something was caught in my system and made me lose my appetite. Water helped me there though!  Spotting - really light blood coming out in the span of two days. The texture was like egg whites and really stretchy, with hints of blood, making it look like a really light pink colour in some areas with the rest of the mucous being pretty much clear. The amount was so little that it could probably sit in a tablespoon.  Intense 5 minute cramping sessions - I mean intense! I got this within a few hours of taking the pill in the morning, and again before dinner, and again when I was getting ready for bed. I usually get cramps but not this intense and not so often!  At the end of this though, I feel that my periods that came after were more regulated, shorter and my symptoms were less intense. Kind of odd but it's a nice effect :)
thank you for explaining what not all men means.
Because to some the modern world is threatening and scary, and they'll hold on to any "tradition" no matter how antiquated and out-of-touch it is. Either that, or they're closeted pedophiles.
It doesn't matter about the man's rights, in fact the state can civilly use to ensure the male rape victim is forced to pay child support (recent case of a 13yo male that this happened to).  Also in some cases the female rapist still gets custody bc it is just assumed that women are better caretakers than men by default
There was a need for a place for women to hangout and discuss female topics online. TwoXC serves that purpose.  I have never supported it being a default subreddit, I am just explaining why it is the way it is.
[deleted]
Haha everthong
Aren't you a mod of srs too? 
Hmmm...
[deleted]
Confusion, to me, seems like probably the biggest one.  Women are constantly portrayed as mysterious, inexplicable beings who never say what they mean and always expect you to read your mind.  Conversely, men are often portrayed in the media as dumb lugs who are completely obvious in everything they do.  It sucks.
[deleted]
/r/childfree spends time researching doctors who aren't insane. 
The way I'm getting over that fear is by thinking about all the absolute morons I know who have their drivers license and haven't caused an accident. 
&gt;That's a shitty thing to do to someone you say you care about. In fact, I'd say it indicates that you probably don't really care about him.  &gt;Let him and figure out what you want. No one should ever be anyone's safety net; life's too short for that dicketry.  Yes!! 
Thank you! I have no intention of forgiving him, I guess I just wanted the closure of him admitting what he did instead of acting innocent. When I was thinking about forgiveness I realized that not only does his action mean he had no respect for our friendship (and that of my bf's)- but that he didn't respect me as a person. Tim's never once indicated any sexual interest in me whatsoever, I'm not even his 'type'. Yet he still did what he did- because I was a conveniently available naked woman. It's like I was just an object to him in that moment, for him to look at. Not his friend with whom he'd shared serious conversations and time. 
&gt;Woman who doesn't have a lot of sex: Frigid  I think it's a bit more nuanced than that.   Woman who doesn't have a lot of sex: virginal (which is a good thing according to society)  Woman who doesn't have a lot of sex with you*: frigid   *you being a general term, not you, personally. 
Like how regular insurance and government insurance covers procedures that only benefit a man?   You see, I am a man as well, and I never understood why some men get their panties in a bunch about birth control being covered by government insurance.   Both insurances for man and woman cover things that it doesn't cover for the opposite sex. So why do men focus on both control for woman. Especially when there are legitimate reasons besides controlling birth for birth control? 
An equally valid way of looking at it is that virgin refers to something that hasn't been touched by external agents. Which applies to all the cases and doesn't project the negative feelings. So if you wanted a more neutral, but still correct definition, I'd go with that.  I think though you'll still find that much of the negative connotation of losing virginity comes from that concept of an external agent becoming involved: external to our bodies, environment, etc...
Children cannot give consent. So it's exactly the same.
I'm pretty generic and boring, a jean and tshirt kind of girl. I buy a lot of clothes from American eagle. Their jeans fit me really well, I have a pretty non existent ass and their jeans don't get saggy in the butt!! I get all of my lounge wear from vs pink. I shop at tj max and Ross a lot too, not so much recently though. And I'm an eBay whore!!! 
I don't think the age gap is a problem (it's fine for you to not be interested in older men), although I at your age he should be in a totally different stage in his life; that could cause problems. I had a great time with a 32 year old when I was 20... But we both new it wouldn't last forever.  Showing you had no interest should have bee enough. Then he was angry because you rejected him/he didn't get what he wanted. Also, he probably isn't a great guy.
http://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Prevalence_of_circumcision  Sorry I guess it's also Canada and Australia. Still though, lots of Christians in Europe. Hardly worth conflating the two
&gt;  If you don't mind me asking, what country are you from that it's illegal to keep written correspondence or to share it with another person/police?   It doesn't matter what the laws are in my country (to answer the question anyway: Germany, [§ 201 Abs. 1 Nr. 1 StGB](http://dejure.org/gesetze/StGB/201.html), can land you for up to three years in jail), nor if I agree with them really (I don't; I consider it akin to forbidding me to *remember*). The crux of the matter is that the laws *differ* from country to country and sometimes even from state to state, so you should be careful what you do with that recording.
I think maybe if your original comment was framed with more info as to why you needed to know, the response wouldn't have been as negative. It seems to me like you are just asking because you would like to understand her situation and reasoning. A few of the comments did appear to be questioning in a negative way though, even if that wasn't your intention.
I get that. But if I were asking a legit question I think I'd rather have it answered here. Sorry.
Yay!
&gt; I have this kind of step-back-and-let-it-pass reaction to the whole thing, which I think is wrong.  You know, you don't have to voice an opinion on everything. You don't even have to have an opinion on everything. In fact, it's better if you don't. In my experience, it is impossible to participate in everything that is going on everywhere in the world all the time; but if it's something of interest to me, I try to follow the discussion, analyse the salient points, listen to people who *are* participating, expand my views or at least my reading. I have no doubt that people would prefer that I absorb their contributions rather than contribute unintelligently or, unwillingly, at all.  Last year my friend and I had dinner together and she invited me to go with her to this sexual assault rally she was attending afterwards. I have no experience with sexual assault, but I thought it sounded interesting, so I went. I was given a seat and a burning candle, and I sat there for two hours listening to women talk about their experiences. I didn't say anything because I had nothing to say. Nor did I feel excluded or scared somehow because I was there as a spectator - if anything, I felt lucky.
Economically they are the same. The only difference is that anarcho capitalists want to abolish the state. Saying anarcho capitalism is not laissez faire is pretty stupid. Sure,not every Libertarian believes all of the same things but in general they believe in completely free markets. This is not quantum physics.
As a guy, I think the biggest objection other women have, apart from unthinking dislike, is the lack of shared experience, i.e, you haven't grown up as a woman and experienced the shit they have (not that you haven't experienced shit of your own)
I do have panic attacks, they know this and don't understand that overstepping agreed upon plans (meet up for lunch, suddenly they're assuming we need to go for a several hour long bike ride) is one of my triggers.   The relationships are generally healthy, just a lot of them calling me their therapist. There's a lot of what I assume is unintentional guilting, too.   My husband is great and comes along or the plans, but he feels smothered, too. He wants more alone time and since we only see his family once every month or two, he's overstimulated here.  The problem is the overstepping. If we do a weekly family dinner they'll want to do more and more, so that would just be an addition to the deluge of plans. Maybe if we did that, though, they wouldn't guilt me about not making every social thing they want to do... I'll give it a shot, thanks!
Not the kind of guys I know.
What if it started as a cutting? ;)
Learning programming is one of those things where all the resources you need are available online, check out coursera or something
5' tall and 100 lbs checking in. I get a lot of comments on how skinny I am. I fucking hate it. I eat, a lot. Fuck body shaming, no matter what size you are.
I don't know what to tell you, other than my experience is completely different from yours.  I'm also male, also in tech (in the bay area,) but I'm not a "nerd" and I have a lot of friends outside of programing.  The culture in tech is like nothing else I've experienced, and maybe if you've never done anything else you don't realize how overtly misogynistic it frequently *can* be. (Not always, but enough that it probably sours a lot of people early on.)  I don't think it makes you stupid to not see it, but you have to have a certain blindness to it for it not to be the most obvious thing in the world.  So, I don't know.  Our experiences seem to be altogether different, but the data is overwhelmingly on my side of the argument.  If you want to make the point that "it starts way earlier than after college" sure, no one is going to argue with that, but to pretend that the culture suddenly evaporates after you get a bachelors degree is a strange notion.
Can someone please report this arsehole. I'm on my phone &amp; can't seem to bring that option up. Thanks. 
&gt; Agreed, why don't we abolish gendered toilets, they're sexist too! /s  No, a better analogy would be "Let's have unisex toilets, but only allow women to use them for number twos".  If another subreddit limited what women could say but not what men could say there would be absolute outrage... and that right there is why this sub is so horrible: it's populated almost entirely by hypocritical feminists. Outwardly it's all about equality, but really it's not, it's about having your cake and eating it too. Equality when it suits you is not equality.  I really hope this sub goes back to not being default. It is, without a doubt, the worst default sub there has ever been. 
I hope the supervisor who wrote the completely inaccurate report is going to get some disciplining - their behaviour from the start was unacceptable, and it's frankly shocking that they didn't record correctly the sexual assault on top of their handling of it in the moment.  Good on you for sticking up for yourself!  Not only have you made it safer for yourself and others, but without your actions it's unlikely the lad who touched you would've had the opportunity to receive coaching on this sort of behaviour - hopefully now he'll get the help he needs on that.
Catholics do confirmation earlier. I was ten when I did mine and there were a bunch of us.
You have a good point.
I'm stuck on the vajayjay is duct tape analogy.
Not sure why I'm being downvoted here - I don't subscribe to /r/AskFeminists myself; does it also have a bad reputation?
Horrific. Completely horrific. I'm sorry it happened and I'm so sorry it's still affecting you so much today. I don't understand how someone can be capable of something like that, it honestly blows my mind. I can't even begin to imagine how you felt.  With that in mind, I'm hugely proud of you for not letting it hold you back. I hope you're as proud of you as we are, you're a fantastic inspiraton and I really do wish you all the best in the future.
Thats the kind of sentence that propagates rape culture.
I think the problem with what you're proposing is that lots of guys (wrongly) think that "Ok, I'll get closer to her as friends, then turn it into something more"  If you really aren't interested in them, the "no romance" thing lets him know that it's not gonna happen.  My thing with relationships, and using this post as an example:  Two humans, both wanting different things, both trying to manipulate the other into getting what they want, each one can only get what they want by denying the other what he/she wants, and nobody can be honest about the situation.  It would be funny if it wasn't true.
By back and forth I didn't mean the flirting.  Example:  I like a girl.  I'm allowed to talk to her for a while, but THEN I'm supposed to deliberately ignore her, pretend I'm busy when I'm not, etc.  This will make her want to chase me I guess?  To me it just feels like so much insincerity and manipulation.  I just wanna act the way my conscience dictates *shrug If I like you, I don't want to have to pretend I don't, or ignore you when I'd rather not, just so I can manipulate some old monkey instinct.  I know it's senseless to fight against what just is, but it still makes me sad.  In the world of dating I often feel like the only one of my species.
[deleted]
Like a pink slip for a car
&gt; when they lost their viriginity  Is "lost their viginity" a phrase they use, or you use?  Because "virginity" doesn't exist, it's not a "thing" that can be "lost".  A "virgin" is a person who hasn't had sex.  It's a weird word because most of our labels apply to when we _start_ doing something, not when we _stop_ not-doing-something.  We don't call a 10-year-old a "not-yet-car-driver" or a "not-alcohol-drinker".  The word we can use for "not-alchohol-drinker" (teetotaler) can be used to describe someone who once drank but doesn't now.  Yet "virgin" is a one-way status change, because let's be honest and acknowledge that "born-again virgin" is nonsensical at best and deliberately deceptive at worst.  (I wonder if this is related to how some conservative Christians have trouble with the word atheism: they think it describes actively believing in Satan or some other god, rather than simply not-starting-believing in their god.) 
I come from a similar family and it's kind of a bummer when I have to consider I'm judged for them.  I live on my own now, so I can choose if I want to be around them or not (have chosen not to).  If you're of the age where you're still living at home, it's hard to create that distance.  That said, I'm not a psychotic alcoholic and I'm the exact opposite of most of my family - that's the model I used - whatever they do, I do the opposite.  :P  It's served me well.  So...  hard to say.  I went through a period of wanting things to work and failing spectacularily.  I eventually gave up.  It's normal to want to connect with your family, but sometimes it just doesn't work.  Be supportive of him and try not to judge him based on their behavior.  It does affect you, but it doesn't guarantee you'll blindly end up like them.
It's all about tone. For the most part I don't care as long as they're ok with me calling them a similar name in return, I don't care if they're male or female. 
I'm from sweden dont know if woman or women and stuff like that becomes hard so I use female
[deleted]
The teacher is a man in this case.
They left out the part where she handed him a Metro to clean up with.
Perhaps...  I'm not saying this is true across the board, it's just been my experience and why I feel I get along better with men.  I do have two close female friends who aren't like I described, but they're harder to find.  Also, a lot of this reluctance is likely caused by me and my experiences as a teen.
[deleted]
The article states that "The case involved Stacy Dean Rambold, a former teacher who pleaded guilty last year to sexual intercourse without consent.  In sentencing Rambold, Baugh drew national condemnation for suggesting the victim shared responsibility for her rape. Rambold was 47 years old at the time and the victim was a student in his class at Billings Senior High School. The girl committed suicide while a trial was pending."   [Note that 'Stacy' is not a common male name in Western countries, but it is used as a male name in more Slavic ethnicities.]
For those unaware, the old standard required female hair to either be in a very tight bun at the direct back of the head with a straight part, or be clipped short enough to be held off of the collar. However, the short haircut seen on men is not allowed for women because it is seen as eccentric. However, there are several ethnic groups which had exceptions to this, either because it is seen as common for them to wear their hair differently (specifically, African-American women are allowed to be bald or have very short hair) or because of difficulty in maintaining the more normal requirements (ie, would require hair straightening). And what is seen as acceptable for women to have that is outside the bun/shortcut largely comes down to command discretion. Most male service members are not aware of the regulations for female grooming, and most unit commanders are men. So, a lot of the time it comes down to how well officers (not known for their listening skills) are willing to listen to female SNCOs and NCOs.  Marines and Army may have different haircut standards though, because I actually didn't realize that dreadlocks or large cornrows were authorized. Or that may be because my company of ~120 has (I think) 7 females  The short version of the new standards seems to be (in an effort for uniformity, not professionalism or efficiency) some of what *used* to be authorized because of differences in hair structure is being removed. And I fully believe that this is being done because of uniformity. My company has been yelled at because some people decided to bring their own food into the field to supplement MREs. Uniformity is literally the most important thing in the US military
Comparing this to a white woman with long hair isn't fair... from my understanding it is very different.  &gt; Sgt Jacobs says the "racially-biased" regulations use the hair of white women as a baseline. Black hair, which grows out rather than down and is very curly, is difficult to pull into a bun or wear loose in an even manner - styles promoted in the new guidelines.  Also, I'm not an expert so I may be wrong, but smaller cornrows are probably a major pain in the ass to take care of compared to larger ones. I had a friend who would get cornrows done and it would take her like 6 hours and was very painful for the first few days. How long does getting your hair trimmed up take? I'm not trying to be a bitch here, but try to view things from someone else's perspective.
In all honestly seeing how other men react to #yesallwomen has helped me better understand when I see a white person respond to the entirety of white people being vilified for acts of racism or racial inequality.  A person can feel attacked when a social group that they don't really have a choice of being a part of (race/gender) is being heavily criticized for actions stereotypically attributed to that group.  It's especially easy when you're not responsible for any of the negatives from your social group.   I honestly try to correct my friend/family (and myself) when I hear them say things like "white people alway do X" or "white people treat us like Y" when discussing stories of racism or discrimination.  It becomes really easy to blur the lines and paint an entire group of people with a broad stroke. For example, my uncle has been in an interracial marriage for 20+ years (black uncle/white aunt).  When we have family gatherings and new stories about racism or racial discrimination are discussed I can tell that she feels (unintentionally) vilified simply because of the language that some of my family will use when speaking about white people.  Now they'll usually clarify and say something like "oh auntie we don't mean you you're cool" but if you read a person emotions you can tell she still feels a bit attacked.  I think that's how some men can feel when things like #yesallwomen pop up on social media.  It can take a conscious effort for a man to recognize and understand that women aren't harping on all men. They're using it as an outlet for discussing abuse and raising awareness for women's issues.  
This submission was removed:  Rule 4. **Relevance:** Please submit content that is relevant to our experiences as women, for women,  or about women.  There are [other subreddits](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/wiki/related_links_and_discussions) better suited to this topic.      [2X FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/wiki/faq) | [2X Rules](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/wiki/rules) | [reddiquette](/wiki/reddiquette) | [reddit's rules](/wiki/rules)
Well I think it's extremely unlikely that the draft will ever be used again, the military is shifting towards a smaller more specialized entity, less boots on the ground. And with technology it doesn't seem we'll ever see the sort of mass of people needed to fight a war. So I see the status quo as sexist but it has almost no effect on anything. There are so many other more important gender inequalities and political and military issues to be concerned with it doesn't bother me that this isn't often discussed or seriously considered for change. 
&gt;Hate to say it but the story could very easily have been made up  Frist of all how **dare** yo u
I used to be but I got out of that business for a job with less hours and better pay. Keep on fightin' the good fight!
Boardshorts or a cover-up wrap are nice alternatives.  I've NEVER shown my body in a bikini or a one-piece because I burn very easily, plus am sun sensitive due to medication.  I wear a tunic-style top that covers my shoulders and comes down to just my butt... so I kind of have an excuse ;)  
[deleted]
Why should they?  When you report the news you should not be "pro" anyone or anything.  That's editorialism and that's exactly my point.  If you want pro-Palestine news then go listen to Al Jazeera.
This sort of thing happened to me last year, and I think it comes down to yes, what the bride and groom want, and also, might require your boyfriend to ask some questions.  When I went, I attended the rehearsal (sat in the pews) and the rehearsal dinner.  I got to the church by myself, but I was able to take the party bus back with the wedding party to the reception venue.  The bride and groom sat me with my boyfriend at a table with other members of the wedding party and their significant others, so that wasn't an issue either.  My guy made sure that me being there for all of the pre-wedding activity was on the up and up with the bride and groom, so the awkwardness was eliminated.  I think this is a situation where being tactful, but up front about things, is really helpful so that everyone is in the know.    Good luck!  Edit: As a note, I am getting married next winter and from what I've read, it's pretty common etiquette for the bride and groom to invite the dates of the wedding party to the rehearsal dinner (especially if traveling is involved).  So, this is what we are planning to do at our rehearsal dinner.  I can't speak for the bride in question, but I don't think it would be overly rude to clarify the point so that you are certain.
Are you saying that if you're in an abusive relationship, abusing them back is justifiable?
Even if they did she could be like "yup that happened" and then they would print it?   Not much better. Although this isn't a real paper...
[deleted]
[deleted]
Nope nope nope nope nope. I avoid wearing anything that requires the use of pantyhose. The only exception is black opaque tights in the fall/winter when absolutely necessary. 
How do you know? Do you have concrete data about the quality of journalism in the past, versus now? 
I'm not going to be any help at all but we used to use condoms (for like 7 years) and then Basal body temperature which a lot of people don't consider a reliable method of birth control (and I can understand that) and then after we were done having kids my husband got a vasectomy. If I had to go on birth control I'd definitely go back to the condom or have an IUD. 
That's my assessment of the current situation, not my opinion on military actions. 
That was just one of a few pieces that tells me this isn't a quality paper (running this kind of story being the most significant). The OP mentioned other aspects about the paper, but you honed in on the advertisement part of it. 
[deleted]
You take that back!
[deleted]
Thank you! Your kind words mean more to me than you would think.
She needs therapy. If she's in college, the school probably offers free or very cheap counseling services, and if not but you're in the US, RAINN.org is a great resource. She may need medication in addition to therapy just to help her get started, but she's in complete control of whether she goes on medication or not.  It's also important that you make sure you have the support you need. Dealing with a partner who has mood problems or a mental illness is not easy, and you are not obligated to stay in this relationship. I understand that you want to help her, but if she refuses to get help you can't do it for her. You're doing all the right things right now, but until she sees a professional, she's not going to get better. If this becomes too much for you to deal with, it's ok for you to break up with her. It is not your job to make her better, and you aren't equipped to do it.
Our version is horrible. When they can't find any sensational news suddenly everything becomes interesting and they start writing about the silliest things
[deleted]
I don't mind nude pantyhose. It's one of my favorite shades to wear. Even though I'm in my 40s, it doesn't make you look old to wear nude. I do wear the black shades quite often though.
[deleted]
My period completely stopped. Occasionally though there would be spotting, but not often. I was on the shot for 3 years. No other symptoms. 
Sending good thoughts and vibes your way. Go baby go!
[deleted]
On March 14th, I started hiking the Arizona Trail at the Mexican border and reached the Utah border last Saturday, May 31st!  It was an incredible experience to travel through the diverse beauty the state has to offer. I hiked through everything from cactus-laden desert to high meadows ringed with aspen and up and down more mountain ranges than I can count. It also goes rim-to-rim in the Grand Canyon, my favorite place in the world :) 
[deleted]
Yea, especially that the most likely scenario is that she was groped by someone who had already shit their pants, and not "I bellowed mightily and they shit their pants I could tell because of the smell!"  Zzz.
I came to this thread from /r/all but I've browsed twox before and it feels more like a circlejerk than TrollTwoX 
[deleted]
There was [this](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/comments/27dkpa/serious_how_do_you_answer_catcalls/) discussion recently that may have some helpful advice for you.
If he's lying now, no matter what it's about, he'll keep lying.  It won't stop.  Do not entangle yourself financially with a liar.  
Don't get me wrong, I am elated that it has never happened to me. Just an observation that it happens to certain people more than others.   Edit: Typo
Thanks for the reply. I realize this logically, and am now trying to get in contact with some church so I can work with them on sundays.  I'm interning in houston, and my old friends are back in my home town, some of them heavily pregnant and quite young.  Could you guys maybe give me advice on the whole marriage thing too? It boggles my mind how many people get divorced, and how many people get married while knowing eachother for what in my mind, seems like not so long at all. Knowing someone for 1-3ish years doesn't seem like enough to Know that you want to spend the rest of your life with them. I know all relationships are different though.. I guess. 
I was never given the talk and it might just be because it's one of those things where parents themselves don't have a solution. So they don't want to or feel they can't talk about it because they don't what to say when you ask "But what can/should I do about it?" :/
I have seen at least 3 articles this week on the BBC "news" website that I read first hand on reddit...
Yeah that's true, there's no proven way to handle it perfectly.
Wait til you see [this reddit-inspired piece](http://metro.co.uk/2014/02/19/reddit-user-claims-he-dated-then-dumped-model-kate-upton-his-username-is-coolsexguy420boner-4309692/) from the London metro.
I've seen enough variations of it and don't really win anything by doubting it, but, you know what? Even if it was made up, it still deserves to be heard. As motivation.
&gt; and/or you got them as a growing teenager then you'll get them during pregnancy.  Not necessarily. Puberty left me with nice stretch marks in my thighs and butt, but two pregnancies left no mark.
[deleted]
Same! I was leaving Good Life once, and this guy tried to grab me and pull me into the bushes at Boylston T stopped.   This is a common occurrence in Boston, just it doesn't go reported. It's like there's nothing you can say for people to believe stuff like this happens.
There is no 2018. If reddit ever became self-aware it would immediately kill itself.
It sounds as though he was previously engaged, and it was broken off around the time you two met. That's not necessarily bad or wrong. What is weird is that he is STRAIGHT UP LYING about an important part of his past. There is no reason not to share that information with you that has any good will behind it. I second the notions here to get to the bottom of this with him, and definitely don't marry him any time soon.   There's also something, to me, a little skeezy about him inviting you on the replacement trip for what was clearly supposed to be this elopement. Yikes.
That would probably be better than hey baby, though that's not saying much. Though to be honest, I'm always a bit creeped out when guys more than thirty years older than me are hitting on me, and that's all the attention I seem to attract lately :( But, "You're dog's beautiful, can I pet her?" is a pretty safe lead in to a conversation. Most people with dogs will happily talk about them, and you can go from there.
Why unexpected?
What wonderful news!! Congratulations!
I agree! I, being a female myself I´d feel represented in an awesome way if you brought it like that
Congratulations, and best of luck to you :) I hope everything goes smoothly for you!
probs
Your pregnancy test gave me an idea for a pregnancy test.  I'll pitch it to you, since you're pregnant.   What if it was a little square that contained a reel, like a slot machine. You pee on the stick and push the button on the side and the reel spins. If you get all 3 babies, you are pregnant. Alternatively, if your hormone levels are simply high and you're ovulating, you get two babies on the reels.  When you get the three babies, it lights up and makes a jackpot noise.  Sounds pretty cash to me. 
Are there any downsides to that? As in, health issues? It sounds awesome.
People should realize it's not just one side or the other who are needed to prevent rape from happening. Not only should we be educated on how to defend ourselves and deal with the situation if it occurs, but also what counts as rape and that no means no. Everyone is involved if we want to stop rape culture, not just the perpetrator or the victim.
In what world is halfway through an engineering degree a good time to have a kid? You realize she's only 19 right?  Are you a troll?  EDIT: it used to say OP was probably twenty. I'm stupid  EDIT2: sesimama apparently had a baby at 20 while in college. this was my response  Just because things went well for you doesn't mean that 20 is a reasonable age to have children. I'm glad everything worked out for you but you are the exception to the rule. I am not belittling your experience, you are ignoring OPs clearly expressed wants and presuming that your experience is representative of everyone which is ridiculously presumptuous.  You even admit it took you longer to graduate. For a lot of people that alone is a really big deal
[deleted]
[deleted]
Happy for you! You both look amazing!
[deleted]
I would need to spend about ten minutes looking for something I do not hate about this article. I wear what I feel comfortable and appropriate in,  and sometimes I do like something because I think I look good in it, but that has nothing to do with other people's opinion. It's about mine
[deleted]
Not really that weird, unless the two people involved think its weird.  There's no known genetic connection between the two, so nothing to worry about on that front, and any remaining cultural taboos can be safely ignored.
You're promoting downvoting if someone thinks the other person is lying? That's the lesser of two evils but it's still not right. 
&gt; you're not attractive enough  Whoo man.  Glad you didn't take it seriously!
Well for me personally there is no need for tip-toeing. I love jokes and don't get offended, by anything really. I appreciate the absurdity of life so nothing gets to me except *maybe* if it is meant to malicious and hurtful on purpose.
Ohmigod, congrats! I dealt with infertility myself (took five damn years!) and I have to say being on the other side feels amazing.  I recommend the sub /r/infertilitybabies. I got some hate on /r/babybumps for talking about what it feels like to finally have success after dealing with IF. IFbabies tends to understand a lot better.
Really? In the Netflix "behind bars" thing they said they always intended to have her played by a man pre-op. When Laverne auditioned, they jokingly asked if she had a twin, anticipating it being difficult to find a lookalike.  Not saying you're wrong, just wanted to share the version I heard.
But do you use it?
I remember getting followed often when I was young, and then it totally changed.  I looked very young when I was in my early 20s, and dressed very slobby - hoodies, ginormous hand-me-down jeans, scraggly hair.  I think I was mistaken for some kind of desperate teenage runaway... many a time when I was walking home alone at night, dudes in trucks would follow me for a couple of blocks and then ask "ya workin?"  Then I took kung fu lessons for seven years and now... nothing.  I must have gotten confident looking.  Or it's the tank tops, showing off my wee shoulder muscles?  Or - ah, most likely at my age I just don't look like a vulnerable waif anymore.
Definitely not the Bella Vita one, as they don't seem to list any info on their machines, which is super sketchy.   The Spa Sasse place has good machines (I've had good experiences with apogee machines), and I've heard fairly good things about the Soprano ones too, which Portland Spa &amp; boutique uses as well as Painless Laser Spa &amp; Silkyskin. however, the Soprano-using spas seem to focus on "pain free", which may mean they will tone down the levels of the machine to reduce pain, but which will also reduce the odds of getting good results. When it comes to this sort of hair removal, pain isn't always a bad thing. Of course, it's also not always a good thing (unskilled folk accidentally burning clients, for instance, though most are good enough these days to avoid that).  From there, it's important to understand what skin type you have, the darkness of your hair, and what areas you're looking at getting treated, and that sort of thing. I can't rightfully recommend without that kind of info, but none of the deals strike me as bad, though I'm not from the Portland area, and I don't know what standard market prices are there. Certainly cheaper than where I live, and with better equipment than the usual places here that push deals.
[deleted]
[deleted]
So, /u/redtaboo, I guess we're back at the "Is she a troll" line of questioning. 
What the other replies are describing - they call it corrective rape. It's disgustingly prevalent in less developed parts of the world.
[deleted]
I think that's a good idea, they probably don't realize how much I think about them and how difficult it is for me because I try to hide that. 
I think that's the problem, I work so hard to make sure everyone else feels good that I don't value my own comfort and happiness at all. I need to see a professional and build up confidence to speak my mind because now it seems like every time I do I get strong pushback that i"m being unreasonable. You don't by chance live in the Chicagoland area, do you? :-p
Bikini line, sparse, dark blonde 
I don't care haha. I think it's sweet and it's better than being called "you" or "girl" haha. 
[deleted]
I'm not saying it's right, I'm just reading the end of the article, which you apparently didn't do.
You're the one who came into a thread where the OP was *specifically* addressing being told that the things she was experiencing were being brushed off, and implied that it wasn't really an issue. Your opening sentence implied you questioned the validity of her claim that she was raped. *And then you implied that maybe she had some culpability in her rape.*  If calling you out on your pseudoscience bullshit, victim blaming, and general asshattery makes me a "feminist" asshole then so be it. I didn't escalate anything, you just made shitty arguments that were extremely easy to attack.
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
Google their websites and the real hard core mra guys. As a woman reading what they believe about women made me sick to my stomach.
what you described is exactly what I fear - is it just the person or is it a scheme?  I actually know one guy who reads these PUA books... I met him on a birthday party while visiting a friend whose boyfriend was friends with him. he (the boyfriend) told her that he's into these books and she told me a few weeks later. he tried to hit on me all evening (unsuccessful, not my type)  - but when we went to a club later he came along and allegedly f#cked 3 different girls in the bathroom...  ...I was absolutely shocked to say at least (he doesn't look like a womanizer at all...). But he seemed like a decent guy anyway (just as friends) and so we went to a festival together (my friend tagged along, no date) there he was first nice to me and then ignored me all evening....I now think this was supposed to get my attention, to make me want him in some kind of way? Well we don't have contact anymore because he behaved like an idiot afterwards too (sending me stupid messages to rile me up)
Hydrocortisone Cream. Slather it on the affected area. It will be better in no time.
I am so so sorry that happened to you, that you had to go through that. Whatever you feel is totally valid, but just know that nothing about that situation was your fault. I really do recommend seeing a therapist to help you through this, they would be much better suited to helping you figure out how you do feel and what sort of action you want to take than internet strangers (though, of course, I'm sure there will be lots of helpful comments from the great people here).    I'm not sure what country you are in but there are resources [listed here](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/wiki/related_links_and_discussions#wiki_resources_regarding_sexual_assault_and_domestic_violence) on the sub.    
Share it! Share it everywhere!    There are so many places we can reach out, something for everyone to do.   Just remember to do what you want to be doing and don't say yes when you are already overwhelmed or its just not a good fit. You can't help anyone else if you aren't helping yourself.   Also - about nursing. I've been a nurse for 6 years. Worked hospitals, home health, and some in between. I got into nursing because I wanted out of the office and wanted a steady job. It was also going to allow me to work with kids, which was my dream.   I love healthcare. Being a nurse is great. There are SO many options about where you can work and when. To a large extent, you can pretty much pick your hours and days. Most nurses work three 12 hr shifts in a row and you are free the other 4 days. Money is decent and you are almost guaranteed a job (the nursing shortage and all).   I've spent a lot of time in pediatric home health - you basically babysit a child who is medically fragile at their home. The only difference is if their trach falls out, you pop it back in so they can breath. I worked nights (yes, I watch a child sleeping) so that I can study at work.   Hospital work is like being a very high skilled waitress, really. With some poop and other body fluids thrown in there.  You go from room to room and make sure you patients are breathing and pain free.   If you are interested in it, I would suggest you take a job as a hospital aid. No certification needed, they are in high demand. It's a   hard job, and your day is baths and diapers, but you get to see what the nurses do there. In fact, we often don't have aids, so we do everything you will be doing and more. There are much easier jobs then hospital nursing, but it is important to do your time at the hospitals before branching off. Make sure you go RN though. LVN's are getting pushed into the crap jobs with no options.   If you can't take a job as an aid right now, you can go shadow a nurse. Shadowing is the way we learn in healthcare, so it is very, very common.   The knowledge you gain as a nurse, about our bodies and injuries and the like should be required of all people. It's awesome to know when to worry and when you should go to the doc.   I love healthcare so much that I am off to Medical school next month to become a Doctor. Yea!
Not so easy to find a place to take a dump in a metro train, or even station, the toilets there are probably not all that inviting. But I'm guessing.
If you identify as a girl or woman, I consider you a girl or woman.  Plain and simple.
Kissing does NOT mean you consent to sex. She may have enjoyed the kissing that does NOT mean she must have enjoyed the "sex".    I really don't think your questions are appropriate. It does NOT matter why she said no at that point, no matter what her actions were like leading up to that point she said NO and that should have been respected.
Please post this in /r/trollxchromosomes instead. :)
I think I'm gonna go buy some hats. Happy birthday! 
I don't see why you felt the need to point that out, but hey, thanks I guess. I suppose if anybody needed that kinda clarification, they have it!
I miss Cat so much, it hurts a little. 
Are you sure? Because if that's true, they really, really should rethink how they communicate that. Because as it stands, that's not the impression they give to outsiders.   And even so, if they reduce it from "any report of rape" to "most reports of rape," it's still wrong.
[deleted]
Girls are fickle at that age, at least what I've seen with my daughter. Encourage her to be herself, join activities at school or outside of it,  and do the things that make her happy.   Friends will come, especially if she's confident AND kind. People are naturally drawn to personalities like that.  Remind her it's the quality, not the quantity of friends that's important. The other girls her age may be less mature, have more drama, etc., which can make it hard to be friends with them, if she's not like that.   Good luck to both of you, and congrats on finding your baby sis!
femradebates is a joke
nope.
[deleted]
[deleted]
You should xpost this to /r/Panthers.  At the very least you should sub if you already aren't. Easily my favorite subreddit.  Awesome picture by the way! 
I think it's not that people don't value a male perspective, it's that they're not looking for it.  Saying "as a man" typically doesn't contribute anything to the comment.  What's it saying?  "As a man" makes it seem like the dude is speaking as a representative of all dudes, which he's not.  Men everywhere didn't vote to send him forth as an ambassador to us.  Clarifying that he's a man later - "if it means anything, I'm a dude" or such isn't terrible, but "as a man" is grandiose and doesn't contribute much.  It also makes me personally wince because I usually see it in "mansplain"-y contexts - that is, when a man is being condescending by grandiosely offering his opinion, which is *clearly* superior because of his gender. (/s)
[deleted]
But I'm a glass half full person 
im not going to waste my time looking up the numbers for the 20 odd somethings of the eu because of semantics. the eu is not doing well. germany is. as far as i (keyword in this sentence) care, that settles it. you can nitpick the data to your hearts content, but you shall do it without me
[deleted]
[deleted]
Upvote for Kuechly too. Gotta love the Boston College alums!
70 up|26 down.  Eeek. Welcome to the defaults...
What a piece of shit
I'm a Bostonian, the metro is where I go for all of my news needs.  It's pants shittingly awesome
And you get things done by motivating your employees.  Good luck with the "you can't do it, why don't you just quit" method.
I think the biggest thing to remember is: there is no rush! You can want a family right now, but that option will likely be there 5+ years from now after you've finished your degree. Fantasizing about having a little family can be so much fun, but in my opinion, there's no reason to jump ahead! Enjoy being in college and getting to know your significant other.
I agree with you, this issue affects everybody. people tend to forget that as a species we are one, that means anything that affects most women automatically effects men. We are not separate. i think a good thing would be to reduce gender separation and try to reduce the sort of "us vs them" mentality. i also understand that this is a complex topic with many moving parts, i cant pretend to understand it completely. but if i were to throw in my two cents it would be exactly that, less men only women only talk, less mars and Venus shenanigans less us vs them mentality. that's just my two cents.
Why are you afraid of making him mad? In healthy relationships, people sometimes unwittingly cross boundaries. The important part is communicating those boundaries honestly and freely. If you are afraid to do so, I question why you would want to remain in a relationship with this person.  
Yay!  Big ol' congrats to you and dad :)
[deleted]
After I reached a certain age, I noticed the harassment intensified. Not 100% true or for everyone, I know I was also harassed before that certain age, but after I hit that birthday, I just was on their radar I guess. The age I mention is 21.
[deleted]
Huh, I'm already subscribed to that :)
I think it's great to ask! I certainly don't mind. Sorry that you are getting some downvotes. :( 
A while ago, we talked about how women with typically masculine hobbies and professions are treated. I promised to butcher in my tiara but couldn't find it right away. Finally dug it out, so here I am, cutting meat in the most feminine way I know how, with sparkly accessories.
OP don't listen to such rash advice please. Edit - honestly, you barely know anything about these people. An unqualified "just leave" is not helpful advice IMO.
I just want to be clear, as it really isn't in my original post, that the reason that I participated after he stopped moving and stared at me was because I thought that it was the fastest way to get out of the situation. In my past, I've encountered this as well... where just fucking someone is easier/better/safer than not. Unfortunately.  The downside to this is that it makes feel very guilty, and it may have left him with the impression that everything was kosher.
This is some dope work! Thanks for sharing. 
I want you to put this in perspective.    -In these daydreams, you are probably imagining a loving husband and father by your side. A husband who helps out at home, your support all the way, and with a pretty good paying job.  You may find someone who can fill most of those expectations, or you may end up married to a person who seemed good at first, but over time, becomes or shows himself as unloving, unhelpful with the kids and housework, can't or wont keep a job, spends every dollar they can get their hands on, and is emotionally, and occasionally, physically abusive.  This marriage situation may seem impossible, but it is what my dearest friend is living in right now.  And sadly I would say probably, at least one of your friends has a home life close to that of my friend.  Looking from the outside all you see is the Kodak moments like /u/pookiepi said, because people think that if they don't get the daydream perfect image in life they have to hide it. They cant show anyone the flaws because of personal pride and fear of being looked down on or seeming like you can't take care of your family.  It is humiliating to admit that there is something going very wrong in your domestic life.     -Once you have kids, life is about the kids. If you haven't finished your degree, it will be dang hard to finish it while pregnant or with a kid.  Imagine trying to go to your classes with morning sickness every day, with swelling, and an aching back.  Once the child arrives you will be exhausted!!!  Baby's are amazingly cute but equally as gross, fussy, and needy.  Part of this need is money!  If you don't have your degree, a job, and a bit of savings before a kid comes along, you will have a extremely hard time making ends meet.   -Take these big life steps when you are ready, not when your friends are! Choose wisely who you share your life with. Choose when you are ready to have children and provide the physical and emotional resources they need.  Biology and cultural expectations try to push you forward into these situations. Don't be pushed.  Choose when and what is going to be the best for you with your reasoning and your heart.   
Please be respectful.
&gt; , but mace is a close second.  Or a gun depending on your state.
The quote is false.   http://www.reddit.com/r/worldnews/comments/27dnet/india_state_minister_on_rape_sometimes_its_right/ci04pil  Here is what he actually said. None of that was an endorsement of rape, tacit or otherwise.
[deleted]
Don't bash yourself too much. I don't think you're an asshole (gasp!). It's offensive that she puts forth more effort for her other friends but not for you.  She's a grown adult and she needs to present herself like an adult. Not like some broke ass college bum that just rolled out of bed.  I don't know how to make her wear better clothes around you, but I just wanted to help you validate your feelings about this situation. I don't think you're horrible. Her reaction made you feel awful, but I think that you're completely justified in asking her to look presentable when you go out together.
OMG Best baby announcement ever.!!!!
The Court held that "all one needs to know about a  given employee for a given year is whether the employee started  or ended employment during the year and, if so, when.  He is  counted as an employee for each working day after arrival and  before departure." Id. at 665-66  And you can see the full article here:  http://www.eeoc.gov/policy/docs/metropol.html  Employment laws cover employees, no matter how small. No matter what a company puts in their employee charter, those agreements are null and void, and superseded by the rights granted by federal law. A company cannot diminish your rights, if that were the case eery company would just disregard the minimum wage and other pillars of civility. You can always file complaints directly to a government agency, state and federal, regardless of any agreement you may have w your company to try mediation first. The company also agreed previously to not violate your rights so if there is no reciprocity I do not see a problem with backing out of your agreement the same way they did. And I do not believe that at the state level there is a seperation in the law between a full-time employee and anyone else. Everyone has the same rights.  *A company cannot have policies that violate your rights*  The link above was to the EEOC which is a Federal agency that administer the laws, but you can always contact your state attorney general's office to find out if any state laws are in violation. The Department of Labor is also a Federal agency with a Pregnancy discrimination law, but there are also State Departments of Labor that I am sure have their own discrimination laws too.   TLDR: I disagree, strongly. Also, sue errrrrbody!!!
I would be asking your SO what kind of life he wants to live, and how often he would like to see his mother. I would be asking him if he wants to support his mother indefinitely and see her every night. Maybe he has not clearly thought for himself about the life he wants to have with you. Find out with him what he would like his life to be like, and work with him on getting there. I'm hoping he would like to make changes, but if he doesn't want to, or if he thinks the current situation is acceptable, then perhaps he is not the person you should be sharing your life with. 
Thank you. I'm doing everything I can to feel better. That's why I get pissed, like- "if I can do it, how come you choose not to?" so I have to learn to not feel that way. I just feel like nobody approaches us because she looks like she doesn't want to be bothered, or we look like a couple because she's a bit more boyish. I don't understand why she bothers going out if she's not going to bother making herself presentable.   And thank you so much for the condolences. It feels like shit and I hear it just gets to be a new normal. I hate every minute of it. It just blows. &lt;3 
OP delivers! Some full body shots  [Pardon my derpy expression x.x](http://imgur.com/Xi4XhXJ) The bf is Batman and Spiderman  [Seeing double!](http://imgur.com/NXLL6GQ)  [Chyeah](http://imgur.com/0NTRete) 
Just posted a new comment with a few full shots :D
Yeah for a second I thought you were her actually, until I saw the comments
[deleted]
No more than it would with any other lip color. Its the same as trying to find your perfect red/nude/pink/etc. Theres a lot of different shades of orange to play around with. Theres orange-y nudes, salmon tones, corals, hot oranges, peaches, red-oranges, and I think they can all be incredibly flattering.
I think that's one of the best wonder woman cosplay that I've seen. 
well, now that you put it like that... I feel a bit silly for asking XD I just like to double check! Thanks for helping!
You need to find a top-notch OB that will gladly work with your neonatoligst to make sure you and the bay get the best care to support you through the pregnancy.  I was high-risk and had the best neonatologist, but the OB I kept getting assigned to in the multi-doctor practice was horrible. She let so many things slide. My pregnancy was so rough that I refused to do it again.  You know the hurdles you'll be facing and it sounds like you have a good doctor. Just map out a plan when the time comes, so everyone understands what is happening and make sure everyone, friends, family, and all doctors, are on the same page. 
[deleted]
There is a huge difference between consenting beforehand in a conscious waking state and doing do when one person is asleep. If both people are awake and someone initiates sex the other can say yes or no immediately and not have things done to them that they don't want. If one person is asleep they do not have that option. The sleeping person can't respond to the advances unless they just happen to wake up. In the meantime the initiator is just having their way with their body without the sleepers consent in a way the sleeper may not even ever know about. I don't know about you but I do NOT want things done to me in my sleep that I don't know about or haven't agreed to. She has ample reason not to trust him because doing that is very clearly a breach of trust. Sex with a sleeping person should not be treated like sex between two conscious consenting people 
[deleted]
Such nice guys out there.  It's not your fault for thinking so.
[deleted]
Pretty much though lol We were trying to move to a new spot or go to the dealer rooms, I can't remember. And people were like, "oh wait, go back over there so I can snap a pic" -.-
If this is a competitive event I hope you aced it.  Looking good.
Thank you! :D Horde for life, because characters like Thrall and Kael and Nazgrim make the story SO GOOD. :)
twoxchromosoms is a sub generally for ladies and lady problems that recently went default. Having a y chromosome sounds like it's pretty cool too though. Welcome to reddit, I hope you like it here. 
As a black dude, this makes me happy.
[deleted]
You look fantastic :). Keep on being a awesome cosplayer!
I posted this as a contribution to Lego and its gender specific releases. But I would also recommend checking out the video on how the Antikythera mechanism was recreated using Lego!
I found a sort of a diary a couple of months back.  And I was shocked at what I read. Basically, me and my friends were a bunch of 12 years old - all nerdy kids with very non-adult clothing and no makeup. We were out and about and for some reason decided to pretend we were drunk. A group of older  (40s) men stopped by and were basically asking about us and making sexual innuendos.   I had also completely forgotten about an incident when I was 16 and a man (50s) forcibly kissed me (after I told him that I was not interested in him, was waiting for my boyfriend and was 16) in the middle of broad daylight and no one did anything to help me.  What really got me was that I was in no way dressed provocatively! Like to the extreme... at 12 I had loose jeans and a shirt 3 sizes too big (to hide them boobies). WTF?  This type of harassment pretty much stopped entirely once I got over 20, l conclude that these people are cowards and will pick people who look young/lost/vulnerable etc.
Yay!!!
[deleted]
the... the last man standing would be a man. The last person standing could be a woman, or the last woman standing. But the last "man" standing has to, by definition, be a man.
[deleted]
Okay...this is my first post to this sub but I do read it regularly. This is not a man hating place. It is a place for women to talk about women's issues and being...a woman. I don't understand why you feel hated just for being a white man. You are not in a group that has a history of facing discrimination. I also do not know what about this sub wold make you feel that way specifically.  
The problem with stereotypes is that a great many people live up to them, which is why stuff like this is still considered funny. 
I've given my 10 year old daughter that talk. She's tall and pretty. I've told her what to do if she's followed/groped/harassed etc. My take on it was to describe situations I experienced when younger and safe ways of dealing with it. I feel angry that I had to do this, but it's better she be aware and prepared. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
The bottom line is that you did something to help. It is extremely difficult to know what people are capable of. You need to protect yourself too. You made a great choice. 
I hate these stand-up images. They take out all the build up, ruin the timing and retard the punchline. Please stop doing it, just link a timecoded youtube clip or something.
[deleted]
How are you feeling? Hanging in there? I've been thinking of you    Hope you're well  
[deleted]
You do know girls wear makeup to cover blemishes, right? And that some people have naturally good skin?
Wait the situation she suggested is so common does this by extension make rape ok?
[deleted]
The reality is it was open season for this material always. Comedians don't need to seek permission before making a certain type of joke. As long as it generates laughs it'll be told. I view this as the comedian reflecting rape culture rather than creating it.
Do you always brush your teeth in the shower? 
Would you support a man beating a woman the same way after she grabbed his crotch? 
[deleted]
[deleted]
The love between a dad and his dog is something magical and not to be messed with. 
I was assumed that was already known, but it is harder to see the damage of unknowing insemination was my point  EDIT: To be clear my point is we havent objectively quantified which is worse. To assert one is worse than the other is to appeal to which sounds worse to you. 
I'm showing this to everyone who says "stereotypes exist for a reason."
[deleted]
Que?
How does this silence a legitimate discussion? I think a solution to "rape culture" must include changed by bother genders in how sex and rape are viewed and this highlights and important issue. Women are able to discuss issues and contribute to solutions that also involve men as victims.
I live near Famine!
Same, I'm 5'10", have been told I look "athletic" (whatever that means... I guess muscular, since I've worked a bunch of jobs that require heavy lifting?), that I seem aloof, that I'm terrifying when I'm angry, and I'm the type to get angry, not scared. I rarely ever have a problem with these sort of things.
[deleted]
Anyone can be a target for sexual assault or rape. That doesn't mean it's their fault.   Yes rape happens, but there is absolutely no reason to blame the victim.   The last thing a rape victim needs or wants to here is that they are somehow guilty or at fault. It's incredibly damaging. 
No one is trying to silence your issues 0fcks. People are raising all sorts of awareness about women being raped. I see multiple posts every day about it, articles in the news about it, and things on the t.v. about it. Do you really think a simple post on reddit is trying to silence your huge issues that get tons of publicity?  I have not seen anything anywhere about men being raped. It's as if people think that it is not an issue, or as if people don't even know about it. Posting this issue on a popular subreddit like this could bring awareness to the issue.  Right now *you* are the one trying to silence an important issue.
I see. I guess different places have different requirements for a smear. There are some standards, but yeah. Mine was just because I was 21, though they also do them for sexual activity over a year and some other things.   It's good that you're comfortable enough with yourself for this, and I'm glad you've found a doctor that makes you comfortable.  Best of luck!
I think people sometimes forget that flirting isn't all about sealing the deal - it's about laying the foundation, too. You're establishing that you're playful and funny. If I were Alec, I wouldn't jump right to "oh, I should ask her out", but based on this I'm starting to think you're pretty cool.
[deleted]
[deleted]
So basically to avoid being raped, it's best to not have friends and not hang out with anyone.    And you wonder what the negative effects of rape culture are.
I guess what is funny and what is not funny is pretty subjective.
[deleted]
So what you're saying is that the image is intended to be funny because it's just a bunch of random lies that have no basis in the author's perspective of reality? 
Haha ugh, I just graduated law school, plenty of debt, need to pass the bar and find a job just like everyone else, but a TON of people tell me "oh you're so lucky, you don't need to worry about anything, your life is set." Old people, young people, fellow law students, etc. Because I'm married to someone with a job. Don't get me wrong, it makes life a lot easier but it doesn't mean I get to go "yup, married, don't need to try anymore." 
It's not a competition. 
Thank you for sharing this.  
I haven't played much / at all in a over a year but still occasionally go on. I used to tank with my pally and Druid and loved it. 
[deleted]
dude i look at it this way. One of the conditions of consent to you having sex with this woman was that she was using a contraceptive. To lie about that is breaking one of your conditions to consent. breaking consent is considered by many to be a form of rape. good luck to you with all my heart. 
I think you might be reading too much into the downvote system here.  Since going default, this sub isn't the enclave it once (mostly) was, so along with the feminists you're describing you also have random Joe Schmoe perusing all the defaults at once.  There have been a lot more downvotes in general, but I think that's mostly due to the change in sub status.
I'm curious, do you have any statistics about this at all that backs up what you're saying, or is it just guessing?
Once he disregards your initial statement, you have zero obligation to continue being polite. Put on your bitch face and say sternly, "I am not interested in continuing this discussion." Women are socialized to be nice, and that's what these men count on and take advantage of. Remember that if HE'S not going to be respectful, you don't have to try to find a "nice" way to tell him off!
Nope. I haven't any idea what the author's perspective of reality is and what has basis there.
This is unfunny and trollish. Get outta here.
&gt; Literally all you have to do is say "well be covering [trigger] in this course," but already there are people here making fun of traumatized people for it. I'm disgusted.  Exactly this. That's all TW's need to be. I've seen them used in Health courses before in high school, and they work quite well.    I feel like TW's are being massively overblown into these uberfascist representations of liberal censorship. C'mon, let's be realistic here. Most of the clout around them are "What if's-?" and hypothetical situations where a student skips half of a course's test material. I don't see how any of that is relevant to putting a TW on a syllabus, I really don't.
Well, the version you told wasn't funny in the first place, so I don't know why you even bothered with that comment.  
Actually at least half of the rape jokes I've heard are about men being raped in prison.
[Are we related?](http://i.imgur.com/3thBtLa.jpg)
That is some excellent projection. I'm very sorry for whatever has happened in your life to make you feel that way, and I hope you feel better soon.
[deleted]
&gt;you think there is no emotional damage relating to being forced into parenthood  Sorry but have you read what I've said, repeated multiple times? Don't come at me unless you have read what I've written
[deleted]
Lets say I had a legitimate complaint with how females behaved, and I decided to call it "Feminine Stupidity," and then wrote an article about it, do you think many women would read it? Probably not.  If you want men to learn more about "Rape Culture" then maybe find a term that doesn't imply that Rape is part of the shared culture of all men. Because that's a very offensive proposition, and your going to have problems getting men to read farther than that assertion. 
Canola is a kind of rapeseed.
Haha! It's so weird to me that if a woman identifies that she is a woman almost anywhere on reddit, she gets attacked for it. Then guys come to a sub for women, and suddenly the idea that someone might get their gender wrong is more than they can bear, and they are compelled to start every single comment with 'as a man', just to be safe. 
There's no getting through I guess.  There's a difference between looking at it and declaring there was nothing the victim could have done, and just automatically declaring there was nothing to be done without looking at the case file.  For some reason, you're happy to throw out all reasoning and do the latter.
If you're just basing it off your own intuition, you're not making an educated guess, you're making an uneducated guess - and to be perfectly frank you don't exactly seem unbiased. I agree that this would be essentially impossible to figure out, but you're the one making the claim. If you're into the whole rigorous analysis thing (which is kinda important if you want to know the real state of things) then you will agree that there is no point in making claims that we can't back up with anything but our own feeling that bitches be lying. Agree?   Your answer here relies entirely on how reasonable you are, if you say "no I am pretty sure this thing is true even though I have nothing to back it up with", I may safely write you off as someone mostly interested in justifying your own feelings about the horribleness women.
Yeah, there's no way I would come here for help with serious issues any more. Like, there were male and female users in the sub before, but everyone was pretty mature about everything. Now the subs opened up to all kinds of users and I feel if I were to come to TwoX with problems that just so happened to be about a man, instead of support or feedback I feel like there'd be a lot more "Omg man-hater!" or "Omg hypocrite!" type responses.  Even if everybody does their part to not feed the trolls, it still doesn't stop those comments from flooding your inbox. And for people who are wanting to discuss a personal or emotional subject, it might be harder to not take offense to those comments.  I agree: This place really has become sort of like a dark alley.
Holy shit, a good feminist rape joke. A funny, totally feminist rape joke. I'm extremely impressed.
I'm sorry but I think you should have kept your thoughts to yourself.   She has every right to go out late or to go bar hopping -- without being scared of rape.   May I suggest you reflect on your strong feelings?  Why does such behavior make you feel fearful?  Why do you think women are unsafe going out?  How do we work on changes in society such that women don't have to feel as you do?
Not intuition, personal observation. I do not feel the need to quantify life experiences into neat little charts to have a discussion about the validity of whether what I'm saying is worth saying.  We are on a feminism forum, bias is a silly word to be tossing around.  We know where this forums bias lies.  You're free to write off whatever you like, just as I'm free to think your simply eager to dismiss what I'm saying because it doesn't fit your narrative of how the world works.  Ask men how many of them know guys who've been roped into parenthood by an "accidental" birth control mistake.  You don't need a statistical analysis to see a trend, especially when you even *admit* it can't be quantified.
Ahh, that's the foundation of a good marriage: Rooting for the same team.   ...I assume they're the same team because the colors are the same... all I know about sports is that you can't dribble a football. 
Someone else on this thread is saying  that the age of consent in Canada at the time was 14. I believe I turned 14 after the sexual contact began. I know I was in grade 8.  So now I don't even know if anything illegal even took place? It was more grooming and manipulation rather than forced sexual contact. He even brought an even older friend into it once and I was too scared to say no. 
You know exactly what you were doing and why.  You hate mensrights and therefore compared them to TRP.  I said you need to stop, because saying that these communities should be treated the same is wrong and telling people they have the same message is what is false information.    I have no intention of writing essay after essay to explain something we both know is true.  I just asked for you to stop lying.  
Also, I just noticed that Generess is a low-hormone BC. I used to be on that and ALWAYS had break through bleeding (my periods were a thing to be reckoned with). I am on the regular level homones now, and it happens much less often. 
But birth control is not 100% effective. When it fails, is that rape?
30 year old man here. Work around men, live around men.  Not once in my ENTIRE life have I heard a man utter a man raping a woman joke.  Never.  That said, I have heard dozens of women make male rape in jail jokes/pronouncements/threat.  Just something to keep in mind.
No, I took a while to downvote you.
I never stated categorically that anti-male institutions do not exist- just that they pale in comparison to the institutionalized oppression of women. Generally speaking, anyone who thinks that a man has a tougher time being a man than a woman has being a woman is very ignorant. We live in a male-dominated society.
well sure, but for it to be a joke it has to be funny.. =F
[deleted]
whats that?  people are using the gender of the child that will most likely be interested in buying the product!  HOLY SHIT CALL THE COPS THIS IS OPPRESSIVE  why is it wrong to target a gender? as much as you might not want it to be true, boys WILL be more interested in the nerf gun than the dress up doll and girls WILL be more interested in the barbie truck than the other one.  why is having something being different wrong?  you should stop putting sarkeesian on a pedestal if you do, she is a liar that effectively scammed a whole group of people through tropes vs women. 
[deleted]
The whole bill splitting thing when going out to eat: I have never, ever, ever come across any group of guys who would do that. I have never even thought about something like that.. Stuff like this picture is so worthless.
This is exactly what my friends and I do, about last year, we gave each other elements and pretend we're superheroes. I saw this on tumblr and was like "whaaaaaaaat?? Thats what we do though!" but I love your art, it's really great :)
Of course you don't have to stop doing everything. But I think it makes sense to not get completely wasted around someone who you don't know very well. Your inhibitions are lowered, their inhibitions are lowered, and you don't know their intentions or values or anything yet.   It's the friend's *right* to be upset, sure. But nobody *wants* to feel upset at a friend they love. It makes more sense for OP's friend to recognize that OP was coming from a place of love and concern rather than judgment. 
What kind of god awful person must you be to think you can just walk away from your child? I know you said you think your dad didn't want to be there. You think that, your dad probably never said that. And he obviously made the effort to try something. Your perception is not always reality. My dad is an abusive, mentally ill, violent criminal. Many would and have called him a monster, but he loves his children and he would be apart of our lives if we let him. Most men won't be able to just walk away from their child. They're to good for that. That means they will be forced to see the woman who violated them everyday and as a bonus they won't be able to inform their child that she is a disgusting piece of scum. Because gods forbid you say a mother is a piece of shit. 
[deleted]
Source?
I haven't experienced this so sorry and I hope it gets sorted out. On a side note though, I had horrible cramps and strong periods most of my life and Paragard in particular is supposed to increase bleeding during periods and can make cramps worse. If this is really really uncomfortable for you, I would suggest going with Mirena IUD. I went with Mirena for that reason and my OBGYN definitely agreed given my history. My periods are really great on it, not horrible at all. It's possible you might want to switch. Best of luck. 
[deleted]
No, the thread asked why young women don't like feminism, and you are not a young woman, you are an entitled male. You have offered lots of nonsense about why feminism isn't addressing your entitled sense of "I have problems too, what about me?" but you haven't offered any insight or evidence that women in their twenties have any attitudes towards feminism at all.  Men's rights activists are a bunch of shitheads looking for ways to be deadbeat dads. There is nothing else to that issue at all. It's a bunch of men who don't want to support their kids.
I don't even know how to approach it. A friend of mine was complaining about a girl he liked and how she banged a lot of dudes but wouldn't bang him and he didn't understand why. I said it was her prerogative who she slept with and none of his business and he still didn't really get it. I honestly didn't really know what to say after that. 
Why are you posting here if you're just going to say sexist bullshit? Go back to The Red Pill and stay there.
[deleted]
You are getting down voted because you lost your temper and think that everyone else in the situation was wrong wrong wrong without seeing any faults in the way you handled the situation. Know one can read your mind, you have to converse if you want to resolve issues.  You did over react.
Nope. People are attracted to whom they are attracted, girls and guys. Some women just aren't attracted to men who are overweight, in the same manner that some men just aren't attracted to women who are overweight, and you can switch out that adjective with literally anything - blond hair, Asian descent, New England accents, below 6 feet tall, etc. Yeah, it might mean that person's on the shallow side, but we're all allowed to have preferences. We just shouldn't be mean or rude to people who don't have the features we're attracted to.
Call him a try-hard GDI.   That'll shut him up.
Yup. I also have pcos hair, so it gets used for that too.
Because I am a woman who likes to shower in her own shower and sleep in her own bed, I bring men and women home pretty regularly. Yes, it's good to have someone check in on you, I guess. But mostly I think it's important to make sure she knows, and acts on the fact, that she does not have to put up with bullshit in her own home.   I've kicked people out for not listening to me when I told them I wanted to sleep instead of fuck. I've made people sleep on the floor because they wanted to cuddle and I did not. I've also had people over and fucked on basically every semi-horizontal surface on my apartment. I've also had people over to drink champagne and eat strawberries and watch Shrek. Her domain, her rules.   You, as a friend might have asked her if she has those boundaries or knows what they are for her personally. Does she feel comfortable kicking someone it for acting like an ass? If not, how can she become so? As long as she feels comfortable enforcing the boundaries she lays down (which normally comes after actually enforcing them) then I say go for it.   But she's in a relationship these days so I guess it worked out fine for her.
I would like sone consistency here.  Ravenous red seems to have taken the feminist trope of "any comment critical of or at the expense of women must be misogyny" and applied it to men.   Now while I would agree with you that criticizing or poking fun of a gender group is not the same as saying you hate all members of that gender group, it seems like the direction that radical feminism and groups of social justice warriors like srs of creating an environment of perpetual offense don't seem to be slowing down.  Is there any way we could just get everybody to step back off the ledge?
[deleted]
Someone with that mindset has already developed archetypes in his head about what those words mean and where they come from -- rightly or wrongly.  
You don't see the difference between a state where there's actual causation (sex leads to conception) and where there's not?  Clothing does not automatically cause rape.  Sperm uniting with an ovum, that causes conception.  Blocking access of sperm to said ovum is a known way of preventing conception.  
I'm confused. You don't meet in person or cam. You just talk? Like friends? Does that count as being a sugar baby? I don't understand what he's paying you for.  What's the dynamic of your relationship. Is it romantic?
Too soon! Too soon!
If someone responds with slurs, you should pull out your phone and video it. At least other women would know their faces. I know I wouldn't date a dude that was on the internet screaming invective at other women.  
I think we are all done here, apologies as I don't tolerate this kind of nonsense well where ever I encounter it.
[Sometimes they are.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Rape_by_fraud)
Do you have a source for this? I've never seen a study that says being raised by a strong woman makes boys misogynistic and that being raised by a man causes boys not be misogynists. I'd be interested to read more. 
You stole this from ~~4chan~~ some fictional story a dude made up and told over radio calls, but it's ok. I won't judge.
I feel you. The best thing to do is have sources and articles at the ready and know exactly what points you want to make. Let him know that you want him to hear what you have to say before he tries to come up with a rebuttal at every pause. It's hard to hear what others have to say sometimes if their viewpoint conflicts your own, but let him know that as much as you respect him as a person, his standings on some of these issues are harmful and are really bothersome to you. Your point of view as a woman on woman-centric issues is so important and he needs to respect that and see where you're coming from. If all else fails, just know I and lots of other people on 2XC are and will be here for you regardless! 
You're a woman, right?   In that case I'd probably ask him how he'd feel if some guy treated you that way. I'm not a big of fan of this argument, but seeing as your brother's ability to emphasize with the sex that's he intent upon entering is poor, that might be the way to go.   Also, I'd ask him if he actually likes women, qualifying that wanting to have sex with them doesn't meet the criteria. 
Boo horde it's all about the Alliance
Lying about birth control is NOT rape. It's wrong, but it's not rape.  It's like having sex with a prostitute, and then not paying. Is it rape? No, she consented, so it's theft. You don't get to tack on extra expectations onto what consent was at the time.
&gt;Don't be silly wrap your willy!  Or rather then hands in this case... 
My first and last name match too well for me to squander it. I'm sure my parents will be happy, at least!
[deleted]
Dude, I would support the shit out of a community like that. Giving men confidence and positive support to succeed in their dating lives with some arbitrary measurement thrown in? That's very cool by me. Learning how to make women laugh, bettering themselves, trying to be a more confident person, making equality happens faster by erasing gender prejudice and slutshaming in both genders..  The thing is, TRP is not really like that. Its sister subreddit is pussypass, which is a subreddit dedicated to news about women getting a "pass" from society because of their gender. It espouses harmful views like this bit :  &gt;Iron Rule of Tomassi #6 Women are utterly incapable of loving a man in the way that a man expects to be loved  Which is on TRP's sidebar. It's required reading, even.  [This](http://imgur.com/a/bGiiW) is a gallery of comments from TRP. It's not a self-improvement forum, it's a hate group.
"he believes his success with women now is all due to the whole bro culture type stuff"  I mean, unfortunately, he's not at all wrong.  That is to say, his success is due to this, not that success can't be had any other way.  Reddit will probably balk at this because the majority of people on here are not the type to go for guys like this, but I think most people who have gone to college would agree that many college age girls are attracted to these personalities.
Hes lonely and doesn't understand how to get women so hes looking for answers.
That is a really dumbass statement. Being a human is a lifetime free pass from shaving, not being a college graduate of a specific school.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Haha! I completely agree. 
I don't care what you call it, but just because something is empowering for you doesn't mean that it's empowering for all women (ie: feminist). Becoming dependent on some guy for money isn't a feminist choice. 
I, as a woman, have never given a crap about co-worker's babies, and would rather mow the lawn than wash dishes. My husband and I flip these stereotypes around such that I've been called a "sugar mommy" and he's been called my "wife", which I found to be so offensive. I am not less of a woman and he is not less of a man just because we don't fit into tidy little roles. What is wrong with just saying we complement each other's personalities?
OneY here, something that happened to me when I was a preteen. I was a shy kid at this summer program surround by people who were nice, but different from me. An older person came over to talk to me and I gave one word answers to her questions. Finally they gave up and said, "well, fuck you then."  People mistake shyness for snootiness; I never understood it as we don't really seem to do anything to other people. You should ignore her, people who like talking about other people won't add anything to your life. You also shouldn't feel embarrassed, it's the assholes who should feel embarrassed. 
If you don't intuitively know, you're not the best person to speak to a guy about this stuff. Find someone else.
I can relate man when I was 19 I had a baby with a girl who I was with for 4 months... All sorts of crazy she was 18 I should've known better. I found later through her aunt and friend that she was trying to get pregnant because she thought I would carry her to success since I had a full boat scholarship starting that winter.... well gave that up because I had to support them and feed them joined the army. She fucks off during my first deployment left my daughter at my mother's cleans the accounts and let's all the bills fall into delinquency.  It was a headache and it didn't ruin my life but it did definitely hinder it. Still shows up every couple of years to make sure my daughter ends up crazy
 Please see rule #1 [in our sidebar](/r/twoxchromsomes/about/sidebar).  thanks.
No, it's not rape. Regretting your consent because you were tricked is not rape. 
I agree, but I think it's more that *some* women and men need to change their views. Even RedPill guys admit that their shtick only works on certain kinds of women. 
That's just how I define it.  Obviously some people see it differently.  I don't see anything edgy about going for cheap laughs.
That's the one! Alternate world with black superheroes.
[deleted]
Woah, that's awesome! 
I don't understand what you mean by 'redirecting the red pill'. Could you clarify?
Why are you still friends with him?
[deleted]
My counsellor made me realise how much people can change or how they can pretend to be something else and then one day you see their true colours. Which applies to other people in my life right now.   My counsellor didn't even remotely suggest I might have something like PTSD. She acted as if what I went through wasn't that big a deal and that I shouldn't be worried in the future. But a lot of what she said about a lot of my issues was basically telling me to just be happier and to not worry and just to cope with it all. But she didn't give me a way of doing that. A friend was more useful. My friend suggested writing down 3 positive things from the day, before I go to bed. That way I realise that my life isn't all doom and gloom and that some good things happen.  My counsellor actually said something along the lines of "I'm sorry, it feels as if I've let you down and haven't helped you at all." ... I kinda felt that way, but her saying that just made it a million times worse.
[deleted]
If you feel like you don't have enough information to contribute, then you should do some research. There are many sources of information, especially right now, on this topic. If you haven't witnessed it first hand, read the many experiences of actual women, be it here or anywhere else on the internet. Unfortunately, this is a very personal problem and the people you may speak to about it have been effected by it, sometimes negatively. People will get angry, but they have the right to be, this is something that needs to be remembered. When you say something and are corrected on it, take responsibility for it, apologize. Move on, and become better. I think using only twitter as a source for information is problematic, because like you said, there's only so much you can fit into 140 characters
Given that such jokes are confined to a site called sickpedia (a shock site), tells a lot about how popular they actually are among the general public (not very).
This is really insightful. I guess the way I'm interpreting it is that people make offensive jokes all the time but they usually don't make them in front of the party they are joking about. A white person will usually not make a racist joke to a black person if they don't know 100% it won't be perceived well. But it is impossible to tell who is a victim of rape on the outside. I get your point that this type of humor should not be performed in general. I'm sorry you have to be put in this situation. 
The general sentiment in PUA community is that what women say they want is often not what they actually want, as shown by actions. The saying is "don't ask a fish how to catch fish".  This.has some basis in psychology in that self reports are notorious for being unreliable. However this is taken too far.
I feel that any person who is willing to generalize half of humanity is mentally lazy, at best. 
[deleted]
Between the two of you, fine. Call each other faggots all you want, don't take it outside that relationship. We don't know you, we don't know your intention. To disregard that unfamiliarity is extremely disrespectful.
Never heard of any of this but definitely going to look into it all. Thanks 
You´re welcome. Maybe you can inform me about the information you get and, if you decide to use it, about your experiences. 
I LOVE my kids. I HATE shopping with them. I would rather be tortured than try to grocery shop with kids.   I like to shop late at night, when I can price compare, ingredients list read, etc in peace.
[deleted]
Huh, I'll ask my doctor is there is one for generess, but maybe I will see if it can work itself out because I am terrified of starting a new one. Also because I don't want to be bleeding when my boyfriend comes to see me (long distance) and I will also be starting school in Canada and will have little to no breaks so I won't have much time for a gynecologist &gt;..&lt; which makes me nervous if I should wait it out. Without any BC I had long and heavy periods with heavy cramping (lasting from 9-12 days). And these doses so far has made them super light and short, it's just the breakthrough bleeding that annoys/bothers me (and the fact that I'm hoping this one doesn't last long). So maybe the more regular dose would make it less? I dunno, maybe I'll see if this can sort itself out....? gah Thank you so much for your answer!!!
Aww hun, that's so shitty. [Have an internet hug.](http://25.media.tumblr.com/4ccce3f4adf6ccec7a5071c323426d53/tumblr_mvnm95mB7r1sk6s1mo1_400.gif)  Sounds like the roomy's gf is just kind of a shitty person. Who knows why she said it, whatever the reason though it probably wasn't valid. Believe me, I know it's hard to ignore these people, but if she can't even try to be your friend before turning around and calling you a bitch then why even give her the time of day? She should be the one feeling humiliated at her behavior.  If you *do* want to confront her though, something that's working in your favor (and something that I use when feeling really intimidated by a mean person) is that she *already* think you're an asshole, so there's no fault in actually being an asshole to that person. This is how I started to be able to stand up for myself when people were saying shitty things about me. This however is taking the lower road.  If you *really* want to handle the situation just kill her with kindness. That will make everyone see the kind of person she really is, and there's no guilt on your part for being an asshole to her. The best revenge is a life well lived and all that.  TL;DR: You have three options: Ignore her, confront her, or be extremely kind to her. Choose the one that you feel most comfortable with.
So it's most likely the fact that I started to work out very hard that could be triggering my period? (I've been running for the most part without any warm up...because I'm stupid)
I have no intention to argue the validity of their philosophy.  I'm just pointing out that you apparently didn't understand it.  Even so, I will play devil's advocate.  &gt; I know that as an 18 year old woman, the opportunities I've had to "take advantage of men" have been nil   You wouldn't see it that way.  You would see it as "normal."  That is what social conditioning does.  &gt; wheras the number of rape threats, wolf whistles, cat calls, and unwarranted sexual advances I've gotten are almost innumerable.  Irrelevant.
I think you have every right to be upset. That shit is infuriating, and especially from someone you consider a friend. A lot of the commenters think you over reacted. Maybe you weren't going to win a debate that night, but I don't see what's so wrong in letting people know that they've hurt you.   Feminism is called feminism because it was conceived in a time where women were at a huge and distinct disadvantage. Why shouldn't a movement intended to elevate women to equal status have it in the name? It annoys me that people call *the name* into question as if they've never read a fucking history book.   Furthermore, the movement was started by women to help other women...it bothers me when men seem to have no interest in or even devalue the movement just because it doesn't specifically involve them. Is it wrong that gay rights movements don't specifically address the rights of straight single parents? No, because that's not what the movement is for. It doesn't mean gay rights activists hate straight people, or don't think they have issues that are important, or wouldn't also support legislation to help them. It just means that when they are making steps to legalize gay marriage, or improve the rights for gay couples to adopt, perhaps that's not the time to question why they aren't doing more for straight people.  If these guys are soooo concerned with "equality", what precisely are they doing to make that happen? Calling yourself a "humanist" and scoffing at real issues that feminists are challenging is doing what for equality, exactly?  It is possible to fight for laws that would protect men against things that affect them specifically without tearing down a movement that has accomplished and continues to accomplish so many great things. Feminists did the work, are still doing the work to be heard and make a difference. If "humanists" or "egalitarians" or whatever think work needs to be done in other areas...no one is stopping them. 
So, velvetjustice is unique in wanting to have meaningful, healthy relationships with other people?
Oh good grief.  Your friend made some decisions that you felt were not awesome.  You care about your friend and told her your concerns.  "slut shaming" has no place here.  What the hell does that have to do with anything?????   If she was making bad choices in any other area of her life (not attending class, texting while driving, doing drugs, etc etc etc) it would be the same.  I honestly think the fact that we have the word slut shaming is kind of stupid.  Because you care for your friend you are trying to look out for her.  The fact that this concern is for decisions that may at some point involve sex of some sort shouldn't matter.  I am assuming you were more worried about her coming to some sort of harm/violence.   Let her stew.  She will figure herself out.  Stay supportive and honest with her.  She is your friend.
Haha yeah I have thought that from time to time :)  Thanks for helping me look at it in another way :)
OP has already stated that she is not dependent off of this money. Also, the only thing here 'not feminist' is policing what other women do. Which you are doing. edit: spellcheck
Yes, exactly.  And then there were the subrules.    He wanted a certain amount of food on his plate.  He blamed me if he gained weight, I was supposed to monitor his caloric intake.  I got pretty good at it.  One night, he took his plate and I saw that it had extra meat on the plate (I figured I'd blown it and put it there) and I reached out with a fork and took it off and he threw the plate on the floor and tried to smack me (it would have been a slap on the arm, I think, but I was ready for it and got out of the way).  Shouting match ensued.  I was supposed to know that *occasionally* he wanted extra meat and had put it there himself.  Of course, I would still have caught hell for any subsequent weight gain.  I realized (in my new relationship) that I was perhaps too sensitive to all kinds of criticism.  "No thank you, I don't like it," didn't mean that a big fit would ensue later.    *Not* that we don't fight.  But, when we fight, both of us are quite clear on the topic and our viewpoints.  With my ex, he could be on about one thing in the morning and have a nearly opposite viewpoint in the evening (for example, demanding we consider a new car as his was giving him trouble, demanding I go research said car and do a budget; then in the evening, throwing things around the house when I revealed my research - he'd forget that he'd ask for it and would never remember...until three or four days later, it would be rinse and repeat).  It's awful.  If a person is going to be difficult, at least be consistently difficult (like me!)  It's interesting we're both using the word "thrown."  I threw something once, in a fight, to see how it would feel (it felt stupid).  But in general, I don't throw things and people don't accuse of "throwing things in their face."  Some people are able to use words as assault weapons.  You're right, simply knowing that normal people do utter criticisms, anticipating them and even asking for them is much better.  Most of the time, the person you ask is fine with whatever it is you did, and if not, they tell you in a fairly polite manner what's wrong.  BTW, my ex "kept book," and I'll bet yours did too, so that something I did wrong a month before could get added into the day's tally (whether or not similar to what I'd done wrong that day).  I kept book on myself at one point!  I started writing out all the rules and areas where I supposed to be improving myself.  I was feeling bitter and snarky during part of that exercise, but I'm glad I did it.    It helped me see that the list always got longer, there was no reprieve, no way to accomplish it, and that no matter how hard I tried, he only saw me as getting worse at whatever it was (and some of it, I did accomplish in a reasonable manner, such as keeping houseplants alive or keeping the kids' toys out of the living room when he was expected home).    He'd ignore all the times I was perfect/near-perfect at the task, wait for the slightest sign (one kid, one toy in the living room) that it wasn't perfect, then point out how yet again I had screwed up.  When he started doing the same thing with the kids, I made plans to leave (it took two years post getting a reliable full-time job to make my exit).    You are not alone and most people who know me would never guess what I went through at home.  
[deleted]
Part of educating yourself on social issues is being able to understand your own perspective and the bias it may carry. Considering issues brought up by the Men's Rights community, I haven't had opportunities to "take advantage of men". I do not have a child, I am unwilling to have a child, I always split bills when going out, I never feel entitled to take anything from a man, I never expect to be treated better for being a female.  Do **not** tell me my experiences with objectifying behavior are irrelevant. They are wholly relevant as they exemplify the entitled behavior of men, they are also experiences relevant to #YesAllWomen in that I'm sure many other women share similar experiences. If your only goal is to invalidate my experiences, I'm not going to bother with this "devils advocate" shit. Have a nice day dude. 
&gt;That said, if PUA type behavior wasn't getting him laid, he wouldn't be doing it. There seem to be enough women in the world that respond in the desired manner to PUA behavior that it isn't going away soon.  That's true. I think a way to break the PUA behavior though is to get them to empathize with the women they're being shitty to, and to get these women to realize that they're worth being respected and cared for. I have seen so many men get laid without resorting to PUA/Red Pill antics that I just don't believe that's the only way to get laid. It may be easier, but it would leave me unfulfilled in the long run.
&gt;I "suffer from resting bitch face syndrome".      I have heard this before! It would make sense if that was something that occurred with me as well.      That picture is EXACTLY how I feel in most situations.. it is amazing to see how many people deal with this too. Thank you so much for replying and your kind/helpful words. It has helped me gain some confidence and reassurance. :)
I would say that some women just feel it more on one side than the other, but I'm not an OBGYN. I'd say ask your doctor if you're concerned :)
[deleted]
Easy there strawfeminist.
I'm sorry, but you've lost me. I have no idea what you are talking about. I've never heard that men are going extinct. 
Thank you very much :)
Not every counselor is good for every kind of client I guess. Some of them only know about things like assault from reading text books. They are good for a lot of stuff though, like being accountable for the services they provide and I'm sure many of them do have a good handle of most subjects. Maybe you just need a different counselor?  It's true some people are a bit two faced, but if you're a good study of character you can usually pick out red flags. Personally I'm wary of people who are charming when they get their way, but suddenly whiny or mean when they don't get what they want, particularly if they use guilt or pity to try to manipulate people, undermine other's self esteem or try to make people second guess themselves. The best defense against that kind of behavior is to have your own mind made up, and don't give in to persuasion or criticism, even if it means coming across as stubborn or inflexible.   You aren't helpless against those kinds of people: your mind is your best defense, you just need to trust your gut instinct and develop a quick reaction time. Whenever I feel uncomfotable in a situation, even if it seems rude, I will just leave: make some excuse, say good night to everyone and walk right out of a room. That's what I mean by having a plan, it's the understanding that YOU and only you get to decide when you've had enough of any social situation, and when you want to leave, you just do it.   Obviously that's harder to do if someone decides to follow you up the street. If that happens walk fast, keep responses curt, eyes straight ahead and just keep saying that you're in a hurry. If they try to grab or touch you, start screaming and shouting bloody murder, it will frighten off most predators because they prefer meeker prey anyway. Don't be afraid to make a scene in public!  Maybe that all seems beside the point, but I find that I always feel safer when I know what "I" am going to do, it keeps my wits under me even though other people's behavior and intentions are unpredictable. Again, don't be afraid to object loudly to behavior that makes you uncomfotable, or to take charge of your situation if it seems to be getting out of hand. As weird as it sounds, being loud, stubborn, and difficult to handle will keep you safer than being meek, keeping your head down, or going along to get along.  I like your friend's idea of writing down positive things each night. Maybe you can add to it things you will do to keep safe, like speaking loudly if you feel threatened or calling someone out if they push your boundaries. I think a large part of fear and anxiety is feeling helpless, so by setting in your mind beforehand that you will stand up for yourself when threatened, you might feel more empowered. Hopefully!   I've been in abusive situations before and what makes me feel safe outside is having that bit of rage and frustration leftover, knowing that if anyone pushes their luck with me I am going to go ape shit until they freak out and back away. But first you have to give yourself permission to do it.      
Bleeeccchhhh! Oh, pardon me, that was the sound of me vomiting. The overwhelming response of the majority of women who have had abortions is RELIEF, even one, two, and three years after the fact. See the science.  &gt;The predominant response to abortion is relief. This is confirmed by dozens of studies that have researched women's reactions to abortions (for example, Adler, 1975; Burnell, Dworsky, and Harrington, 1972; Lazarus, 1985; Payne, Kravitz, Notman, and Anderson, 1976; and Smith, 1973.) (1)
Lets just not make light of anything because someone else might take it the wrong way.  Fucking political correctness really has gone too far now.
I lurk sometimes... totally intimidated. I did buy a half decent set of brushes though, so it's a step in the right direction!
fat chick detected 
I find that at best, the argument that we should all be 'egalitarians' or 'humanists*' naive, ignorant of the history of gender relations, and dismissive of the women (and men) who fought and made advances in for gender equality under the banner of feminism in the past. At worst, it's a misogynistic tool for derailing uncomfortable conversations. I wonder which camp 'friend' is in.  *As well as being ignorant of the actual definition and use of the word humanism itself.
Wow. Just wow. This is a very emotional issue, and this guy (along with many other people) was making uneducated yet condescending remarks. He is exactly the kind of person who WILL NOT be convinced. It's natural to get angry, as it's a unique situation.  As a woman, I would definitely defend anyone I care about in a situation like this, male or female. I believe this is to be expected from people who truly care about you, regardless of gender. If you don't, then you don't have to be bffs with OP. But most normal people do, and you'll have to get over that.
He is going based on their actions. His "research" would probably be trying different methods to interact with women and see which ones they respond positively to(with sex being the biggest positive response).
so  much this.
But generally used as permanant birth control, not temporary, so I can definitely see why a 23yo guy might not want to get one.
As long as women are responding positively to what he is doing, he will think he knows what they want.
In other countries they do. It's actually the most commonly used form of reversible contraception in the world. Their use in places like China tip the scales. At least in the United States, I think their lack of popularity could be attributed to complications in the past. Around the 1970s, the Daklon Shield came out. It's suspected to have caused.a lot of physical damage in women, leading to infertility.
Looking at women like trash also means he's probably talking to more women. That's pretty big part of the reason TRP bs gains traction, looking at women like they are worthless makes socializing with new people far less scary. When you think you're better than someone, there's nothing to be afraid of when conversing with them. 
Yep! And not just SSRIs. Other meds that work on norepinephrine and dopamine can be helpful and also have different side effect profiles. L-methylfolate (brand name Deplin) and high EPA Omega-3 have also made a big difference for me.
Well, in this case, I think the difference is that they took a product that was almost exclusively marketed to boys and added a line to market to girls, vs. taking a gender neutral product and then splitting it into two different gendered marketing. Which I think is a good thing. Similarly, the Easy Bake oven was initially marketed to girls, but they've added an oven that is marketed towards boys.   Obviously it would be better if those products just had one gender neutral line, but I think opening up their market to include the opposite gender is a good step towards including both genders equally in their brand.
I won't change mine...  My first,  middle, and last name were carefully thought out by parents and flow really well together.    However, if I'm addressed as "Mrs. Hislastname"  by people, I won't really care. Legally and professionally I will keep my name but if someone wants to refer to us as the "Hislastname" family, I won't object.
The last time I looked into IUDs, they mostly seemed to use the copper ones. A friend of my mums had one put in a while ago, and it ended up fusing to the wall and she had to get it surgically removed :/ That scared me pretty bad, even though I'm not sure how common/uncommon that is. They also seemed to be pretty expensive without some kind of insurance. I think the non copper ones were somewhere around $300?   I'd love to have a less daily bc solution, but with so many hesitations about the IUD I was more inclined towards the Depo shot
But the mods of twox are so damn strict the rest of us will never know.
My friend, who has known for years he doesn't want kids, talks up the IUD like it's a gift from the gods, but still hasn't gotten snipped.  I love the guy, but goddamn do I still want to knock some sense into him.  Why bother with trusting someone else to get something that does have a failure rate when you can take it upon yourself to rig the game?
It's wrong when they view women as purely objects and a means to get laid.   I love how all the TRPers have come out to play and defend their ideals over here. 
How can you know that? He could see she was a woman, so he clearly was speaking to her as a woman, wasn't he?
&gt; It doesn't imply the woman was responsible.  Statistics show that women are more than twice as likely to initiate the divorce. You can argue about how each spouses behavior contributed to the divorce, but its clear women are quicker to end a marriage than men.
&gt;you can't trust women when they say that they like nice guys and hate jerks, because those silly women don't know what they like.  The majority of women give terrible dating advice to guys. They dont mean to. They give advice based on what has worked for them and what they think they would like. The issue is that what you think you like and what you want to like doesnt make someone doesnt necessarily create any sexual energy/ chemistry.   &gt;If men say that RP/PUA works, and being nice gets them nowhere, then that's considered valid.  If it doesnt work it will have a limited audience and you dont have to care if some people think its valid. If it does work then it will become normal but you cant blame guys for treating women in a way that gives them the best results.
You seem to not be getting this point of your beliefs, my beliefs, what the law says, what society in average thinks, and what these individuals believe.  We are only talking about that last one, because that is the one influencing the actions of these individuals.
I write for a hockey magazine, and you see it, but it has been on a steady decline in recent years. Women would probably use it, however you see it less and less.  I watch the islanders, who have the heaviest hitter in the league (Matt Martin has 77 more on the year than the next guy behind him.  Even the league's heaviest hitter only hits 4 times a game.  Quickly looking at the data, it seems that the median number of hits on a year is around 100. That's less than two hits a year. This list is dominated by only one third of the league.  You don't see Top lines hitting, the main hitters  are bottom 4 dmen and bottom six (in some teams, 4th line only) forwards.
&gt;he old man at the pharmacy counter was super nice and apologized for it being so expensive.  That's fucking *adorable*.  &lt;3 awesome pharmacists.
[deleted]
&gt; Not married, don't plan on getting married, irrelevant!  You might not be getting married, but marriage is still common.  Women in relationships will also push towards marriage.  Surveys show that the desire for marriage is falling for men, but not as much for women.  &gt; Objectification and verbal harassment is controlling, especially in those scenarios in that it cultivates an unsafe and threatening environment for women.  Let me ask you this: do you think society, in general, approves of street harassment?  These are a small percentage of men who do not care whether or not their behavior is acceptable to others.  In contrast, marriage is considered a given by the majority of people.  Society says you are supposed to end up married.  If a 40 year old is not married people often wonder why, as though this is unusual.  This is the difference.  Society pushes people towards marriage, but generally disproves of street harassment.
[deleted]
:)
If I was you I'd consider myself lucky and not feeling emotional about it. Feeling bad about not feeling anything is a lot better than feeling all emotional about getting the abortion. Some women just don't get super attached to these kind of things which could be considered a good thing because it overall make the whole thing easier. 
Because if you post anything that criticizes "rape culture", no matter how reactionary and quasi-ridiculous, everyone on this sub expects you to jump right on board and agree with the author.  Don't get me wrong, there's definitely a problem with rape and misogyny in this country and all over the world that definitely needs to be addressed. But extrapolating a weird awkward comment by a waiter into an entire article conflating said comment with the perpetuation of rape culture and misogyny is totally asinine. 
Watching people use evolutionary psychology to justify their arguments makes my blood pressure spike.  I tried to explain the scientific failings behind this pseudoscience once, because I naively thought evidence might sway opinions.  He told me that he didn't need to know the science behind it since it was just common sense.  Fuck, man.
I dunno about OP, but my issue wasn't that this was her experience but that the women were generalizing for *all* women.  I wouldn't recommend abortion to everyone.  I wouldn't recommend sleeping around to everyone.  I wouldn't recommend Game of Thrones to everyone.  There's a difference between knowing something isn't for you and telling all people ever not to do that thing.  
* They are likely to be triggering to survivors. And 1 in 4 women has been sexually assaulted, so the odds are pretty good that your audience includes some.  * There have been studies that have found that priming men with rape jokes and other sexist jokes makes them more likely to answer serious questions about women in derogatory ways.   * There are also studies that have found that the more funny people (of any gender) think rape jokes are, the more likely they are to say that various forms of non consensual sexual contact are OK as long as they aren't described as "assault" or "rape".
Or just have it around as accessory info for the police report? Would seem pretty solid.
feminism...
People in college, especially the first year or two, are not more mature.
It's been a couple weeks, so not terribly long. I wasn't intending to make generalizations - I was more wondering if there's a problem with the way I come off on the phone that's irking other women I talk to. Or maybe I just don't have a thick skin yet and I'll get used to it. 
I wasn't on the pill, we had a broken condom and you need to meet the pharmacist here. It's about 5 minute meeting where the pharmacist asks when your last menstrual cycle was, where in the cycle you are, how long your cycle is, etc... They also note why you are asking for Plan B. 
[deleted]
The reason for common law and judges and juries is to draw that line. 
Depends where you live.  In some jurisdictions this is sexual assault and in others it's either simple assault or disorderly conduct.  If you want to say what State/country this happened in, I could give you more information.  I don't think the police would be super eager to investigate a butt grab months after the fact, but you could try if you really want.  
I actually agree with everything you wrote there.
I wish I was better at Baking.  Cooking I can do, I love creating new recipes and throwing a little bit of this and that into a pot and turning it into something yummy.  Baking though, takes a lot more measurements, work, time, precision and skills that I just don't seem to have.    I also wish I knew how to sew.
i'm a guy, and i only found this post by browsing /r/all, so this will probably be different than most of the responses here.  i have seen my brother go through that transformation, and i'm in the middle of it myself.  why did my brother do it?  because he realized the world was shitty and shallow.  either the world needed to change, or he was.  so he did, he lost weight, and got some muscles.  then he started acting shitty and led on multiple girls at a time.  what did i think?  good for him.  why?  because had he not worked hard like that, he would have lived his life as a lonely fat guy.  in regards to your brother, in a way, i think he saw first hand how marginalized fat people are.  so now that he's no longer a fat guy, he sees it as fair that he gets to act differently.  he now gets to act like he thought others acted towards him.  even if you ask him "how would you like to be treated like that", i think he'd be fine with it.  fine with it because he already was treated like that when he was fat.  now it's his turn to dish it out.  i'm not saying it's the right way to act, but i can see where he's comming from. 
Bless your little heart.               &gt;Have fun ruining America. Modern day Nazis.          LOL, nice message, Stormfront Jr.   
&gt; I know there's a crowd of girls chasing you, but put them on hold for a second.  Its because women almost always view the guys they date as nice. Even if they are complete assholes.  More than that though, its hard to be nice, confident and assertive. Unless you have amazing social skills, you have to constantly second guess yourself to make sure you aren't being an asshole or creepy when you go after girls.  By contrast, being an asshole means not having to worry about any of that.
I never said I can't sympathize, my issue with the commercial is the extreme bias they show. 
I had to get Plan B when I was dating my husband and at the time it was only available through the pharmacy. I remember the lady at the counter giving me the dirtiest look when I said the words 'Plan B', and before I could finish my sentence she told me she wasn't going to sell it to me because she said it was against her religious beliefs. I asked her where else I could get it, like if there was another pharmacy nearby because I was new to the area, and she just ignored me and told me I needed to leave. At the time I was so embarassed I just left and told my husband we needed to go, no complaints or anything. I just wanted to get out of there. It was pretty shitty, but I did wind up finding another pharmacy and the lady who did sell it to me was very helpful and answered all my questions about it with kindness. 
[deleted]
I generalized about the men that choose to send out dick pics, having the same logic as street harrassers, am I not allowed to say they're all alike?
Nope. It really sounds a lot like customer service - reading people and making them happy regardless of whether you actually like them. That's not something I enjoy.
You are a female? Ask him what he would think if someone treated you like he treats other women.  Or just tell him to stop being an asshole.
Mulan. I accept no substitutes.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Most likely the rapists, like many rapists, do not or did not consider what they did rape. They penetrated the victim with their fingers, which is rape, but I don't think they thought "I'm going to rape his person now" and definitely did not think "I'm doing this because rape is good." That's not how people rationalize doing horrible things to people. Many rapists think what they are doing is either not rape or perfectly justified. Some rapists do it because it is wrong and they like to rape people. But others are uneducated, in denial, and/or able to rationalize their actions. The scary part is not that they are inherently evil demons, but that they were probably normal people who were drunk and willing to do horrible things. As for the reaction from the town, they defended the things that allowed the rape to happen (victim blaming), they did not defend the rape as such ("the rape was a good thing," perhaps 'expected' and therefore somehow the perpetrators are not culpable, but not 'good')
If you're complaining about targeted marketing don't. It happens for men/women country/different country race/race. They make products targeted for women because they know that they can force women to pay more. It is incredibly unfair but it works.
Everyone feels marginalized these days. That's why these kinds of 'movements' (for lack of a better term) get started.   It all comes down to personal fears, self consciousness, and ego obsession. It's always ME ME ME, and nobody can look beyond that because they wallow in their pathetic self centeredness.   I don't even think there is a good answer for this, societies ruining children before they have a chance. 
I'm really sorry that happened to you. That would leave some scars. I love how the two of you had sex but he thought only you should feel bad about it. You shouldn't:)
Very true
[deleted]
So if a women dresses provocatively, she was just asking for it? What?
"women" are not some sort of monolithic entity. i do not "want to be told what to do and how to do it", i make my OWN decisions. and if any man in my life, including my partner, tried to act in the way you are describing, our relationship would be over. please do not generalize.
&gt;A man will dress up for weddings and funerals  Apparently no "men" live in NYC, because men here tend to dress to the nines here even if it's casual.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Me verbally joking about murder around a murder victim would NEVER be appropriate.   Why treat rape differently?
Lol, that's bad
If you have trouble making both eyes look the same try doing your non dominant side first. Really helps me make them look the same.
To a certain extent that makes sense. Plan B may not be effective depending on where you are in your cycle. It's not a magic pill, after all.  Though I'm somewhat dubious that the questionnaire is more about what's best for the customer than it is about gathering statistics.
I actually love Jane from Tarzan. I mean she ends up getting with the king of the jungle, so she's royalty right? 
[deleted]
He doesn't. You're right. Here's what I think is annoying people: It's one thing to say ' hey, I can't really have an opinion because I don't know enough about it.' That's fair. But it sounds to me like this guy just tucked his tale between his legs and put his hands over both ears because he fears confrontation with either of them.It's spineless at worse and apathetic at best. No, it's not his place to save her. Hell, he doesn't even have to AGREE with her. But if you are dating a person, it follows that you do give a shit about them and are invested in what they think. If I saw one of my friends talking down to my boyfriend to where it visibly upsets him  - we have a problem. I will have something to say. It's not like I'm watching two strangers argue with each other.
I've had a pharmacist refuse to sell me Plan B. He was really smug about it too.
It's very rare scenario.  But the key is they didn't consent to having sex- WITH YOU.  It's a fuzzy, meta concept, IMHO.  Like I say, maybe you told her you had a job and did not.  OK, that's lying about the situation, not about your identity.    Maybe you told her your name was Chaz when it's actually Chester.  OK but that's not the identity of ANOTHER person you're faking.  So say you claimed to be an author she read, but it was just impersonation.  Hmmm.... you're not actually exploiting a real relationship.    But if she DID actually know the person you were swapping with... then that seems to be the line.  That raises the bar on "difficulty", if she truly knew this person, you would not readily be able to swap, unless you're like his identical twin brother.  Hmmm now say you claimed to be a guy she had a crush on in high school, but in fact were not.  If you went on a date with her, I think it's established that whatever she thought you name was, she knew she was having sex with you.
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
Hahaha, that's actually a good idea! If you're ever bored, you have a lot of inspiration already. Pinterest is awesome.
[deleted]
Pretty sure I answered that. If there were no way around conscription (and I can't think of a circumstance where that would be the case), then equality would mean that yes, women should be conscripted. As I said, Israel considers conscription genuinely necessary, and even though it's not exactly a forward thinking bastion of equality, women are also conscripted. 
They shouldn't be able to deny you at all; it's their job to sell it to you, whatever they believe.
Or tumblr. 
I just felt "off" or unhealthy. I didn't really miss a period,but it was different that month. 
I had problems a year ago with my nuvaring ( going back to random) and 1 visit in acupuncture helped me alot. After 6 months of randomness and periods coming back more often, it was the last time i was on my periods. You can try it if you have irregularity again ( sometimes stress, changes in alimentation), they do something so your body produce more progesterone  Nuvaring is the one that last the longest. Usually they stop working after 2-3 years. That's a great method
Yeah, listen, I don't know if this is intended to be snarky or serious but either way, OP. If you need to make money that badly, stripping at a club is a LOT safer. I did it when I was 18 for a summer, I made a ridonkulous amount of cash &amp;amp; at my club, I was always safe.  Just don't take the drugs &amp;amp; spend all the money on a leased car &amp;amp; you'll be fine!   Edit: ok, yeah, fucknuts up there was showing us the wit &amp; charm that brings all the girls to his yard.  But my advice stands, OP!  Be safe! 
Not sure that covers you from a legal standpoint.
it's both. rich people get off easy, and sexual violence is not taken seriously within the justice system.
You specifically said to pick the "more dehumanising and generally terrible bits", which roughly translates to "worst".  So you specifically said to cherry pick the worst parts of TRP to suit your own agenda. I could do that here, in this very thread, to suit an agenda against feminism or women in general. Play nice.
As someone who's worked in in-house cleaning (not nude though),  one of the biggest things for me was keeping in contact with someone reliable you can trust.  Call when you get there,  call on your  break,  call when you leave.  Make sure if you ever feel uncomfortable,  you let them know right away.  Having someone that could pick you up on an emergency helps too. Stay safe! 
[deleted]
Yeah, I'm sure you were a wise, all-knowing guru at the age of 19, right? :-P
my husband and i wanted to do this! but we could agree on a new last name, so he's just taking mine :P
This has nothing to do with being a man. This person is a billionaire and he probably bribed the fuck out of everyone involved in his case.
Right, but for the police misconduct, it would have been admissible.  The only question is why the police did what they did.
I know a lot of women that fell for fun and confidence at the beginning, and then ended up in some pretty bad relationships with guys that were actually childish selfish jerks beneath all that confidence.  I think entitled selfishness often comes paired with gregarious confidence, and confidence is attractive.    It wasn't until I was &gt;25 that I started really seeing it, and finally looked for confidence that wasn't attached to a massive asshole.  I think it's dumb for people to be pushed to make decisions about their entire romantic lives in the first 4-6 years that they've tried dating, everyone's inexperienced and bad at it.  Maybe one way to fix it would be to make the gregarious confident guy a hidden villain in more of the media :) .  I have to say, that's something Frozen did right.
[deleted]
This is a very common response from girls when guys ask them for general dating advice.  Many women expect men to "just get it" or "be themselves".  To them, attractiveness is unique and someone trying to attract women as a group is "objectifying women" or even being "manipulative".  And this is why TRP is so popular. Pickup groups are the only ones providing a general guide to women that has a decent success rate.
My advice is to do it as soon as you can, which you seem to be doing. I've had two abortions, one at 6 weeks and one at 18 weeks. Let me tell you, the 18 week one was the most difficult thing I've ever dealt with. The 6 week one was a struggle, and left me sad and confused for a few months, but was much MUCH easier to get over. If you know what you want, do it. Don't let anyone else get you down. Personally I've lost friends over how I handled my own body, but in my experience, those aren't the kind of people you want to hang around anyways.  I'm still dealing with the effects of the 18 week abortion, as it is still fairly fresh. But I know I made the right choice, and you will know too. Be prepared for some mixed feelings and confusing emotions afterwards, but also be confident that you did what was right for you.
No, she is older and she was found separately from the litter
Are you employed through a company? Every company I've heard about that does nude/topless maids send girls out in pairs to make sure they are safe.
I wish!  I just don't have access to those kinds of devices and explosives.  And don't get me started on the required art skills.  
Yeah, I just feel like the image is idiotic. Nobody tells jokes about rape in the same way that would be comparable to what it's talking about. There's shit like [The Grapist](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=9Yt0b_QBP_A) or saying "you just got raped" when referring to somebody who suffered a severe loss.  I mean, if somebody wants to make analog jokes about not taking birth control to get pregnant, they can go ahead. It won't be funny unless it's very well done simply because it's a needlessly complex and specific way to illustrate the violation of trust.
This thread is being heavily brigaded by TRP and TRP apologists who are intent on pretending the sub is anything but what it actually is: a sexist shithole.
[deleted]
I just mean that it's reasonable to have different safety concerns for men and women.
OP,  I'm sorry that your post appears to be getting targeted by awfulness :(
Also, I didn't really think about it until just now but.. How can anything be 10x more effective than *sterilization*..? I'm not doubting you so much as..I'm confused. Isn't sterilization pretty much the end all? Are you telling me that people still get pregnant more often with sterilization than they do with a thingy in their arm..? If someone could explain, that'd be great!
[deleted]
It's so fucking infuriating. Like, is it really so impossible to just be friends? Is it impossible to want standards? If girls were only meant to fuck, why don't they also go for the les attractive? Why only beautiful girls? (Of course I'm glad some girls never experience it, it's aweful)
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
*snork*  At the end, I'm a little surprised he didn't tell you to stop being hysterical.  Yikes.
[deleted]
&gt;  Both women and men need to change their views. (Because I don't agree with them).
People have to have productive interactions with others of both genders.  He is going to hurt himself down the road if he continues buying into this bullshit.  Women aren't just there for romantic/sexual interaction.  He will have female classmates, coworkers, etc. his whole life.  Things will go better for him if he learns now that they are on equal footing with him.
do you have any evidence to support this, like statistics beyond this case? I've heard it before but I've never seen any numbers to back it up and it would be interesting to see
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
None of this even remotely hints about the prince side... this is just like asking "Who's your favorite Marvel superhero?" If you do find it creepy, then you'll looking too far into this.
Why are you talking about rights? Again, no one is trying to make this a legal matter. I'm not arguing for a "right not to be offended" (whatever that is) which sounds like something you just made up. You seem really confused about this. Like I said, if you don't care about the harm you cause when you say shitty things you're a shitty person and I'm going to tell you so. That's certainly my right. 
I'm curious as to what makes him sound smarter than her.
Nice cover, but you clearly either haven't read it, or you assume that other people will be too lazy investigate.   Under "Required Theory Reading", (it's the only PDF listed) from page 26 pf 29:"The date rape issue can be solved overnight by restoring shotgun marriage-but with the shotgun at the woman's back. The "victim" should be told to get back into the kitchen and fix supper for her new lord and master."   What do you understand that paragraph to mean?
[deleted]
I wish I was there so I could tell him exactly why being a "humanist" is an example of why people need feminism. People like him grind my gears. 
Thank you.
Hey, if you're doing it, why can't I? I mean, I'm following you're example after all. :)
[deleted]
not necessarily true. date-rape or acquaintance rapists tend to get off on much smaller sentences than coercive rapists, or not get charged at all. 
I will definitely try to be more conversational and hope that it helps! I probably do get businesslike when I've been calling for a few hours, which might sound curt/insincere to the person on the other end. I need to work on that. Thanks for the advice!
Because he was struck by her sparkling personality, wit, and conversational stylings? A dude saw a girl on a bike, the only information he has is her appearance. Are you sincerely telling me that this man took an interest in her because he wanted a relationship? He saw her on a bike, and thought "Man, I'd really like to have fulfilling conversations about my feelings on my life path and meet her parents." 
Doctors are people too.  Would you be saying this if this post was about a worker choosing to do the right thing instead of listening to a corrupt boss?
Sex work is a pretty encompassing term, which covers anything from prostitution to sexual performances.   See the UN definition here: http://prostitution.procon.org/view.answers.php?questionID=000849
Who would ever be offended by that joke? Isn't she just saying it's fine to make rape jokes?
At this point pretty much. First, they'd have to find the guy, which would be hard. Second, all the evidence the cops have is my word. Third, I have a mental illness, am trans and one look at my FetLife profile will tell them I'm into some weird stuff. Basically, unless he confessed to it (assuming he's even found), I'm screwed. 
Being feminine in general. Doing hair and make up is time consuming with little payoff, so I never bothered to get good at it. I can't walk in heels. I also don't get the appeal of salad. Also, being hairless. I'd love to be free of body hair, but I don't wanna shave every day, that takes too damn long. Also, spendng more than $10 on an article of clothes that isn't a bra. That's sheer insanity.
What if his life goal is to be in a meaningful relationship? 
It didn't feel small, it felt like a personal attack on me lead by my good friend.  And if I want to let the argument "waste my time" I should do so.
Why would you have sex without protection with someone you don't trust to be honest about birth control? Especially if you want to be careful about who the mother of any future children will be?  People can lie, of course, but if there isn't trust there at the start, why take the risk?  It's not victim blaming, it's saying take precautions and be responsible. If something like fatherhood is held in such high esteem by someone, they shouldn't be having unprotected sex with women they don't want mothering their kids.  Any woman who takes issue with it and isn't understanding isn't worth the intimacy anyway. They should understand and respect the guy's wish not to have kids and not see it as an insult, but rather, as a backup to their own desire not to have kids. 
My mom tried for 14 years through IVF (I think that's what it's called, I really know nothing about this stuff). She had more than 10 pregnancies that eventually failed through that, and she had tried to get pregnant before that naturally. She finally had my older sisters when she was 35 and was happy. Four years later she saw something weird on a test and doctors thought it might be cancer...nope, just me, the only baby she's ever had naturally, at 39 no less. She had no idea she could even have a kid naturally. Bodies in regards to pregnancy are really, really weird. 
I was a great test taker then dropped out of a major tech college after a couple of years...then went back and finished doing community social work and also got my masters. And a boatload of debt...I make 4 dollars more an hour than my friend who tosses pizzas.   School...tests...don't necessarily make you smart...and I don't really believe in smart vs stupid labels anyway. We all come from different backgrounds and have different experiences that form our understanding.  Ugh tests!
My wife uses my double edged safety razor for her legs. The blade stays sharper, longer, and the price savings are phenomenal. There is a bit of a learning curve and she uses Mach3's for detail work (back of the knees, etc). She also uses my lather kit on her legs. DE Safety razors will save you a huge amount of money for a relatively small initial investment. You can spend less than $60 to get started for a quality razor, sample pack of blades, and a quality lather kit. The sample pack of blades are to allow you to find a blade that is right for you. Once you find a blade you like, you are looking at less than $0.40 per blade for the most expensive Japanese Feather blades. We use Astra blades that I purchased in a 200 pack for $16. She can get 3-4 shaves(very thick hair) before the blade starts to degrade noticeably, so we end up changing them after two shaves. We're spending more money for water when she shaves than on everything else combined.  I would highly recommend looking at the men's movement back to classic double-edge and single edge shaving and applying that knowledge to shaving your legs.  If you are looking to get started, here is my (and my wife's) recommendation:  * $34 Razor: http://www.amazon.com/Edwin-Jagger-DE89Lbl-Detail-Chrome/dp/B002RBF1PO * $8 Osma Bloc (Stops bleeding when you get nicked, which will happen when you first start out): http://www.amazon.com/Bloc-Osma-Alum-Block-Ounce/dp/B004NEHR28 * $19 35 Blade Sampler pack: http://www.amazon.com/FEATHER-Oclock-BLUEBIRD-Blade-Sampler/dp/B004UIZFQW * $25 Lather set (We refill it with Dove Sensitive skin bars that I carve into shape when needed): http://www.amazon.com/gp/product/B004L4EING 
It only doesn't work if the individual in question values a monogamous long term relationship. Something that a lot of people don't seem to want to accept, a **LOT** of men do not consider that type of relationship valuable **at all**. So for those men, it works pretty much until they can no longer find what they consider, "fuckable" women.
[deleted]
I feel you.  I'm approaching the year mark of being single,  which is the longest I've been single in my adult life.  I was a serial monogamist who thought she needed a relationship to be happy.  While I have come close to getting into a relationship again, I haven't find the right person and I realized that I missed too much of my life chasing the wrong people.  I'm loving the life I have now - I just wish I had realized this when I was 20 instead of when I was 30. I think I would have been much happier much sooner .
Leave him.
&gt; Me personlly my go to is "wow an attractive girl like you single, do you have a tail or penis?" That way you know it is a joke to take the heat off a bad discusion.  Holy transphobia, batman. You should probably find a new line. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
this is normal and legally permitted in canada.  you have choices when getting married... your last name. his last name. both hyphenated. both not hyphenated. or you are  allowed to pick a new name for yourselves.  cool cool.
[deleted]
I just went through a rough breakup and have a lot of spare time on my hands too. My plan of attack has basically been to eat well, wake up early, go outside for most of the day, and read a lot. Also cleaning. Anything to get my mind off of my ex and keep busy. I definitely second learning how to play that guitar. I think the best thing about being single is being able to better yourself for your own sake. Also, reach out to any budding friendships you may have and try to cultivate them.  ETA: If you only bought the guitar because of your ex, try to sell it and find a different hobby. It's only going to remind you of him every time you see it.
[deleted]
Hell, I'd _prefer_ this - i like being nice, and it sucks having to hold that back because it makes a woman less attracted to me, but it does, and dickery turns them on.   Then again, one of the big things (and it's in RP) that's helped is setting and enforcing boundaries and not avoiding confrontation. Don't be agreeable, go after what it is that you want. _you_ have value, don't worry about if the current GF is going to get pissed and bail.
[deleted]
the eternal victim refers to feminism's tendency to always paint women as oppressed and without agency - when I'm looking for a fight, I tell people that I don't hate women nearly half as much as feminists do.  but you gave an honest answer, so you deserve an honest response: i don't think this is a result of social strictures. if anything, social pressure in the past reduced this tendency, basically formalizing the provider/wife roles. We've torn that down now, so women can pursue whomever they like, and men have little guarantee that playing provider will get them anything other than betrayal down the line.   It works more than not, but there's precious little protection for men if the women they marry get bored and wander off. So fewer men are doing this. Because it's a lot of work and the deal is getting more sour.
What is stated there is "They're 46 alleged rapes and 54 guesses at rapes that may have happened but not been reported."  Which highlights the question of how do you determine what percentage of rapes go unreported. Maybe you get a huge sample of people who you can convince to tell you they were raped, and whether they reported it, and you somehow make sure that no one is lying. How could you possible estimate (with a level of accuracy useful to these statistics) how many unreported rapes happen?  The second half of the problem here is that the subtext of the RAINN data source is some people had sex, and we as outside observers are going to call what happened rape regardless of whether the people involved do because our definition of rape is xyz whereas those people that engaged in the sex only consider xz or yz or xy rape.  If two drunken people go home from a club and have sex and RAINN considers that rape, then there is an unreported instance of rape that is being included in their data, despite opinions of the actual people involved.  Gathering data on rape is difficult as hell. And RAINN is attempting to do it, so they have their work cut out for them. But definitions must be explicit not implicit. If they are going to boil down this hot button topic to an infographic they should skip the step that claims they know how many unreported rapes there are.  If instead they went with "Out of the 100 reported incidents of rape 7 people will spend a day in prison" it would be less dramatic. (remember that we are still comparing apples and oranges, 100 rapes could happen, and 20 people go to jail, and that constitute a 100% successful conviction rate because each rapist raped 5 times) And it would still have a shit load of problems with it like counting "Well, the defendant spent five months in jail awaiting trial and was sentenced to four months service, so he gets no prison" as someone 'getting off scot free'.  And we don't know this was made by a man, all we know is somebody saw the title Out of '100 Rapes 3 Rapists will spend a day in prison', read the actual methodology, and saw that the title could just as easily been, Of the 9 rapes that go to trial, 3 people will spend time in prison.  Or, "Of the 5 felony convictions only 3 rapists had to spend time in prison because 2 of them already spent so much time in jail before being found guilty; (subtitle) Three fifths of the people who were found innocent effectively served time in full for a crime they didn't commit."  There is no way to get around it. The graphic put out by RAINN is an exceptionally poor case of data science. It is so bad that I have to believe they were bending over backwards in whatever direction would get them the most eye catching headline.
[deleted]
Well.. My boyfriend and I started as friends. Though I always thought he was cute, but I respected the boundaries of our friendship and kept it to myself. We talked all the time, joked around and poked fun at each other. Hell, I even gave him relationship advice. (this was all online at the time.) Last summer we went to a convention and met up there one day. We joked around and played some games, went to lunch with another one of his friends. At the end of the day we hugged and said goodbye and resumed our online talking.   Couple months later I went back to college (he lives nearby it) and he asked me to go to lunch with him as friends, so of course I said yes. A few days before he had gone on a date, I gave him advice and wished him luck. (boy was I crushing *hard*) When it didn't work out, the girl cut contact for no apparent reason, he and I set up an adventure. We were going to go to the movies or something but ended up staying on my campus. Welp, we ending up doing the naughty-no-no and he asked me out.   For me, I definitely prefer being friends first. You get to know the person on a deep level and then if there's a spark, you can go for it. A red flag would be disinterest, or harsh criticism. Disinterest is like asking questions and always getting one word answers or "idk" "idc" all the time. My ex told me that I was annoying, because I texted him a question.   I don't have a general timeline, I just go with it.  Sorry this was so long haha.   
&gt;Knowing what women want, and knowing what some women want, are the same thing.   I disagree. In almost any other situations, applying a trait from a fraction of a group to an entire group is going to draw arguments: Housecats love water. Movies are about disasters. Men just want NSA sex. It's not a particularly honest or accurate way of communicating.   &gt;Also, an appropriate opener would be "Does he?", not "Are they?" as "Are they?" implies that you are questioning the fact that they are responding positively to it.  I was. If only a small percentage of women are responding positively, which is a possibility, it's misleading to say women respond positively to his approach.  If you think I'm being 'picking fights', do you think it will further the discussion to try to pick fights in return?   &gt;Experience?  My experience and the world I live in don't at all line up with the idea that PUA and TRP mindsets are meaningfully successful. So I guess we have the same amount of evidence. 
Because there is a REASON both these things happen and to not acknowledge the social context is to oversimplify it for the sake of winning the argument.
If a girl sees a guys been single for awhile, they assume it's because no other girl wants him, therefore she should not want him either.  Of course, then you're stuck in the catch 22 of no women ever giving you a chance.
I can tell from the vernacular posted this guy is from misc. I'm not sure what a weir is supposed to mean though
&gt; and confidence is attractive  I wonder why so many of you find confidence to be so attractive. Confident women are great, but I'm just as attracted to women that are not confident.  But anyway, perhaps it is not easy for a lot of men to be that confident. Just human afterall. And especially if you used to be fat and nobody wanting to be with you. Maybe a few years with being an asshole will build up his inner confidence to at some point be confident without being an asshole.
I didn't say she wasn't?
Fuck off
My husband did the same (took my name). He didn't have a good relationship with his step-father &amp; family and also thought the combo of my last name &amp; his first name made him sound like a pirate. My nan was over the moon, as she had thought the family name would die out 'cause she only had granddaughters. 
It's really not that hard anymore to find a doctor that will do it.
I too am a shy person who hates confrontation, so I can empathize.  The question you have to ask yourself, is why do you care if somebody thinks that you are bitch? A hard lesson you'll have to learn is that not everybody will like you... No matter how good a person you are. A few will love you, more will like you, most will be indifferent, and some will absolutely hate your guts. And often they will do so for completely unfair, arbitrary reasons that you can do nothing about.  Why let this one comment take up so much of your headspace? Why put so much of your emotional energy into it? You think the girl who made this comment is crying over it?  You need to make a conscious decision to not be bothered by this kind of bullshit. It's just noisy static... Focus on the signal, your relationships with your bf, friends, family, etc.
There are easily as many guys who prefer modest breasts to super big ones. If your goal is to look attractive, I can guarantee that you that increased fitness will more than compensate for any perceived diminishment of your blobs' appeal. Get healthy, forget about worrying about breast loss.  
Lol. Come back in 10 years when you're my age and STILL having people assume you're under age. Being off by a year or two is pretty fair. 
The guy is trying to have a discussion with you. They're not trying to give you a hard time.
Eh, my weight shall cometh backeth. It always has and it shan't fail me now!...JK I'll see what the doc has to say once I'm 95 pounds again ha ha. Maybe I should find a scale sometime to make sure I'm getting up on these numbers. Although I rather my body deal with my weight accordingly.
&gt; My step father's attorney suggested that I was jealous of my mother and I had been seducing him for a while and while I wasn't at fault, I was complicit.  What the fuck kind of person do you have to be to even argue that?  I realize this is kind of tangential, but if you were a lawyer and got this case, would you really make this argument, even if it was the most likely to get your defendant off?   I'm so sorry, I admire that you had the ability to testify.
The patronizing you see happens to men, too -- by women -- all the time.  You just don't see it in the same light.
Yeah, made me say the phrase "Damn girl" without any hint of sarcasm for the first (and hopefully last) time in my life.
If he gets angry when you try  to talk ro him about sonething that bothers you then why are you two friends? 
Yeah, but anecdotal cases aren't really evidence.  I want real data. Thousands of cases that show a clear trend in money buying someone innocence.  It's all well and good people talking about the ruling elite, their dirty money and how it corrupts our legal system, but until someone backs their claims up with some decent level of evidence, I'm not really going to take the position seriously.  I think it might be the case that there are a few niche times when rich people get off quite lightly, but I'm sure the same is the case for really, really poor people too.  I'm happy to be convinced otherwise, but 'the affluenza kid' isn't really what I'm looking for as a convincing logical argument.
It's totally true, one study I read found that people who rated high on narcissism got a lot of positive attention from people because their behaviors were very similar to people who rated high on self-confidence, but not narcissism...  So basically when you first meet someone, narcissism and confidence are nearly indistinguishable from each other...
[deleted]
[deleted]
More than likely they were pressured into not cooperating by the rest of the family.
Great points. I'd also like to add you 'both' in a strange way share each others opinions, this seems like a microcosm of the Men's rights moments verses the modern feminist movement, basically they both claim to seek equality for the sexes, yet have massive hang ups over semantics's.    
The judge would have reviewed them, and then turned them over to the defence, who would have used them in open court--ESPECIALLY if the victim had even so much as hinted that she felt anything even remote pleasurable when she was being molested.   They (the defence) would have done that with the express purpose of painting the victim as a little slut who wanted it and who initiated the contact, rather than the sicko step-dad deciding he wanted some underage trim.  I'm so sorry that you seem to feel that victims do not deserve any rights to confidentiality when seeking counselling after being sexually assaulted.
[deleted]
[deleted]
You have to love yourself. Point out things that you KNOW are great and work off that. When I look in the mirror I don't like what I see. But what I do like about myself are my eye brows. They are really pretty and have a nice arch, I also like my eyes, they change color depending on my outfit or my mood, I like my lips, I dont know why.. I just do. I like how I can tell people exactly how I feel without feeling bad I like how I know when to ask for help.. And yeah it feels silly to say but you have to do it. I promise this feeling of insecurity is as temporary as you let it be.
Okay.
This submission was removed:  There are [other subreddits](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/wiki/related_links_and_discussions) better suited to this topic.      [2X FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/wiki/faq) | [2X Rules](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/wiki/rules) | [reddiquette](/wiki/reddiquette) | [reddit's rules](/wiki/rules)
I realize now it's not immediately obvious from the photo: it's not a ladies' shirt, it's for little girls.
[deleted]
[deleted]
It's simple. They guy repeated inappropriately touched his step daughter over a period of 3 years.  When this came to light, he paid Mom and step-daughter off.  That is why they didn't want to release the medical records so that she could testify. I'm sure that if he offered no financial compensation to them, her mother would insist on her testifying.  This guy got off easy because he is rich and it's not because justice is flawed.  It's because people are greedy and Mom is satisfied with the arrangement.
[deleted]
Do I feel that too many partners lowers my potential value? Fuck no. My value is based on who I am as a person, not how many people I've jumped in the sack with. If anything, more partners means I've had more practice which means I'm probably a better lover. My fiance doesn't care about my "number," I don't care about his, and if we did care, then we wouldn't be the type of person that the other wants to marry. We did want to know each other's numbers, but only because we were interested in exploring each other's pasts as we got to know each other, because those experiences help to shape the people we've become.  Numbers don't matter whatsoever. What does matter is if you are a kind, respectful and giving person when it does come to sex. You don't use it to hurt other people or as a means to end; you do it because you and the other person (or people) want to have fun, express intimacy, explore with each other, etc, no matter how many people that's with over the days or months or years. About the only thing you do need to worry about is getting tested for STIs because the amount of sexual partners a person has increases the risk for contracting one. But as long as everyone plays safely, it shouldn't be a huge issue.
If you think Christianity is a unified group, I'd be interested to know how. Other than believing inJesus as a savior, a liberal Quaker and a conservative one have little in common, much less bringing other sects into the mix.
Maybe it is your age. When I was around your age I could only orgasm from clitoral stimulation. Any penetration did nothing. It felt good and all, but never made me orgasm. When I was around 25 or so, I began being able to orgasm from sex, but only when I'm on top. I sometimes can barely feel penetration in certain positions (like spooning and missionary).   I'd say just give your body time and just continue to explore what makes you feel good. 
The problem is most the people here are looking at billionaire as guilty and the trial as a something procedurally necessary to punish him.  They are focused on the sentencing and not the convicting.  Every case, no matter who is involved, should have a presumption of innocence until proven guilty.  Without proof, there isn't much the court can do.  It is an unfortunate reality, not an attack on women or victims.  The only evidence is a he said/she said argument, which isn't enough to convict "beyond a reasonable doubt", which is the necessary burden of proof.  
[deleted]
[deleted]
I think I was pretty clear about the parameters under which I would consider your opinion. Until you come up with a credible source I'll just keep taking it at face value and calling it a shitty, terrible movie.  EDIT:  Check out the sources for [this Wikipedia article about Contracted](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Contracted_(film)). None of them, including an interview with the director, back up your claims. 
This has nothing at all to do with generalizations. This has to do with ONE GUY being a dickhead to a girl who did nothing wrong but a lot of people here seems to want to crucify her for, GOD FORBID, *not shaking someone's hand*. LOAD THE PITCHFORKS! THIS BITCH GOTTA *BUUUUUURN*.   I made my statement about sometimes (and I did say sometimes, tyvm) girls not wanting to talk to random *guys* because lately this sub has blown up with women recounting their catcalling and street harassment stories from the male gender. This is the topic on focus right now, stop trying to derail it. These guys think they are owed *something* just by approaching someone. Not sorry at all, they are wrong. I'll say it again, no single person is owed any reciprocation from anyone they approach. At all. Then not responding or ignoring you does NOT give you the right to become an aggressor and hurl insults! Grow up!   Edit: Changed "everyone here" to "a lot of people here". 
Based on the read of the article, the victim was not allowed to testify without the judge seeing the therapy records  What a backwards rule to say the least.  Therapy records of anyone, much less a child shouldn't be a basis of allowing someone to testify even if ONLY the judge was to see them.  Therapy should be a safe place and not a condition of testimony.  I don't see anywhere that the step-dad's medical records were requested anywhere.    I think everyone deserves a fair trial to prove guilt, but you can't stack the deck against the victim and then blame them for not "doing the right thing" in a stupid f'ed up system.
Thanks for stopping by to leave a negative, judgmental comment based on assumptions! Good on ya! 
Unfortunately the ideal world seen in utopia will never come to pass. You would have to replace humans with robots for people to do what's best rather than what they actually want.
&gt; was charged in 2011 with felony sexual assault but prosecutors had to seek lesser charges because they were unable to get cooperation or necessary records from the victim, Racine County District Attorney Rich Chiapete said on Friday.  There's your reason.  This is not a women's issue.
Yeah, I've been treated for anxiety/depression for a few months now, and I think it definitely helped, although I haven't yet talked about sex to my psychologist. I'll start to look at dildos online — there's a sex shop in town, but I'm way too shy to go in there.
Not judging your choice but like some other people posted; it seems like you have a high risk to be video taped or something worse like touched because you're in the clients home and maybe by yourself. If you need cash stripping might seem "safer" as in, phones and touching prohibited plus prob better money. 
Well that doesn't mean we shouldn't work to improve things. We can make things better even though we can't make a utopia. 
It doesn't really matter to me what the customers think. It's annoying when they become actively hostile and nice when they're cool and funny, but that's about it.  Also, yeah, I know about the risks I'm taking. Most sex workers do. You're not helping by being patronizing.
[deleted]
So I ended up asking if I could add him of FB because I just kept freezing when I would try to say the words. He said to go for it and after he approved the friend request I send him a message: "  Hey there! So I was wondering if maybe you wanted to meet up sometime outside of smoke breaks at work? You seem to be a really cool guy and i've enjoyed the little chats we've had out on the back patio." - Then I gave my number and told him to call/text me sometime.   He responded "Well thanks! I think you're really cool too. I'm sure we can make something happen." Which is a pretty solid yes to me. :D  I'M SO HAPPY I DIDN'T GET REJECTED. xD Now I have a plan a date in a city I don't really know with a guy I only know the basics about. Wish me luck!
The ones made simultaneously with your previous comment.
Get some therapy.
No. It wasn't.
[deleted]
Well, I'll check it out for sure. Thanks for the tip!
[deleted]
Haha, amazing reply. American laws are fascinating and your comment about Hungary police, well Czech police would say the same &gt;&lt;
The first couple times. But you get better at it. I used to only change mine in the shower for that reason. 
[deleted]
&gt;This obviously has a male aspect to it because women care what men think of them  HAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHA
It's not stupid! It's avoiding any bad news, and I think we've all done that to some degree. It's normal human behavior. That's why I choose the non-judgy doctors. ;) A midwife might be able to help. 
Exactly; actions always speak louder than words, this case is no exception
[deleted]
i'm a man. thanks for clearing that up. i never really thought about it that way. 
Truth is, a lot of guys have TONS of subconscious issues concerning women and their own masculinity and are unknowingly and instantly threatened whenever they feel a woman is challenging them in some way, whether it be intellectually, romantically, whatever. Even bringing up feminism, a topic which many men know little about because they do not actively pursue knowledge of it, can be threatening in it of itself to a typical guy who is uncomfortable being vulnerable in this way.  It is an unfortunate truth about gender in our culture, but the good news is more and more of us guys are becoming aware of our unconscious prejudices towards women and are working to actively combat them.   So, sorry you may have lost a friendship over feminism and gender issues, but trust that there are plenty of decent, respectful guys out there that perhaps deserve your friendship more.  - A Reformed Male Feminist 
[deleted]
No problem :) It can be hard to understand this sort of stuff unless you've experienced it, that's why I thought I'd try to explain. 
I guess it is beyond my abilities to help them. 
(not rhetoric question/attack at you)   so if a woman is sexually assaulted, why would a man receiving a sentence deter them from reporting? like ... if she doesn't report then she has to internalize it but if she does report and find him guilty then maybe she knows she has her experienced acknowledged in the eyes of the law and know she probably put a dint in her attacker's prospect. people with sexual assault charges get held back from working at a multitude of work places, you'd know their livelihood will be effected in punishment for degrading yours, so why not? 
You are not at all being unreasonable in wanting physical contact with your boyfriend.  There is a bit a truth to what sesimama is saying in that if your boyfriend does not want that at any point, you will probably need to find someone else to be with.  Relationships do evolve though, so you could move towards a physical relationship with him, if it's what you both want.  The real question is:  Does he want physical contact too (and just hasn't worked up to it yet), or does he not want to ever go there in your relationship?  You should talk to him about, specifically asking what he wants.
You're a human I admire! 
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
&gt; She didn't ignore him. She made eye contact, smiled, and kept walking.  She claimed to have smiled, said nothing about eye contact.  &gt; It is not necessary to social interaction to accept every handshake that is offered at a bar.  I agreed with that. Reading comprehension 101.  &gt; But she was at a bar, and had every right to choose not to interact with him.   Exactly, she was in a bar. People engage other people in bars. That's why most people go to bars. She's free to not interact, but in a bar you have to accept people wanting a chat. "Thanks, no" is enough for a normal person to know that it is indeed "no".  &gt; Additionally, OP isn't here to be berated for every little thing you think she could have done better. Guess what? If it wasn't refusing the handshake, it would have been having a boyfriend.  Are we talking about the idiot insulting her? Maybe (maybe not). Those people exist.  &gt; This sub is for support. It is a safe place to go to discuss women's issues.   A, this is a no-child-left-behind-sub... good to know. This sub is the feminine version of the red-pillers.  &gt; Or better yet, unsubscribe.  That's done. Circlejerk away, I'd say.
[deleted]
[deleted]
patronizing is different than telling the truth and reality of the situation
Boo! Flowers are nice! Down with the man who thinks he's too masculine for flowers. Chocolate and home made cookies are pretty great though, it's a solid idea.
And a lot of people don't like that sort of mind set when getting married. For most marriages it becomes "what is yours is mine". What happens when they retire? Is he going to keep that for himself and she gets to keep working? Or do they... you know... share it?
This doesn't sound like a situation where waiting it out is going to change anything. 
Name calling falls under rule 1.
[deleted]
[deleted]
I agree.
[deleted]
That may be the case, but even if it is the case for him, he's clearly chosen this particular method of dealing with it. If that makes you pity him that's your response, and it is what it is, but nowhere do I see any indication that OP is "taking" something from him in this transactional sort of relationship they have going on. Presumably if he wasn't being fulfilled in whatever way this is fulfilling for him, he'd end it.   BTW I think you're a good person for thinking about things from this perspective. 
"you can't love, until you love yourself" right?
Yup. You can call me judgmental on that one but I stand by my assertion.  He can't hold hands with someone he's known for 5 months, despite apparently wanting to for at least the previous month. That's anxiety that's interfering with his life in a real and appreciable way. 
It depends on being raised that way?  Or just discuss it with your SO.
[deleted]
I completely agree. While I will be a pretend extrovert at work, I refuse to do so in my personal life.   I grew up trying constantly to be more outgoing, and i'm so much happier knowing that I'm just introverted, not a weirdo. It's exhausting forcing yourself to be "on" all the time, and if I get called a bitch, then I probably don't want to know those people anyway. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
FALSE
No, I'm not straight either, but men are not a marginalized group. Men already have all of society as their own space. Same with straight people.
[deleted]
also Indian guy here. The situation is far more nuanced than "most guys are". Backwards ideals reinforced by tradition are not exclusive to makes either. Shockingly you'll see many women who turn a blind eye to these crimes as well.  There are varying "shades" of progressive thought. Some are farther along the road if enlightenment and tempered, reasoned thinking. It has become harder and harder to encourage progressive behavior amongst certain sections of the population because they see it as Western influence and then oppose it unequivocally regardless of merit or logic.  Even my parents used to think that homosexuality was a Western invention until I managed to slowly change their views over time. But I mean even today my dad just ranted about how Western pornography is causing the rape epidemic.  There is no epidemic. It has always been this way and as the population explodes it will become even more virulent and harder to control.   Saying "that's how it is, woe is life" will not to anything. Indian guys like you and me, besides setting a good example, should actively seek to speak out and change minds one at a time through dedicated argumentation and    progressives on the whole should organize. As of now the anti-rape efforts are scattered and the only thing they've managed to do is introduce a death penalty  - which, honestly, is stupid. The government is too busy placating the majority of the voter base which is far too reactionary to realize that rape won't disappear because the *punishment* is worse. But alas the so called progressive leaders are too busy sucking up corrupt money. The progressive voter base is disillusioned, so ultra conservatives like Modi and the BJP come into power.
By that logic that one guy you dated back in the nineties is welcome to have sex with you whenever he wants because at one point in your relationship you consented to it with him.   She isn't, she complains that it hurts and she doesn't get anything out of it. But she's obligated to do it because he's her husband and she doesn't really have much say in the matter. 
[deleted]
Nobody has still given any reasons having anything to do with this article. And I'm not saying you concocted the plan, it's a group tactic your sub is infamous for. And yes, before your late night brigade the discussion in this thread was much more civil, though the responses I was getting were so ridiculous all but 1 got deleted. I never knew about this sub before it was on the front page so I can't say what it used to be like but everybody knows all you guys do is troll and brigade people, and the real name calling starts long after it's out of view to the general Reddit population. That's probably less intentional and more just the fact that only you trolls are seeing the posts after their 15 minutes in the spotlight, but the fact remains, this was a different discussion before you came in here with your panties in an uproar.
Yea i have that problem. Finding that line to still let him know i'm interested and not being complete clinger is something that I'm working on. I know my limits! :D
So tell me. What facts am I missing?   All I'm doing is calling you on your bullshit statement of "maybe this is why women are afraid". This is not a simple case. For you to sit there and be condescending anyone who dares oppose your opinion is why nothing ever productive comes from these discussions.   I'm of the opinion that this one case offers very little IF ANY evidence as to why someone should hesitate to report a sexual assault. Like I said, this case is incredibly complex, and there are a ton of moving parts to it. Would you be kicking up this same fuss if a man got robbed at gunpoint, and his assailant went free? I said it before, but I think you do have a great opening for a discussion about how our legal system works. But this case isn't about a woman not being treated fairly because she was assaulted. It's about how the Justice system failed to deliver Justice in a specific case. But just because it didn't work here doesn't mean that that women and men shouldn't report future assaults. To draw that conclusion would be moronic. 
When you get unsolicited attention on a daily basis, ignoring it is usually the best way to deal with it. However in this situation she smiled at him, which is more than she needed to do, so in fact she didn't ignore him. Regardless, it's not rude to ignore a stranger who approaches you. I don't know what planet people are from that makes them think they are automatically owed politeness from strangers they attempt to interact with. 
So, first OP is probably ugly, then guys just want to dominate her?  Grreaaat.
I swear like a sailor but only around people I know well, and I don't call people names until I've gotten to know them and a) know they won't be offended by it, and b) I've called other good friends names around them so they know that's how I am and it's not a "joking" attack on them.
It is - it's valid because he's an educated man with his own personal set of experiences with feminists, many of whom use feminism as an excuse to belittle men.  This is not the textbook definition of feminism (which is what makes his view incorrect), but it is certainly valid.  An excellent analogue is Christianity or Islam - a Christian or Muslim can scream and shout that their religion is all about love and peace, but at the end of the day, they're still screaming and shouting instead of embodying the fundamental principles of their religion.  Others' perceptions are completely valid.
If you approach it that way, you're a fedora-wearing neckbeard nice guy.
Your mom doesn't know what she's talking about.  Being a virgin isn't important at your age.  What is important is that you are happy and healthy.  If you're involved with someone, and you both want to have a pants off dance off, that's exactly what you should do.  Sex is great.  Sex with someone you care about is amazing. 
No, but those women are the outliers. Their trauma is tragic, but they aren't going to lessen their trauma by endorsing anti-choice propaganda.   It's important to learn to accept not only your choices, but the choices of others. 
As soon as he said "I didn't mean to upset you." He was being kind to you then. He was trying to diffuse the situation. He was saying he wasn't trying to be rude and disrespectful or any other thing that would lead to you being upset. He was trying to apologize, not for his opinions, but for whatever it was that was making you mad. When you continued to be angry you basically rejected his apology. What else could he say but "Are you done?" He already tried to apologize. He can't just yell back at you, because you are a girl and if he starts yelling back everyone will look at him like he is a jackass for yelling at you. So all he can do is wait for you to finish. I don't start yelling at other guys unless I have good reason because I am asking for a fight. You can yell at him all you want. He knows it, you know it and you took advantage of that fact to reject his attempt at apology and yell at him. You didn't need any help from your boyfriend. From your boyfriends perspective someone offended you, apologized when he realized he offended you and you decided to reject their apology. He isn't gonna start beating up on the guy too! The guy already said sorry. You're the one who lost control and took advantage of the fact that you are a girl to yell at someone with impunity. He didn't dismiss you because you are a girl. He dismissed you because he apologized you were being a jerk by ignoring his apology and continuing to yell at him. edit; Even if your anger is justified, you accomplish nothing by yelling. In fact you hinder your own cause. If you had acted calmly at least he couldn't say "I met a feminist and she freaked out". Had you acted calmly even if he disagreed with you, even if he was rude to you, all he could take away is that other people have opinions different than his and that would be a good thing.
Just seemed weird is all.
[deleted]
http://youtu.be/iwxZzTjgr9U
No one said you had no character.  I actually think you're a decent guy so far.  And I promise you, I don't find Willy's comment at all inappropriate... that wasn't it at all.  I disagreed with Willy's implied conclusion, in no way do I think he was a bad person for coming to what I consider to be a wrong conclusion.  She was really just talking.  Thinking he was wrong was not a moral attack.  Thinking you are wrong is not a moral attack.  The one part of your character I did criticize is the way you take being told you are wrong.  I see your point of view, and I think you're wrong.  That's perfectly fine.  It's when we take offense to someone thinking we are wrong and turn it into a moral debate that things go badly.   I do that too sometimes.  We're all dicks, men or women.  But women tend to be able to say "oh, hey, I was being a dick wasn't I" far more often.  Men tend to dig in further.  This is not absolute, of course, and again I am a man.  We talk about self entitlement not because you're a horrible person but because every healthy person on the planet feels that to some degree.  Just because we acknowledge it in ourselves and other people doesn't mean we think you're a bad person.  I suppose I can't really speak for "we" on this one, so just because I acknowledge that in myself and see it in other people doesn't mean I think you're a bad guy.  I see that you are trying, and I think you might be misjudging this place.  This is where you come to learn to communicate with women, and learn the way they communicate with each other and prefer to be communicated with.  I honestly think if you take that approach this place would be good for you.  And I feel like you're welcome here any time.  Trust me, I've been told I'm wrong here plenty.  And so will you if you come back.  And that's ok.  We're all wrong a lot.  I've also dug my heels in here as well, and told 6 or 7 people "no, I still think I'm right and you guys are wrong".  It kind of sucks, but it's good for me.  I need to learn more patience, I need to learn better communication, and this is a good place to do that.  You need those things too.  And I think you're welcome here, just try and remember where here is.  This is the girls room, we talk their language here not ours.  And if you learn it here and now you'll be better off in the future.  Just try and see the perspective here and be open to changing yours.  You might be surprised how many of them really are open in return.
&gt; Stuff like this always upsets me, because having a minor repeatedly recount their sexual trauma is an insane task to even ask of a person  But what's the solution?  To convict a person on the basis of a police report?  To prohibit the defense from cross-examining the "victim" by probing their credibility, honesty and trustworthiness?  &gt;Clearly there's a reason it's needed with the nature of evidence for these crimes  Absolutely.  But it's more unfair to send someone to prison for a crime they didn't commit.
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
&gt; I feel like some men, and most woman (where I live anyway) feel like as a woman, we should want to find a guy, get married and have kids. Like that's all we're here for. It's really sad, and really frustrating.  I know exactly what you're talking about and these people are merely [Projecting](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Psychological_projection). The people who make others feel this way are usually those **who just HAVE to be in a relationship**. You know the type of person I'm talking about right? Ya know the ones that just can't be single, and even if they are single they never stay single for very long... I feel sad for *them* because there is sooo much more to this existence than just a relationship... I feel these individual are the ones missing out on life because they are too scared and insecure to be the ideal self.  In reality these people who make you feel this way are insecure and measure their own worth by whether or not they are in a relationship or whether or not *another* person gives them validation rather than the individual generating their own validation. It is sad and frustrating.
If the boundaries aren't set then you just don't go there. Don't know if your current partner is okay with drunken bdsm? Don't initiate when they're drunk until you're sure.  The only time you should "learn the hard way" is when you're trying something new that you've talked about and the boundaries that were set are discovered to be not okay. Then you stop and talk about how to make it okay.  Drunken sex isn't a thing you explore on the fly, because it's simply not safe.
Gosh, how difficult life must be when you're young and good looking and everyone wants to talk to you. Sometimes I just don't appreciate how lucky I am to be an unlovable monster who people barely notice.
Good on you for being able to get out of that situation so cleverly! And good on him for being able to admit that he was wrong, I hope he learned his lesson. 
Can you show me where it says anything about men being the opposition? Opposition in this context refers to those who don't believe street harassment is a problem, male or female. 
They don't.  Did your mom/dad teach you to open doors for people? To pull out chairs? To buy flowers for a guy on the first date? Most likely not. They probably DID teach you to expect/desire these things.
Here's what it says in the "Required theory reading" about women and men in love:  - - - - - - -  Women are incapable of loving men in a way that a man idealizes is possible, in a way he thinks she should be capable of.  In the same respect that women cannot appreciate the sacrifices men are expected to make in order to facilitate their imperatives.  .......  She’s not incapable of love in the way she defines it, she’s incapable of love as you would have it. She doesn’t lack the capacity for connection and emotional investment, she lacks the capacity for the connection you think would ideally suit you.  The resulting love that defines a long-term couple’s relationship is the result of coming to an understanding of this impossibility and re-imagining what it should be for Men. Men have been, and should be, the more dominant gender, not because of some imagined divine right or physical prowess, but because on some rudimentary psychological level we ought to realized that a woman’s love is contingent upon our capacity to maintain that love in spite of a woman’s hypergamy. By order of degrees, hypergamy will define who a woman loves and who she will not, depending upon her own opportunities and capacity to attract it.  ..........  If it is beyond what a woman is capable of, therefore even if a woman recognizes this incapacity in herself, is there no way to compensate? What if a woman truly desires to try to move beyond this? Does she just consider it a hopeless matter and do nothing?  I don’t think it’s necessarily impossible, but it would take a woman to be self-aware enough that men and women have different concepts of their ideal love to begin with, which is, improbable. The biggest hurdle isn’t so much in women recognizing this, but rather in men recognizing it themselves. So, hypothetically, yes you could, but the problem then becomes one of the genuineness of that desire. Love, like desire, is only legitimate when it’s uncoerced and unobligated. Men believe in love for the sake of love, women love opportunistically.  - - - - - - -   **The fallacy here, of course, is that many men are loved by women they way they want to be.  The people who say "this is true, no one has proven it is false" are the ones who don't have that relationship.  Go find people who have it, there are plenty.  They disprove this theory by their existence.**  That said, I have met women who fit the description of hypergamous.  I don't deny their existance.  What I deny is that the majority of women think of love in those terms.  You are essentially saying women are gold diggers, when women leave far better "mates" for much worse prospects for love.  Rich, good looking, successful....left for some bum she has to support.  That is the opposite of hypergamous.  Being a slut, by the way, is the opposite of hypergamy as well.  Those things are directly opposite of each other.  If women by their nature are hard wired to be attracted to the alpha and shun the betas, then they wouldn't sleep around.  Your concepts are so broken that even the most basic contradict each other.  And anyone with eyes can find that lovely couple who's been married 50 years..or 20 years...or 1 year for that matter, and breaks the mold of hypergamy/women loving "inferior" mates wide open.  You have to blatantly ignore reality in front of your face that disproves these theories to agree with this stuff.  My mom loved dad in every way, still does.  He was poor as hell when they met and had no game.  He has no idea how his sons got game, but it's because we saw a good relationship and know what it is.  That's what people want, gay straight men women, everyone is the same.  We all have the same minds, we just like different bodies and different socialization.  That doesn't mean every man has the same mind as every woman.  It means some women have the same minds as some men, and other women have the same minds as other men.  People is people.  Gay, asexual, dominant, submissive, transgender, more masculine, more feminine (no one is absolutely either)....you find it in both sexes.  You find every "type" in both sexes.
[deleted]
His initial reaction was that he raped her.  Her initial reaction was that he did not.  Why is the only possibility that he did?  She was blackout drunk.  Just because she does not remember giving consent does not mean that she didn't.  The fact that he reacted as he did points to him not remembering what actually happened.  If he raped her and he knew it it's doubtful that he would have brought it to her attention.    She may not have actually said "yes, I consent to engaging in sexual activities with you tonight".  But they have been together two years.  They have had sex.  Drunk sex and sober sex.  I've been with my wife for 11 years, and short of the first couple times we have never said something resembling the asking for and giving of consent.  After that it just happens, and if one of us initiates and the other is not feeling it we say so.  So if the guy in this situation initiated sex and she did not do or say anything to indicate she did not agree, it's totally reasonable that he should see no issue with continuing.  That does not automatically make him a rapist.
[deleted]
Australia's last Prime Minister was a lady, and the US currently has a black president. Equality in that regard IS better now than it ever has been.      The way some people treat women, however, is a completely different story.
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
Why is it my responsibility to be the representative for all Feminists...?
If he thought of it as rape, it sounds like a boundary had already been established though. He was explicitly aware of her approval of it, but did it anyway. It isn't a grey area where he wasn't sure she would be ok with it or not.
The survey breaks down type of harassment as well and no one reported dirty looks. 
paid for by the no shit sherlock foundation  As a man i can confirm i don't have time to go out of my way to help someone if i am busy. but if a really cute girl needs/asks for something. i am going to try to chat her up and get to know her and just run late. 
But...can't she love lipgloss AND science?
well yes it's fine that she fuck's whomever she wants to, but that's not what he was asking.  he was saying "i dont see how i'm any different from the other guys she's fucked, so why won't she fuck me".  while your response was "she can fuck who she wants to.  she doesn't have to fuck you".  well yes, that's fine and true, but he wasn't asking that.  so i could understand why he "didn't really get it".
The allusion to Peter Pan had little to do with the current conversation? If you wanted to allude to Brier Rose or Sleeping Beauty it would make much more sense.  I am not twisting the definition of anything! The word has more than one definition and the definition I provided does not have to apply to land. Have you ever heard of "The Rape of the Lock"? ( hint, "the lock" is a lock of hair taken unwillingly from a woman).  I am not attempting to belittle the experiences of rape victims. I am attempting to explain the reasons I felt that the film included a scene that is analogous to a sexual rape. Was Maleficient raped in a physical, sexual sense, no. Does this scene in the film parallel a sexual rape, yes I feel that it does.  She is drugged by someone she knew and trusted, she has something physically and violently taken from her, something that previously represented her power over men. She wakes up alone, distorted, confused, crying, and physically/mentally scared. The parallels to a rape are all there.
I'm saying let him be shitty to women who like to be treated shittily. Because that "shit" attitude, is just him calling for sex from other women who want it. That may not be you, that's not a lot of woman, but he is catering to those who do, and who enjoy that personality. One day, he'll either find that he wants a woman who doesn't just want him for sex, or maybe he won't - whose right is it to care? There are women who are just the same with men, and treat men for sex. One day, they'll either decide they want a man for different reasons, maybe they won't. He's not disrespecting all women, he's disrespecting women who like to be disrespected. Might other women get caught up in it that he tries to flirt with? Sure. But what will they do? They'll blow him off and look for a guy (or girl) that cares. He's just a person being a person. He's not being a misogynist, he's being horny. 
[deleted]
I've known him for a long time, and I do believe earnestly that he's a good guy **with this exception**. If we were to break up, there would be other reasons that didn't involve this event.
you could ask her if she wants to talk or if she has someone that could come down and support her (in case the hospital hasn't already taken care of it)   you could say that you heard what happened and that you feel sorry and if theres anything you can do to make her feel better.
Baby wipes are amazing for cleanup.
[deleted]
Thanks for the wise words, 1950's!
[deleted]
&gt; I have no interest in what you have to say  I think that's a pretty terrible attitude in any context...
[deleted]
I empty mine in the shower after sleeping with it in, but during the day I just change it regularly and bring a water bottle to wash it/me out
I don't think most parents are purposely trying to stifle creativity or interests in science/technology.  They just seem overprotective of their daughter and don't want her to get dirty/injured.  **Edit**: Geez I wasn't saying that it's right to be overprotective of your daughter. I'm just saying that parents intentions normally aren't malicious.
[deleted]
The only thing you can do is be the change you want to see. When, if, you have a child of your own don't pass on your grandma and mother's archaic outlook on virginity. Just teach them to have safe sex. Not that I'm saying it doesn't suck to be treated that way by your own family and I'm sorry that they can't be mature about it. And really, if I had a nineteen year old that was having sex I'd be more worried about what kind of person she was with and how he treated my daughter than ' oh no! She isn't a virgin anymore, she's used goods!' Kind of sad if that's all they care about.
&gt; With that in mind, see it from the mother's perspective. A broken condom, an accident, causing her daughter to become pregnant. In the home country (assuming immigrants), in the wrong part of the United States (assuming Texas), or just a few years in the past, similar situations would have pulled the daughter out of college to support/raise a child ruining her future.  That's true and understandable , but then *that* is what they need to tell her. Not some religious hooey about loosing your virtue or damaged goods, but exactly what you said. 
&gt; I don't believe that the poster has ever met a feminist like the ones he describes. He's just repeating things other people made up on the Internet.  Of course - it's easier to simply dismiss a man's perspective than it is to understand that he has his own set of experiences and perceptions.  I've had a feminist look me in the eye and tell me that I, like all men, am *unable* to view a woman as anything other than a sexual object.  I've had another feminist sit across from me and scream at me that I'm "stupid" because I don't share her exact worldview.  Intelligent, egalitarian men have these kinds of experiences all the time in the face of feminism.  These aren't "extreme members" - these are everyday, run-of-the-mill feminists.  It's not on your shoulders to apologize for them, but you do need to acknowledge that they exist, and they don't do the movement any favors.
1) I thought I should, but like if I don't 100% have to, then I'd prefer not to.   2) I think I'm going to ask one of my close friends to drive me to planned parenting this weekend- I don't have a car:/. I also think I'm going to take a regular drugstore pregnancy test this week but until then I don't know what to do... Thank you for your advice:) 
Then I'd talk to him about how you don't want to push him too quickly, but you would like to move forward.  Maybe try holding hands at home watching a movie or something (asking him about it first) so there aren't other people around and there's a little bit of something else to focus on... therapy might still be a good idea too if little things like this prove impossible.
Take a test before you burn any bridges. You are in my thoughts in this tough time.
Good luck! Planned Parenthood is also a good option, as they can give you really good guidance no matter the outcome of the test.
I think I'm gonna make an effort to go regardless, and talk to my parents seriously about birth control... My dermatologist recommended it for acne, which is just another reason to get it. 
[deleted]
Have 2 in diapers, I keep a stock in bathrooms but whenever I need them they are all gone. 
[deleted]
'lol' right back at ya, cheese dick.
Ah. Did not see the WSJ article. Thank you for pointing it out.
I am running out of different ways to say it. Let me try again..  In the Rape of Nanking, the Japanese Imperial Army committed unspeakable atrocities against the Chinese. If we pass a moral judgement against them, we disassociate ourselves from what they've done. It was the Japanese Army, the Japanese, War, or anything except something that people did to other people.  In the Great Leap Forward, tens of millions of Chinese starved to death leading to cannibalism done so publicly that children were sold by weight in markets for food. If we pass a moral judgement against these people, we disassociate ourselves from it. It was the Chinese, it was Mao, it was anything except acknowledging that we would do it too or that it reflects on us too as people.  In the Irish Church, children were used as test subjects for vaccines eventually used to save hundreds of millions to billions of people. Much like the Nazi medical research we recovered, and used, this medical knowledge saved countless people. If we pass a moral judgement against the Church, the people of the time, poverty, or anything else, we also ignore our own complicity in receiving the vaccines the children gave their lives for. We do that while absolving ourselves of association saying it was their failing alone instead of all of ours as people.
Thank you for the feedback!  My goal is to create and conduct my own primary study and compare that to the tons of research already published. The brackets selected for each questions, reflect those published in secondary research surveys - for easy comparison.
I've actually been thinking about this a lot myself, this is the first time I am writing so let me know if it doesn’t make sense.   The truth is up to this point feminism has been great for women and changing their mentality providing them with the encouragement to be independent and seek equality.  However we are at a current cross roads where feminism is stagnated because men have not evolved, mentally, as women have. Men still see women as women and "the boys club" is still prevalinent.   Until a man can look at a woman and see her for more than her gender we can't really move on, men need to be able to find their new roles in our progressive society.   Being career driven myself I've started try to be "one of the boys" because at the end of the day I can be just as ruthless and can talk to them about the same topics as any other guy however I constantly get told "oh no its boys talk" ... this is excatly the issue, their mentality is still stuck in the same gender talk.   
I used to get acrylics all the time; now I do shellac because they last better and it's less damaging to my nails. I sometimes would get an airbrush design, which cost a few dollars extra (depending on how many nails I wanted airbrushed). I don't know if they would do a design you brought in - I would ask!  
Ravenous has this great homoerotic tension that gets me. I also used to quite like re-watching Secretary for its hotness.
[deleted]
Often there are severe physical injuries that can be documented by medical professionals. 
Sounds like you had sex while you're a mature adult in a committed relationship. There's nothing wrong with having sex while you're a mature adult and with someone you trust. Rock it girl and enjoy it sex is meant to be fun.
"The danger is that it works" - all this wishful thinking. Keep deluding yourselves. Sometimes women just want to have sex and don't care if you're an asshole, just like when guys sleep with girls who happen to be bitches, it's not *because* they're bitches, and women aren't retarded enough to credit their bitchiness. 
When he told me they didn't sell it I wasn't sure if he meant all of this particular chain of grocery stores (pharmacy was in the store) so I asked him to clarify and he told me (can't remember his actual phrasing) that HE was refusing to sell it to me. I just said "ok" and turned and left. Honestly, I was kind of shocked as I didn't realize that it was legal for them to refuse to sell it.  I guess he got some satisfaction out of denying it to me (that's the smug I mentioned, he looked very pleased with himself), but I live in a huge city ... I just went to another pharmacy down the street.
I am no expert (you can look at my post history to see how that goes), but this might be something you should talk about with a therapist. There may be a reason you don't want to go any further with these men.  If you think it is just a case of nerves, and I would still recommend talking to a therapist, you can try to buy some really sexy underwear, some liquid courage (half bottle for me!), and talk to him.  "We cuddled, I gave you hair scrtiches, let's go have dinner."
A hand fan. They come in handy so often.
Who knows? So leave.
I view it in a sort of similar way. To me it's like decoration, no different than rings, bracelets, scarves, etc. It can pull together an outfit, draw attention to your best features, or just plain look neat with pretty colors and artistry/designs.
Well I mean they are pretty standard parts of evolutionary biology is what I mean.  So they are applying those theories to human behavior are they not?  What is the difference in your view?
As a guy I agree with this, and would also add that the girls who have received more of the chivalrous treatment from me haven't even been the ones I was the most attracted too. I just thought they would get a kick out of it.
Guy here, when meeting prospective partners wherever the last thing I think about is "is she a virgin?" or anything to that effect. It really doesn't matter honestly and the mindset that virginity is to be sought after is quite old fashioned. Long story short, no, you are not "damaged goods" and there is absolutely nothing wrong with you or with having consensual sex. 
I second that. None of my friends ever have band aids and when they injure themselves are always shocked when I whip one out.
&gt;But what's the solution? To convict a person on the basis of a police report?  Obviously no one's suggesting that, in fact what I said had nothing to do with consideration of evidence besides testimony. It's a complicated problem, and one that we haven't exhausted the solutions for.  &gt;To prohibit the defense from cross-examining the "victim" by probing their credibility, honesty and trustworthiness?  Yeah, but that's the point. Do you really think cross examination of a five year old rape victim is going to give you the unimpacted truth? Is the intimidation and trauma going to make them more likely to change their story, drop the trial, etc regardless of what actually happened?  A naive view of rape victims as just another witness taking the stand is unfair and unproductive to both sides. There are legal exceptions in rape cases, and for good, vetted legal reason.  &gt;But it's more unfair to send someone to prison for a crime they didn't commit.  I never understand why the dichotomy. Every time I mention that the law could be improved the immediate reaction by people with your viewpoint is that that entails sending more innocent people to prison.
Boys CAN love lipgloss and science...and they can hate lipgloss and science too if they want to!
Er no? They're about as sexist as girls nights are. Aka they aren't. Guys like to have time to hang out with other guys, just like girls like time to hang out with other girls. 
Not at all! Maybe it's just how I was raised, but the man is supposed to make sure nothing bad ever happens to a woman. Perhaps it's a masculinity issue. If the guys were to, for a lack of a better term, "friend-zone" her, then I wouldn't necessarily see an issue with it. There are a lot of variables to the question you're asking, and a lot of different answers at that as well.
Conflict of interests.  (stereotypical example): guys like to talk about sports and violence and women like to talk about chick-flicks and that new girl at work.
Well it shouldn't really make a difference, unless maybe you take triphasic pills and it's just the dose for the second week that happens to do that?
The difference there is one is doing something physically to the other person without their consent, and the other is not. You're harming the person financially and legally in one case, and physically in the other.
Do I see how sociopathic that is?  No, and neither do you.  If you were nice to someone and they responded by spitting in your soup, would you keep being nice to them?  Are you a professional saint?  The reincarnation of Ghandi, maybe?
Actually it all fits in a standard bucket purse about 12" by 12". I make my own kits to save space.
&gt; pins me to the floor, kissing and groping me as I tried to push him off of me.  Are you fucking kidding me?  Kissing someone and seeing if they respond is making a move. This shit isn't 'making a move'. Doesn't sound like he 'let' her go either, she managed to trick her way out of the situation.
[deleted]
Thanks for the link!
Honestly I think the difference lies in low-percentage vs. high-percentage.   Obviously it's individual as well, but most people I know (including myself) who turn unpleasant has been drinking liquor and the hard-stuff rather than beer or other low-grade alcohol.  I had to stop entirely from drinking liquor when I was 22 because it just made me such an asshole that I didn't have shreds of joy of the night-out afterwards, not to mention how annoying I was to others I was out with. Which isn't how it ought to be.   Drinking beer or other low-percentage is at least a more easier curve to handle and you don't get "pop!" suddenly drunk out of your mind that a few shots of tequila will. 
If you camp often why not get a portable toilet? Thats what I always used growing up when we would camp often, and it was amazing. You can even get little tents that go around them.
Well that's not quite what she said now is it? She actually answered the question by stating colleges probably don't want a bad reputation so it might be ignored, then gave some advice after. But hey, why look at the facts when we can jump to conclusions.
Same here. My bf had an acquaintance who had been accused of rape twice but the charges never stuck. I had never met him, and all of his friends defended him. My first encounter was hearing a smallish girl at a party ask him to "stop touching her and go away". What a joy he is
[deleted]
Did you watch the video?  &gt; I am through lying still/just a body to be/Beaten, fucked, and if I’m lucky, left for dead/  Yeah, so whiny. Speaking out against sexual violence, that's... Whiny.  &gt;Even if you’re only a boy/ you can/Fight like a girl  And let's ignore the reference to male victims of sexual violence and their inclusion in the fellowship of the oppressed. Because that's just... Whiny. 
This is absolutely true. I live in Oregon and very rarely, if ever, get catcalled. I spent a summer in Ohio and experienced catcalling at least once a week. It was a very unsettling experience.
I don't think you're a troll just because you disagree with me. I thought you were a troll because of the way you had gone about it. "*Nuh uh*" is not very effective communication.   Maybe it's my fault, for stumbling upon your post later than the other people who responded and jumping in anyway. For that, I apologize.   Buf if encouraging people to protect themselves is a good idea, and if it's proven to be effective in reducing incidences of violence, why would bringing it up in a national forum watched by millions of people be a bad thing?  You've said you expected a 'watered-down, non-controversial' answer to the question. Could you be more specific about what you'd have liked her to have said?
Thank you for your honesty! Yeah, this is sort of what I fear...
How do you know that? Generalizing? Stereotyping?
Yep, it's really frustrating how a lot of men have had these standards ingrained into them due to the media. 
[deleted]
Woah, why the hostility. I'm also speaking as someone who has an understanding relationship with my brother. I never said you should try to reign him in. Have you spoken to him about how you really feel? What is this "about" then?  What's your grand advice to OP? On second thought, I don't feel like listening to your response. You haven't really said anything to in this reply. Bye.
I have never seen any of that in /r/mensrights again for anyone who wants to check it out for themselves. Sorry for trying to distinguish two subs whose views I find abhorrent and misogynistic from one sub that I believe is trying to do something good.  
I hear ya. If I had a face like Audrey Hepburn and the patience to do my makeup like hers, I would chop my hair off with a quickness. Alas, we make do with what we have.
Are we really going to accept shilling from Verizon? Does reddit have the memory of a goldfish? Do all you need to do is say "girl power!" and you get to the top of this subreddit?
[deleted]
I'm not as bad off as your girlfriend, but I've been raped and I have some hang-ups in the bedroom. The following is advice to help her be more comfortable with you in the bedroom. I'd like to preface this with a strong recommendation that she see a therapist. Not a sex therapist, because this extends outside the bedroom. I'd recommend a Cognitive Behavioral Therapist. They teach people how to deal with trauma/anxiety/other disorders and can specialize in sexual violence.   There are certain things that are, without exception, **not allowed.** My SO has an easier time knowing what's what because I'm usually comfortable talking about it and he knows what to do when I'm triggered/how to avoid it. For example, he can never mention how tight my vagina is. Not during nor after sex, *especially* in a positive manner. This cannot and will not change. I'm giving you an example just to help out- triggers vary based on experience.  -Take note of the triggers she has and do your best not to start them, for instance, since she gets panicky when she doesn't know for sure it's you, say something like, "hey, girlfriend, it's me." when you come in.  -NEVER take her consent for granted. Assume every time you two get frisky it's a wiped slate, unless she tells you otherwise. My SO does this with me -and started without my prompt- and I was shocked at how much more comfortable I became with him sexually. **With him, my lack of consent is not a point of negotiation, it is a statement.** This is not something that had even occurred to me before we entered the relationship. My ideas of my own consent were far more timid and I'm a bit embarrassed and how much I've learned just from having a supportive and patient SO.  -Obviously, I don't know how sex is preluded with you two, but how often does she initiate or escalate? If you tend to lead, back off more and let her take charge, moving your hands where *she* wants them (as long as you're OK with it). This will help her feel more in control and safer around you.  -Unless she says otherwise, don't try anything while she's inebriated in any way. Couples have different rules for that sort of thing, so I don't know where you two are with that. If you show her her consent is highly valued, so much so that you always want to make sure she's enthusiastic/consensual over anything else, she'll start to feel safer around you and in the bedroom.  If anything in here came off as assumptive or doesn't reflect you/your relationship, I apologize and am happy to be properly informed.  Feel free to PM me as well.
&gt; There is a toxic, limiting, one-dimensional notion in our society that girls can grow up to be either powerful, strong, educated brainiacs or weak, vapid, self-absorbed, passive bimbos.  ...combined with the notion that you're *either* a scientist *or* cool and successful, regardless of sex. 
Lol, you and a certain character on orange is the new black!
Here's some advice, don't call this dude back and if he calls you tell him to fuck off
It all depends on facial structure. :) Anyone can rock short hair, it just takes a LOT of google images to sift through, haha.
[deleted]
Wow really?
not really being to able to know whats going on down there... -_- it just does whatever it wants, which is fine most of the time, but sometimes it  goes really crazy, wetting everything :( this happens even more when i'm outside... anyone else having this or got some advice?
Oh man, sounds like something in /r/asianparentstories .  I wish you strength until they lay off or you get out of there.  Can you distract them?  There's so much nonsense I've dodged by having an older sister out of the house disobeying them, I could just bring her up and they'd be off my case.  I wouldn't directly argue with them unless you have your own place to retreat to or are safely separated by an ocean.   Sorry you have to deal with that.  The force of cultural expectation can be a crushing burden.  It's sad, but it's common just to lie about anything that will upset them.  My cousin is pretending to be Muslim long enough to get permission to marry his gf (she is also secular and just going through the motions) Her family is very religious and overseas.  I think their plan is get through the wedding and then "gradually" lose faith by the time there are kids.  He's actually half Jewish, they're both atheists or at most mildly spiritual.  I never told my mom anything about my sex life.
 I guess I can understand your need to patronize her brother…  But what I don’t understand are your racist comments.  You are implying that the ‘traditional uneducated Indian male’ has an outlook similar to that of a cult.    Additionally, you are implying that village girls in india willingly accommodate to the unreasonable male because : A) they are from a village or B) they are indian, or both?  You somehow managed to be racist and sexist in the same silly sentence.    Such uneducated and condescending comments about another race and demeaning view of the ‘village girls’ only highlight your ignorance.  
Yes, this so much! I hate it. It's like a vicious circle. Women hover because they're worried about a dirty seat, the seat is dirty because women hover. :| 
[deleted]
I agree with your comment 100%.  It can be hard to believe that at 18 though. And honestly, makeup is amazing. It takes practice to do well, and find the right fit for you, but the right combination can do wonders for just about anyone, I believe. If being "plain" is making your life miserable, really exploring and learning to apply makeup will almost definitely improve your physical appearance.  I say that as someone who hardly ever wears makeup. When I was younger my attitude was "well, I'm not pretty so I feel silly even trying" and now it's some combination of laziness and "I shouldn't have to look extra-attractive to succeed in the workplace." However, I did start wearing it for dating and the like - if nothing else it increased my confidence in that particular area.  I doubt I'm exactly striking blows right and left for women's lib in the workplace with my lack of mascara, and I get one should look clean, professional, put together etc. But I resist the idea that to look professional I need to have flawless makeup - it just seems to underscore that women are still getting judged on their looks, at least subtly. (Yes, men absolutely have to dress well, etc, too - and I don't envy them the beard upkeep by a long shot. I trim and shape my eyebrows, get rid of little mustache hairs and the like, and use spot concealer if I get a particularly unsightly zit. But that's the extent for work.)
* *Shame*. Fassbender. Naked. So naked. * Pretty much anything with Alexander Skargaard. Naked.  * *Sherlock*. Sherlock (Benedict Cumberbatch) getting roughed up.  * *Star trek Into Darkness*. Anything involving Benedict Cumberbatch as Khan.  * *X-men: First Class*. Fassbender speaking German.   Edit: I don't buy into the idea that women as a rule aren't visual creatures. I think that's a heteronormative myth. 
&gt;I, personally, never do or say anything drunk that I wouldn't do sober  I'm the complete opposite. 
This will not work.  Tri-Ohasic pills can not be (reliably) used to skip periods. Some women who have been taking tri-phasics for a while can get lucky and delay their period, But because you have not been taking this pill before, its highly unlikely it will work to delay your period.   It wont hurt you though. You can start taking the pills now, there is no reason you can't, you may get lucky, It may work at delaying your period if you take all the pills as intended.  Its more likely that you will spot when you are supposed to get your period, Which may still be preferable to a real period. Your homones will be all over the place once you start taking the pills, and they will be all over the place once you stopped, so you are looking at a month or two of PMS craziness if you do start a tri-phasic mid cycle.  You are better off to try and get hold of a Monophasic brand of pills, they are more reliable at delaying a period even if you have never taken birth control before. You can start a monophasic pill mid cycle without as much hormonal fluctuation as what a tri-phasic would cause.  Even when taking birth control properly (at the start of your cycle) its a gamble to know how it will effect your period. You just don't know if it will work until you try.
The review from the [Escapist](http://www.escapistmagazine.com/videos/view/escape-to-the-movies/9291-Maleficent-An-Unusual-Fairy-Tale-of-Revenge) was interesting. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
I recently watched *Don Jon*, and while I adore Scarlett Johansson, the scene with Julianne Moore and Joseph Gordon Levitt was *so* hot. If you've seen the movie, you know which scene. If not, watche the movie!
&gt;The world is doing just fine, you're the one with the issue. You're the one having problems. Work on you.  I hate to sound like a troll and I'm sure I'll be swiftly labeled as one, but all of the posts on this forum directed at women say the precise opposite, that if they are unpopular with a group of people, or that if they are not approved of by a certain person, it's society or the other party which needs to change. 
[deleted]
Sometimes I'll try and set a time limit where I have to eat something, but almost all food I look at makes me cringe. I've tried eating little spoonfuls of peanut butter since it's full of protein and is one of my favorite foods, but I almost can't even stomach the smell. Once I asked a friend to eat dinner with me so they could make sure I ate and that worked but I can't call someone to eat all my meals with me and I'm really trying to figure out how to do this on my own. And I think one of the worst parts is that if I do eat my body digests it super quickly and in about 5 minutes I'm incredibly hungry again but I know I won't be able to eat anything.   
Yeah, the dad shouting "WOAH WOAH WOAH" because he assumes she's incompetent at handling a dangerous object really hit home.  That gut reaction that tells you they don't believe in you.
That really depends on the makeup. Some can actually help get rid off acne. Either way, as long as you're not allergic to it, makeup shouldn't be harmful for your face as long as you remove it every night and have a decent skincare routine.
I think you're reading too far into how the message was delivered, but the overall meaning is that the girl was raised to care about appearance, which culminates into the girl putting on lipgloss.
Alcohol affects everyone differently.   This is someone who should not drink.   I'm a male over 50,and I have to say, all the dates I have had go bad on me years were ones where she had been drinking.    Find somebody for whom a date is not just another excuse to drink!
In threads like this OP is looking for support, not advice. Here in TwoXChormosomes we believe the OPs. If they are making it up, it doesn't hurt anybody, they don't even get any karma as they are selfposts. If they are not making it up saying that they are causes unnecessary damage, and may dissuade the OP from reporting the incident.  If anybody feels that a post is irrelevant, please downvote it instead of commenting unnecessarily.   We don't ban people for making comments that are removed unless they have been warned about it a couple of times. 
&gt; I seriously have no idea what to do, and any advice from you lovely people would be extremely appreciated.  The OP.
HAH.  I accidentally do this to my boss all the time.  First time, I asked him how long he was willing to stand there (he said longer than you will) and I took it as a challenge :3 He was sooo angry after he walked through that door ;)  Now he just shakes his head at me and walks through the door, grumbling. XD
[deleted]
[deleted]
Glad I could help! Haha. Redditors can get a little out of hand. Don't let anyone discourage you.  Don't freak yourself out, hand holding, and kissing, and cuddling, and all that other stuff will come with time. He could just be a diamond in the rough.   :)
[deleted]
[deleted]
Lots of hugs and love. I feel your pain and it's so saddening to read, you really sound broken and nobody should ever go through this.
[deleted]
[deleted]
&gt;I've never even had a conversation with a woman my age in my entire life. That's probably why I have trouble with women.  I'm not saying this to be rude, but I really don't understand. How can you have trouble with women (I assume you mean romantically) if you've never had an interaction with a potential romantic partner?
Yes!  My best friend and I had kind of a cult around this movie and David Bowie, I don't think we ever realized why we were watching it over and over and over....  I wonder how many of us cut our sexy teeth on that children's classic.
Yeah, good point. I haven't been under a whole lot of stress because school has ended, but I have entered a new relationship that I am nervous about. But I doubt that would cause too many issues. 
I'm 34 and I have dark purple and lilac hair... do what you want!
Yes you are. Don't listen to these idiots saying just do it. They are the socially oblivious people who actually believe their friends when they say it looks lovely through gritted teeth.
Yeah he sounds like a great communicator.
I'm spoiled. BC fan...Diehard BC fan...  But I root for almost anyone in hockey east not named Boston University :) My parents live in NH so I always pull for them! 
I might be in the minority, but while chivalry is sexist and is totally about genders, I think it is still about being polite. We work together on a lot of things and he respects me as much as anyone on the team does and is quick to recognize when I do good work and also seems pretty socially aware. So while the door holding thing may be technically sexist, I don't think it comes from a bad place at all.
It's actually a pretty blunt and honest translation. 
Did you mean didn't do? :P
First, let me say that I wish you strength to get through the next days and  weeks, which will be difficult, I'm sure.  Secondly, and most importantly, please know that even though it does not feel this way right now, you will heal. This will pass and you will recover. All you need to do is do a few productive things each day (stowing away the wedding gear might be a good start), in addition to going to work, of course. Eat well. Spoil yourself with whatever entertainments you enjoy. The days will pass and you will get through this.     If he did not really and truly love you for you, then better this pain than a lifetime of those NYC dinners you wrote about, watching how loving husbands treat their wives while knowing you do not have this with your husband.     Loving someone who doesn't love you and want to be with you is destructive, and I say this from personal experience, so please try not to keep saying that you love him. It only reinforces something that is not good for you to feel right now. If you have a support system of family and friends, I hope that you will enlist them to help you immediately. Probably a great deal of logistical matters must be dealt with if you are canceling the wedding. They possibly can help you. Maybe what you cannot cancel can be donated. I read about a family that provided a posh dinner for homeless people at what was going to be their reception because it was too late to cancel and get money back. Something like this might make you feel really great and strong right now.    Hang in there. My thoughts are with you.
Are you fucking kidding me? The top,post on r/mister right fucking now is a post about how more men abuse steroids than women are diagnosed with eating disorders. What is wrong with talking about men's steroid abuse on its own, its a valid subject? Why the need for a reactionary and misogynist response to what is also a valid problem for women? Its not like eating disorders in women DON'T  need to be addressed. That post exemplifies what is wrong with the men's rights subreddit and the MRM in general. Please don't ask me to do that again, it was way too easy.And read AMR seriously because this shit happens all the time
Awww :)
[deleted]
[deleted]
I was kind of disappointed...Maybe I just built it up too much because I was waiting to watch it and then ended up disappointed. The visuals were amazing, but the storyline seemed rushed and I felt like they jumped through Aurora's life/growing up too quickly. Would've liked to get to know the characters better
He's a douche. I know you love him, but you sound like a great fun person and he seems weirdly critical. It's going to suck for a while, but one day you'll feel better and you'll find a guy that respects and loves you for **you**. You're in my prayers girl.   **Edit: Can someone explain the downvotes? I'm legitimately curious.**
[deleted]
I bet you are actually very beautiful. Pop culture and / or how you feel can seriously warp your perception of yourself.
Just lift the seat before you hover, and the problem is solved.
I completely agree that it's a mixture if many traits. And I agree, I can't change what traits I find attractive. Your point of having changing ideas  of what is attractive is also interesting.
Just because some latin dudebros said it doesn't make it true.
Missing what point?  If the goal is to meet a compatible woman for a romantic relationship, then going where a higher percentage of acceptable women are actively seeking a decent man for the same thing IS a solution.  Honestly, where am I going wrong here?  Just because a guy goes out of his home country to find a woman doesn't mean I think it's smart to write off all attractive Western women.  After all, they can be great.  But, foreign women can be great, too, and for guys who are not the most socially adept, they are almost always easier to attract. (Obviously there are trade-offs but I won't get into that unless you are interested.)  Anyway, be grossed out all you want.  This is the world we live in.  I don't deny that in the USA, women are considered by many to be "prizes" but you know, that's a big reason why guys leave the country for women;  They'd rather be in an environment where, if anything, the guy is the "prize".
[deleted]
but it *is* represented the way they want by thier chosen/endorsed celebrity, who gets to wear/be styled by the fashion house for free....  Hayden Panetierre purposefully told everyone she bought the dress, so I still don't get it. If she *didnt* tell everyone she bought the dress, *then* I could understand where the anger would come from, but.... that didn't happen.   &gt;and only want people they approve of wearing their designs somewhere that will be photographed as much as a red carpet.   and to me thats a pretty messed up statement, if it also extends to thier customers. I can understand it for the celebs who get freebies. But not for paying patrons....celebrity or not. I mean.... no matter how well controlled you want your brand to be, once someone pays tens of thousands of dollars for a piece, shouldn't they be free to wear it wherever they want, or do whatever they want to it?  I guess I don't understand the fashion world. hahaha 
He got a GREAT job in a very specialized field and in a part of the country where we would both like to end up. So we decided that we would rather just start investing our time and money in establishing a life there, even if I'm not actually present most of the year. The whole process was a real mess--I was applying to medical school at the same time that he applied for jobs. Unfortunately, our results just didn't line up. I can't be that ungrateful, though; they didn't line up because we both ended up in amazing places for our individual goals. We're confident that our desired part of the country is generally considered undesirable and that the specialties I'm interested in are non-competitive enough that we should be back together again for residency.  The long distance rotations were something I saw more often in smaller private schools, especially DO schools that were competing with local MD schools for rotation sites. If a school was very invested in the state (i.e. state medical schools or even private schools with a local focus), then they stayed in-state with rotations. A school I was interested in was in Missouri and had rotations in multiple states, including as far away as Utah. You could give preferences, but basically they made no guarantees about where you'd end up. Even the state schools I was at sort of bounced you all over the state, though.  Perhaps you should both read The House of God by Samuel Shem or The Intern Blues by Robert Marion together and have a conversation about needing to focus on maintaining your relationship with each other through the coming years. Not that those are necessarily reflective of modern training or specific experiences, but most people say that they're instructive regarding a state of mind. Especially the former I keep hearing people read repeatedly over the course of their training (hate it before, eventually agree with it).
I'm reading this on a device that makes it hard to read the comments.   One thought: if he gave you a nice engagement ring, keep it and sell it, unless your state has a law against that. I think an engagement ring is really a deposit against moves like this.   If he gave you an heirloom engagement ring, then I think you ought to insist that he reimburse you for the financial costs involved with the cancellation of the wedding as a condition for getting the ring back.   Of course: if he's broke, you could modify that to fit his situation, but my impression from the original post is that he's not broke.   
There is a huge difference between a one off comment about cake and the *constant* barrage of comments about men that this sub has had lately. A post about street harassment? 'That happens to guys too!' A post like this one? "This happens to guys too!" I seem to recall that the last time you and I were in a comment chain it was a situation where a guy was saying that being talked down to 'happened to guys too'.  You seem like a good guy, I know that you comment here in good faith. What you have to consider is that other men are *not* commenting in good faith. I don't know if badakow was one of them. But you have to consider the greater picture of the fact that men are coming into this sub with the sole intention of derailing the conversation and belittling the women who post here. They want to shut down the conversation. They think it's ridiculous that we're upset about street harassment and gender roles because 'that happens to men too'. They hate that TwoX is a default.   So people here are wound tight and they're tired and that means that they're quick to downvote. Please keep the greater context in mind. It's not that guys are unwelcome. It's that the constant guiding of the conversation back to *men* is unwelcome. I don't know how to more clearly illustrate the difference. Look at #4 in the sidebar.  
*boy in his early 30s who spends his time leaving comments on GW albums...
These dudes idolize women in foreign countries that treat women like shit because these women are "polite" and "know how to be feminine" (all a caricature created in their minds). It's why you see so many "awkward" (fucking creepy) dudes stalking Asian women in America (How the fuck is it normal and totally acceptable to treat a race like a fetish without it being called racism?). They're polite and stereotypically feminine because they are experiencing their own version of sexism. I don't think that women in Japan and China (where these dudes usually fantasize about going to retrieve their human fleshlight) are as quiet and 2D as their porn and television shows suggest, just like America's. But apparently these dudes don't get that there are actual people behind the fantasy, and prop these women up like they're angels sent to rescue them from an American culture that doesn't value them for simply being male. That's creepy. That's weird.   And why are you acting like I suggested making the woman a prize is a good thing?! No one is a prize. Everyone is a gift. A prize asserts entitlement, self-importance, etc. for no reason. Being a prize simply for having a certain set of genitalia is fucking creepy. If guys are upset that the woman is seen as a prize, maybe they should stop fucking treating her like she is one and instead come to realize that we are all just human beings.   That's why you are so wrong. Because you can't seem to get it through your mind that this isn't some big game. This is actually real life. It's not a video game where you're the hero. This is fucking game of thrones (since fantasy is the only thing you understand?). Everyone has something going on. It's so easy to say that women in a foreign country will love this guy (just because he's a dude? Because he's awkward? Really though, where are his merits?) when you don't know women in a foreign country.   I know you're just getting this from some PUA forums. I saw the one Elliot Rodgers posted in. You're repeating the words of those other dudes. Stop treating love and relationships like a game. 
Ok so at 18 I thought the exact same way that you did, and it was not healthy. It sounds like you have less of a problem with your appearance and more of a problem with your whole self. I think you should try to see a psychiatrist/therapist for these negative thoughts, because they're not normal, and it's going to continue to negatively impact your life. I know that you think you know 100% how you look because you've spent all of those painful moments staring at yourself in the mirror, but it's so easy for your perceptions of yourself to become dangerously warped, and it sounds like it's warped your perceptions of yourself as a whole.      I don't want to come off as a creepy cautionary tale, but I had similar problems when I was your age and it led to a debilitating eating disorder and I let myself become vulnerable to abusive relationships. I'm only 22 now, but I've never gotten help, and it's still hard. Start trying to get better now, don't let your life derail because you hate yourself so much that you can't function. All of the terrible feelings you're having are very manageable with medication and therapy.
It's the same with me. If I sit at home I'm just going to sit there and cry and be miserable all day but if I go to work I know there will be something to occupy my mind.
[deleted]
Are you serious about those edits? I mean I'm not sure I understand what you're saying but are you telling me that mods are editing *intentionally* to present TwoX as ...eerr... this?  This is madness.
His or her last line is on point. What is wrong is the attitude of "fuck that guy he's a POS." A POS would've married her and then cheated on her shortly thereafter. A guy with a spine has the balls to call it off after realizing it's not the right thing. In time, OP may come to appreciate that. She may never be friends with him but she shouldn't hate the man either unless there are other underlying things she hasn't told us about. 
[deleted]
Try http://www.meetup.com/
I absolutely love Soraya Chemaly. I just desperately want to be best friends with her. She somehow manages to write exactly what I'm thinking, and/or exactly what needs to be said, before you even realize it needs to be said. 
[deleted]
go somewhere for a little while if you can. ask for some time off, if you can, if not, a day trip will suffice. Don't talk to people. Don't do anything. just drive somewhere. stop. and look around. think. go home. do this until you can go back home and clean his shit out. Be that girl he never realized you could be. for yourself.
It won't cause the hormonal imbalance still tells the skin to grow more hair even after I have removed the current one, so it will last for a few months and then the hair will be back again, this means it is not a good option since it is so expensive and time consuming.
I say go for it, I went from long hair to a short graduated bob to this (http://imgur.com/a/L3sD5) and I love it! Like everyone says, it will grow back (although it will take like 15-20 months to get back to below shoulder length), but you might find that you like it! I really like mine and will probably keep mine like this for a while before I grow it back out again (if I ever decide to do that!).
I think you should also factor in how much your work will be affected by it. I am all for the "finding something to do to get my mind off of it" deal, but when I went to work while waitressing this actually turned out to be a horrible idea. In a high stress job where you have the chance of having to deal with a dissatisfied customer, being highly emotional and mentally/physically drained is definitely not a good combination. I cried 4 times in one day after a rough breakup and made less than half what I usually do in tips. On top of that I had to keep explaining over and over why I was off my game to my coworkers because it was quite obvious that something was wrong. Taking a day at the beach or starting a new book sounds like a much better way to take your mind off everything.
Yeah, I don't think most people realize it's just a design thing, not an actual function.  
You dodged a bullet, OP. And now your body is going through a massive drug withdrawal (yes, oxytocin, endorphins, and the entire hormonal entourage are powerful drugs).  Having done this myself more than several times in my 62 years, I can assure you it will take a minimum of 18 months to reprogram yourself not to go into those "comfort" zones in your mind where your memories of him (good and bad) lie. (Oxytocin is secreted at painful recollections as well as positive ones, thus is equally addictive.)   May I suggest you use that time to go back to school (start at a CC if necessary) and rebuild your life around YOU this time?  My heart goes out to you, hon. Grieve it as a death and try to see this as a new chapter in a better life.  Please don't waste your time in regret.  
I had an abortion at 8wks last December, my last week into finals. Those 7.9wks were so completely miserable - all of the studying and stressing while not feeling good, always tired, bloated and cramping, boobs sore, walking miles in a day traveling to/from classes - and that was just during my regular undergrad. Medical school would be torture while pregnant, now that I think about it.      You are absolutely right - pregnancy is something I would be experiencing on my own. My SO can only do so much to make me comfortable, but I would be the one gaining 50lbs and having to pass my rotations. We haven't even gotten so far as a parenting philosophy.  Seriously, thank you for opening my eyes!
[deleted]
So for you it would be kind of just like waxing then?
DGAF and moving on.  A final point, If she cannot walk away from the situation, she created that situation herself. She in no way, shape, or form asked for it or deserves it and nothing like that should ever happen, but shitty things happen to good people. If you put yourself into a situation where you are willingly alone, nude, in a room with a monster, and with no one on the outside to see that you are in danger... then what the fuck are you thinking? There ARE people like that in the world and you WILLINGLY put yourself in the same room, alone, with someone who might be one of those people?  Of course their are monsters that won't let you walk away and if you put yourself in their presence daily you better be ready for the bullshit. It shouldn't be like that, you shouldn't have to fear, but don't be an idiot about your safety because the world doesn't care what shouldn't be.
This is a good link, although I believe your title is meant to cause drama. Please explain what you mean by it.
I know she is universally disliked at my work so I could probably find others to back me up. My manager is aware that she's bullied people in the past and did act on it last time when there were two witnesses. I'll ask around and see if anyone else is being targeted or has heard anything to back me up.
I don't think feminists are actually against women learning self defense. When they say 'why should they have to' they're saying 'why does this problem exist in our society?'. What they're against is the *focus* on that. There's a lot of discussion of what women should and shouldn't do, but not so much focus on how to prevent rape from happening. There should be more discussion on what is wrong with our society where teenagers think it's okay to drug and then rape another teenager, and why other teenagers took pictures. There should be more discussion on why and how this sort of abuse is so common.   I think this is something that people keep missing. It's not that we think it's bad for women to learn self defense. It's just that our conversations might be more productive if we focused on the actual problem rather than just protection. (By the way, this goes for male victims too. This isn't solely a 'feminist' issue regarding women.) 
My insurance will cover prilosec (acid reflux meds) that can be bought over the counter. It is $20 for a 3 month supply which is way cheaper than it is OTC. 
Have you gotten a second and third opinion? I am a bit skeptical that people with male hormone levels can have it done with success but you cannot? I mean cis men even get laser done, its a permanent removal of the follicle. At the very least it should help you thin it out and not make it as prominent or as much of a burden to take care of.
I used to work with a guy who would just cut me off mid sentence and talk right over me. All the other guys in the office would act like nothing happened.  I have never experienced anything similar from a woman, ever. And when I notice other people do it to someone else I will call them out on it, not just sit quietly by while someone who was speaking gets steamrolled. Its super rude behavior and far too often these people get away with it.
Babes, fashion is fickle, yes. But one fat chick wearing one gown isn't going to bring down a brand. Kim K./Givenchy. Givenchy still raking it in. I rest my case.
[deleted]
I agree completely - I actually assumed she had gone to the police first....   
[deleted]
thank you! your words mean a lot to me! :)
My ex went along with our relationship for a long time, pretending he was fine and that everything was going to be okay. When I talked to him about his feelings, he brushed me off. He always seemed happy, but instinct tells you when someone you love is struggling or suffering. When he broke up with me I was blindsided and furious. I never thought about things from his perspective and told him we couldn't be friends. Today, if I saw him again, I would thank him for cutting me out of the relationship I couldn't see was failing. I hope one day your ex forgives you, understands why you did it, and I hope you get over the guilt.   People forget that those who break up have feelings too, and usually hurt and complicated ones. I'd never considered the guilt he may be living with, and I'm glad I saw this post. I may talk to my current partner about talking to my ex so that I can tell him I'm doing well, thank him for finally having the courage to own up to his feelings, and tell him I don't blame him for anything.   I hope one day you find the ability to forgive yourself; your situation was hard, and people aren't perfect. One person can only do so much. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
I think this point of needing to spend the first few years working hard to prove ourselves is something that graduate students don't tend to realize. We always think that what we are in right now is the toughest and actually sometimes it is not that bad.  I am finding that now that i am a professional I see the difference  in demands of family on women vs men much more than when we were students.  But then again I am very much in a male-dominated field. **joy! :-/ **  You are doing a really smart thing by asking about these questions and getting a good idea. /u/Countenance gave some really great advice.
again - once the celebrity *buys it themself*.... then the company should have **no say** in how/when it's used. ESPECIALLY If the celebrity clearly says "hey I bought this for myself".  It makes no logical sense to say: "Oh, because youre a celebrity, you can buy our clothes, but you can only wear them to an event we deem to be OK."   again it would be somthing else if she bought it and altered it drastically, bought it and didnt tell anyone she bought it, bought it and wore it wrong.... but none of those things happened. She bought it, looked great in it, and made it clear she was not part of the Tom Ford team. She just liked it, so she bought it and wore it.   I don't think that anybody should be vilified for that.  
Cherry picking data to promote an agenda only promotes ignorant assumptions.
Two things that happened in December? Is there anything you're leaving out of the story here? Was there any infidelity in the relationship? Are you sure there is nothing at all you can think of as to why he may have up and left? I feel like I'm missing a gigantic piece of the story. I agree it sucks that he would just up and go without talking about it. Very cowardly. 
Maybe they were lying. I honestly don't know anyone that can get off from vaginal sex alone, myself included. Sometimes, at the right angle it feels really good, especially standing with him behind. But eventually everything just kinda goes numb. People told me that maybe after a year it'll happen but it honestly never has and I dont think it ever will. It's not like my boyfriend isn't any good or is too small, I just don't think I'm rigged up the right way for vaginal orgasms.  I can only get off with my boyfriend if I do it myself or if he does oral. At first it bugged me but then I figured out it does a good job of getting me ready for the main event so we decided might as well cos it ends up just being all the foreplay I need. 
My boyfriend swears that he feels no change with my pelvic muscle tone, and I tested it myself and didn't notice a difference either. I have zero issues with urinary incontinence/leaking, etc.
Reddit users seem to love anything that shits on feminism, even if its coming from a climate science denying republican think tank.   Strange bedfellows...  Edit: Speaking of which, "Hi MRAs! Welcome to TwoX!" 
Thank you. May I ask how old you were when you had your first child? And what your SO did while you pursued your PhD?
I think you're misunderstanding-- no one is talking about legality, or whether the designer actually *can* have a say. It's just that there's unwritten rules/procedures for how things *usually* go. Nobody is doing anything not allowed, she just deviated from the norm and it was frowned upon because it's a big deal for designers when celebrities wear their clothes to events.
I've noticed lot's of things women do to men, but we don't give them a place to talk about it without calling them sexist and oppressive.
Of course! And I'm in a similar position to you in that I don't want to even get married until I'm through with a post doc, which means sometime between 28 and 30 if I'm lucky. I'm also from an area where everyone gets married and has babies young and my grandmother is always asking me why I don't have a ring yet. I'm only in my first year of my PhD program! Fortunately my SO is on board with my timeline since he has a series of professional exams to study for that turn him into a hermit for months at a time.  It might help you to make your point if you point out that you not being involved could have some negative consequences for the kids, too. How are you going to breastfeed (if you want of course) when you're in class for 4-6 hours at a time and when you're in a residency where you're working 12 hour shifts? Does he understand that you want to see your child hit the big milestones? That you want your children to bond with you? That you want to be making money when you have your children, not living on $50K/year student loans? I don't think this is necessarily a dealbreaker though it could be. I do think maybe you two should consider some couples counseling before making any big decisions including marriage. Having a mediator can make these conversations a lot more productive.  And if you ever want to talk, PM me. I'm actually taking some first year med school courses as part of my program so I know how rough they are.
This too shall pass.
You are committed, he's not, you deserve better. You especially deserve better than being punished like a child because of a bad semester at school. FFS, that happens to everyone at least once.
[deleted]
She's already being ignored-- it's not rudeness when you're trying to stand up for yourself against others' rudeness.
[deleted]
Come hang out at r/xxfitness!  Everything's a work in progress - once you get to what you current vision of "perfect" is, you're going to have set new goals! It's all baby steps. Your plans have to be actionable :)
I apologize, I should have said people rather than victims.   As I said before, I've offered an answer... I'm not sure what you're looking for, here. No, there's nothing wrong with suggesting that people learn self defense. However, there IS a problem with constantly focusing on that and ignoring the real problem: the fact that people think it's okay to rape. When people in the public eye focus on self defense over and over again it keeps the focus on 'protection' when the focus should be 'prevention'.  
[deleted]
There are tons of ways to collect data without relying only on what is reported to the authorities. Surveys, taking data from resource centers, etc.  &gt;The people who come up with 1 in 5 have an a agenda  [The CDC came up with those numbers](http://www.cdc.gov/violenceprevention/pdf/sv-datasheet-a.pdf). What exactly is their "agenda"? You say they "don't have facts to back up these 'truths'" but you're doing the exact same thing.
amazingly put. one of the wisest explanations about love/relationships i've ever read. thank you.
I bet it was quite different as the classic Maya civilization was just coming in. 
[deleted]
I'm not being obtuse, I am questioning whether people falsely accusing someone of rape occurs enough to merit mentioning it as a problem on a even somewhat similar level to actual sexual assault. Using only anecdotes to back up your argument and waving away any potential statistics makes it almost impossible to prove or disprove your statement. 
Why exactly do you think those numbers are "made up?"  I would bet you $100 easily that you know at least one person who has been sexually assaulted. That is unfortunately true of most people. Anecdotes aren't data, but both the data and anecdotal evidence point to sexual assault being a huge problem.  You didn't even look at the link I posted, did you? Are you just trolling? If so, *yawn*.
Your comment assumes that women's self image is driven primarily by their desire to be sexually attractive to men.  Would it surprise you to hear that I, and most women I know, don't really care about whether the average man finds us attractive but care very much about living up to the standards set by the other women around us?  And those standards don't always match up to what men want to have sex with.  Shocking. 
[deleted]
Not sure of your age, but this is happening to me as well and I am 32. If you are over 30 it could be attributed to regular stuff. Always ask your doctor about changes in your cycle. Keep close track of it and provide that info to your pcp/gyn. See what she says. 
Thank you, Friday is Wax day and I've no plans after (payday where are you?!) So I will definitely chill out , I'm just so sick of razor bumps!   I'll definitely go again after the first time just to see the difference and decide if it's worth it.  Xo
[deleted]
I'm not pregnant, thank you so much for your advice! I'm talking to my mom about birth control today- wish me luck!
Your best bet is to work it out with your husband. And it's far past time to have a come to Jesus talk with him.  "Honey, you have to find a full time job, until then keep this house cleaned, get treatment for your depression, and start satisfying me in bed again, or this relationship is over."  Because let's be honest, you're not going to stay in your marriage unless those things do change, and he deserves to be fully informed of that. 
[deleted]
Could she wear them to the workplace? (Assuming she's not an underaged exotic dancer or  cocktail waitress.)  If not, they're inappropriate for school. 
That tight black shirt that Khan wears is wonderful.
[deleted]
You need to decide what kind of person you want to be and then choose to be that person.  Don't drink if that's your response to it.  Tell people that that's the reason.  You don't have to follow along with peer pressure, and if your friends are crappy find new friends that aren't (doesn't mean you stop being friends, but find better people to add to your life).  You can do things like volunteer to help society at places that need hands, and meet people who care about the same issues as you.  You can do all sorts of things.  Finding "the one" will probably require you becoming a better person so that person will want you too.  It's not that she wouldn't be interested in the you you ought to be, it's that you are not that person yet.  You can't just expect "the one" to like a you that isn't self improving.  Just think about it.
I completely agree that this is the best "solution" to stopping confusion over consent.  Unfortunately, many feminists advocate that consent should be interpreted by the person receiving consent and decipher whether or not the consent is "enthusiastic" enough.
[deleted]
Oh my! This is indeed complicated. I will talk with the doctor's office again and try to get more information. Thanks for replying!
[deleted]
I don't know how you didn't commit a triple homicide after that.  What the hell has happened since that day? I mean, your brother and best man? Friends don't really get any closer than that...and for them to stab you in the back?  What the fuck man, I can't even comprehend this shit.
That's the joke. Society says we should have a mix of characteristics that haven't ever all existed on one person. 
I will be reading this in more depth later... however, I wanted to say my knee-jerk reaction to this piece is to remember the response to the testimony Sandra Fluke presented before Congress.  She was a **professional** testifying in a **governmental body** and the most publicized assessment of her testimony was the group of voices calling her a tramp, whore, or slut.  It is astounding, and makes me sick to my stomach.
Well in the case of their shared finances going towards the debt then it would be his debt too. Money that could have been spent elsewhere is being spent on debt. Now he is not legally responsible for the debt but it does affect him.  
[deleted]
I'm not sure what to do when your stalker is powerful, but groups like The National Network to End Domestic Violence work with people who are being stalked. http://www.victimsofcrime.org/our-programs/national-crime-victim-bar-association/ seems to be experienced with imbalances of power.   What about politicians and law enforcement who outrank this guy? Your member of Congress has a constituent services office. State and national law enforcement might be interested.   For the technology side of things, it's possible to use a cell phone to track someone. You don't need to mention this if you think it will alarm your sister too much, since the solution also helps with the disturbing texts. How about getting her a new phone with a new number, one that the stalker doesn't have? A "dumb" phone is better, since there's a limit to how much stuff you can install on it, and battery life will be better. 
This isn't really helpful.   Men, like women, come in varying degrees of hairiness and some of the men are very self-conscious about their coverage. Let's not add to any body-image issues guys may already have.  *edit to add a comma
A house is a debt, yes, but it's also an appreciable asset. My husband and I are currently house hunting, and I have to say it's inspired one of my deepest regrets -- all the needless spending I did in my 20s. Do you know how much money I'd have today, that we could put toward a house, if I didn't buy so much crap? The only reason we are even in a POSITION to buy a house is because of my husband's frugality throughout his working years.  Being told what to order from the menu is fucking annoying as hell. I know you're describing just one of many probable scenarios where his frugality drives you crazy, but trust me - if you want a secure future, you've got to get on board with his tactics (whether you stay with him forever or not!)  I hate going grocery shopping with my husband, because every time I bring something to the cart he says, "Is that on sale?" or "How much is that?" You think it doesn't matter when it's $20 here and there but shit, does it ever add up!
[deleted]
[deleted]
Wow, you really went all out! Haha thank you, I appreciate it very much! You certainly raise some valid arguments for both sides... I will take all points into consideration. :) Thank you for taking the time to do this!
&gt;Right, and they fail to answer them because many of them are idiots.  I don't see how that's relevant to our discussion.  &gt;You're acting like beauty contests are some massive national institution, placed higher than any other type of contest.  No. I'm not. They don't have to be a "massive national institution" in order to be sexist.   &gt;Pretty women have beauty pageants.  Right. Which is sexist.   &gt;Honestly I can name way more female athletes than beauty contestants.  Again, I don't see how that's relevant. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
Sad part is, I'm sure there are people that have cried wolf.  Look at how many grandparents happen to die during final exams.  Look at how many people have had 5 or 6 grandparents die during final exams!
So did you always wax before you were married or did he actually see the body hair?  If he did and he was ok with it before, then his depression and perhaps feigned disgust probably comes from some other unhappiness.  A lot of times things like that just make a convenient excuse.  If he had no idea of it before hand, I can see how it might be upsetting, but not THAT upsetting.  If he's that messed up over some body hair, what's going to happen if you ever have a stroke or lose a leg?  A spouse is someone who will stick with you through all that stuff - not run off at the first mustache tickle.
I know what a skene's gland is.  Skene's gland =/= prostate
Well, I just gave you one. You are choosing to not address it in favor of "No one could agree!"   You are probably being downvoted for hostile presentation and not engaging in productive dialog. 
Wow, that is horrible. She doesn't even make a single tackle or play the entire highlight reel? She was shut-down on almost every single play.
I am so sorry this happened to you. If I were you, I would definitely call to complain. That is such bullshit. Call the manager or go higher up. Tell them you will never shop at AutoZone again.  In the future, you shouldn't be scared to go into a store like that because they are a retail store and their prices are going to be marked. They won't just make up numbers to take advantage of you. If anyone would do that, it would be at an actually shop where they work on cars. I know nothing about cars and have never had any issues with the people who work at the parts stores. These guys were HUGE assholes and should be fired. You should definitely call to complain.
[deleted]
You wouldn't have changed yourself because of her if she didn't give you a chance? 
ughhh each individual woman's chromosomes decide that for her.  further protip: you can't will yourself to have big boobs, a big ass, or big hips. sorry /:
&gt;I was just reading post that made the front page about how #yesallwomen was actually misleading and gender-biased, and I left shaking my head with disappointment. Am I naive for wanting to believe that Reddit is more than a bunch of angry neckbeards?           What I find disturbing is how you didn't even pause for a second to consider if that post had any elements of truth, and just shook off the entire thing as being "angry neckbeards."  It truly blows my mind how close minded a group supposedly advocating for equality can be.
Is this a joke?
So being rational and logical is inherently male and it scares women?  I feel really bad for the women in your life. Do you know how I talk to people? Like human beings. Women and men are *not* different species who speak different languages and need to translate themselves to each other.   You are being super weird. Do you realize that your entire comment is an incredibly offensive generalization of both genders? 
This is rough.  I've been through a lot with my wife,  two bouts of narcotic addiction,  and a subsequent affair she had with a guy she met in her sobriety group.  With the addiction,  my heart broke FOR her;  she was struggling,  and I saw that.  I was not disappointed in her,  I was disappointed for her.  So we teamed up and fought through it.  Second time was worse, she got fired.  This happened a few months after our wedding.  I helped her through it,  worked my ass off to keep money coming in so we had somewhere to live.  Long story short,  people mess up.  You messed up in school,  but it wasn't the end of the world.  You deserve someone in your corner who is more understanding, more supportive.  If this is the end for you two,  work through it.  Carry on.  It might all turn out to be a blessing that he did this when he did.  Best of luck. And take care. 
No problem. :) I'm really sorry this is happening to you though. I have a lot of self harm scars on my arms and legs and vitiligo,  I can only imagine how terrible I'd feel if my partner made me feel insecure about it. If you need to talk, I may be able to understand.
I am the frugal, debt-less, one in my relationship. My SO is much more willing to spend money. I know I pinch pennies. I was raised to, but that being said, we've had to talk in great detail so that I don't stress about money. That being said, I would sit him down, as other have advised and explain that you're aware of the student loans and your plan of action to repay them in a timely manner. I think the biggest thing is the idea of getting married and having 0 debt. That's a very nice thing to want, but that's also not necessarily the most responsible. Both of you need to sit down together, compare your last few months of spending and have a discussion about where you can spend more and where you need to cut. Good luck and just be patient with him. I know how annoying and irritating I can be about finances.
Culture is so insidious in everything we do and think that it can be difficult to even take stock of your actions and consider the deeper repercussions--good on you for at least recognizing and admitting to yourself how you'd like to change!
Yeah, it's just ignorance on their part.  I have a science degree and studied women's studies extensively in college but there's nothing I want more than to be a stay at home mom, and I won't let anyone tell me I'm less of a woman for wanting this. 
Can you tell me how suggesting differences in the behavior of men and women is misogynistic?
I'm still trying to figure out how to be the best possible ally after transition. I'd welcome any thoughts you have on it. It's extra weird for me, because being transgender is its own weirdness.  
I could take that advice if the abuse was being directed at me, but I'm not going to stand by and watch anybody else suffer if I can help it.
Jesus, do I ever empathize.          A boss I really respected hired a woman who had said something ugly to me the day she interviewed. I told boss and he said she was perfect and I must have misinterpreted it. For the next four months, I felt like I was in that cartoon where the frog only sang when he was with that one particular person and no one else saw it. She disrupted nearly every coworker relationship I had, accused me of saying things that were 100% untrue, and actually had me wondering a couple of times if I was losing my damned mind.          Until the day my boss finally caught on and all hell broke loose. They were literally screaming at each other in one of my labs and I had never heard him raise his voice before, (and he had eight kids). Her manipulations all came back to haunt her. My boss, A) apologized profusely and, B) promised that he would never ignore my gut again.          Not that my story helps you, at all. My point is that people like that aren't able to maintain their control over the situation for too long. Go to HR and let them know she's creating a hostile environment.          Edit: [Michigan J. Frog!](http://vimeo.com/50941741)
He just said that it's looking at my cervix with a magnification on it. I have read up to be as book smart on the subject of colposcopies as possible. I know the procedure, but I want personal anecdotes and advice from women who have actually *had* the procedure. Reading up on it is fine and dandy, but actual experience is invaluable to learn from.
trust me, you're more likely to escalate the situation which is probably why she was pissed at you, most women deal with these things by ignoring them as you never know which one of them will go more apeshit than you can handle
Kept woman?    Wow.  Jealousy doesn't become you. Tsk tsk. 
Not exactly same as your story- but this reminded me of a pretty embarrassing situation for me and my boyfriend, when we were on a flight, and I was really tired. I saw the flight attendent with the drink cart approaching us, but I was so exhusted I really just wanted to close my eyes- I asked him to get orange juice for me.  So when she comes, he (as I asked him) orders for both of us.  She pretty much flips, and says "She can make up her own mind! Now, miss! What would YOU like to drink?" I sort of mumbled "orange juice?" half sleepily and felt awkward as other passengers stared.   She continued to treat him pretty terribly/ give him dirty looks the whole flight.  I guess I really want to remind people there sometimes is a backstory, and guys who speak for their gfs aren't always huge assholes!
"Just fine, asshole. "  Say it not playfully
Okay. Just woman through it?.  Also, I've never broken a bone D: !  However, I have had an IV infiltrate and that was the most horrific pain...and lasted for like 10 minutes.
No, she didn't. She obviously did not. She compared your statement to races to illustrate how stereotypical and offensive it was. Nowhere did she suggest anything about differences in races, you are just twisting around the metaphor to try and discredit her and avoid rebutting her valid points. If you aren't going to engage with people, just reach to try and discredit those who disagree with you in order to avoid your opinions being challenged, why even bother? Just walk away and pretend you won. 
/r/relationships would be a better place for your post. Thanks!
[deleted]
Why the 3D glasses?
[deleted]
I wish that it had been just a terrible joke, because it is so ridiculous! I know he seems to have thought that he had the best of intentions and was just trying to help, but it just seemed like a very selfish thing to say. I had just finished saying I was in a really bad spot in life and instead of even just the generic "I'm here for you" I got "I'll throw you a bone". I just don't understand why he thought that was an ok thing to say?!  I'm not getting treatment at the moment, as I've had some friends and family whose unrelated conditions were treated as related to mental health once the word "depression" was on their medical record. One friend is still struggling with it, as she also has a condition that makes her faint unexpectedly at random intervals, and every time she goes to hospital she has to go through the whole song and dance of convincing her doctors that the fainting and the depression are not related. So while I feel like I can handle it myself, that's what I wanted to do.  Most of my friends are being really great and my mum is really supportive and is keeping an eye on me, like mum's do, but if I get any worse than I am though I will find treatment. And I am looking for couples counselling with my SO, so hopefully that will help me with that particular stress point on the whole situation. 
Be aware that she may be in more acute pain than the average women when experiencing PMS.  Never tell her she is not in pain or not feeling what she is feeling.  
Check out /r/paleo. So many people in there report that the diet has made their skin completely clear up. It's good to be aware that stress and pregnancy often crank up the immune system to the point it's overactive and allergic or autoimmune issues can really mess up the skin. Paleo is about limiting general inflammation and being healthy, *not* losing weight. People who lose weight on it should consider it a side-benefit of being more healthy.   Paleo is all about eating a lot of healthy veggies and meat and cutting out junk. There are a lot of other varying shades of it and different points of view in the community about what is healthy (some think nightshades and beans are bad, some don't, etc.), but the main points are   1.) don't eat unhealthy food and   2.) eat a lot of very healthy fresh, organic food.   Very simple.  Obviously not everyone can afford to buy organic produce exclusively, but just making a point to eat a few *healthy* veggies/fruits (not corn, not potatoes, nutritiously dense food) with every single meal is going to infuse your body with a whole lot of good nutrients that you may not even realize you lack.  Because you're pregnant, you might not want to dive into it full-force, but you could stop eating junk food now and cut back to 100-150 grams of carbs after the baby comes (you don't want to risk hypothyroidism while you're pregnant by limiting carbs. A mother's hypothyrodism is very hard on developing baby-brains and on moms as well).   Your hair is gorgeous but I can see how it would be hard to do more than one thing with it. You might consider getting it highlighted when you get the layers cut in (and maybe bangs to show off those gorgeous eyes). It will make it so much more bouncy and manageable to have a little bleach damage in it, and having different shades of color really gives it a lot more depth. Also, while you're pregnant you won't have to worry about it touching your skin since it's done on the surface. Don't try this at home, have it done professionally, it's well worth the money.  I have silky light brown hair too and it just does nothing unless I've colored or highlighted it (which opens up the follicle a little to help it maintain some shape after styling.)   I'm sure you're tired as hell and just have the blahs in general if you're going from work to dealing with two babies and now pregnant on top of it all. I know it seems stressful to do right now, but get the hang of handing over the babies to in-laws or friends once a week and doing something for yourself or having a date night with your husband. YOU NEED THIS!!! Don't neglect your mental health; it's every bit as important to you and your family as is your physical health. 
I don't disagree, whatever works for you and whatever you choose in your life right now; I'm just presenting the case -- don't shoot the messenger. 
&gt;around 75% of those women don't think they were raped, and nearly half went on to have consensual sex with their attacker later.  This does absolutely not negate the rape. You might have no idea here, maybe you do, but for me being raped was a totally horrifyingly confusing experience. I was bleeding on the floor, found myself in the college showers on the tiles shaking, didn't eat for days...but I refused to believe that I had been raped until I spoke with a therapist about it. I had sex with my rapist one more time and threw up violently after.   People are raped by their husbands, girlfriends, friends, FWB, etc. It's usually someone you know and trust that ignores your consent and just...well...rapes you. He didn't think me saying no multiple times, me moving to the floor to sleep in peace, or me crying and begging him to stop counted as him raping me. All because we had sex before, and I was in his room.   The fact that the rape victims are confused and in denial is not a valid reason to question the numbers, honestly. Anyone with knowledge of PTSD and trauma could tell you that. 
Really? I've literally asked my partners things like "wanna bone?", "wanna have sex?", "will you let me suck your cock?" etc,  and told them "I want to fuck you right now", I want to suck your cock", "I want to ride your dick" etc. In all of those cases I've waited to get an affirmative signal (verbal, taking my hand and leading me to the bedroom, a head nod, and others) before I've had sex with them. It's not a rapey thing at all. 
To those saying this is just an issue of some people being assholes:     Please don't pin racist, sexist, ableist (etc. etc.) behavior on "bad people". MOST people think themselves incapable of being a sexist because sexists are "bad people". Therefore, as a good person, they couldn't have possibly said something sexist. By saying this is a "bad people" issue, the implication is that a) normal people don't do this, so it isn't an everyday problem b) complainers need to toughen up and stop blaming their problems on the rare asshole that everyone deals with, and c) you yourself couldn't possibly accidentally assume the women in the circle is less knowledgeable, because you aren't a bad person.    And maybe you're not and you've never once toned out and checked your phone when the chick starts talking. But this attitude of vilifying humans who aren't educated or empathetic enough to notice their bad habits is one that really halts people looking at themselves critically.     This is an entire article describing a phenomenon (both with sources and anecdotes) that a huge thread of women are agreeing with. This is obviously not a "lone-asshole" type problem. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
If it's playful and my fiancé reads the situation correctly then he is welcome to do that. Teasing and playfulness is always welcome. He'd never use that language in a disrespectful way. The only thing he has to be careful of is catching me in a bad place, and he knows how to read those. 
I'm almost 99% certain no one gives a monkeys about a female or male being a protagonist in a computer game, If the game is good it does not matter if it is a man or woman or even a monkey, pretty sure monkeys are popular though :P
[deleted]
Thank you!
As an avid gamer, I do. Especially since there are almost no games with female leads. 
Of course not.  However this is a critical piece of the story buried by downvotes, as he outed her, and was not slanderous.  To read your story without this information the wrong conclusions will be drawn by others.
[deleted]
Your comment helped me so much. You described every emotion perfectly. Hope I can get up from my personal mess. :)
It's my inner "never was a Girl Scout but wish I had been" coming out. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
&gt; u're not responsible enough to have a job, drive, drink, own your own house, or live on your own, why do you think 12 year olds are responsible enough to have sex?   So they are responsible enough to play sports that can result in the loss of vision?  What about concussions, we have just begun to see the side effects of those in contact sports that begin during middle school.  &gt;We are not talking about young women, we are talking about children.   So when people were debating about 'young women' getting access to Plan B regardless of age, were they using the wrong word then?  &gt;In many jurisdictions, children below a certain age (like 12) cannot have sex at all.  I have yet to see some law that actually prevents something from happening.  All it does it punish it after the fact (which encourages some people to do it less).  Are you suggesting we should throw 12 year olds in jail for experimenting with their body? 
According to old stats(2003), 1 in 6 was reported while 1 in 4 was estimated. It is very possible the stats are still underreported.  (this is only looking at women, data's incomplete, consent is difficult to define legally....)  Being surrounding by guy friends relaying stories about false sexual assault reports and reminding us how they hated when girls say it was rape when it wasn't rape.  All these reasons are why quite a few of us never reported. Too used to being attacked by everyone, XX, XY, Trans and Queer. 
When is your appointment?
Other than the raven, you mean...and Prince Philip wasn't bad.  There weren't a ton of notable characters in the movie, so 2 bad guys and 2 good guys seems decent to me.
the point of the article seemed to me that MEN do this TO women systematically, and patriarchy n stuff
Are you the bully or her? Who is to say?
Cortana is a AI I never thought she was nude lmao, Not all men are perverts no one I know thought she was naked :I
[deleted]
Are you able to link to the post you're referring to re:ADHD, I'd be interested in reading it
I hope that my Makeupaddiction suggestion didn't sound rude. I'm a little obsessed with the idea that the world would benefit from wearing makeup, which is my own personal weirdness. Some of the ladies there use a little makeup to look more like a man, but now that I think about it, using makeup to feel like a man could make some people feel...weird? I don't know.   It's funny that you mention that people sometimes grow trees, we call them 'woody growers', which makes my inner 12 year old laugh. Part of what I do is grow garden plants. They call what I do a "pot plant" grower. It means I grow plants to a large enough size that they can be sold in garden centers in regular sized pots, but my inner 15 year old always laughs at that. I can't help it.  Running a nursery is hard work! And thank you for affirming that when you hear nursery, you don't think daycare. Sometimes I'll meet a someone and I'll say something like: "Sorry I'm so muddy, I have a nursery and I've been working all day", and I'll be standing there, wearing muddy sneakers, muddy jeans, and a muddy jacket, with my hair tucked under a hat, and the person will respond by saying something like, "Oh, you have a nursery? I love children!" It makes me feel like I'm taking crazy pills. I look very 'girly', and I wear girly makeup, so I guess sometimes people are confused by the idea that I run a nursery.   Your "darwinian force for plants" comment made me laugh! It was funny to me on more levels than I care to admit. I do some plant breeding, amd I always feel like Dr. Moreau (not sure if that's his name is spelled?).   I love the idea of you being your adorable self. I don't know what you do for a living, or where you live, but you might want to try rocking some kind of look where you can wear pants and a button down. It's none of my business really, but I've enjoyed our conversation, amd I'm just trying to be encouraging.   Thanks for chatting with me. I feel a bit bad, like I'm just cluttering up this thread, but this has been meaningful for me. When I got your 'Internet hug' comment, I was watering the last 5,000 feet of a 30,000 square foot facility, and it was so hot the plants were wilting, and I was almost wilting and my hose broke, and I've been reading this thread all day, and feeling a bit defensive about other comments people were sending me here, and I when the hose didn't work, I cried, then I felt like I was just fulfilling gender stereotypes by crying, then I felt like I'm spending too much time on reddit, then I realized that this is the longest sentence ever, amd I don't know how to end it.   Anyway, I'm home now, and feeling better, and it's been nice talking with you. 
I sometimes have dreams as people I know, for me it feels weird like I am somehow betraying their character, even though I know it's all in my head.
Although the film itself seems to be getting very mixed reviews, one thing I've consistently found in almost every opinion of the movie is that Angelina Jolie was good in her role.
I get super happy if I even get an option to play a girl in a game. ^(how long did it take Pokemon?)
In the end, Love is all that remains.
by insisting that the conversation be equally applied to men in every discussion and by crying "NOT ALL MEN" in every discussion about the problems women face, you are exactly hijacking this sub. also, i frankly don't see the sexist language you're talking about. acknowledging that there's a gendered problem is not sexist, and again, the article did not accuse all men of partaking in this behavior and it also acknowledged that women are partly to blame, as well.   it'd be more helpful to be part of the dialogue by asking how you, as an individual, can acknowledge these inherent biases and be aware of your own behavior and the behavior of those around you. saying "NOT ALL MEN" is a point that has been made hundreds of times and it does nothing to add to the discourse. 
&gt;Wouldnt women become offended if you treated them like one of the guys.  Speaking for myself, not really. I'm kind of glad they are that comfortable with me.
Yeah, if they're in the US there are definitely laws against public nudity. 
She told one dumb lie, this dude told like 5 dumb lies in a row. There's no comparison. 
I don't really mind considering male characters are ridiculously buffed too. What bothers me is for instance, medieval games where male armors cover everything vs bikini mails for female characters.
Prove it. 
Then maybe you should post it to OneY? 
My middle school wouldn't let us wear flip flops for some reason. I never really understood why. We could wear strappy sandals, however, as long as there was a strap that went around the back of the heel. Because that makes such a difference, right?
please please please go to the police. universities are infamous for their lax punishments in cases of sexual assault. they do not like declaring someone guilty because that reflects poorly on them. in any case, sexual assault is a violent crime that needs to be handled by a real legal system. your boyfriend is a rapist. unless you go to the police, no one will know after he graduates.
The word bully, to me, implies an abuse of power.  In none of the posts I've seen by OP was there any notion of this dynamic.  I am not defending the person being cruel and hurtful to OP, we can agree this is ugly behavior.  I also don't want minimize the pain OP clearly feels by this fraught interpersonal relationship she has with this particular co-worker, it makes work a drag, dreading dealing with the person even in your off time.  She would not have reached out to others for advice if it was not bothering her.  However, OP received, what I believe, is bad advice from your supportive community.  Trumping up charges, implicitly threatening the manager, and generally going for the throat, should be the very last option; tried when all others failed.   Its not that I don't fully believe OPs representation, rather I'm trying to suss out the weirdness there and perhaps give OP a different perspective.  I'm mean, who makes comments on someones lunch choices?.. and in what situation would I take those comments personally, and believe they were somehow attacking me as a person?   I expected a bit of nurturing from other women, to address the psychological pain OP was suffering, and strategies to deal with the situation, ideally by de-escalating it.  Yet, she received the opposite was told to go for the kill shot.  I have no idea if the "mean woman" is a misunderstood victim, or just taking her misery out of everyone she encounters.  There is weirdness there, the person is "universally disliked"; I do not know of any woman who would be happy being friendless at work, even worse disliked.  Perhaps the "mean woman" deserves to be ostracize from her peers, still not a pleasant place to be.  If, OP could get a glimpse at the motivation of the "mean woman", perhaps OP could understand the "mean woman" was not singling OP out for nasty behavior, but "mean woman" was coming from a dark place of profound psychological pain.  That understanding could make "mean woman's" nasty comments less personal.  Finally I quoted Marcus Aurelius, and Cato the elder to put in context, interpersonal human interactions are not always pleasant but we as a species have been experiencing that throughout history.  Also, to give OP techniques for coping with hurtful comments and opinions.  Lastly, in life, you will meet and encounter nasty people displaying wicked behavior.  In most of these situation there is no magic HR to fly to so you can execute your foe.  So, yes, I was disappointed with your supportive communities response to the "mean woman" with the evil tongue.  I had hope you would strengthen OP so the sting of the "mean women" would not longer bite at OP.  Instead the suggestion was to lie, get creative, double down and go for the kill shot.   &gt;   It is said that one day the Buddha was walking through a village. A very angry and rude young man came up and began insulting him. “You have no right teaching others,” he shouted. “You are as stupid as everyone else. You are nothing but a fake!”  &gt;  The Buddha was not upset by these insults. Instead he asked the young man, “Tell me, if you buy a gift for someone, and that person does not take it, to whom does the gift belong?”  &gt;  The young man was surprised to be asked such a strange question and answered, “It would belong to me, because I bought the gift.”  &gt;  The Buddha smiled and said, “That is correct. And it is exactly the same with your anger. If you become angry with me and I do not get insulted, then the anger falls back on you. You are then the only one who becomes unhappy, not me. All you have done is hurt yourself.”  
I use a home Tria device. It's really reduced the amount of hair that grows on my body. Time consuming at first, but you start to see results after 5-6 sessions. Worth it.
&gt; one sex is "wrong" and it should change to suit the other  It's not though - the article is trying to suggest ways for women to stop this from happening/to cope with it.
It's an old game, but you should check out Oni from 2001. Still kicks ass
As a guy: I have a lot of friends that are women. I would have sex with every one of them, if we were both single. That doesn't make me an animal, that makes me human. I don't go and look for opportunities to have sex with any of them, but if one came up I would at least take the chance. They are all really cool people, good friends, and pretty attractive. Why wouldn't I want to have sex with them? Maybe it turns into a relationship and we end up getting married. If it doesn't, oh well we can both get over it. Is there really something so fundamentally wrong with that?
I'm a guy so my opinion might be less valid than many ladies here, since I'm less likely to be a rape victim, but I'll throw in my opinion.   I think her statement is being thrown out of proportion. Other than promoting self-defense, I'm not sure what else she could say. Saying, "hey guys, you simply shouldn't rape people" isn't a solution. Rapists don't listen to reason. Otherwise they wouldn't rape people. I feel like she was looking for some type of solution and teaching people self defense is a very good solution for all types of crimes, whether you are being robbed, assaulted, or raped.   Im definitely open to being disagreed with, but I really do struggle to see why people are frustrated with her answer. If my child was being bullied, teaching them self defense would be one of my first considerations. 
Agreed, they made a disgusting, unfair sex joke. I'm glad you walked out.
See i don't see it as always rude. In group conversations the pace can be so quick that often if you do not aggressively get your voice in there, you'll never get to say anything. It has nothing to do with manners and everything to do with how that group is talking. In a corporate world if you are not in a superior to subordinate discussion groups will often work this way (at least they always have where i have worked). Some people talk too much and if you dont interrupt them you'll never get a word in edgewise. Who's really more rude at that point? The person who doesn't stop or the person who interrupts to say something?  I've never seen or called anyone a bitch for working their way into a convo. The only time i have a problem is when someone get offended at non issues, and takes things out of context. I have been accused of ignoring someone when i was having a conversation with someone else entirely, a 2 person convo that they were not part of. I was rude because i didnt openly invite them in when they were sitting nearby apparently interested in the discussion. Thats bogus, if they wanted in they should have spoke up. I can't read minds and i was directing my comments are the person talking to me because im not insane.   I think you don't properly acknowledge the issues males face, women are not the only ones ill treated in this world. The world is not a fair place and it's not mens fault. I've suffered at the hands of sexism from women, but i didn't blame all women for it. I would rather focus on the bonuses of our differences.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Yes, years ago, but I never saw any results from it so I switched to laser hair removal. You may do well with electrolosis if it's just a few strays. 
I've meet some cool people off CL. I never attended a group, it was like individual-to-individual. Not everybody on the site is undesirable.
His thought process is probably "I am ending the relationship anyway. I don't care what she thinks."
 Please see rule #1 [in our sidebar](/r/twoxchromsomes/about/sidebar).  Wishing rape on anyone is not welcome here.
Point taken,  At this point I would think that there would be a reconciliation. Seeing how they have been in a relationship for so long. I think it might have been based on a mutual connection of values and trust.   This statement does not have any support behind it either. "You are stating as if they are facts things that very likely are not true." How true is it? You say not very likely, I say very likely. Who is right? I am giving my perspective.   "very counterproductive for OP right now" Also this is your perspective. Mine is completely different from yours.   So, you, as you said, "seem to lack the inisght to know that your own narrow experiences do not generalize outwards in the way you think".   Thank you for your input. I have given mine.   Edit: Also, OP has chosen to take get all of Reddit's opinion on this. I'm done defending my position. If there is a 100% accurate answer to this question, then please fill in C and bubble the blank. She asked for opinions. I gave mine. She can choose from here. Or, she can update her post, and then you can all prove me wrong. Until then, I'm out. 
Making fun of someone because they are wearing something that makes them feel confident. Are you in the right subreddit, or is it ok because he is male?
[deleted]
&gt;I was discussing what's normal from a statistical perspective.  Then you shouldn't have a problem providing some statistics to back up what you're saying. 
I'm not arguing there aren't *any*, simply that feminism is overrun by whiney do-nothings. I'm sure others exist, but really who has time to sort through haystacks to find needles? 
My relationship of 6 years shows patterns of all 4... mostly when one or both of us is stressed out. Shit.
Thanks for your response! You brought up some really good points. Maybe I could find another geek group that has guys and do special cross posted events with them while keeping my group ladies only. 
Seriously, this is wonderful advice. I'm not suborn at all and he is as stubborn as they come and I don't always know how to handle the situation. He's told me before that at times I make him feel trapped so to speak so it's nice to hear a new way to try things out!  
My message to Mr. Will tonight on his Facebook page:  "Get thee to a physician, George, and heal your very sick mind. I feel sorry for the women in your life. My wish for you is that you encounter some god-awful life experience that will stop you in your tracks and make you realize how very, very, very wrong you are.    "Coveted status" my ass.  You have no concept of what a woman reporting sexual assault has to endure, either in the original assault or in the horror that awaits her if she tries to seek justice.    I don't often agree with your columns, but I read them from time to time so I can try to understand how conservatives view the world.  But for your views expressed in this column? There should be no place for you in respectful public discourse. I hope you are tarred and feathered and run out of town."
[deleted]
i dont understand how that is a sequitor response. please, dumb it down a bit for stupid ol' me and articulate explicitly your response to any aspect of my question
I'd like to share a friend's story.  She's in her early twenties, but was promoted as a department manager in large retail. Even though it was sucky retail work she had an amazing work ethic. On Black Friday last year she was in charge of distributing TVs to ticket holders. (Think huge retail, chaos, black friday, she's standing on a chair to give a TV to each person in line)  A man she just gave one to says he wants a new one because his is "damaged." The box was squished in a corner, pretty normal and its still only the box. 100% sure this TV was FINE. My friend explains there is only enough for each customer with a ticket and she assures him its not damaged.  He becomes more and more angry. DEMANDING that he get a new one because the TV is broken. Again she assures him, as calm and straightforward as possible, that the TV he has is fine. If there even was a problem he could return it at another time. He refuses to take her answer, and my poor friend is trying to juggle this man and making sense out of black friday chaos and giving people their TVs.  Then a young guy employee steps out from working behind the scenes. He points to the man and says with a nod: "Sir. That TV? It's good condition." And holds up his hand in an "I got your back, its good." Tone and motion.  "THANK YOU!" The man says as if he finally got some sense out of someone, and turns around satisfied.  
If we truly weren't aware of some arbitrary (for the sake of the argument) privilege, then who says there is a problem there.  I just consider this (the topic of the article) a form of sexism, nothing really new here, other than facts and statistics to prove the point that, yeah, sexism exists, and in many forms.  Additionally you're acting, as I said in one of my earlier comments, as if having a privilege is inherently a bad thing, which it is not.  My comparison to a CEO probably doesn't make sense because you're not using privilege correctly.  Privilege just means something that only a certain group can do, or a right they have.  There is no bad connotation to it, nor is it a bad thing if you are deserving of the privilege.
I think a lot of men would be turned on by a sexually aggressive woman. In my own experience though, even though these men accept sex, they tend to see me as "not girlfriend material." I get the feeling that it's partially because they're cool with aggression in a fling but it might feel uncomfortable in a long-term relationship. Maybe also because they think I might be too slutty if I was that aggressive at the onset.
[deleted]
[deleted]
So, you think that movements that are for specific groups of people are all invalid? Or is it just feminism?  What about Anti-racism movements? LGBTQ rights movements? What about those who fight for accessibility for the disabled?  Actually, in the US we did try to for a more blanket approach -- general egalitarianism ("all men") was guaranteed in the constitution, but specific groups were still oppressed anyway. Your blanket approach, historically, hasn't worked in the US.   The reason feminism exists is that there are specific laws and cultural norms that oppress women specifically, and focusing on those will eliminate that specific source of oppression. "Equality for all" might seem like an effective solution to the fact that 1,200+ women PER YEAR in the US are killed by their male partners. Simply focusing on equality for all people doesn't help eliminate the root causes of oppression of specific groups, it hides them--so that we can't address eliminate them. If we pretended that men and women killed each other in equal numbers, we would obscure the fact that the women are often in abusive relationships in conservative areas where women are less likely to be viewed as equal human beings, but as property or objects. We would lose a potential solution - more support/exit help for women in those areas coupled with more progressive education about valuing women as people.  If everyone were equally oppressed in the exact same ways, your view would make sense - and that's the myth that many men on Reddit who have never read any piece of feminist literature seem to espouse. There are a couple of myth at work here:  **Myth 1:** "We're all oppressed, but I'm just not allowed to complain. Women are super oppressed, but so am I! In the same way! Why do they get all the attention?" Even a cursory glance at history or at the many studies on current legal and societal restraints on women dismantles that reasoning pretty quickly. It's that faulty line of thinking that underlies what you're saying, and I think it's the reason you're being down voted.   **Myth 2:** "Sure, oppression existed before, but it's over now. So all these movements should go away." I get it: you think we've reached some sort of tipping point of equality, gone past it, and now WOMEN ARE IN CHARGE. The horror. To say that the progress that has been made in the past 100 years has erased or reversed legal and cultural institutions that have been in place for many more hundreds of years that have privileged men is very wishful thinking. Feminists aren't just a bunch of whiners who complain for fun... reading this forum, you'll see that misogyny is a very strong force at work - stronger than whatever equivalent forces are oppressing men. The tide hasn't turned, women aren't in charge now, as many "women are breadwinners THE END IS NIGH" news stories would have you believe. Again, I would urge you to look at studies that analyze how women and men are treated from as early as their first weeks of life. The gender stereotyping imposed on infants - women as passive, weak, and emotional, men as active, strong, and intelligent - only amp up as people grow up, with more negative, disempowering consequences for women.   **Myth 3:** "Everyone in America is in charge of their own destiny and has equal chances. If a woman feels oppressed, it's her fault." It's the other side of the myth above, related to the deeply American neo-liberal conception of self. It's hard to admit that some people didn't get the chances you got. Why? Because then you have to admit that maybe, just maybe, luck, or birth, or other factors beyond your control contributed to your success. Why does this hurt? Because it interferes with your myth that you are self-made, that you worked for everything you have - that your status reflects only your great character and intelligence. If you acknowledge that the female engineer next to you had to deal with 2x the obstacles you did to get to her position, that means you also must acknowledge that perhaps you got to your position a little easier than she did--that maybe you're not the most hardworking, self-made person in the room. Ouch.  It seems that not very many people on Reddit are comfortable with admitting that. It's much easier to simply say: "Those studies about sexism in the sciences are bullshit. Affirmative action put her there! She got the job easier than I did. I'm the smarter, more hardworking person."  By saying that feminism, and LGBT, and civil rights movements, any movement for a specific group, shouldn't exist - because we should just be focusing on "broader equality" - you're implying that the issues they advocate are fake, made up. Movements that help historically oppressed people have produced tangible improvements in equality, and yes, it does come with a cost for the oppressor/majority (hey, we can't own slaves anymore! bummer). You think your daughter will never encounter sexism, and I hope she never does. Maybe as you watch her grow up, you'll realize that "giving the shitty deal to a different group of people" isn't actually what feminism seeks to do.   I don't even know why I wrote all that. It seems that you've never read any feminist literature, and if you're like most of the guys who come to /r/twoxchromosomes or /r/feminism to say that feminism is worthless, this won't have any affect on you at all. 
I'm sorry to hear that you had a bad time on spiro! I had to take it for skin symptoms for about three years, and only recently ceased it at my doctor's advice. I didn't have any bad side effects, although I know a lot of people who did... It must be very frustrating.  Now, I know that you're not looking for medical advice-- and I totally respect that. But it sounds to me like you're suffering enough that maybe you should have another consultation, maybe with a new doctor (specifically a gynecological endocrinologist if there's one in your area.) You might contemplate surgery on your ovaries-- it seems extreme, but if you're spending *hours* of your day coping with symptoms directly and *hours* more feeling anxious about those symptoms, maybe it's the right path for you.  PCOS is something which can really reduce your quality of life and make you unhappy, but you shouldn't have to suffer just because your ovaries are a little lumpy. Stay positive, and keep looking until you find someone who can help you out! 
Ooh! Have you heard of transistor? Red is a lot like Faith... amazing fighter, unafraid to ditch her appearance to do what's right, intelligently motivated... I just love it. I can't speak much for Faith, but I love how Transistor made Red to be so competent and, well, confident in herself as a lady. It just makes me so happy.  And oh my gosh, that soundtrack...
I'm really not sure what any of this has to do with men vs women.  The only time you even reference men is #1, the rest is just general advice.  The only ones I agree with is #3, and I guess #4.  #1-2 - Yes, successes are important.  So are what your responsibilities are.  But bullet points in general aren't really necessary, depending on the job.  Just describe it.  #3 - Yep, as long as it isn't far too long, 2 pages, for instance, is fine.  #4 - OK...   #5 - Networking is vitally important.  But that's a different issue than references.  References are basically irrelevant, as you point out.  #6 - Job titles matters at least as much as salary, especially if you're still trying to move up the chain quickly   #7 - Cheryl Sandburg is an idiot when it comes to this stuff.  Definitely agree with you there.
\#YesAllMen  You can say not all women are like that, but it doesn't invalidate the experiences that I and many other men have had.  Many women love dominate men, you can hate it all you want but it's the reality of my experiences, and the experiences of lot's of other men.  I never interrupt, as I was taught by the wonderful women who raised me.  It's AMAZING how quickly most women will switch their gaze from you to another after he interrupts you.  It's amazing how many women seem to be drawn to guys who exude enough confidence to interrupt anyone they feel is inferior, which is often simply called playful arrogance if the man is attractive enough.  Again, you can say not all women are like that, but enough are to merit a duty to teach women to be better people.  Now do you see how sexist this bullshit is?
That's a lazy answer. The point of the study is that women are viewed as sluts when they instigate sex. 
[deleted]
Going back and forth with you, personally, is absolutely not the way to get people to take anything seriously, because your comments are jerky. You're being kind of aggressive and weird. Also, who is talking about feminism? TwoX is not r/feminism. It's subreddit about women's perspective that *you* find to be "intellectually deficient", but you still feel compelled to comment here. 
This has to be some of the craziest shit I've ever heard in my life.
Climate change is a worldwide problem, rape is a cultural problem. The key difference being that we can disown the culture norms of another nation all we want, but we all share the same climate.   That being said, you also cannot declare anarchy against a single facet of society, even one as horrible as rape culture. Fixing the problem this way might also 'fix' the 'problem' of stable infrastructure, modern medical care, somewhat decent social care.  You can't blow up only a piece of it.  If you look back, most modern movements for social change have succeeded through education and legislation, with some non-violent protest for good measure.  Not through "[using] the weapons at our disposal...no matter the circumstance".  Finally, to address your comments made in the tree above, your assailant cannot be charged with perjury for lying to you. Perjury is the crime of knowingly delivering a false statement while under oath in a official capacity. In the United States, this mainly pertains to the courts, as in judges and juries.  It is a crime. A crime you committed. it doesn't make his actions any less terrible, or you pain any less real, but it does make you a criminal. I would be careful about who you tell that information to.
sexually forward guys are not exactly accepted in society either. This is not fair, but it is equality. 
I love her voice. "That's fucking annoying. Stop that shit". Amen sister. 
Just a warning, **DO NOT READ THE COMMENTS** if you value your sanity. 
copper IUD is extremely old school and inferior to more modern IUDs like skylar and mirena. copper iud &lt; birth control pills &lt; mirena, skylar. why are you choosing copper might I ask.
[deleted]
only works if the other person wants to speak. stone walling, or number  4 on your list, makes the exercise futile. 
What makes you so against him paying for my meals? I pay for other non-food related items in our relationship, so it's the least he could do. Plus, we DO alternate from time to time on meals, but he pays more often than I do. Frankly, I am not spoiled whatsoever. I've grown up poor and put myself through school, so I know what saving money means. Don't be so judgmental when you know so little.
I am just so sorry. I am sending you a big internet hug. X
There's no way that you could know that. I think that people getting slaughtered on the street, while possible, is less common than people seem to believe.
unfortunate but true. before getting into pickup, I was a 26 year old virgin. I was really nice, kind, etc. But just couldn't get anything going on in relationships.   after pickup, I literally been with 17 women in the last two years. And no, they are not all "sluts". They were just cool girls that had their own personalities, and most of them said "I don't usually have sex this early but I like you".   That's too bad that when the cooperative/cooperative solution doesn't work for an individual, the individual is forced to seek the defect/cooperative solution. But I like to think of myself as a cooperative defect hybrid, being able to play as the situation dictates rather than always playing the same card.
Yeah when a girl is the sexual aggressor they seem more mature and like     that.
Oh no. I just don't care to memorize every single organization that exists. It's great that you have so little going on in your life that you can do that, but some of us have more important things to do. 
Found one instance.  Tons of comments pointing and laughing at the OP. But still that's like judging all Christians based on the WBC.
[deleted]
I'm a phd student, most women I know have their children after grad school, during post-docs or early tenure track (although that's a little intense, I hear :) ). I can't imagine having a child so early as 25!
[deleted]
When my mom and I talk about relationship things she's mentioned that she feels that a lot of couples seem like they're always competing. Everything is a competition with some couples, and while it in some situations it can be a fun bonding experience, I think if it goes too far (you won the last fight so I HAVE to win this one) it can breed contempt. You're on the same team, that's what marriage/partnership is about. 
&gt;You seem to making the false assertion that feminists cannot be objective about feminism.  I'm afraid it's not a false assertion, an in-group will always have a implicit bias towards viewing it's own ideology, it's one of the most fundamental observations in psychology.   As for the rest of your post? We can agree to disagree.
when its a random person, sure, but a person on the job being so blatantly rude? not really an issue of letting people effect you, more it's an issue of being treated as if you don't matter. being talked to like that by employees at a store is very demeaning and would make any sane person angry.
[deleted]
You have options. Don't ever feel like you're trapped in a bad relationship. There is always a way out. It's difficult, I won't deny that. But going through some hoops is worth getting out of the abusive situation you're in. 
[deleted]
First off, next time you talk to her, dont call her feelings ridiculous, they are valid and hers. Personally I think what you did was nice but I can understand how she might feel like you were controlling and made her feel like she couldnt handle her own problems. She was obviously in a high emotional state being locked out and and you taking control of an issue she may have wanted to fix herself didnt help.   You should have told her what you going to do. 
Yeah. Losing our home would be quite a reduction in our standard of living. That's one example. Most people would agree I would imagine. 
[deleted]
Examples help, I think. At my old job, it was very, very common for people to ask me something, and if they didn't like my answer, they would go to the nearest man, and accept their answer even if it was the same as mine. This was especially obvious when they would rather speak to a (male) cashier rather than a (female) pharmacist about something a cashier would know nothing about.  I would point this out to my male coworkers, and after seeing it occur again and again they started trying to break people of that behavior by supporting other peoples' authority, etc.   I don't know that this had far-ranging effects in the real world, but it made these types of occurrences less annoying.
No offense, but I'm not gonna just accept your description of that post without a link. And no, I don't see how that's a criticism of enthusiastic consent vs regular consent. 
Regardless, of your own reaction in this situation the thing is you did take control of a situation she very obviously wanted take care of herself. Ignoring that part of her and calling it ridiculous will not do you any favours. 
[deleted]
Can you please explain this? I never heard of PCOS doing this.
I feel like this goes both ways.  "Men want sex, and in particular, they want sex with people who really want them. But socially, many straight women still find it a turnoff when men are sexual aggressors. Which means that, for men, aggressively pursuing the thing they want actually leads to them not getting it."  We live in a very sexually repressed culture. I never realized this was a problem for women too. I'm just into strong willed, aggressive women. Thanks for sharing your side! Of course, this is just my veiw of things, and i could be wrong in general. I'm just submissive usually. I love it when women pursue me (like that often happens lol). It makes me feel really valued.
also i noticed youre being downvoted. thats not me, just so you know
That's bullshit, I love it when I get booty called.
Curious about contempt, specifically in regards to sarcasm, name-calling, and ridicule. If it's all in fun and both parties are aware that mocking each other is not meant seriously, is it still necessarily a bad thing?  This is coming from a male perspective, where all of my friendships have been like that for a long time, and I feel like I know my SO well enough to think this isn't an issue, but I'd like to hear thoughts on it.
if that's true, what should I do?
Blegh, how awful those radio comments are! It's just more of the same thing, placing the blame on the victim's looks, their weight.  Fuck them, op. You're getting fit for yourself, not for anyone else. 
It's good the something is being done. I would listen and do whatever the police to do though. They have far more experience than you at this kind of thing.
I can add a fifth bullet point:  If you are researching what is wrong with your relationship by viewing bulleted lists online, you are highly likely to end up apart.
Hi, just to let you know you can also up vote the thread and their is also a save function :) 
&gt;This is text book slut shaming. You are doing to things. First you are judging someone's sexuality based on what clothing they wear. This is problematic. In reality you can't tell at all how much sex someone has or doesn't have by the clothes they wear.  I can see how you get that from me using the terms hot and sexy to describe clothing but I would like to point out I never said she was a slut or even began to think she was looking for sex. I only said those clothes were meant to be hot and/or sexy.  &gt; Neither this girl or her family thing that she is dressing poorly or inappropriately. Frankly, I don't either.  We know the region we're dealing with and the situation so I'll skip over the three quarters of this paragraph and deal only with the last bit. Disregarding all other things she broke a school rule. It doesn't matter what she or her parents think when it comes to school and work you need to conform to all reasonable requests. That is simply the way life works.  &gt;Second, you seem to be tying a person's worth to their sexuality. There is nothing wrong with looking "hot" or "sexy". It has absolutely no bearing on a person's worth. Women who wear lacey corsets are just as valuble as women who wear nun habits.  Where?  As for the rest of what I hope to god is just a meager attempt at trolling . I was not slut shaming. If you want to wear short shorts rock on! However, as I mentioned before you need to take the situation into account when you decide your wardrobe. I don't think anything that can be deemed provocative is an acceptable choice for any child, and even if I did I would still frown on her for choosing to break reasonable restrictions. I hope that clears my view of the matter up for you. :D
FemShep is best Shep, the voice acting is so much better than MaleShep.
I definitely see the same communication issues, constantly between two men and people of different gender. I'm guilty of that myself at times unfortunately with all people.  &gt;once it's 'my turn', so to speak.  I wonder if that's part of the problem. Myself and many other people I talk to don't think in terms of "turns", but in terms of if you have something to say. I'm not sure if that's a cultural thing, or a social thing that is significantly ingrained and differing between the sexes.  &gt;But there's still tons of evidence that this occurs disproportionately to females rather than males, regardless of whether or not she has an assertive personality  I'm not disputing the evidence on a global scale, I'm more wondering if the evidence is specific to other cultures, where the culture I live in is considered more polite, and I don't see this type of thing happening towards women significantly more than men. It could also be a case of optics or environments that I'm fortunate not to participate in. 
Haha. Did he have a bad experience with one? Dogs are very protective sometimes. 
[deleted]
Well, it's the four horseman research on which many of Gottman's later conclusions draw *and* on which much of his credibility lies. He's even developed a professionally practiced style of therapy that revolves around it. So I wouldn't consider a claim of lack of evidence negligible.  As for evidence, I don't claim to have read [every one](http://www.johngottman.net/?page_id=7) of Gottman's publications on therapy. But his four horsemen research has been included and referenced in many of his academic publications. Not to imply that publication equates proof of evidence, but rather to draw attention to the quality of work needed to even be considered for academic publication.   In order to *actually* be published, his work had to have been scrutinized, editied, and re-edited by multiple anonymous psychological professionals before being put before a board of said professionals and voted on.  Having watched his therapy footage and commentary in college, I'll agree that it's definitely incredible in both senses. And cries for evidence are not unfounded. I simply take issue with the idea that one can "debunk" (even a small bit of) Gottman's life's work without any credibility in the field.
[deleted]
No disrespect. This is exactly how it happens! The big dude relentlessly torturing someone's breasts also wants snuggles after... We are a very cuddle oriented community. 
This exact thing happened to me. Went on a break andwer broke up with me via email. There's nothing wrong with you. Someone who breaks up via email is cowardly and you wouldn't want someone like that in your life anyway. I know it sucks that you couldn't be the one to do the breaking up, and it kind of feels like "hey, wait a minute....I'm the one who was unhappy!!" But you're better off in the long-run. Would you want to be with someone who was clearly incapable of talking about or working through the difficult stuff?  It's going to take some time like any other breakup. Just please stop blaming yourself or thinking "woulda coulda shoulda." Good luck.
I don't know how experienced you are in public facing roles, but I found that when I first started I experienced the same. Later, I had somehow adopted an aloof but friendly approach - it was good customer service and no-one complained but they (even nearly all the new customers) limited their interactions with me to the type they had with men.   I think it's just something that retail gradually drains your eyes of over the years. I've had to work really hard to change it since! 
Funny, but this statement is sexist by itself. Just as women aren't instantly turned on because a guy wants sex, some guys also aren't instantly turned on because a woman wants it.
Exactly what I'm talking about. It was like I was trying to fool everyone and then when I come home and take off the bra, they looked so small (all relative, of course).   I probably started thinking about it because I had a guy friend who HATED padded bras. Felt it was false advertisement haha. He didn't mind smaller breasts, just didn't want them to completely disappear with the clothes 
Isn't this just like saying there is an effective and ineffective way for females to pursue sex?
I read "Roose Boltons book".  Sorry not interested In a guide to better flaying in my relationships...  
How you say things does affect how the information is accepted. This is usually most important when both people are upset and in a somewhat less stable state than usual. While both people should try not to let sentence structure be overly important, they should both also try to avoid phrasing things in an inflammatory way.
[deleted]
Exactly what I am saying.  
As someone who's (somewhat) successfully made the transition to being able to take criticism, I can tell you why it was tough to hear it from my wife. First, nothing had really prepared me for someone to be that close and intimate with every detail of my life. Every failure and every success is easily seen by my SO. Once I could hide a failure with an excuse and carry on, but this is no longer the case.  I forget and lose track rather easily so pointing it out after the fact does little to help me. Even replacing "You always..." with "You tend to..." would still upset me. I'd even get upset when she'd beat around the bush or try to remind me before I'd mess up. After a good amount of self examination I had to change my perception. I am frustrated by my own failures and my coping mechanisms are to either gloss over it or get angry at myself. She became an external personification of that and unknowingly pushed that button I thought I had squirreled away from everyone.  So for both of us, we (mostly) try to be proactive about things. If one of us is making the other late for something, saying "we're going to be late" is like trying to bake something faster by turning up the heat. Accept the failure, even as it's happening, and learn from it. It's now a habit so even when she vocalizes her frustrations, my reaction is to apologize and push on. I'll even wait a beat before responding so that the first thing out of my mouth isn't an excuse or deflection via ad hominem. 
Anything with Angus MacFaydyen in it. http://www.imdb.com/name/nm0005171/?ref_=fn_al_nm_1. 
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Helen_Lewis_(journalist)#Lewis.27s_law  And I like smart women, it's essential in fact.
hand sanitizer, and a spare bit of cash hidden in something innocent looking, like a compact.
You're being pretty aggressive with the definition of "coercion" which requires force or a threat.  It's nearly impossible to claim "I'll be sad" is a threat, for example.  Or when you tell friends "If we don't decide on dinner soon, I'm going home", did you just threaten them?  So I guess those fall under "emotional manipulation" which is frighteningly vague and can easily be applied to the entire dating process...  But I'm happy to find out where your line of coercion and emotional manipulation stops exactly.  Let's continue!  "Would you like to have sex with me?" \*makes puppy dog eyes and sad face\*  "Would you like to have sex with me?  I think you would like it."  "Would you like to have sex with me?  It would make us both so happy."  "Would you like to have sex with me?  C'mon.  Say yes."  "You should have sex with me.  Agreed?"  "If you don't have sex with me I won't mind that much."  "If you don't have sex with me it would be a minor inconvenience to me."  How many of these are rape?
[deleted]
Someone else recommended that in this thread as well! Thanks! :) 
Look, I see your point, but I disagree.  I think that's a viable argument under some, far less extreme situations, where the actions of the offending party could actually be construed as acceptable.   I don't think it is ever okay to spy on strangers the way he did. I would still think it is creepy, inappropriate behavior if this were set at his home, for example. 
Lawyer here: DO NOT SELL THE RING. Definitely talk to an attorney first. The law in this area can be very nuances and weird, and differs state by state. 
That is a nice sentiment... it's just harder to bring the guard back down once it goes up.
Not a medical type, but a chemist. I'd say to rinse yourself with huge quantities of water, then get yourself checked into a hospital.  OP, this is a hugely scary situation and you have my sympathy! No one should have to live in fear of attack. 
Ugh - have you actually ever asked a woman if she enjoys being interrupted and talked over? I can see the responses now....  ~twiddly music indicating flashback~  "So, Sarah - what really turns you on with a man?"  "Oh, Henry...I just love it when my opinions are steamrollered in a conversation. I never have anything really important to say anyway, and it's ever so gratifying when a big man comes along and recognizes that, because then he can just cut me off without listening, show me that he has no respect for my ideas, demonstrate that he doesn't view me as a competent adult, and then whisk me away on the back of his horse into the sunset" *sigh*.  ~end flashback~  Really?
Maybe try to accept the fact that some/most males will get defensive when you talk about gender bias.  A conversation can be both sharp and genuine.    If you are always concerned that men are getting defensive and not speaking genuinely, it could also be they are simply disagreeing with you genuinely.  
Sorry but if someone that outweighs you by about 50lbs, has a foot on you in height and the element of surprise on their size attacks you a hammer is going to do jackall, especially if you aren't trained. She is much better off getting pepper spray or mace. Even if she accidentally sprays herself in the face she will fend off her attacker as well. 
[deleted]
Good luck with everything. You're gonna need it.
Buy a fake cam, and get a few "security"stickers then. It's a mild deterrent.  Set one up in a window that people can see.
Hey OP - I think that what you did was noble and good, if *slightly* reckless, and that you probably don't deserve the anger your girlfriend is expressing, unless you tend to do reckless things on the regular and/or have previously been injured in some kind of fight, in which case her reaction is to be expected.  Now, can I ask you a favour? If you have relationship problems in the future, please take them to /r/relationships. TwoX, according to the sidebar, is   &gt;a subreddit for thoughtful content - serious or silly - related to gender, and *intended for women's perspectives*  (emphasis mine)  TwoX is not here to provide a service, and we are not here to be a sounding board for men upset at other women.  This is not meant as a smackdown, but as a gentle reminder: there are spaces on reddit that are specifically designed for this kind of post, and TwoX is *not* one of them.  Thanks.
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
&gt; Many straight men still find it a turnoff when women are sexual aggressors  Is this true? I've never seen an example of this in my entire life.
Waiting on the call from the doctor, but yes - definitely using a backup method!
A bit harsh with the 'leave the relationship' already, but, 'Flabby pregnancy skin is not the problem, your feelings are' Kinda nails it. Unless your girlfriend is a sex doll the years are gonna change her. She has put up with this to produce a child that's half yours, I'd be pretty F##king hurt!
&gt;Any advice?  Work on the fact that you are for some reason repulsed by normal bodies?  The skin will likely continue to slowly tighten and improve over time - the same way scars slowly fade over years. Most women see the skin retighten within two years, but for some it can take longer. Massaging it can help by increasing blood flow.  Edited to be nicer.
I do not suggest getting a gun if you have no interest in guns.  Guns can be very risky if you will ever have children in your place and statistics even suggest that you are more likely to accidentally shot yourself or a friend/family member than defend yourself from a criminal.  Others have suggested pepper spray as a much better alternative.  It will protect you from an attacker and is far safer if accidentally discharged.
Definitely get a consultation with a doctor.
You're in luck, calf size seems to be largely genetic and is hard to work (with size in mind) even for the people that WANT larger calves.  
Get big and mean. There's no reason you should be unprepared. You can be all the things you already are still, but add big and mean. You're Linda Hamilton, and the Terminator is coming. If you have time to be afraid, you have time to get big and mean.  Maybe you don't want to live that way. I am 6'3, and I was raised to be gentle and kind. My family had a history of physical abuse, and my parents encouraged discussion and passivity and kindness. I love that about myself- it's how I want to live all the time- but recently I've learned to be big and mean too. You can invite aggressors to consider other options with your shoulders up, your eyes wide, your smile full of teeth.  Get a little gun. Don't be scared, don't panic, you can type on a keyboard so you can have a gun without having an accident. Name your gun after whoever it was in your life who made you believe you weren't capable of this.  Take your clothes off, bare your teeth, pick your shoulders up and pace your apartment. It's yours. It's your space. You're an animal, you're not to be messed with.  People who go door to door looking for easy targets are cowards. They don't want to mess with anything. They would just get a job if they had any real grit. If you can be more of a hassle than an application at 7-11, you are more than most criminals know how to handle.  You're a hassle. You're an animal with retractable claws. You're everything you used to be and now you're more. It's fun to be scared now. It makes you feel alive. If you see that guy around your apartment again, think: "I wonder if he's edible".
The harassment has to be based on a protected characteristic. The term is frequently over used or misapplied.
That is totally easy to distinguish from a girl who is bad as sex.    If you are with someone uncommunicative, and they don't really react you you, positively or negatively, you should ask questions. And not just "do you like this?" "How about this" but also stuff that forces they to answer one way or another "should we do X or stop?" "Do you enjoy x sex or x sex more?" "Which position is your favorite?"  I mean, Christ, if you have a limpy fish partner and you go "awell" and just plow them in silence like it's a doll the one who is shitty at sex is you. How can you POSSIBLY do that and not realize you risk doing something that hurts them or inconveniences them even if they do want it. Skin gets pinched, bodies lay too heavily, arms get numb, hair get trapped and pulled, and cervixes get punched. You should never just "do" your thing without feedback from the person.   So with questions, a terrified person would obviously answer like a terrified person. If they hesitate, or answer meekly, stop having sex! At that point ther is a non negligeable possibility they feel threatened. Why risk it? Stop fucking them! It's obviously not fun for them. It's not like by avoiding these rare, contrived sexual situations you will destroy sex encounters in general 
&gt; Think about it: Women want sex, and in particular, they want sex with people who really want them. But socially, many straight men still find it a turnoff when women are sexual aggressors. Which means that, for women, aggressively pursuing the thing they want actually leads to them not getting it.   This doesn't seem to be suggested by the studies discussed at all...it seems to be a non sequitur  opinion of the author.  I'm sure most men reading this are having the same reaction I am..."this sounds like utter bullshit".  The idea that men are out there turning down offers of sex from attractive women because THEY want to do the asking sounds like the premise of an Adam Sandler movie.    It's possible that studies could show this result, but would be making a massive mistake of correlation.  It could be that attractive, sexually appealing women find no need to be a sexually aggressive...where unappealing women find they have to be more aggressive, and get turned down frequently.  
No one is saying you are turned off by a sexually aggressive woman.  We are saying you are less likely to pursue a long term relationship with her.  Of course you like to have sex with sexually aggressive women. Let's not get silly here.
[deleted]
It's too biased an article for me to plough through. If the woman is dead then keeping her on life support in order to save the baby seems perfectly reasonable to me. So reasonable that I'd assume that doctors and next of kin probably already do it. So why the bill? 
Oh yes. It really helps to soften the hair and my skin. I do it on my under arms too. I usually don't shave them either. But I use a bristle brush every shower anyways to get deodorant off.   Hope this helps! And btw, its refreshing to know there's more and more ladies out there who shun the razor. Viva las body hair! Lol
[deleted]
That means you need to be clearer about what you want. 
No gap teeth here, (mine are so tight I get the floss stuck like every other tooth), but definitely wonky - front teeth are big bunny teeth, lower teeth are a bit crooked, and I've got one in the back that literally faces backwards for, like, no reason. It just did a little twirl as it grew. Frankly, I like my wonky teeth, even though the front two often peek a bit if I leave my lips parted. They give me character! I always think of the main actress from Dirty Dancing, who had that really unique nose and got it fixed a few years down the line; her nose gave her a lot of character, and without it, it was just like ... eh.   While the aesthetics of your face and body are 100% your own preference and call, IMO if it's not causing you any trouble health-wise or anything, I'd take a unique feature over a totally standardized one any day.
I read every word, actually.  That's how I was able to quote him.  Which part about my recounting my own rape did you find to be a made up fact?   Edit: Hello downvoters: I ask you the same question.  Which part of my recounting of my own rape do you find to be a made up fact? Or is it that you have no response, but you're just mad? I guess I'll never know.  :( 
Well I'm not having sex yet so right now it's just for the hormones haha but thank you. I think that was part of the problem yesterday, being by the pool on a Florida afternoon makes you pretty sweaty as well.
For me, my period sort of my thing I want to deal with on my own. I'm luckily not overly emotional, and while I get pretty bad cramps sometimes, I really just like to walk it off.  That said, I have a really awesome boyfriend who just happens to have nice chocolate on him around the time I happen to be craving it every month. He has obviously tracked my period in order to gift me chocolate at the optimum moment. Busts up my tough girl act every time.
Your girlfriend is not interested in being in an open relationship with you.  You're attempting to bargain your way into other girls' pants while trying to make a one-partner woman happy.  It's not going to happen, and you can't convince her that it's okay.  Break it off.  There's nothing you've said in this summary at all that actually *suggests* you love her, there's only a lot of detail here about how much you want to be with other women and how much she hates that.  Why are you trying to drag her along in this bullshit?  Both of you will be happier without this relationship.
You guys are forgetting that the fetus needs the mother's body functioning properly to develop, not just survive.  It's possible that the fetus was without oxygen, fluids, nutrients, etc for some amount of time enough to disrupt normal development.  The baby could be born disfigured, brain dead, with serious mental disabilities, or similar chronic or life-impacting issues.  The family - a father and a toddler - are already trying to cope with a loss - imagine the impending financial burden of keeping someone on life support for months at a time, and the possible burden of an ill fetus immediately thereafter with no mother to take care of it once it is born.  I think the Munoz's, both paramedics, seem more than qualified to determine whether or not they want to take these risks.  Furthermore, the issue here is that the law is ambiguous and will go directly against DNR or other directives the patient themselves have declared.  The article ends by saying, "**Unfortunately, however, in order for a court to hear a case challenging this law (or any law like it) the plaintiff bringing the case must have standing, meaning the plaintiff must have a direct stake in the case.** In addition, the case must be ripe, meaning the case must be mature and not based on a hypothetical situation that may or may not occur at some point in the future. If the case fails on either of these two technical counts, the case will be thrown out of court.  And that is exactly what courts have done. The Washington Supreme Court in DiNino v. State ex rel Gorton and the U.S. District Court for North Dakota in Gabrynowicz v. Heitkamp, for example, rejected the claims of two women challenging pregnancy exclusion laws. In both cases, healthy non-pregnant women sought a ruling that the pregnancy exclusion law in their state was unconstitutional. And in both cases, the courts held that the women didn’t have standing and that the cases were not ripe: Neither woman was pregnant and both were in good health.  **What it all boils down to is this: A case challenging HB 1274 as unconstitutional would likely have to be brought by a brain-dead or terminally ill pregnant woman**.   And for obvious reasons, that’s a terrible way to make public policies, and a horrible burden to place on a family already facing tragedy."  
&gt; I told my SO to not go anywhere alone anymore, and now I am contemplating getting her a gun  You think killing a mentally ill guy will make her feel better? 
[deleted]
....yes. This is what my dating life was like. "Women can have all the sex they want; they just have to say yes." There was NO ONE asking.   Fortunately, I found a guy who wasn't terrified by me making the first move. Eventually. 
&gt; They view abortion as murder / infanticide. Even if they don't care that you're having sex, it's not something they're going to compromise with you on, because they view it as something abhorrent.  It's not about abortion being murder. That's an attempt to draw attention away from their morality play. They're also attacking contraception, as this politician is trying to do by banning insurance coverage of IUDs. It's about making sure that women only have sex under strictly controlled conditions, primarily to ensure contraception and reproduction.
They are operating under the logical fallacy that biological life equals being medically alive. Its something they teach in churches to teenagers and that very few of them ever confront with facts. Its about as anti-science as the climate change denial and popular with the same crowd of folks, generally speaking.
[deleted]
&gt;...but guys are socialized to take sex when it's offered
(am male) Random thoughts I've had for my own apartment defense.  Noise and affirmed, guaranteed attention will get any assailants to leave faster than dedicatedly attacking them.     I would go for a ultra-loud noisemaking device, they have them in like necklaces that activate by pulling a pin, and shout"warning, warning, danger" louder than you can think next to.  Leave four or five around the house, and I think this will make most people instantly leave.  They are opportunists first.  I also like pepper spray, and get the strongest OC % allowed,  illegal for humans but okay for bears.  I also like gel because you can aim it and it coheres enough to be used across a room.  Be careful with pepper spray because it doesn't work on about 5-10% of people for genetic reasons, or on many junkies.   Again, noise is a workable main line of defense, pepper spray or other weapons are not, but they can be useful in making space.    Have some weapons but plan on never ever using them, or using them to create surprise for a brief moment to create an opportunity to escape.  I assume an average attacker will have weapons in case you do, but not looking to get into a pitched battle. Your bat, knife, or stun gun will probably escalate more than it will help.  Not so much that it would be used against you, but they will have brought their own weapons.    All dogs, of all kinds and all trainings, are useless. There hasn't yet been a solution found to the bribe-with-steaks technique.  They can't even be relied on to make noise.    A spare cell phone (with batteries, but no need for a service plan) will always call 911, and can be a little useful to keep in a nightstand.    For your particular weird situation, in my mind I would never say anything to any questions, through the door or on the street.  If he's asking, he doesn't know as much as he wants to (asking is a risk to him as he's putting you on alert).  Without knowing you personally this may be nonsense, but I wouldn't make any kind of not 100% true threats like "My boyfriend will kick you ass" or something.  Noncriminals almost always crazily overestimate their ability to lie convincingly, and underestimate criminals ability to pick up on it. They've had more practice than you.  If you ignore it and say nothing, he will have no info and assume a higher level of risk to himself.    If you have any apartment windows on any floor, get a $30 anti-shatter window laminate from Amazon, and have a window guy professionally install it for ~$40 (pro installed because a crease in the tricky to apply film will be permanent, mare the window and piss off the landlord).  Burglars are playing a game of probability to manage risks (even junkies, they just are myopic in their risk assesment) and if they expect the window to shatter easily and it doesn't, they are gone. Many ex-burglars have said that this is a larger deterrent than most people think.  They also make magnetic window alarms that automatically sound when the window is opened. These are probably a good idea and I have only looked into them a little, but I am wary because: many are expensive, but the electronics are unreliable (Im sure there is a good one out there but I don't know it), and they only seem to work when the window is forced open, not broken. Note that windows can be silently broken with free materials, and very often are, so don't just rely on that noise for detection.  If guns being in your living space works for you, I would say go shotgun instead of pistol.  Again plan on it never being a situation where you want to draw down and fire instead of run into the hallway, but who knows? Pistols are so impossibly hard to hit anything with enough times in enough places to stop the person immediately, while a shotgun doesn't need as much aiming, and has more power.  A gun means bi-monthly practice and cleaning with forever, and practice with the flashlight you'll fix to the barrel.    Depending on apartment layout, and automatic motion detector light is a good idea. Put up flyers with what happened on your floor, in your lobby, and around your block.  As an opportunist, that guy might decide to move on.  Find a cop (not in the station, just on nearby patrol) and ask him for any local tips- probably not super helpful, but he can tell you to look for for groups that you might not have found threatening (old folks on the porch are lookouts, etc.)  However, don't devalue anybody that looks threatrening if he says they aren't, police have a different threat threshold than we do.   I get overwhelmed thinking about this stuff, so I try to stay in the mind frame that mt preparing doesn't hurt me, and doesn't make anything Im preparing for more likely.  Also remember though, that even in sketch neighborhoods it is much much more likely that nothing would happen at all.  I'm just getting ready in case I get unlucky. 
I'm not. That's my perspective on the situation.
So, you have not heard other men's opinions on this?
It sounds like she's probably only going along with the whole open relationship thing because she doesn't want to lose you; not because she's actually okay with it.  I think you need to talk to her and either a) end the relationship, or b) close it. Most people aren't really down with open relationships which is perfectly understandable. It sounds like you guys might just be incompatible at this point in your lives and staying together with an arrangement like that isn't really fair to either of you.  Something like this happening in my own relationship is a big fear of mine. Good luck.
While I'm in agreement that the first statement is not very helpful, beware the roots of the second statement.  There is not much different between the two of them at their core.  Both state to the partner:  "**You** are wrong/bad/need to change"  Couching accusatory statements in psych-speak makes them harder to 'counter', but leaves the person spoken to in no less of a defensive state.  So... if I were to attempt to 'neutralize' the statement I'd try something like:  "*I can see I have an early trigger around the trash.  When it looks full to me I start to feel really uncomfortable.  We had discussed chores and you said you'd be willing to take out the trash.  I can see that either what I think of as 'taking out the trash' is different than your idea, or that my anxiety level around it is higher than yours.  Can we work on a solution together?  If your idea of taking out the trash is linked to a day of the week maybe get a bigger trashcan?  Maybe we can adjust our division of labor? Maybe we can 'change jobs' around chores and get a smaller trashcan so I can more easily take it out.  Do you have any ideas?*"   Own one's part in the discord, don't blame, be solution based, and ask for help/solutions from your partner.
The first step is a peaceful democratic government, which won't happen by arming the coup leader's henchmen under the guise of 'protecting' women.
Please be respectful.
I'm a female in STEM as well... and nope... I've never been given an award just because of my gender. I have been given awards and was accepted to competitive internships because of my accomplishments. And I had to work my butt off to get recognized. Usually people tend to minimize my accomplishments. She's not smart, she just works hard. Or she doesn't work hard, she is just smart. Or whatever bullshit. So I doubt that you got the award just because you are a woman. 
&gt;I think you are letting your personal experience affect what you have read. He clearly uses the dataset assumptions of rape advocates when he breaks down his assertion. (not to mention the fact that he says the resulting number is still to high.)  I think you are having some reading comprehension problems.  What I said, &amp; what I continue to say is that Mr. Will's contention that the current rape statistics are "preposterous" has no basis in fact, &amp; is just something he threw out there b/c he *feels* that the statistics must be wrong.  I offered him an explanation of why those statistics on women who don't report their attacks are very likely valid.  As to me "letting [my] own experience affect what you [I] have read": you're goddamned right I did.  Mr. Will offers opinions based in no fact &amp; no experience. My offering a response based on my experience was not because I am so very broken by the crime that was committed against me, &amp; you saying that is is dismissive &amp; disgusting. **I am the victim of a heinous crime, I am not hysterical, &amp; I am not brain damaged.**  Please take your 1950's concern trolling elsewhere.   &gt;I think you may be guilty of reading them through a thick cloud of steam that was coming out of your ears, which is understandable, given your personal history with the subject.  Please see above.    As for your repeated assertion that I somehow believe accused rapists should have no rights, I never once said that &amp; I do not believe it.  I believe passionately in the right to a strong defense, for everyone.    Edit: bolding! 
Get a gun and good training on it. You can respond to a threat more effectively with it than a knife or a phone call to the police.
The problem is, if you do something sexual and then immediately stop when you notice a bad reaction, you have ALREADY committed sexual assault.  There's zero margin for error.  Also, what does a question like "can I go further?" mean, exactly?  This is my point about the ambiguity of even verbal communication.  No matter how explicit you are with your requests for consent, there is always significant room for interpretation.  Even a super explicit question like "Can I touch your breasts?" is not completely unambiguous.  Touch your breasts when?  For how long?  How hard?  Where on the breasts?  With your hands or something else?  How many times?  Perfectly unambiguous communication is impossible.  No matter how explicit you are, there can still be questions about what you meant.
yep. aside from not being helpful in solving the problem you feel like the bad guy because you are 'throwing a temper tantrum'. and then you get even angrier feeling like he is just letting you vent and that will make you feel better, since your problem is not worth his input or something. no need to engage in the discussion or anything.   arrrgh i think at this point i will be happier if he would just break china or something. 
I wish her the best, also, and again, you're right about confronting the issues rather than deflecting them.  I had to make a huge relationship decision after a pregnancy scare...It's really sad when you realize that the man who may have gotten you pregnant is not a man you'd trust to raise his own child. I think the fact that we'd gotten 'engaged' but had never talked about it again after the one happy moment was a clue the relationship wasn't really going anywhere.  Since I'm much happier single and child-free, I feel I dodged a bullet that would have not only impacted his life and mine, but that of a third, unsuspecting human who would have deserved much better.
She usually thanks me after. I'm used to it now and not discouraged at all. Thank you. Usually I just laugh it off without her knowing. Metal music is my motivator and gets out all the WTF moments. I don't like to stay angry even if it's completely unreasonable.
Right - because one story totally disproves general behavior of half the population. /s
Don't answer the door to anyone that you don't know. You should have never answered the door. Even if it was obvious you were inside (TV, etc). It might seem douchey but there are cases of burglars using their female buddies to get a door open on false pretenses (i.e. help me i'm being followed!) then rushing in and assaulting/robbing the residents.  Look through the peephole, if you don't recognize him/her, DON'T ANSWER. If you don't have a peephole door, get one.  And please buy and learn how to use a gun. 9mm glocks are pretty cheap and extraordinarily user-friendly. A few hours of learning and few hundred bucks is a small investment for your life. You might even pick up a new hobby. (And most guys think girls with guns are hot ;)  Additionally, invest in an alarm system. You don't have to go through brinks or adt who charge an arm and a leg. Shop around, there are inexpensive ones everywhere.  You can go with a bat but unless you know how to hit someone with it, it's not going to be that effective, especially for a female vs. male situation. (no it's not like baseball, using a bat/baton requires a different strike, one example being you NEVER "squash the bug" [rotate your rear foot] as you swing the bat/baton, if you do = instant 30% power loss)  Good on you for talking to your neighbors though, that will help tremendously.
I am. Seems like a good bonding activity. The couple that flays together...
Oh good, I was looking for some one to offer you a firearm. Seriously, buy one, get some one to train you. 
Buy a 12 gauge. You can buy those rock salt pellets and use non-lethal force to ruin any intruder's day.
[deleted]
Gap here. When I was younger, the gap made me self conscious and I begged my mom for braces. She said, "Braces are expensive. Besides, Lauren Hutton has a gap and she's a super model".  I'm thankful that my mom didn't allow me to "fix" the gap because it's something that sets me apart and boyfriends find it endearing :)
[deleted]
Different areas/states have different laws.  But a good rule of thumb is don't carry something that can be used against you. 
If it makes you feel bad, it sounds like you expect a different degree of exclusivity from the relationship than your boyfriend. If you watched porn, but did not want him to watch it, that would be unfair, but I am assuming this is not what you are doing. I think you should think about what you expect from the relationship and make sure that you are both on the same page. If these terms are unacceptable to your boyfriend, ending the relationship is probably the way to go.
I agree with you and I didn't mean for it to come out as paranoid.  it never really stopped me from asking stupid questions. Better safe than sorry.  I just got hired for my first job and its been amazing how nice everyone is. They have confidence in me and it gives me confidence in turn.   Sexism is there but not as bad as it is made out to be.
As somebody who's spent a great deal of time in Detroit in the last few years, you have no idea what the hell you're talking about. *Anybody* (men and women) who lives in a shitty part of town quickly learns tricks to keep themselves out of trouble. 
&gt;Being forward is not very feminine.  Maybe you aren't aware of this, but you guys don't have to adhere very strictly to what is traditionally considered to be "feminine" anymore. You've given a lot of slack when it comes to that stuff.   &gt;I have to resort to subterfuge lest I be branded as a "loose woman".  Hahaha. Go to r/askmen and ask them how much they like subterfuge. Ask them which they prefer, having to summon up the balls to go ask a girl out or having that girl freely volunteer her number. Go on. I'll wait here.   &gt;agree with you when you say that making a "Wonder Woman" movie is a bad idea  Huh? I don't think making a Wonder Woman movie is a bad idea. I think there are characters who are far more deserving, and better suited to a female centered superhero flick than Wonder Woman (like She-Hulk, for instance)... but wait! That's beside the point! I *don't* want you to necessarily agree with me if you don't. I would much prefer a woman who will openly disagree with me, if she disagrees with me and will discuss the subject with me at length! Is that feminine? Probably not. Don't care. I'm going to think very well of a woman who'll do that.   &gt;so it's not like I'm not doing anything.  Doing those things isn't really very difficult. Asking someone out is difficult. It requires you to be brave. It requires you to face the possibility of rejection. That's why you guys aren't doing it. Because it's hard and you don't have to do it anyway because it's incumbent upon men to do it in the first place and you're fine with that.
I agree with the others encouraging you to go to Planned Parenthood. You have three main options right now, termination, adoption, or raising a child. They will help you through this without judgment.  I know you feel alone right now, but remember that we're always here for you. I know that the 2X community has supported a lot of women through this, all the way to providing transportation and a hand a hand to hold.   About the medical issues, there is a test now, free cell DNA, that will test for chromosomal deficiencies with amazing accuracy. If you have insurance, at your age it should be covered. That test can be done as early as 10 weeks, and I was told yesterday (when I went for mine) that the results should be back in about 2 weeks.  Good luck, and know that you are strong enough to handle this!
[deleted]
I'm female, and I have to watch porn to get off by myself. I don't think this means I have a problem, just maybe I prefer having visuals and hearing sounds instead of relying on my imagination entirely.  I love my boyfriend and I don't think it hinders our sex life at all. Actually, I think it's awesome that we're both open about porn. It's definitely better if it's something you can talk about or share with your partner.
Cycle syncing is, for the most part, a myth. Another woman's odor only influences your cycle if she is ovulating or about to being menstruating. Even then, the shift is no more than a day or two.  IUDs are known to change the regularity of your period. Did anything else go on during this time she was gone? Were you stressed out? Eating right?
Not being funny, but this is relevant to guys as well. I feel pretty nervous when I'm on my own, because I don't want to be confronted by some big guy asking me loads of questions about my house.  As someone once said, "we get scared too, we just pretend we don't". :)  I hope you feel safer soon, and I'm sure it was just a bad attempt at hitting on you.
&gt;we haven't even defined all of the aspects of women's social rights  Hahaha, what? Women's social rights are defined. Everyone's social rights are defined. Everyone's social rights and obligations are the exact same, regardless of your gender. You shouldn't get any special rights for being a woman.   &gt;Women do not have equal representation in our political system.   Women have the right to vote, just like men. Thus, they are represented just as much as men. The prime minister is a woman. Half of her cabinet are women. The leaders of two of the three big political parties in the country are women. The leader of the small party I vote for is also a woman. The only group of people you could argue aren't represented well in the political system are children.   &gt;They do not have the same economic power as men.   Maybe not. Just like men are slightly underrepresented in politics, women are slightly underrepresented in business. There's nothing fundamentally wrong about that. It all comes down to people's personal choices.   There's nothing preventing women from having economic power. Women have the exact same opportunities as men. And that's really what's important.        &gt;They are not evaluated on their ability to make decisions as men are in social systems and in the culture at large.  This statement is impossible to prove. I think it's untrue from my personal experience. You think it's true because of your personal experience. 
[deleted]
You mean the open sidewalks?
You should pursue this. Also many gun ranges have discounts for women or even classes on how to use a firearm. For a first timer it would be a good idea.  Lastly you can get a small caliber handgun with a safety. Some people who shoot for the first time use a caliber that is way too strong for them, and the noise and recoil scares them. I don't know your strength or body size but nothing bigger than 9mm for most women, and ideally smaller than 9mm. Also a good alternative is a shotgun.  Get a deadbolt, a shotgun in your room under or beside your bed and an alarm. Heck buy a big mouth billy bass, those stupid talking fish that hang on the wall. Dirt cheap motion sensor alarm. If it goes off in the night, get out of bed. Get down next to the bed on the floor. Put the shotgun on the bed pointing to the bedroom door and hold it there ready to defend yourself.  The bed makes the shotgun easier to hold up, and also provides a bit of cover in case they have a gun. Also keep your cellphone charging next to your bed and call the authorities. Forget your stuff, if they are just there to steal, that's why you have insurance, that crap can be replaced. If they try to enter your bedroom before the many many minutes it takes for the police to arrive, then you do what you got to do.
As an aside, don't washing machines turn off automatically when the cycle is done? All of the ones I've ever used do... 
First check and see what tenants rights exist in Seattle. Usually there is some sort of board you can contact. Once you know your rights you can most likely start with holding rent until the mouse problem is addressed. 
I think this is great, but I also think it's not enough.  The APA came to the same conclusion two years ago, but that doesn't mean that sports associations are following the recommendation.  Medical associations have no legal or financial clout to force them into creating that designation either.  Even if 35 states have designated it a sport at the high school level, the NCAA does not, meaning college cheerleaders aren't given the same protections that they had in high school, if they were in one of the 35.  There's also the risk that this new designation will present Title IX challenges.  Title 9 requires schools, colleges and universities to spend equal funds on male and female sports.  One of the big points of resistance to having cheerleading designated as a sport, is the fear that schools will now pull funding or not continue to increase funding for girl's team sports because the equity can be made up by including cheerleading.
Because just because *you* can get off that way doesn't mean he can. You're not the same person, not even the same gender, and what works for you might not work for him.  It blows my mind that some women are so insecure about this, and I don't mean that derisively. It must be quite a struggle to worry about, since pretty much *all* men do it and you're only causing a big problem for yourself by not accepting it.
How is that different from a woman who *needs* a vibrator in order to get off during masturbation?
Actually it wouldn't be that bad, they'd probably just throw it away.  Once my mom grabbed my dad's bag and "tried" to go through security with a 4 inch knife in the bag (which she didn't know about). TSA just threw it out and she was on her way.
I picked up on the at least incentivized  sterilization vibe there. IUDs just need to be focused on more in sex education. Birth control pills are so flaky sometimes. They can wreck some women's moods and body rhythms, take awhile to actually become effective, and can lose their effectiveness for a number of reasons. They're just not the most reliable and it would be nice if more people knew more about them.  
I think the question as is is very poorly worded.  "When you were drunk, high, drugged, or passed out and unable to consent..."  Can be interpreted as   &gt;"When you were {drunk}, {high}, {drugged}, or {passed out and unable to consent}..."  or   &gt;When you were {Drunk, high, drugged, or passed out} and {unable to consent}..."  Depending on how the respondent parses the nested conjunctions.  If you assume that every single person responding to the question is answering the second interpretation of the question, it's a legitimate question.  However, I don't think that's a particularly good assumption.  Especially if the question is administered in an interview.  People naturally tend to parse things as they hear them.    I definitely think the question could be worded much better to accomplish what it's trying to do.  As you said,  "unable to consent" is the most important part of what the question is trying to get at, and where it's placed in the question, it feels tacked on.
Your HR department is free to misuse the term, I wouldn't call them idiots, but you're free to do so. Check with the EEOC, harassment is only illegal under Title VII, the ADA and the age discrimination act. Being mean to your co workers or being a jerk of a boss are not illegal. People throw out the term "hostile work environment," but what the OP described does not meet the standard for the EEOC. Though there may be some stop-being-mean-to-me law that applies locally.
As stated in my original post.  I have a dog, and he is quite the noise maker even if he is pint sized.  He was barking like crazy when this guy knocked on my door.  Thing is, he barks at the slightest sound (which is a good early detection device lol), but my neighbors are probably desensitized to it.
Indeed. Being forced to go through pregnancy if you want to have a direct descendant seems a bit barbaric.
&gt; Their god requires them to control ALL behavior or suffer punishment.   *Their version* of their god. Other people worship that same god and know they don't need to force their views on all people. Still other people who worship that same god don't even share those same views and are okay with abortion. 
As a South African who has to be very conscious of crime, I can recommend a security door/gate similar to this  http://www.amazon.com/Leslie-50732X80NW-32-Inch-80-Inch-Security/dp/B00378KBO2/ref=pd_sim_sbs_hi_9?ie=UTF8&amp;refRID=14M6PZ3QHBF7D3YXQ1VF  Get someone to install it properly, at least this way if you open your main door wide open, there is still a very strong barrier to entry.
[deleted]
Honestly sometimes just laying off sugary soda and twinkies is all that's needed but again for some people that's easier said than done.
[deleted]
[deleted]
I had a bf in my mid 20's who was very liberal, hippie, feminist, etc. He never seemed to have a problem with my periods except for when we went out one night...I think we were going out clubbing, and my outfit didn't have any pockets (pre-wristlet days). I asked him if he could put a tampon in his coat pocket, and he refused. Flat out refused. No one would have seen it (it was one of those compact ones), he had a big winter coat with pockets, but the idea of holding carrying a tampon freaked him out.  He was an ex for many reasons, but stuff like that was one.
[deleted]
&gt; It is not one partner's choice to limit the sexuality of the other  It is if they both understand what they are doing and are ok with it. People put all kinds of limits on their partners' sexuality all the time. Technically that's power exchange, but so what? If the boyfriend does not want that, I am sure he will let her know.   It's not wrong to not want your SO looking at porn. If he must look at porn and OP absolutely cannot live with him looking at porn, that's an incompatibility and they should find different partners. If OP is just insecure in the relationship, sorting all this out may actually help her to feel more secure. 
Yes because every marriageable man is an abuser. 
Get a gun preferably a smaller caliber like .380 or .25 cal. Buy some expensive hollow point ammo (wont shoot thru walls) . Go to a gun range and practice.      If you don't like guns, there is a safety product that mounts to the floor in front of your door and its nearly impossible to open your door when it is in place. When u want to open the door simply slide the attachment off and the door opens over it. Amazon door stopper, jammer.    Simply safe offers an easy home securirt system diy, and it will call authorities in an emergency.     I suggest a gun, a dog, and knowing your neighbors. My neighbor hates guns but when we had a rash of breakins my older live alone female neighbor borrowed my .22 pistol for protection.  Im still trying to get her to purchase one and offered to teach her.    Hope you called police when a stranger came asking weird questions.  Be safe research security tools.  
That's awesome that they send a card every year. Depending on how her parents handle the situation when they feel she's old enough to know, maybe she'll reach out at some point in the future. How would you feel if she did?
*Disclaimer: I'm a happily married male. I realize you asked about this at 2XC, so if my input isn't what you're looking for, please feel free to ignore.*  As others have said above, every relationship is different. I've seen some couples where the woman asks the man to refrain from viewing pornography, and the man readily agrees. It doesn't sound like the case for your relationship, OP. There are other cases where the woman requires the man to cease viewing pornography, as an ultimatum, and the man grudgingly consents. In my experience, in the vast majority of these cases, the man will sometimes still look at pornography in secret. (It's very easy to get away with this, after all, and the urge is usually strong.) There's a real danger in a man feeling the need to be dishonest with his partner about a source of sexual gratification, of habitually hiding things in the sexual sphere. If he is later tempted to have an affair, a habit of lying to you about sexual things will be a much bigger risk factor than the pornography itself ever could be. So if you decide to demand that he stop, you should know that there is a downside, even if he accepts the ultimatum.  Your second question has to do with whether it's possible for you to stop feeling hurt by his pornography viewing, and that's much harder to answer. Porn usually shows standards of sexual desire and attractiveness and ability that no one can really be expected to live up to, and that can be deflating to see. Besides that, it can be unpleasant to think of any other woman providing (indirect) sexual pleasure to your bf, even someone who has never met him and has no interest in ever meeting him. So your feelings about this are valid and natural. The question is, what can you do about them?   If it helps, I'll tell you my experience. I'm happily married and completely satisfied by my wife. I will never, ever cheat on her -- partly because I'm pretty sure she'd leave me, but mostly because I know how much it would hurt her. But I also look at pornography and masturbate sometimes, and she's well aware of it. (Honestly, the times when I don't look at porn, I simply imagine the sort of generic, attractive female form that porn usually shows, doing the same things people do in porn, and it's not particularly different. Just less vivid.) It is absolutely **not** because sex with my wife has gotten boring, or that I need to look at another woman to "get revved up again", as you put it. When I have sex with her, it's all about her and me, period. But there are times when she doesn't feel like sex right then. Or, there are times when I'm horny, but just not in the mood for the vulnerability or emotional intimacy that comes with real sex. Or, there are times when I want to look at a specific situation or act that my wife, understandably, doesn't want to be a part of.   I'm usually reasonably discreet about it -- I don't announce every bowel movement to her either -- but I'm never dishonest with her. She just sees it as a part of my life that she doesn't need to be a part of, like my daily tooth-brushing, or the dumb comedies I sometimes watch that she rolls her eyes at. She knows that these adult actresses are not her competition, any more than Brad Pitt or Pablo Neruda are mine. But actual sex -- the real, tactile, emotional, visceral, intense, vulnerable, meaningful experience of sex -- that's something we only share with each other.  I hope this is helpful, and I wish you the best in finding a solution that make the both of you happy. 
I'm a young female builder.  Every other women who works in a remotely similar field are real estate agents and interior designers. I've found it very hard to break into the, "boy's club," and to ignore the harassment that I've been privy too.  Luckily, I had some help finding a female mentor who is a high-end re-modeler and we're able to swap stories and work through hypotheticals with each other. 
[deleted]
A can of wasp killer is cheap and just as good as pepper spray and it is effective on targets up to 20 feet  away.  Just aim for the eyes if it's necessary.  
You probably do find validation in your partner count, subconsciously. I know lots of girls (and guys) that do. Its not something that is overtly or outright stated, that doesn't make it untrue. Why does Jack try to bang a different girl every weekend, and can't figure out how to keep a girl long term?   Is it because Jack is just a player, or is it because Jack has self esteem issues? Neither of these are 'good' things. Its a sign of immaturity.  Walking in to a messy house with shit smeared on the walls isn't a sign of mental illness, but its a good indicator.  Promiscuity isn't inherently bad - but its not inherently good. It's generally a negatively viewed personal choice. I'm very ok with that.   Lets play a game: Given the choice, would you prefer your life-partner slept with 100 different people, or 5  before they met you? (I already know you're going to try and say 'it doesn't matter' - which is horseshit.)
5.) even more ??????????? 6.) Profit!
According to the FDA drug facts sheet on Mirena ( http://www.accessdata.fda.gov/drugsatfda_docs/label/2008/021225s019lbl.pdf ) on page 10, it should be used with caution in patients who have migraines or exceptionally severe headaches. From my experience with Mirena, no headaches, but I wasn't particularly prone to them to begin with. Definitely talk to your doctor and take a look yourself at the literature available for the different options for IUDs.
[deleted]
Agreed. Whether I've experienced it doesn't diminish the problem or imply it doesn't exist, but it does weigh into whether its cultural/social and specific to certain groups or people, and maybe we can learn from areas that are less like this.  Its unfortunate that you experience this. I'm not sure why I'm getting downvoted either. Thanks for the good discussion!
Yeah you need to be a little careful about it because it might come off as being sarcastic:  "Take out the trash."  "Ok. I hear you saying I need to take out the trash."   But if you run into problems you could Wikipedia mirroring and tell her that YOU (make sure you aren't shifting blame to her) feel like YOU'RE having a hard time interpreting her directions and that doing these types of mirroring interactions might help.  
I guess I just meant your 'therapist' seem a better place to start. OP's poor girlfriend might not wanna hear reddit told me to ditch you, there's a kid in this as well. OP gets real is a better outcome, surely. Again though I can't disagree with your latest post. 
Ugh men amirite ladies
I think most men who care about their SOs and were hoping for a child can simpathize and feel the women's pregnancy. The wording might sound weird but its meaning is quite powerful.  I would be more concerned to see careless men who act like it's the woman's job to be preparing 9 months for their child and he'll only deal with the situation once the baby is out.
I'd say it's a lack of information/education. Reddit generally won't accept an argument at face value, but few people here actually grasp concepts such as patriarchy, so the result is people reject the theory.
Great info. Thank you very much!!
yes yes yes 
I sometimes genuinely prefer to do many of these things alone, including seeing movies. More often there is a ballet/concert/play I really want to see but no one is free to go with me or no one is interested in going- why would I make myself miss an opportunity to have a great experience? I really disagree that the overall point of doing the things on the list is to spend time with people. I personally get a lot of value out of those activities regardless, and I think that's the point of the post.
[deleted]
[deleted]
:( abused dogs depress me so much. How can people do that to something ao helpless?
I've never used it around the mouth - but I do lather it on fine lines starting to show up on my forehead.  It's worth a try - I haven't found anything better and I've been sent and tried a lot of stuff. (former women's mag writer here)
Find your own research then. It's not like it's just one study giving these numbers. There's plenty of studies giving similar numbers (between 1 in 4 and 1 in 6) from around the western world.
I love Angelina Jolie. Not only is she beautiful, she stands for social justice. Instead of a beauty line like other female celebrities she wants to actually make a real change in the world. 
[deleted]
A .22 is the best for self defense. It's incredibly accurate for a non-sharpshooter because of low recoil and you can empty the whole magazine in one go without your hand flying around. I'm a man and I sometimes have trouble with a 9mm. A woman panicking might get smacked in the face from the recoil from a 45.   But I wouldn't recommend using a gun for home defense because you're statistically more likely to get shot than the attacker. 
Don't condescend to me because I'm educated and interested in this idea.  I thought we were having an interesting debate, not warfare.  People are *already* going around fucking and catching disease and having unwanted kids.  Shaming them for engaging their consensual sexual desires isn't going to make that less likely to happen--it just means they'll be less likely to seek out information about it and assistance that they need, further spreading disease and unwanted pregnancy.  We're seeing that right now in the U.S. with its abstinence-based sexual "education."  Viewing promiscuity as negative doesn't help *anyone.*  It only hurts.  Victims of sexual assault and rape are made to feel like their attacks were their fault.  They're shamed and humiliated.  Rapists go unpunished.  And because there's no absolute definition of promiscuity, it's wielded as a weapon.  There's no unit of measurement for promiscuity.  It literally serves no purpose.
[deleted]
Sad story. I like the way you told it, very tangible. I think you are not wrong.   To me this feels like at least mild emotional abuse. I think you should talk only with your mom about this. Confronting your dad seems only to escalate the situation and when you leave your mom is left with the fallout (see [When your frame of reference is flawed/Supporting someone who's being abused](http://www.nerdyfeminist.com/2014/03/when-your-frame-of-reference-is.html)).  Maybe it's a relationship thing and has nothing to do with abuse. It's hard to understand what happens when your own parents have an argument.
[deleted]
That's probably one of the best things you can do is have neighbors watch your back. Having neighbors that care really keeps things safe, IMO, having experience in Berkeley and Oakland. I usually make sure the windows are covered by curtains...it makes smash and grabs more dicey if a thug can't see what's inside.
[deleted]
Actually the orgasm (or lack of) thing is pretty irrelevant when it comes to finding a partner. A person who is the right life-partner for you will love you for *who you are*, not if you can have an orgasm or not. Anybody who doesn't want to be with you and states the reason is because you aren't orgasmic is *super immature* and not somebody you want to be with anyway!
Aww, thank you :) I have pink streaks now...the ex wouldn't let me get pink streaks in my hair. When we separated I told my stylist to "pink the fuck out of it" lol.
I know, it's okay. That would freak me out too. I'm sorry that happened to you.
i see your point but i disagree, men can't be pregnant. i have no problem with we're having a baby - both parents will have a baby, but only the woman is pregnant. 
[deleted]
I'm sorry so many people are being rude to you, OP.  :(  I don't think there's anything wrong with an open discussion with him.  If I were you I'd tell him exactly how you feel about him watching porn, and see what he says.  It's very possible he'll say, "If it's making you uncomfortable, I'll stop.  No worries!"  It's also very possible that he'll say something to ease your mind.  I think communication is key and I bet if you tell him everything you've expressed here, he'll be supportive and the two of you will be able to work through this!  :)
Holy crap. You describe my in-laws perfectly.
Honestly, I think OP needs to get her head straight. She seems to have the expectation that all sexual attraction to other women should stop. That's not a healthy outlook.
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
fair enough, I will look into it further. If you have any references  that'd be most welcome because I haven't found a quote of what was said but nevertheless, men making dick jokes,  as you call them, behind a woman in a conference has quite a different context to a woman making dick jokes in general.  I'msorry for the  digressionbecause noneof this is pertinent to the subject 
[deleted]
&gt;  I just think it's interesting to provoke people into a conversation  Haha, so you are a troll!? 
That as it's written is a classic example of a slippery slope fallacy. This bill does not lead down a path to the prohibition of contraception. Unless you can argue that it does, slippery slope fallacy.    And regardless, it doesn't change the fact that the law as written is not an attack on contraception.  
Find your local police non-emergency number. Program it into your phone in case something like this happens and you need to consult someone about your safety.   In general, keep the doors locked when you're there alone. There is no good reason for someone to keep knocking when the office is obviously closed to business, people know to call during open business hours if they need to make an appointment.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Go on amazon and buy some door alarms.  You can put them on windows too.  bought them for my GF, they work great.  They are cheap too.
He posted frequently on PUAhate, an offshoot of the PUA sites that was also tied to "A Voice for Men", a known MRA site.
I am all for the big dog approach, I always have been. If you are extremely concerned about your well being, save up the money for a trained PPD (personal protection dog), they are not cheap but they know the game. And no, they are not "attack dogs" they are well socialized to be able to go with you, be part of a family etc. They just have the training to be an effective means of protection
I'm not sure I've ever met anyone who's taken care by testing on a schedule. Only after they notice a problem.
I think if you were a stay at home mom it certainly would be more acceptable, if that was something you two agreed on previously. Keep in mind that by being a stay at home mom, you are doing work that should be considered as adding to the household. Generally this makes more sense after marriage and children as you are limiting your ability to make money in the future by dropping out of the workforce. Women who stop working cripple their future ability to make money, but do so for the good ( if agreed upon) of the family. You are not a mother. You are not contributing some huge amount of childcare and cleaning to the relationship. Do you two even live together!  As for men making more money than women: yes I agree this is true and a problem. This is why you should be lobbying for equal pay and also insisting on paying your share of dinners etc. By you being the "taker" you are reinforcing the whole system of male- provider, woman- provided for. You are only adding into the problem by insisting on him paying for your going out expenses. In fact by you abdicating the role of equal payer, you only make it more clear in his mind that he needs to be the one being frugal (since it is his money). You should be striving to support yourself and look for opportunity to advance, not making excuses for mooching off your BF.  You are not married and seem to not even be sure if you want to keep dating this guy. Why on earth would you think you have the right to his money. It's incredibly selfish and unthinking, especially as you have debts right now that need to be paid off. You should champion him trying to save money where possible. After all you are expecting him to use his income to subsidize yours. If you want to have a more lavish lifestyle, you need to provide that, not him.  You are being defensive to anyone in this thread who is trying to get you to see things from his side. Why not listen to other opinions to see why he might be frugal and why that could be a good thing. I highly doubt this guy is going to neglect his kids needs. HE still takes you out to dinners. If he was really frugal he would insist on only eating at home.
He gives me some leeway. I try not to be an emotional wreck, with greater or lesser success. He makes jokes about the pain he will suffer if I become pregnant. I remind him that I'd happily let him do the job for me if I could. He's awesome.
A couple pieces of advice - Don't let anyone make you feel bad because you don't orgasm when having sex with them. As long as you're both enjoying yourselves, everything is good.  Guys need to understand that a girl not orgasming isn't a failure on their part.  -Don't stress.  If you're stressing about not being able to orgasm, it will only make it more difficult and less likely to happen.  - Do not be afraid to use toys with sex.  You say you get off with a vibe and what I'm assuming to be clitoral stimulation.  Try getting a little vibe that you can use on your clit while you're engaging in PIV sex.  Another possibility is to get your boyfriend off and then let him watch as you masturbate.  
Have you tried gently confronting this fear? Ask your boyfriend to drive to a big parking lot after the stores close, and try driving very slowly and gently in a place with no other cars. A diving instructor could also ease you into things, maybe you can find a driving school where the instructor has their own brake pedal to stop the car if you have any chance of hitting something?  A lot of these driving schools deal with housewives from Asian and middle eastern countries, women in their 30s through 50s who have never been behind the wheel. Trust me, you won't be the first person they've dealt with who feels intimidated.  A lot of women in their 20s or later who learn to drive, feel a sense of freedom and independence. Try to focus on the positive, how good it would feel to be able to drive anywhere, anytime you want.
You don't need to make a doctor's appointment to buy condoms.
The article cites studies by Carbino where men and women tend to have negative views of women who initiate dates. These women are seen as more promiscuous.
Do you have anything else? I've seen this before and find it pretty condescending too. Thanks.
You can buy a punt gun.  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=n7FeeamC4qk
There's a weird thing here where you can't see that he probably found your way foolish and unnecessary. A flaw itself. Mote plank eyes etc...   You sort of sound less like you thought you weren't compatible and lot more like you felt superior. Poor guy. We all have flaws, yours is kind of obvious. Humorously your approach probably only amplified things. 
Why is it always Ohio? *sob*
[deleted]
[deleted]
If it's impacting your household finances, you really need to get on fixing this. What was your plan to get to this job if you're offered it anyways? Pay $60 every day for a taxi?
Amazing work! So many beauty brands don't cater to darker skintones and end the shade range way too light, it's total shit. Dark skin is so fucking beautiful and I wish the beauty industry would reflect that. Representation is so important for young girls and for women of all ages.
&gt;Get a boyfriend (Thanks, I’ve actually already been working on this one :-/ ).  LOL. That's unhelpful advice. 
[deleted]
Get a Machete. I sleep with one between my mattress and box spring. I can't imagine anyone in my tiny apartment not shitting themselves seeing a crazy woman screaming and swinging a machete. Plus it's a good go-to in case of zombies. 
...and teaching mechanics    The super buff girl who hates everything girly is as much a stereotype as the super girly girl    no reason you can't have the best of both worlds
Thats fine for you if you want to me treated differently. I want to be treated like I'm just as worthwhile as a male.
[deleted]
Great advice. I made it a point to remove my earbuds when walking around at night even in a place with a lot of people.
I still don't get it. Why are schools involved in "handling" crime cases? 
This is just a thought exercise, not necessarily debating your point, but in this scenario, if you MADE me dependant on a new kidney, I could hold you liable, right? For damages anyways
[deleted]
In my world, even some of my gay male friends are "one of my girls". Kudos to you, I hope everything works out perfectly for you!
You've *almost* persuaded me to purchase that vile substance
[deleted]
Of course it is.  Knowing the exaggerations and misrepresentations, where they're coming from and how they will be dissembled-- *and who is behind them*-- makes them easier to refute. 
I never understood why people like the pencil sharpener metaphor. After a while the blades dull or it breaks. A brand new sharpener is always better than a worn one.  Also &gt; but a pencil that's been put into too many sharpeners will be useless eventually  That's the same as the lock and key metaphor, a pencil needs to be in lots of sharpeners to be useful (a key needs to unlock lots of locks to be useful).
I love this picture!!! First off you look amazing. Secondly I am obsessed with your monster cat.
I did. I am sympathetic.  To paraphrase...  These people are douchebags. What they think of you is of very little consequence, and to have someone that low class think poorly of you is nothing to be upset about.  How do you suggest the OP deal with this? The pic is out there. We can't control what people think or say,no matter how much we wish we could. To expend our own energy on being upset about is a waste of emotion and energy. It will not change how they think, nor will it make this particular situation go away.  If an asshole calls you an asshole, you can lose your shit, or consider the source. If Charles Manson calls you crazy, are you going to be upset about it?  My suggestion is on how to deal with it. We can walk around saying "poor you", but it accomplishes nothing. Her SO has it right... The pic was posted. At this point, control over its usage was lost. And it's fallen into the hands of a bunch of PUA dickheads.  But, fine. OP... I sorry some total losers don't think you're "fuckable". Is that better?  
Well now I don't know what to think, you made a very valid point. 
about 12 minutes seems like an adequate amount of time.
That makes sense.
Its a good response, very true and very insightful. I don't know why it makes me want to shut everyone out though. Thank you regardless! I need to work on myself.
The way women's health issues are handled is appalling, honestly. I didn't realize until I experienced it firsthand, but now, I see it everywhere. I think it's a bit more prevalent in issues with the reproductive system ("periods are supposed to hurt - it can't be *that* bad!"), but you're definitely right that women are dismissed as "overreacting", "being dramatic", and "getting hysterical" when they shouldn't be.  I have endometriosis. These are all things I've heard from doctors before my diagnosis (general practitioners, ER doctors, and gynecologists):  * "There is nothing wrong with your reproductive organs." (This was during my first and only appointment with that particular doctor - the only test she performed was a pelvic exam.) * "Are you sure it isn't just cramps?" * "If you get really emotional on your periods, it'll make your cramps worse - that's probably what's happening." * "You won't like to hear this, because it's not as glamorous as gynecological problems, but I think something's wrong with your GI system." (??? Seriously? You think glamour is what I'm concerned with?) * "Stop exaggerating and tell me what's really wrong." * "You're fine."  Luckily, my current gyno has been a lifesaver. I told her about my symptoms and she said "Yeah, you're right - periods should *not* hurt you that badly". I nearly cried with relief from the fact that someone was finally taking me seriously. She performed a vast array of tests, culminating in a diagnostic laparoscopy, where, LO AND FUCKING BEHOLD, she found endometriosis all over my kidneys, ureters, the back of my uterus, and the bottom of my small intestine.   Meanwhile, my male family members have had no problem getting diagnoses for their long-term illnesses, including an assortment of gallbladder and digestive issues in one case and sinus polyps in another. I've also noticed, like you, that they have always been taken seriously - my SO and sister sprained their ankles on two separate occasions about a month apart, and he got prescription-strength naproxen and a brace, while she was told to take some Tylenol and put ice on it. The sprains were around the same severity and they live similarly active lifestyles, so I'm not sure if it was the fault of the doctors or a sign of a bigger problem.  In any case, I think *anyone* who is in pain deserves to be taken seriously. I know there are issues, particularly in the ER environment, of people seeking drugs, but that's not an excuse to potentially let someone who's really suffering go without the relief they need. And even when the problem isn't that severe, it *sucks* to be told that you're wrong about how you're feeling.  I hope you never have to go through something like that again. &lt;3
I think this is something your OB/GYN can best advise you on, since he or she is most familiar with your medical history and the frequency of the side effects you're concerned about. You will hear good and bad stories about any given BC here on Reddit, whereas your doctor can tell you what proportion of her patients with medical history similar to yours have had those issues with the contraceptive devices you're interested in.  FWIW, though, not everyone has a miserable insertion experience. I all but waltzed out of the doctor's office 5 minutes after getting my IUD put in. It pretty much comes down to your uterine conformation and your doctor's level of experience with doing insertions. If your doctor thinks you're a good candidate for an IUD, certainly talk to him or her about Nexplanon, but don't feel like you need to discount the IUD!
[deleted]
&gt;maybe it's just because i don't understand why...  That certainly contributes.  A google search could be helpful;  https://www.google.com/#q=the+word+rapey  &gt;...the word seems to be an ironically cutesy way to casually refer to rape culture, that’s exactly why it’s dangerous. Not only does its frivolous usage trivialize rape, it suggests that there is a spectrum of sexual assault. If something can be “only kind of rapey,” it would follow that someone can be “only kind of raped.” And the real-world consequences of that notion are downright dangerous.  ~~--~~  &gt;feminist, and all types of people you might find respectable use the word.  That is not a good thing.  &gt;you've made up some personal code of language that you have assigned value to that no one else is aware of  You are only unaware of it because of you haven't *tried* to be aware.  It isn't 'personal', it isn't unique to me.  It just takes effort.
I quoted you directly. You wrote what you wrote.   
Both of the mechanics are female. That doesn't mean they'll never hire a man, especially since the article has a quote from the (male) manager, so clearly at least one male works there already. :I
No the children should have their upbringing continue as seamlessly as possible. This means awarding more custody time to the primary caretaker. The parents decided between themselves when married about who should take more responsibility. The courts should follow in the parents already established directives. 
In fact what I said is crystal clear, all you have to do is go back and read it.
I've heard you can take the pill and skip the "off" week. Do it long enough and you may get random spotting. The bleeding you get on the pill isn't a "real" period anyway (no buildup of endometrium). Its actually a withdrawal symptom.
[deleted]
[deleted]
I'll piggyback on this real fast. Im in CA and use planned parenthood. I have insurance, but it's shitty and even though I was raised to hate PP, I actually like it. It's not the fastest always, but they are thorough and do not judge. I came to PP for confidential, free testing after I was assaulted. They usually provide services for free of cost. 
There is one in the Madison, WI area.   Dutch's - [http://dutchauto.wordpress.com](http://dutchauto.wordpress.com)
Yep, I can confirm when I was an 19 year old, I was approached directly by a beautiful girl at a party and asked to go to get place and have sex. Literally the only words we spoke were about going to her place for sex.  I was too nervous and dumbfounded to say yes. 
[deleted]
&gt; Well, they certainly engaged in an action that CREATED a fetus, which is as you say, by definition in need of their organs  [Having sex is not consent to pregnancy](http://www.patheos.com/blogs/lovejoyfeminism/2012/10/when-you-do-the-thing-that-makes-babies.html). Furthermore, we've not even covered if the woman was raped or using birth control, both of which would belie any sort of consent to a pregnancy. I like to think of my IUD as a biological NO TRESPASSING sign. Women have a constitutional right to consent to pregnancy after sex, not only before it. Also see Roe v Wade.  So, point of information, again, women are not taking from a fetus something it once had, thereby causing it's need. A fetus needs a woman's organs because it has not got any of it's own yet. I thought you were asking about liability, so I think this is the legal argument. Need alone is not sufficient grounds for liability. Sex does not imply consent to pregnancy, unless we're pretending that Roe does not exist in this exercise.  Children are consented to. We have safe haven laws if you can't take care of your kids anymore; society will care for them for you. What we don't do is take some foster kids and just show up at a random person's house and be like HAHA YOU FUCK SOMETIMES, SO HERES SOME KIDS.
Well hell, if you're sophomoric enough you're *sure* to be right.  Still though:  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=FWgslugtDow  http://www.macleans.ca/education/uniandcollege/a-mens-rights-advocate-spoke-at-the-university-of-toronto/
[deleted]
People can view something as bad and still be stupid in how they ban it.  For example, pick something that both sides of the abortion debate can agree is wrong: child molestation.  Now, if you poll people, how many do you think would say that child molestation isn't wrong?  Besides for a troll or someone wondering if you mean a 17 year old (say now, we are talking much younger), I doubt anyone would disagree.  But... people are very stupid about the laws they make concerning things that could end child molestation.  How much money are they investing in researching how to end it?  Very little in comparison to other investments, especially when you adjust for how wrong they see what they want to end is.  How many of them support laws that would make a molester who has served their time more likely to re-offend?  Quite a lot of them.  We have laws on the books that basically scare away most potential molesters from seeking help until it is too late.  Everyone says they are against child molestation, but most people seem to support at least some things that make the rates of it go up.
Notallmen will only die once people learn to accept that people from their own gender can do shitty things and that doesn't mean that they do it. And that nobody is looking at them as if they do when it's being discussed.
Undoubtedly. It's your eagerness to refute that I'm questioning. You're not interested in discussing, you're interested in "winning" the argument. Your attitude mirrors that of the hacks you listed above.  
Hm, I've been told that simply not answering the door is not good because burglars are looking for an easy target -- and a vacant home is easier than an occupied one. Someone being present is an automatic deterrent.   I never answer the door in English, though -- always Spanish and always through the closed, locked door from a distance. I do it for personal reasons (I have a psycho, abusive ex that I'm concerned may send his dumbass friends looking for me) but it works like a charm to get Mormons/Jehovah's witnesses to go away too. 
Heh, can't really comment. 2 years sober next month.
correlation does not mean causation.
I don't need my boss to be my friend. I want him to trust and respect me.
Then leave.
I wasn't completely discrediting his work. I was only addressing the 96% claim. That is a very specific and completely implausible number.
Ha, well, *I* didn't debunk it. But thanks. :)
Oh no! No point of view from a man's perspective? What shall we do without a MAN'S perspective around here??!?!?
Perhaps I'm misunderstanding but are you still assuming that a specific trait is the causal factor for an action when that has yet to be proven?  It's similar to how people discuss the fact that black males are responsible for a significantly high amount of total gun murder (around 50%) yet only make up a small overall portion of the total population (&lt;10%).    It's not skin color, or gender that *causes* a person's actions in these situations.  It's a combination of upbringing, social economics, socialization,  mental health/stability and probably dozens of other factors that are the actual cause. Undoubtedly gender and race play a major role in determining the specifics of those factors but being a man/woman or black/white/hispanic/asian/etc isn't a predetermined cause.
Did you talk to the pharmacist or the cashier/dispense tech? Normally I'd say listen to the pharmacist, as they know more about drugs than doctors. This advice sounds kooky though, so maybe get a second opinion. 
Yeah some just assume you're being dramatic 
I'm sorry that you're dealing with that.  I have a rare kidney condition and pass kidney stones daily.  (Yes, multiple stones on a daily basis.)  No one has ever treated me like that.  I hope you find doctors who take you seriously and friends who don't blow you off.  *hugs*
[deleted]
[deleted]
&gt; some ignorant trust fund shit    I wasn't even going to dignify this with a response, but seriously, where the everloving fuck did you get this? 
[deleted]
Ah, thanks. Wasn't aware.
[deleted]
Our local auto parts store disposes of oil for free. And I inherited a set of stands from my dad. But considering I just paid 50 bucks to get my oil changed in one car, I would pay to invest in quality stands for both of my cars as well as my mom &amp; brother's cars which I pay to support.  I'd save.
Meh, I'd wonder why. He's not really bothering anyone.  I mean if i found a guy stalking kids I would absolutely react. But in general I dont care about what people stare at and i find absolutely nothing to be leud. If a pair of 70 year old gay men wanted to fuck eachother up the ass in the middle of the town square I wouldnt care at all.
I think a large part of the hook-up cultures development is the disappearing threat of HIV/AIDS as a 'deadly' threat.  Sure, the disease isn't gone but it's not as dangerous as it once was.  Don't you worry though, with the rise of antibiotic-resistant STIs rapidly spreading, I think the kids growing up today (like 10-12 right now) are going to be much more conscious about sexual health like people were back in the late 90s, early 00s.
Good for you - I wish the best for you! I'm actually pretty wary about taking birth control super long-term, even though doctors say it's pretty safe. I just don't want my body to forget how to regulate its hormones on its own, you know? Maybe one day there'll be a pill for men...! 
[deleted]
[deleted]
Same I had a chihuahua when I was younger and at night she would love to snuggle during bedtime. However it wasn't just sleep at your feet snuggle it was literally curled up by your head or sprawled with her back flushed against mine. Then out of nowhere in the middle of the night you're awoken from a dead sleep by her licking your face so she could get back under the covers. 
Yet absolutely true.  Go figure.
Perhaps just mention to your husband that he makes sure to teach your son what he means by this. It's fine for your husband to instill a sense of helping out, of being protective of his loved ones, of working hard to provide for the ones they love. But to avoid ideas that the man has to be the head of the household, that you the mother in anyway is inferior or helpless, that the man is always in charge, that a man has to do the previously stated ideas to be considered a success. The statement can also get your son excited about helping out around the house and taking responsibility like his father, and a lot of sons absolutely love being able to be like dad. I wouldn't ban the phrase from your household, just make sure the intention and meaning behind the statement is correct.
By having clear pricing guidelines?
I'm proud of you! It's difficult to call them out on things like this and I'm glad your dad was able to admit he was wrong.
[deleted]
Thank goodness! One of my dearest friends has a hip problem and it never really got better, I'm so glad you did!
I'm so sorry for what you're going through.   You didn't list details but ... everyone makes mistakes. His mistake cost someone their life and he will likely pay dearly for that.   I think you can feel bad for your cousin and still feel bad for his victim(s). I think what you're feeling is totally normal right now.   Try not to start fights w/ your family over this, as tempting as it might be to speak your mind ... Everyone's feelings are valid, no ones feelings are wrong, etc. It's not worth putting a rift in your immediate family right now.   Is there someone outside of your family that you can talk to about this ...? Are you in school? Does your work offer counseling? 
I doubt any mechanic charges less than cost for a repair. You can just make less money but still make money, surprisingly capitalism can work without taking the attitude that you screw everyone as much as you can.  It's OK to make less money than stores engaged in dodgy business practices, I'm sure everyone gets enough to live on.
I want to be you in that pic right now, but alas, I have only two cats.   PUAs are assholes. The end. 
necrophilia is ok right?  we can remove organs from people not on the organ donor list right?
I'm getting to the point of considering it. I'm arguing with a redpiller...on TwoX. Those should never go together. I used to love this sub :(
I feel strongly that you should discuss this situation in detail with a therapist   They will help you sort through all your confusing feelings.   Anything you do must be something *you* decide and *you* are ready for.  If it were me, I would work on my own feelings and goals before taking on another person as a project.  I'm not discounting the good things you have done for him or vice versa.   But you owe it to yourself and whomever you date to be as mentally healthy and strong as possible.   You can still keep him as a friend and help him that way. But you've got to focus on yourself first right now. 
Your post became a wonderful primer on personal safety.  My grandma, who lived alone, kept an unloaded shotgun near the door, for the sound effect.   We have this siren/megaphone thing that is super loud and very police-sounding.  Neighbors would definitely hear it.   
They NY Times did a piece last year called, ["The Gender Gap in Pain"](http://www.nytimes.com/2013/03/17/opinion/sunday/women-and-the-treatment-of-pain.html?smid=tw-share&amp;_r=1&amp;).  Two statements stuck out to me.  &gt;In 2011, the Institute of Medicine published a report on the public health impact of chronic pain, called “Relieving Pain in America.” It found that not only did women appear to suffer more from pain, but that women’s reports of pain were more likely to be dismissed.  and    &gt;The oft-cited study “The Girl Who Cried Pain: A Bias Against Women in the Treatment of Pain” found that women were less likely to receive aggressive treatment when diagnosed, and were more likely to have their pain characterized as “emotional,” “psychogenic” and therefore “not real.”  ---  I have chronic pain.  It took me years to get a diagnosis.  Each new physician I saw seemed to dismiss my concerns or think I was exaggerating my pain until I finally saw one who took me seriously.  Even then I think the only reason I was taken seriously is because I was asking for tricylic antidepressants (chronic pain medication that works for many conditions). 
Thanks for your reply and advice. Yes, I've looked in several areas and continue to look. I am willing to travel to the ends of the earth really. And spend all my money as long as this gets treated. I am going to a doctor soon that is a psychologist/ general practitioner. He specializes in transgender patients, AIDS patients and patients who have experienced "sexual disasters". According to my psychologist he is very good at putting the pieces together. I really, really, really hope he can shed some light on this. I've pretty much exhausted the specialists in california. 
You are under no obligation to try to fix him, or to wait around for him while he tries to fix himself.   You love him, and that can make the entire process harder, but you have to do what is best for your mental and physical well-being and take care of your son before you can take care of him. Tell him you think he needs psychological help, and should see a doctor or a therapist, but you shouldn't put your life on hold because he won't seek help.   You are not his keeper, and if he is serious about seeking help he needs to make those steps on his own. 
A standard std panel does not include herpes. You have to specifically ask for that test. 
[deleted]
&gt;Nearly 1 in 5 (18.3%) women	and 1 in 71 men (1.4%) reported experiencing rape at some time in their lives.  OK, thanks for increasing the rape [statistic](http://www.cdc.gov/violenceprevention/pdf/sv-datasheet-a.pdf) bro.  *edit* replying to myself. lol
I agree wholeheartedly.  I still believe that this is true with women though.  The ones that think they're so sexy they can't be turned down turn me off the most with their arrogance.  
thank you! i'm sorry you've had any bad experiences with doctors. i know first-hand how much they suck. unfortunately, it's a genetic disorder, there are no cures. i've suspected it for two years and i've been working on proper treatments, but just received the "official" diagnosis. 
There is a great story of a radar operator shooting down a missile based off pure intuition, he couldn't justify it at all rationally. Turned out the only difference was it showed up two sweeps later, and it gave him a negative feeling as it broke the comforting pattern of regular radar traffic.  http://baneofyourresistance.com/2009/08/07/how-far-should-you-trust-your-intuition/  Emotions are shortcuts vs. the logical mind. they can sometimes mislead but in general they are amazingly powerful.
Okay I am a welder, I need her secrets. My nails are nasty. 
Acid reflux, IBS, and ulcers. 
Aw man, I'm so sorry that's happened to you! It sounds miserable. I'm glad you're finally getting the treatment you need, though - I hope it proves easy to deal with from here on out! 
[deleted]
I don't see the point in changing your own oil, the fact they dispose of the oil for you is worth the labour cost for me alone.
That makes a lot of sense, thank you! I will dazzle her with my new knowledge!
I'm sorry :( I'm glad she caved in.
Alternatively:  1. Get safety toe boots(steel toe)  2. Wear safety toe boots  3. Kick assailant with boots
Take up some kick boxing classes. My coach was a 4'8" little blond woman. One day some guy went nuts on her and tried to hit her face over the gas pump taking a little to long for his liking. Dude was well over 6' she flipped him over herself and slammed him to the ground. He was stunned. She was on her way to her MMA finals. Bad day to be a bully. As for the work thing, you just gotta keep at it. Equality won't come for free, just strive to be your best and when your the boss it'll help equal out the playing field. If you don't fight your way up, and neither does anyone else, nothing will change. Strive on, remember that if you don't like the way something is run, get up and be the one to make the difference. 
[deleted]
You're getting carried away. Neither of us are sexually assaulting the other one, it's in good fun. No I wasn't trying to make him feel sexy, but a squeeze of my BF's butt isn't the same as a stranger groping someone on the subway. I realize I didn't go about it in the right way, and should have just initiated a conversation at the beginning, but I was never trying to cause harm to him, and obviously I haven't since he loves it.  If he isn't sexually assaulting me, by actually making me uncomfortable, than I am by no means doing it back to him when he actually really enjoys it. I'm his GF, not a pervy creep on the street.
Thank you kindly!  I'm definitely glad to know someone can relate.  As for your story, finding your own true identity is a perpetual uphill battle-- for everyone!  Keep at it; do what you love, avoid what you don't, but always be open to new experiences and changes.  :)
[deleted]
[deleted]
That was just a guess, sorry dear.
It seems like handling issues with and prescribing birth control is a huge chunk of a gyno's job. That woman should've picked a different job.
The Gift of Fear by Gavin de Becker? 
I'm not saying no woman should take it. I'm saying that if she's at risk of low bone mineral density and early osteoporosis anyway, Depo is not her best option. Not only does it not address the hormonal cause of her elevated risk, but it also elevates her risk even more. I had a similar discussion with my doctor when I started hormonal birth control a few years ago because osteoporosis runs in my family and my mom was recently diagnosed at age 60 with pretty severely demineralized bones in her lumbar vertebrae. Not every woman needs to avoid Depo because of the increased risk of bone mineral density loss, just like not every woman needs to avoid combination pills because of increased clot risk. There are still people who do need to worry about those problems and avoid those methods, like OP and me for Depo and like a smoker or someone who gets migraines with aura for the pill. Depo is a bad option for OP, not for every woman, and there are other ways to not have a period that don't increase her risk of osteoporosis from its already elevated baseline.  Edited to add: No amount of calcium or vitamin D will make up for hormonal problems. Hormones are very important for guiding bone turnover rates and osteoblast and osteoclast differentiation and action. OP needs to address the problem itself, not through tons of nutrients she's not deficient in at the problem. 
This sounds great! Thanks for sharing :)
Sedatives. Sleeping pills. Valium, clonipin, ambien, etc. Or anti-depressants.
Wow.   Thank you so much for sharing that. 
So, just the one in the whole world then? And that's challenging stereotypes? Seems more like it's reinforcing them.
Let me start by saying that I come from a Pakistani family, and I find this ruling despicable. 9 year olds in today's society are not physically or mentally ready for a marriage. Culture has changed everywhere in the 1400 something years since the Prophet's time.  That being said, much of your information is quite biased. The Prophet did not *rape* Aisha... Keep in mind that girls getting married at that age was *definitely* far more common in an agricultural society like that of Arabia in the 600s. Aisha was the only one of the Prophet's wives who was that young. Every other one of his wives was previously widowed or divorced.
You are making a rather immature assumption that men cannot understand the specified difficulties of women.
OP, you can't love someone out of their problems. You know and everyone else knows that this is some abusive shit right here.   Would you still be hesitant if it was your best friend in the same position? How much would you do to help someone you knew in the same place you're in now?   I promise there are still people out there who are willing and able to help you. Reach out to them, tell them what's been going on (I get the feeling that you, like me, were eventually cut off from the outside world under your abuser's guise of jealousy and the need to feel "special").   I've been in that place before. It's not a good place for you, it's not happy, and all it takes is YOU wanting to get out. You don't need her approval to leave. This isn't on you. If you're literary, like me, do some reading-- I highly recommend Captain Awkward's series on the "Darth Vader" partner.   From your post, you're looking at the financials, the puppy, the other people involved, and not yourself first and foremost. You know you can't take much more of this. You know what you have to do-- no one can do this for you. But if you have good friends, you can make this break.   Be strong, OP, it doesn't hurt so much in a few months. Hell, in a few weeks, I was marveling at the upturn in my attitude when I wasn't being taken down for every action or accused of doing horrible things. You won't be a nervous wreck anymore. You'll stop taking things out on yourself so much. You'll be able to spend time thinking about your needs without worrying that you're being selfish. Please, do this for yourself, OP. 
The only thing that asshat grows is cig butts in his yard. Now he cat calls me when I go to the mail box. Good thing we are moving.
I think that it is a marketing ploy, but I don't think that there's anything terrible about it.  I suspect they're using it as a differentiator to bring in more customers - and more power to them.  I'm not sure how much it will benefit them long term.  However, I don't think that they're 'challenging gender stereotypes' or materially assisting in teaching women (or anyone) how to better maintain their vehicles.  I'd have to read the article again, but I don't recall them running specific lessons.  If they were to run DIY courses some evenings or on weekends, for example, or have days where they open their workshop for customers to perform work on their own vehicles, using their tools and equipment whilst their staff assist (which is a business model that has been successful in some cases), I might agree that they were really putting in an effort to help the average woman (or man).
&gt; No detail or examples are given  I went to try looking for it and found other articles that actually decided to say who specifically said that it was "daft".  [This article](http://www.ndtv.com/article/offbeat/girly-garage-in-paris-twins-tune-ups-with-manicures-538934) has pretty much the exact same information as the article in the OP. It looks almost like a word for word copy except that rather than simply stating "feminists" it mentions it's a blogger by the name of "Sophie Gourian". The spelling of her name appears to be wrong.  Here's an interview with her by French "gender marketing lab" (is this a thing?) Womenology: [Interview with Sophie Guion/Gourion/Gourian on Gender Marketing](http://www.womenology.com/gender-marketing-encounters/gender-marketing-encounters-sophie-gourion/)  Her blog (in French): [Tout à l'ego](http://www.toutalego.com/)  TL;DR - She believes gender marketing for specific products (ie razors) makes sense but for most is inherently sexist since it doesn't make sense and rather than selling the product, is selling us an idea/value of who we are.
Thankyou so much for explaining to me what it's like to be a woman. I never would have understood what it was like to be me until you came here.
[deleted]
[deleted]
OMFG. Omg. OMG. My body just noped itself inside out. I'm so sorry, I really hope there's some kind of retribution for this asshole intern, holy fuckyyyowwww omg :(. Is she okay now?! Did the guy get fired?! holy shittttt :(
Excuuuuse me, but I'm offended by your comment. That was blatant snark. There was nothing underhanded about it at all. 
Had a huge post, erased it and am leaving this: It sounds like in your case they were Mean Girls, and build themselves up by putting strangers down. You were meant to hear it. Any reaction would just fuel them. It sucks. Unless you are prepared to go 10 rounds with them you won't win, they do this all the time and reacting will just validate them. I know it hurts. Please remember you didn't wear the dress for them. The opinion of a pubescent twerp doesn't mean anything if it is meant to hurt. I'm sorry it happened.
[deleted]
Well, regardless of gender/sex people do tend to be more forgiving of minor screwups from people they find physically attractive. Doesn't mean an attractive person can get away with anything, just that someone who looks like a professional model doesn't have to be as perfect in other ways as someone who is on the left hand side of the attractiveness bell curve.
nice one ;-)
Just be aware that your son is six and any off the cuff comment your SO made was likely a response from SO's childhood and would not represent the way you and your SO are trying to raise your child. Pick your battles, I don't think this is one you should follow up on. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
Yep.  My husband doesn't understand why I worked part time just to "avoid a gap in employment", this is why. 
[deleted]
The line moves around though depending on perceived attractiveness.
I'll be honest, you can't just take years off of research and jump back in, and every potential employer knows that. Everything she learned in her doctoral program is outdated now, and her old research is obsolete. She's competing with new PhD students who are dedicated with recently published papers, and she took years off to raise a child that is still young and in need of care. Everything about that tells an employer that her priority will not be her research because it certainly hasn't been in the past, and she probably only has a few papers from her time in school so there's no proof that even when she's dedicated to doing her research she's good. Publish or perish, and she hasn't been publishing.  So she's not going to get any research positions. Her best bet is probably going to be teaching positions at community or technical colleges or something in low-level public policy like with a state or county health and environmental protection department. Unfortunately this is bigger than just an employment gap, so taking a minimum wage job won't fix anything if she's hoping for a research position. 
[deleted]
I could talk for hours about what's happened to my family over the years because of what my father did. And yes, in my first comment, I am over simplifying. But, simple truths are sometimes the hardest to grasp.  You were a victim once. You are not any longer. Easier said than done, right?  You have a choice to make. What happened to you did not take that away from you permanently. Everyday when you wake up, you make a choice to live your life a certain way. That's your power.  I volunteer for a non-profit that fights human trafficking (it's really not that much. a few hours a month). The woman who founded the group was once a victim of the very thing she fights against. She's now in her 50's, owns two homes. Married twice, with children in and out of college. Travels frequently, for work and otherwise. My point in saying all this? Life goes on. Let it. 
This is a false analogy at best, as child molestation is illegal and abortion is not.    &gt; How many of them support laws that would make a molester who has served their time more likely to re-offend?    I don't know what laws you're talking about, as there are safe zones around schools/daycares, sex offender registries, etc. I highly doubt someone who is against child molesters is going to support getting them all jobs as kindergarten teachers.    I think maybe you're confused as to the direct impact restricted birth control access and sex education have on abortion rates. We have real, scientific evidence that accurate sex education [reduces unwanted pregnancies](http://www.tandfonline.com/doi/abs/10.1080/19325037.2001.10603497#.U5hSTirD9Hg). This is direct causation.    Arguing that you can solve the problem of unwanted pregnancies by banning abortion is like saying you can cure cancer by banning chemotherapy. 
I go running and I'd feel like a twat if I had to wear reflective clothing. It would put me off doing it. Also, he goes for walks at night, you can't really wear reflective clothing for just a nice little walk.  Unless he's from a dangerous neighborhood, he's perfectly safe. No sane person is gonna mug a 200lb 6' guy.  My advice to him really is that he shouldn't be so scared of people being intimidated by him. It's their own paranoia and delusion.  Honestly, the more you try to placate peoples fears, the more they will fear you.
For me, the line in the story that made me think "not creepy" was that he actually vocalized to his male friend that he was worried about being creepy on a bus at that time of night. 1) Being conscious of a woman's feelings of safety, and 2) being willing to vocalize that to a male friend without fearing social backlash. That kind of consideration and self-awareness is not something we see a lot of when strange men talk about us in public.
[deleted]
[deleted]
This depends where you live, and what the laws are. If you're in a more liberal part of the US women have relatively easy access to abortion. Either a woman can go have one without discussing it or telling anybody, or she can discuss it with her partner/family/friends/whoever she wants. Ultimately that choice is hers though, nobody can legally force a woman to have an abortion in the US.
Are you calling rape victims paranoid, infantile people here?
As I said, there are other aspects involved, and the guy's physical state is one of those aspects, as well as the guy's acknowledgement that it would be uncomfortable for her if he approached her.  However, I still stand by it that their complimenting her beauty without being obscene is the biggest factor here in them being considered not creepy.  Regardless of how physically attractive the guys were, if they started saying things like 'she's got such a great rack' and 'I'd love to tap that,' then the guys are no longer respectful and cute as OP identified, they've become creepy assholes.    I understand that people think the guys got labeled as not creepy because they're good looking, but if they were hot guys, OP probably would have said so because it would further ego-boost herself in the story (which is perfectly ok) since she didn't, I figured they were most likely normal dudes.  What I'm finding horrible is that OP told a story about a guy's behavior being desirable, and people assume it has to do with the guy's appearance
The county health departments have STD clinics. If you're a resident testing is $10 and if not its $20. Their hours are a bit wonky but I've been to the middlesex county one a bunch of times for routine testing and all of the ladies who work there are absolute gems!   Their website with a list of clinics state-wide is [here](http://www.state.nj.us/health/std/index.shtml)
Yeah, maybe a large number of them can remarry their abusive husbands that they divorced for being abusive so they can be safer by being married to abusive men. [dies of sarcasm]
[deleted]
You sound quite a bit like I used to be. The only danger in that being that you might fall head over heels in love all of a sudden and get married and be together for at least 17 years. Will keep you updated. ;)  Having said that we were friends for a few months before things changed.  Do you find guys very attractive generally in life? Or even on TV/film? 
Stupid people are afraid of vaginas? 
The fortunate/unfortunate thing about pregnancy symptoms is that many of them are the same as an upcoming period:  swollen breasts, nausea, bloating, etc.  If you're stressing about it, that can also delay your period.  I've had a few scares where I was so stressed and worried about my late period that the stress was keeping my period from actually starting. The dollar store has cheap, accurate tests.  Take one.  Also, to address the birth control issue - I don't know where you are, but universities often give discounts on it to students (at least mine did).  If you're in the US, certain birth controls are often covered by the ACA if you have insurance.  I'm not here to chastise you, but if you don't want to be pregnant, you've got to use some form of birth control.  End of story.  Babies are incredibly expensive, adoption can be emotionally challenging for sure, and even obtaining an abortion can be difficult and costly depending on where you live.  I would argue it's not the best decision to put yourself or your partner, whom you clearly love, through this whole potential pregnancy scenario with no contraception if they're not 100% on board.  All that being said, shit happens, and I hope you get the outcome you want.  Good luck to you!
[deleted]
[deleted]
Guy here. FemShep is my Shepard as well. In the playthrough I consider the most "canon" out of the three I've done, I actually modeled FemShep after my girlfriend. Appearance, personality, attitude, the whole bit. It's no surprise that she ended up being a total badass who took absolutely no shit from anyone.
Noone said that she wasnt justified at her concern of the event in question but when someone falsely claims thats 7/10 women in utah will get raped it slightly adds to the whole rape culture, no? as its just fearmongering at that point. But hey given that fact that i was a victim of rape (i'm a male) i believe my opinion to be fair.
[deleted]
[deleted]
When you see posts in TwoX where a man has done something "bad" to one of our ladies, don't feel ashamed of your gender.  Instead, be proud that not all of your gender is like that, and if you'd like, take a moment to provide words of encouragement or comfort.   Not only do you then get to feel better about yourself, but you also make the OP feel better, and show off that whatever was said/done is not indicative of the feelings/actions of your entire gender (which is always nice to see).  Edit: Just make sure those words are tactful, and not bashing either gender. No sense in proving "not all men are like that" if you turn around and imply that all men except you are like that.
Some cultures give money as a wedding gift, but some don't. What culture is the couple from? Perhaps that may give you the information you need as to what to bring to the wedding? You can't go wrong with another gift from the registry. Pick an inexpensive one for the wedding if you already gave at the shower.
You're missing the point of my post. I clearly don't expect *anyone* to be perfect, and my use of the word was in quotation marks. I asked people to share experiences where they thought they had a really good match going on, only to find there was some small irreconcilable thing that ended up breaking the relationship, not to nit-pick my word choice and talk to me like I'm 13 years old.
i don't think you are complete with an SO. i think you just need someone to compliment you.
I guess you're more likely to be raped on a date?  But how are you supposed to get married without dating?  
Ok, so now hire a team of developers, marketers and managers.   Developing games (especially first class games like AC) take a lot of time, effort and money. Its easy to say *why didn't they do X* but video game development takes easily as much effort and time and money as making a Hollywood movie.   That been said, as mentioned by /u/d_j_escher AC3 Liberation had a female protagonist, so its not like females are being completely ignored by the franchise and, as /u/Ell36 mentions, the video game industry as a whole. Females are underrepresented, sure, but more female producers and devs would swing the numbers toward balance. You can't wave a magic wand and make female devs and producers appear (and no quotas aren't the way to do it either). 
I agree with a lot of what you say. You're very calm in an emotive area, you gotta way with words I lack. I'm just frustrated, it's every day, and a lot of the time! Worry about me or friends :( E.G, Their planting new hedges on the campus. I'm looking at them thinking, how thick?, how tall will it be. This is a dark-ish, and an un-busy area, but it's open, these hedges, will it be more scary, and dangerous? :( I'm fed up with worrying, it just seems so un-bloody-fair!! Men on here laughing about it (or at uni) I get so angry! I read that stuff about, its feels like a thing.. some Men rape, all Women &amp; Girls have to worry. Some public space at certain times is off-limit to Women. I know its not some plan by a 'secret council of Men' ... but the result is the same. I really 'get' those 'Take Back The Night' marches in the past I've read about, really 'Get' it.. Just accepted &amp; never thought of it till reading stuff a while back. Just accepting it, that feels like the worst thing. More Female Town planners?? Has to be something,not just a surrender of public space.
Good day to you my lady, I've lumbered sense I was a baby ;)
Blah blah blah...
Most mechanics I know wear gloves
I disagree. Few ideologies try using science to this extent. Feminism and sociology are practically inseparable. Perhaps it's only in my experience, but I see feminism do this sort of thing all the time. To the point that they have the president doing it, as you mentioned. Can you name another ideology that has done such a good job of misinforming people about facts in one specific direction?!  There seems to be a noticeable wage gap that can't be explained....  Stopped reading there. Source?   I'm not suggesting that we discount any research. I'm asserting that feminists routinely draw conclusions from studies that simply aren't supported by the study. If a study shows that women reported x, then that's how it needs to be reported, not that x is Fact, and that those who question x are misogynists.  I found those examples in five minutes in this sub. Imagine what I could find if I went looking.
[deleted]
Perhaps the problem does not lie with your mother denying you birth control on her wallet, but something else. If she's aware you're being sexually active and *okay* with it, it makes little sense to deny BC.   That said, if you feel you need to go behind your mother's back with it, like toasted said, Planned Parenthood is your go to. Most of the time it's free to minors, in most states.
Well, having been asked to be an egg donor really caused me to have to reconsider my views, and I was older than 16, so I had more maturity to leverage and ask questions. I was in the position of having to say "No, I can't help you have a baby because that would be murder." The idea of that was mind-blowing. How could I say such a thing? This girl just wants to have a baby with her husband. How am I "Pro-Life" if I disagree with that? It did not feel right or sound right. It felt wrong to my heart. So, like most Christians would tell you, when something does not settle right and you're thinking its a conflict of belief, you need to read and pray. I did a lot of that. Bible in one hand, Embryology text book I swiped from the library in the other.  In doing so, I tripped over some pretty brutal facts and inescapable logic. If a soul is created at conception, then what the fuck is going on every time I have my period, manslaughter in mah panties? How can that be God's plan, to doom women to be eternal murder machines? The uterus, supposedly a product of intelligent design, appears to dispose of most pregnancies without making them into babies, what happened to those souls? Why would God place a soul in a non-viable body, knowing that body will never live? After studying my Bible with a furor that can only be described as righteous, I came the conclusion that the entire thing was a scam. There is no concrete scriptural basis for this belief that spiritual life begins at conception; its doctrinal at best.   This feeling was validated by my experiences when I went to the fertility clinic to check things out. There was not a gahtdamn soul marching around that building. Zygotes are apparently only precious if they are located inside an unwilling woman: this realization hit me like a ton of bricks. If Pro-Lifers are so all fired up to save every zygote, what about the ones rich white ladies are buying off us poor white kids? Hmmmmm?  That moment when I "got" it, that is what changed my mind. Its why the Pro Life movement still does not address the issue. They can't. 
When you two have argued before, has he ever insulted you or called you names like that before? Has he ever threatened to break up or move out during an argument before? Or was this the very first time for both of those things? 
["Could you recommend a good book about raising your kids not to sex-murder people?"](http://www.asofterworld.com/clean/expo.jpg)
I'd also recommend going to YouTube and putting in something like "&lt;insert car make/model&gt; oil change" So if you had a Ford Escape, do "Ford Escape oil change". This is how I've learned to do more advanced maintenance on my own car, like brakes and brake fluid changes. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
Thank you.
I suspect she is saying negative things to others. Other people who were friendly towards me are not now. Whenever I enter the room and she is talking to someone, she suddenly stops talking. Everyone is scared of her because no-one wants to be her next victim. The woman who I stood up for went to HR and reported bullying. Despite a room full of witnesses who heard the new girl saying nasty things about and to the other woman, not one came forward as a witness for her. I suspect they would not help me either. 
Link her to RPW and tell her you've discovered her lost tribe.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Came here to say "dazzling" because it's not often I get to describe something as dazzling. Glad you had a fun night and a cool public transit experience.
What ever country you are in will have doctors. Basically, nobody here can say for sure if your symptoms are a cause for concern.
Cool, that's really good to know. Thank you!         Whenever I'm looking to buy something I always run by my boyfriend because he works kinda in the field of hunting and self-defense so he tells me whats legal and not legal to have (although he will never tell me not to buy something because he feels that it's better to say sorry after than to have a traumatic experience or be dead).      
Peoples fears are not something to be pandered to. You should never have to stop what you like to do (walking at night) because some women are paranoid about this guys motivations. Walking at night can be a wonderful thing, see the stars, it's so quiet, no traffic, cleaner air...  The problem with paranoia is that the paranoid are going to look for cues to feed into them. So if you go out of your way to appease them, they will become more afraid of you simply if you didn't give a fuck.  If go out of your way to look innocuous, some will take that as an admission of guilt, like the guy in the insane asylum trying to look sane by dressing up everyday in his best clothes.
[deleted]
Technically, your friend and her BF may have broken the law here. Especially if they could potentially have been seen by any children nearby.  Similar case: [http://www.nj.com/morris/index.ssf/2013/08/blinds_wide_open_east_hanover_man_arrested_for_masturbating_in_his_home_cops_say.html](http://www.nj.com/morris/index.ssf/2013/08/blinds_wide_open_east_hanover_man_arrested_for_masturbating_in_his_home_cops_say.html) 
I'm going to play devil's advocate here.  I want to be clear that she's treating you shitty - there's no doubt about that, and there's no excuse for it.  But I think I'd be mildly annoyed if someone was basically staying at the apartment part-time and not paying rent.  Yes, you're cleaning up and that's great, but that's a roommate's job - paying rent and keeping areas clean.  You're only doing one of the two.  I'd also feel like I had to tiptoe around someone else in my own space half the time, and that would annoy me.  Again, she's acting a fool, no doubt about it.  Her behavior is not acceptable.  But I can see where she might feel upset.  Maybe it's worth having a sit-down Come to Jesus meeting with her and laying it all out there?  If she's being passive aggressive she may not bite, but at least you might be able to get to the bottom of things and see where you can find middle ground.
Oh yeah, I forgot condoms are 100% effective and no one has ever had a baby while using them.   Believe me, I understand where you're coming from. If she lies about birth control, then what else could she be lying about? But sexual health and sneaking out at night/whatever other thing a teenager will lie about are different things entirely. I doubt we would be on her side if it were an issue of things that would negatively impact her health. However, her parent is actively choosing to deny the truth of her daughter's sexuality for whatever motive the parent has, whether it be image or just simply not being ready for her daughter to grow up. There's no reason she should be against one form of contraceptives and not the other. Access to the pill doesn't make you any more promiscuous than access to condoms, and is much less likely to be used incorrectly. (Should her mom really be trusting 16 year old boys to use a condom that fits correctly?)  Either way, we'll probably just have to agree to disagree. I don't really want to get very heated, and I'm sure, as a mother, a topic like this has to cause negative emotions for you.   
And now MTA stands for Motherfucker Touching my Ass.
[deleted]
[deleted]
That's partially my point; it could be either male or female, so why has it (almost) always been male?
No, not really. I realize that people are complex. They may lack reasoning when it comes to believing in the fantastic reality they were sold as children, but they are capable of reasoning outside that. I do find the belief in one illogical idea is often coupled with others. It's worse in the less educated, or those who buy into other narratives of the Abrahamic religions. The bible being unassailable truth leads to some of the most moronic an evil things ever. It doesnt take much to feel superior over people who believe any of the stuff there.  Notice I did not say a god does not exist; its not something provable when there are unknowns in the equation. The Abrahamic god... which is only one of many in that mythos in reality on the other hand is readily dismissed. The events of the bible itself being readily debunk.  Really, to have a serious discussion on this one would need to define what they mean by god. Mathematically we are still looking at a divide by zero/infinity  issue when it comes to the probability. 
Yep. I got a job right out of college fortunately, but money is still tight. I still ended up spending about $1000 after it was all said and done (gave them $250 for the gift, plus travel, bridesmaid dress and shoes, bachelorette party, etc.), but I still felt like she expected more from me as her MOH. But all of us are 22/23, so we were like ummm sorry can't afford
Correct. Some men and some women characterise mere initiation of sex, or sexual interest, as an act of aggression.
[deleted]
Ooo, I have actually heard of this. Sorry to pipe up with a dumb comment. I'm just pleased with my self ha ha! That where you assume something must right &amp; should continue to happen because it 'natural' I think?
This story sucks! The guy was respectful and cautious which means he obviously has an appreciation and respect for women, I think it's cute that he sat there and debated asking you out for so long, you could have at least given him a shot if he asked! I'm glad he didn't, he didn't deserve that rejection. Bad on you for not giving him a chance, you never know if that could have proven to be the romantic "how we met" story you could be telling in ten years.  Give people a chance.
I worked at a pizza place through high school, starting when I was 15. At one point, I had two assholes order pizza and kept saying really inappropriate things. I was freaking 16! I hung up on them once, but they kept calling back.   Between calls, I told my manager what happened, and he was a really cool guy. He told me to get their address. I took their order, dealing with their idiotic and perverted comments, and they gave me their delivery address, because they're stupid.   My manager said I had 3 options: do nothing, file a harassment report with the cops, or he and the guys would take care of it. I was like everyone's younger sister, the people at that pizza shop were really good to me.   I actually opted to call the police about it, since I was 16 and they shouldn't talk to anyone like that. An officer took my statement, and those dipshits got an officer to their door instead of a pizza. They actually had to go to court for it, but since I gave a statement, I didn't have to testify.  It made me feel really good that I had support of everyone I worked with, and the officer that took my statement was supportive as well.   One of my coworkers ran into the guys at a party much later- she was wearing one of the work hoodies. The guys started talking shit about the dumb bitch that called the cops on them, and she told them at length about what massive idiots they are. Apparently they didn't learn their lesson. Made me feel a lot better about calling the cops on those morons.
[deleted]
I think OP knows OP better than OP's mother knows OP.
I wish you well.
[deleted]
on their own (as far as i know). and i agree with you, but that level of effectiveness is acceptable for some people, especially if they're using multiple methods of bc.
Correct.
It isn't your place to approve or not approve of your friend's relationship choices. But if IS your place to not *participate* in activities relating to those choices that you disagree with. So just make up an excuse to explain to the BF why you can't make the trip, and let her do what she's going to do.
agreed
&gt;put in the new filter. remember to lube the edges with some oil.  Ahem. When she says "lube the edges" she is telling you to put oil on the rubber ring that will contact the engine block when you screw the new filter back on. Do not lube the steel parts of the filter. Make sure the old seal has come away with the old filter. It should not ever remain.  Bear in mind that all this explanation, while useful, is also making the thing seem much more complex than it is.   It's best to watch a Youtube video or two, since this is one of those things better shown than told.  Do not be shocked if the oil filter doesn't want to spin off at all. Sometimes apes put them on. 
As opposed to post-partum depression, which is obviously a fake condition made up by big abortion to encourage women to murder babies.  /s
You wouldn't be assuming anything about their interest; you'd only be saying you don't feel like chatting. You can do it! Be brave!
[deleted]
[deleted]
I think it is really important to keep in mind that it is HIS uphill battle and know that you are going to need to not provide him support as you will  need all your strength for you.  Best of luck chickadee!  
His argument would be valid if we didn't evolve ourselves past it.
I was thinking the same thing. Unless I had a special relationship with the person I couldn't imagine spending upwards of $1000 to attend a shower.
OK, enlighten me then.  What do you think Men's Rights Activists believe?
&gt; you seem to be suggesting that just because she can do it means that it is right to do it  It's the right thing to do if the woman getting abortion decides it's the right thing to do.
How is not trusting someone just as bad a cheating? I don't understand that... and are there any acceptable reasons to distrust someone? Or is all mistrust bad?
No he means me :-)  
[deleted]
I find it ironic that you refuse to educate yourself about legitimate men's rights groups whilst simultaneously bashing them for misinterpreting feminism.
FMLA eligibility: http://www.dol.gov/whd/fmla/  Applies equally to mothers and fathers. Up to 12 weeks unpaid leave. 
So you approach women on buses because she looks like she would be a great friend?
[deleted]
This isn't about sexism. Its about money. Males make up way more of the market share. Plain and simple.
The majority of the posts on here are basically the same. And the comments are all reactionary empathy and sympathy. Maybe having this type of debate could be more proactive and productive? You might not agree with his message, but at least it's different. At least it makes you think about things that can often be overlooked. Maybe not you personally, but someone somewhere might learn from his post. Isn't that what's really important, and not some cantankerous want for exclusivity?
Think we should end this here.
Personally I'm against it. We have more than enough people on this planet, I don't see a an acceptable ROI on investing tax dollars that way. I'd rather see us with a slightly smaller population, better quality population. More money into schools and public services than encouraging more babies.
Oh, I see now. This isn't a place to discuss ideas on how to prevent future abuse. This is a place for people to wallow in pity.   I'm done. Don't bother responding because I'm not going to read it anyway. 
Self treat with a 7-day treatment, like monastat or any store brand is fine too. The one day and 3 day treatments work less of the time. Yeast infections don't typically go away on their own.
Haha that's worded so well, and exactly how I feel. Unfortunately surgeons in particular can be quite dismissive, and think "if I can't fix it, they can go home". Alternatively, "I don't know how to fix this, please call a whole other specialty" when it's not necessary (as a junior doctor on the team, I do know how to manage a pneumonia).
[deleted]
You are literally on a subreddit specifically for women and our issues; if you don't want to see them, then get the fuck off of this sub.
Start with the longest day treatment. I can handle the 7-day, but the 3-day stuff made things more uncomfortable than the actual infection. There are also a lot of natural remedies out there, do some extensive Googling and reading up to figure out which one you'd like to try for yourself. 
&gt;No that's not opinion, that's logical inference since there's nothing separating the two in this regard.   Feel free to prove that it's improbable that God's existence will be proven, or admit that's just your opinion.  &gt;Both points, the ability to be disproven and proven make the FSM relevant to this convo.  Bringing the FSM (according to your brand new definition) into the conversation is no different than me saying that the Abrahamic God can't be disproven or proven.  Who cares? Nobody is disputing that.  &gt;No by definition FSM=a god, not necessarily the Judeo-Christian God.   So FSM does not equal god, but FSM equals "a" god?  LOL.  What's the difference?  And who said anything about the JCG?  &gt;The point is obvious in the second sentence. The mention of the FSM is not a red herring, it is a fine analogy because it illustrates the point that God and the FSM have the same chance of being proven or disproven,   Nobody ever disputed that, which is why it's a red herring.  &gt;little if any for both.  Feel free to prove that it's improbable that God's existence will be proven, or admit that's just your opinion.  &gt;That is for all intents and purposes, the same thing.   It's not the same thing at all.  You're suggesting that I claim that if two things are different, when there is no analogy.  That would contradict the definition of analogy.  That's not what I was doing.  &gt;The whole point of an analogy is to compare something slightly different, though sharing similarities to demonstrate the point someone is making about something. The point was that as deities the FSM and God have the same amount of proof and same probability to be disproven/proven.  I never disputed that, which is why your point is a red herring.  &gt;There's no other definition of the FSM other than a deity  I've never seen the phrase "Flying Spaghetti Monster" in the dictionary.  As far as I know, you made it up.  &gt;and God is just as mythical as the FSM. That was the whole point, with the same amount of evidence for both they can easily be compared. The FSM created the universe in the mythology surrounding it and is master of all creation so I changed nothing by defining it as a God, that's what the lore around it says, just as the Bible says about God.  You moved the goal posts, because the FSM was not initially defined as a god.  I wouldn't have argued the validity of the analogy had the FSM been initially defined as a god.  &gt;You're missing the most important point however. As I first mentioned it doesn't matter if the FSM is a deity. The point of the FSM when it is used is to point out the burden of and chance of disproving something so large in scope and outside of the natural universe. You can do no better disproving it's existence as you can God's. Ultimately it's comparing beings for which no actual evidence exists  Actually I didn't miss the point, you did.  *The very first post I made that you responded to* I said: "The Flying Spaghetti Monster is not God and does not claim to be the source of consciousness, so that's a false analogy. **They are only analagous in the sense that their existences can neither be objectively proven nor disproven.**"  &gt;and which the possibility of being proven is little to none.  Feel free to prove that it's improbable that God's existence will be proven, or admit that's just your opinion.  &gt;An analogy only needs to compare things with some similarities. If we're talking about conscious beings they don't have to be the exact some kind of life, meta-physical being etc. In biology for instance legs of vastly different organisms can be compared because of their shared purposes. Well God shares the same amount of proof for his existence and chance of being disproven with the FSM making the analogy a valid one even without defining the FSM as a god.  It would make the analogy invalid, because the existence of a non-diety FSM instead of a diety would not explain the source of consciousness.  The existence of consciousness improves the probability that a diety exists compared to the probability of a non-diety FSM existing.  &gt;And as I've explained, you're wrong.  See above.
[deleted]
Yikes, whats with the hostility?! I think what he said make sense. 
[deleted]
You're definitely one lucky motherfucker.  Everytime I've neglected to pee/fallen asleep before getting a chance to do so -- BAM, horrible UTI. My GP then offers me an appointment a few days in the future to ''double check'' and write me a script. At this point I know what it feels like and no, it cannot wait a few days.
Well, treat her like a person.  My sister and I needed to learn completely different lessons taught in completely different ways to learn to be healthy functioning adults. There is no one plan that someone can spell out to tell you what to do. Which is fine. Just realize that ANY children you end up having are people, with their own needs and personalities.
Thank you to those who have replied. I'm not sure why I got downvotes, but it's pretty disheartening to open up about this and be met with anonymous, pointless negativity. At least explain why. 
[deleted]
I've tried the frozen yogurt - it does do wonders for the itching/etc but I'm not sure it did much to fight the actual infection :/ Tbh it was so painful/itchy that I just went the store-bought route pretty quickly but it's worth a try!
[deleted]
In most European countries ( not the UK ) the mother or father can take the maternity/paternity leave. This eradicates this form of discrimination.
[deleted]
Well we used to do a lot more in front of a mirror than we do now. We're both in dance classes, so sometimes we dance in front of the mirror. Last year we put on a magic show for mom and we did that in front of the mirror first. I used to practice ordering at a restaurant in front of the mirror. For some reason ordering at a restaurant (a real one, not like MaCdonalds) really scared me. It doesn't so much anymore.
You don't owe anyone sex. No matter what. That being said, you do owe him some sort of monetary payment or you need to go find your own place.
[deleted]
I hope you escalated that complaint. :( And complained about the manager. 
&gt; I view it as impractical to only hire men.  Impractical how?  Illegal, sure. But impractical?
that depends on the employer. one of my friends didn't get a job at a big oil company because she had a really bad driving record. they said that she and the other candidates all had equal qualifications, so they looked for other factors that indicated risk.   some employers do take time to judge the likelihood that applicants will drop out of work. no employer wants to hire somebody who's likely to drop out of work for a variety of reasons. they don't want to waste the time and money training somebody who won't be worth the investment, and they don't want to be contractually obligated to give someone benefits   when they can't make any money for the company.
Well, the non-bigoted version is because males have more ability to pass on their genes than women do.  The bigoted version is people putting too much value into reproducing.
And what if one lawsuit could bankrupt a business?   You wrote:  &gt;At least give me one good reason why a company should hire women if they assess they are a higher risk.  I gave you a good reason. Now you're just coming up with hypotheticals. 
Discrimination happens on all fronts. Based on sex, appearance, race or creed. Employers and recruitment companies will often discriminate based on these factors. Women may get employed over a man because they simply look better to the hirer. The opposite can be true too. We live in a world where nothing is made equal yet we try and strive for equality? It's really quite absurd. Men are built differently and do certain things better than women. Women of course have their own areas at which they excel and I do not mean the house work.  There are also certain jobs where sex is not important. Such as running a business. There is no distinct advantage between the sexes when it comes to running a business.  In Australia women get paid maternity for up to 3-6 months of which they can choose to take at half pay to extend their time which can also include annual leave and long service leave loading. Men get 2 weeks.  
That's pretty true. Bad news for the people scared of the immigrant takeover, though.
yes i do, i actually just wrote my thesis on the topic of sexual assault and to quote myself:  "Unless we want to argue this point, which I won't do, the reality remains that rape often lacks visible evidence and words cannot be enough. If that was all that was necessary our legal system would crumble, I don't have enough faith in humanity to believe that it wouldn't be taken advantage of and not only with regards to sexual assault. While the injustice of your rapist, the person YOU know is your rapist despite what the legal system says, walking away unscathed is unbearable, so is the thought of infinite innocents locked away for years. While I have thus avoided discussion of false rape accusations because of their detriment to real rape accusations and our inability to ever know the truth of any situation, this is the place to bring them up. False accusations do occur (albeit incredibly rarely, much more rarely than the internet and media care to realize) and they do have extremely negative consequences in a culture that searches for reasons to deny rape. They give validity to the claim that there are liars who abuse the legal system. They make sexual assault into a joke, one that some of us don't have the ability to laugh at. The fact remains though, we never know the truth. We don't know if false accusations are actually false. We don't know if claims that are made and taken back were lies. We don't even know if every jailed rapist is guilty. We can't read minds. Once again, we return to the root of the problem, that the evidence is invisible and controversial. If an enhanced understanding of rape takes hold in this country, will the legal system reflect it?"
Why is the woman much more likely to return than the man, and why do you assume the man can leave with no sense of guilt, but not the woman? Is this argument not just as discriminatory?
lol.  how many wait staff have you seen rolling around in wheel chairs?  does that mean that the restaurant owner thinks people that can't walk are somehow lesser?  no, the owner just realizes there are more risks involved.  as long as women are statistically more likely to take leave for pregnancy and quit completely to stay home with the kids, there is a very practical aspect to that position.    when the culture shifts to even that out, so will the opinions.  we're headed that way, it's just going to take a while  the guy is just being honest. 
She aborts just because she didn't want to have that gender.
[Under the Family and Medical Leave Act there are several instances in which men can also take paternity leave.](http://blogs.findlaw.com/law_and_life/2012/06/are-new-dads-eligible-for-paternity-leave.html)
I'm the only one of all my friends who've had babies in the last couple years to send out birth announcements. Come ON, ladies, they're the cutest!  I know, I know, they're expensive and the last thing you have time for. I'm the worst.
That seems like it could work... maybe I'll ask my sister to "set a precedent" next time she's on kitchen duty. We'll both help clean up, and I think my brother might feel enough peer pressure to help at that point.
[Try harder troll.](http://media.tumblr.com/374cf99f32a55dc55b0a4018f62f9d5f/tumblr_inline_mlqji4JFmi1qz4rgp.gif)
A different job would do you better.
As far as I know, there is no Pope written about in the Bible either, but we've still got one that people consider to be quite holy.  If you want to anchor your argument against the literal religious texts, there are many, many things done in religion that are only done through interpretation of specific passages. It doesn't necessarily need to say, "Cut the girls." for people to interpret some passage to say, "Cut the girls."  Immigrants who grew up in the UK, going to Western schools, have been caught sending their daughters out of the UK to have the procedure done. When one is discovered via a spoon tucked away by the girls, there is a mixture of religious indignation that Islam would be "inappropriately" associated with it and disbelief that Western educated citizens in the UK would participate.  They don't participate because they lack a formal Western education or access to Western freedoms or values. They don't participate because Arab, African, etc culture requires the practice. They do it because of their religion and the religious community pushing it as something of a guarantee of purity.  TL;DR "If she can't enjoy sex, she won't be such a whore." - Islam
[deleted] was a nasty rant against women by an angry dude  There are shitty members of both genders. Both men and women have the capability to lie, cheat, steal, mooch, abuse, and rape. Maybe if every HUMAN tried to realize their full potential we could make improvement as a race instead of spending all this time with stupid fucking infighting. Quit being part of the problem and perpetuating gender stereotypes and spend more time looking the mirror.
[deleted]
It actually IS discrimination, by the definition of the word; one is discriminating between people.  The difference is that women are a protected class under the law, whereas motorcyclists and bad drivers are ~~now~~ not.  EDIT: now=&gt;not
I think this is a prime example of "correlation does not always equal causation."   
In Canada a parental team is entitled to 1 full year of paid leave for child rearing. You can divide it however you choose (so 1 year for one person, or 6 months each, or whatever).
how would you know one potential employee would never go on paid maternity leave, especially if you don't know the gender of either person?  You then claim that if men could get pregnant they would face the same discrimination, but they don't because they can't get pregnant, which is exclusively a female thing.  You then admit you wouldn't hire the woman because she could get pregnant, because she is a woman.  Yes the logic does follow, women can get pregnant, men cannot.
You're not in charge of your mother. She raised you and she's probably tired. I know as a mother, I've got two young children and I'm already exhausted from making dinner all the time. Imagine doing all the busy work you do x 1000 for years 24/7/365. Burnout is not uncommon.  Or there could be something troubling her. Could be depression or some other issue.
The *Factual Feminist" series comes from the American Enterprise Institute (http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/American_Enterprise_Institute).  It's a conservative "think" tank.  So yeah, there's gonna be huge helpings of conservative views on women.  :/
Respecting your elders is great, until they don't respect you.
&gt; they're able to take it so lightly  I don't think most people take it lightly when you're talking about what's commonly accepted as that.  But I think when you engage in "rape-inflation" (for example, kissing your SO while they're sleeping and calling that sexual assault as the Supreme Court of Canada does) it trivializes it to the point where it is dismissed.  Even with severe rape-inflation, people still treat the conventional type extremely seriously.  But if you think the the second example is the same, you're not going to get very far with popular opinion and you're shooting yourself int he foot, IMO.  &gt; people don't understand that their comments are possible triggers   It's not anybody's job to avoid language that triggers anyone else.   &gt; this i am not actually saying here, but i absolutely believe that all rape accusations should be treated with respect, understanding and belief  I agree with you up until that very last word.  Nobody has a *right* to be believed solely on their word.  This doesn't just apply to this subject matter, but to any.  &gt; far more often than not the person is not lying  Probably true.  It doesn't mean that there isn't merit in verifying that is the case.  &gt; question them or insinuate any disbelief is so horribly detrimental to their healing from trauma  You're confusing your wants (wanting to be believed) with the rights of anyone to be inquisitive.  If I call the police, and tell them my diamond ring was stolen, they have a right to question me further to make sure that I actually had a diamond ring in the first place and that I'm not trying to put together an elaborate ruse regardless of my feelings on the matter.  Their job is to determine fact, not to coddle my feelings.  I doubt that we're going to come to any sort of agreement, but I appreciate your thoughts on this.
And you don't think there's going to be any potential abuse of this any age, no questions asked birth control option? Or that a sexually active 12 year old (or younger) will actually even think about birth control to begin with? It's usually an indicator of not-so-fantastic parenting or growing up in an awful area. I don't think you're thinking this through entirely.
Someone who manages a fairly large group of all men in a workplace says that guys frequently take other jobs and use their unpaid leave to work there.  They retain benefits, of course.    Paid maternity leave is not that common in the U.S.  It's mostly unpaid - just like the leave men take.  He also said they take it to go hunting and fishing, stocking their freezers, etc.  While the company doesn't have to pay them, they do have to hire (and spend the money hiring) someone else to work in their place.  
[deleted]
Agreeing with others, this is not unusual. All throughout high school and most of college, I would get my period every 3-6 months. I never knew when it would come or how long it would last. Sometimes I got bad cramps and other times it didn't bother me at all. Especially when you first start, your body is still working out a rhythm.  That being said, you should definitely bring this up to your gynecologist the next time you go. S/he will probably say the same thing, that it's nothing to worry about, but it's good to bring it on their radar in case it does become in issue in the future.  For me, I didn't get a monthly period until I started birth control to help do so. It was never dangerous or a real health problem that it was irregular, but it bothered me and it was a hassle, so I liked having it even out. But all that is really up to you. It's not silly to worry about something likes this, since it certainly is an important part of your body and how it works. There are also phone apps that can help track your period and symptoms and could give you some piece of mind or help you see a pattern in your cycle, too. I use P-Tracker. :)
Not really. Even for women it isn't the case. Average age of first marriage for a woman? 27 years of age. Average age of a woman at the birth of her first child? 25 years of age.
[deleted]
Yeah because everyone knows that you *have* to be married before you can have a child. Has something do do with the sperm, they can't swim until they are exposed to gold nano-particles which can only be absorbed through the finger between the pinky and middle finger. 
Don't listen to any of the morons advocating arming your place to the proverbial teeth -- weapons can and often are turned against their owner.  Martial arts and self-defence classes are a much better idea, as well as the ideas about good home security like locks, peepholes and deadbolts.  Most of all, though, the best thing you can do is have a good plan for letting people know of your situation, particularly the police and your neighbours.  
[deleted]
1) don't take advice from the Internet at large on this. See a therapist, see a lawyer, see even a community of others who are in a similar situation. But don't ask a general forum.   2) /r/survivinginfidelity is a great subreddit of people who have been through or are going through what you are experiencing. There is no other pain like it; it is compared (unfavorably) to the death of a child. Most people just can't speak to that kind of pain.   3) marriagebuilders.com had a bunch of articles that gave me a perspective that helped a lot, especially in  the first awful days when all I could do was cry.   Take care of yourself. Go or stay, your most important responsibility now is your own mental needs. Go to a gym, go for walks, sleep in another room, , do what you gotta do. Do not underestimate the seriousness of this: you are trying to save your marriage, or at least yourself. Don't be afraid to make or request drastic changes. People quit their jobs, move neighborhoods or even states to overcome this, and that's appropriate behavior.   Don't make any life decisions now, and try not to let him make any either. You are both in a completely fucked up mental state and have to get through that first. Get yourself (and your husband if possible) to a therapist, alone and together.   Best of luck and all my support. I'm sorry you have to go through this too. 
I thought this article was interesting and refreshing. I think that shaming men for liking things that are considered "girly" is very damaging. I thought MLP was all about friendship and loyalty, and stuff like that. Why should we discourage people from being into that?
I am just one person, but I would not stare at you or threaten you or think of you as anything less than a human being who deserves to be treated with respect. That's the support I can give you in spirit. Hang in there and love yourself!
[deleted]
Sleeping in separate beds is often a symptom of an abusive relationship. My ex and I slept together when we first moved in together, and we had an active sex life. His behavior made me not want to have sex with him anymore, and that eventually led to me moving into my son's playroom. I was the only one that took care of the kid anyway, so I already spent most of my time in there.  The weed thing is an issue because it's selfish. If he's depressed and they're low income, he could probably get antidepressants either free or low cost. Weed is expensive and risky, and irresponsible as hell if you have a family to support. I believe it should be legal, but in most places, it isn't. My ex self medicated with alcohol, and that's no excuse. He was a selfish bastard, just like this woman's husband. 
There are many times that doctors blow through their stuff and say, "Your script is in your file the nurse will give it to you," and breeze right out the door without asking for any questions.
Does the school you go to have on-campus housing?
It's looking totally adorable and soon you'll have a bob!  [Katie Holmes and her short bob](https://www.google.com/search?q=bob+with+bangs&amp;client=firefox-a&amp;hs=vra&amp;rls=org.mozilla:en-US:official&amp;channel=sb&amp;tbm=isch&amp;imgil=1fL3L8NzD93vcM%253A%253Bhttps%253A%252F%252Fencrypted-tbn3.gstatic.com%252Fimages%253Fq%253Dtbn%253AANd9GcRrV-SVCUJjkuVpiNGbX3CrS3-DBkmy6QukvHnfTAliIVbNDQtRHA%253B300%253B373%253BMGYqexrNswSy1M%253Bhttp%25253A%25252F%25252Fwww.sheknows.com%25252Fbeauty-and-style%25252Fhairstyle-photo-gallery%25252Fcelebrity-hairstyles%25252Fkatie-holmes-short-bob-with-bangs&amp;source=iu&amp;usg=__QXSQKdkpy3B2ojStojz0LMxbdww%3D&amp;sa=X&amp;ei=3wGZU7v7JdSwsQSOkYDYDA&amp;ved=0CCMQ9QEwAQ&amp;biw=1600&amp;bih=773#channel=sb&amp;q=katie+holmes+bob+with+bangs&amp;rls=org.mozilla:en-US:official&amp;tbm=isch&amp;imgdii=_) is my hairstyle icon.
Yeah, but this particular post was in response to a woman who didn't get hired because of her driving record compared to that of the other applicants. No mention of pregnancy or the like.
You may have got one or two downvotes from idiots, but the vast majority of any downvotes you see are most likely due to the 'fuzzing' that Reddit employs to thwart bots.  Essentially any post with a fair amount of activity will display a random amount of illusory votes in both directions.
On the flip side you also have 40+ year old mothers of first newborns. Considering that [teen pregnancy is at it's lowest](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Prevalence_of_teenage_pregnancy#United_States) I really don't think it's to blame.
&lt;3
I am male and I have no idea the level of your pain. I joined this subreddit because I started to see how my culture(American) really skews my view of women. Also trans, bi, homo, etc. I think it took a lot of guts to express yourself and your frustrations. That shows me your inner-courage and I respect that so much. Keep you chin up, your head held high and on behalf of the worthless, judgmental members of my gender, I apologize for their ignorance and ridicule.  Some of us are working on it, ignore those who aren't. They're not worth your valuable brain-space.
I understand where you are coming from, but think about it from your mom's perspective.  She cooked and cleaned for everyone for years and years.  It probably was not her favorite thing to do, but she did it.  Now everyone is really old enough so she doesn't have to do this anymore.  It also sounds like what you want is family time.  Does that have to be dinner?  Could you watch a movie together and eat popcorn?  Could you have a family game night?  Could you find something that your mom likes to do and do that with her?  If you do want a family dinner specifically, does it have to be a big production?  Could soup and sandwiches shared around the table by everyone be just as good as big meal?  One of my families favorite dinners is a hodgepodge of foods like deviled eggs, boiled shrimp, a selection of cheese and crackers, etc.  It's easy, doesn't take much effort or cleanup and everyone loves it.    Find out what your mom would like to eat for an evening meal.  It may be something very simple, but if you make it she will see that you are thinking of her and not just of how things used to be.  Also, please know that you can make your own traditions.  In college, me and my roommates always put on an "orphan's Thanksgiving".  We invited everyone who could not go home for Thanksgiving and everyone brought a dish.  We made the turkey and dressing.  It was great!  I hope this works out for you.
Just curious where do you live? It's horrible that that kind of thing happens and I believe you it's just so hard to imagine that happening anywhere I have lived
I'm so sorry you're going through this.  I don't know what you're going through so I don't have advice, but I do know there are people out there you haven't met, and may never meet that love you.  They are fighting for you with their love to make this world a better place for everyone to live, because you deserve it.  We all do.    I don't know you and probably never will, but I want you to know I love you.  You are not alone.
This exactly. Like OP I tend to get UTIs pretty often, once every few months or so, even though I do all the "right things" -- pee after sex, wipe front-to-back, drink lots of water, etc. etc.   I was referred to a urologist awhile back, and it turns out I have a structural abnormality in my bladder that makes UTIs wayyy more common. Kind of sucks, but honestly it was kind of a relief learning that it wasn't something I was "doing wrong"! 
Yeah I am.
[deleted]
This event is a "more than one apology" thing. He cannot say those things and then clear it up with an apology. He needs to show a change of attitude and a change of perspective, and he should earn your trust back.  Being in a bad mood does not excuse a lot of what you said he did here. To insinuate that you should look nice "for" him is pretty insulting to you. To resort to calling you fat or ugly or that he hated you, thats out of control!!!  You cannot unsay those things with an apology.  I do not know enough about your relationship to suggest that you leave him ect. But i would ask that you please consider that these types of fights may not be uncommon in the future. Everyone gets upset, everyone has a bad day, you should trust that your S.O. can handle it like an adult. To trust that he is mature enough to be upset without hurting you or at least trying to hurt you in a deeper or more profound way, he needs to show a serious change of mindset.   I'm sorry your BF acted this way towards you. I wish you all the best with this.
So what are you saying? 
Hmm, I really like that advice! Thank you so much!
[deleted]
Text for those who won't bother to click through:    &gt;Feel free to sexually harass me if you’re male. You know what they say “Boys will be boys.”. Although I’m not sure any of you will want to do that since I’m not very modest, therefore not attractive.  &gt;The new principal at my school used two phrases while addressing new dress code rules to a class.  &gt;"Modest is hottest." and "Boys will be boys."  &gt;He should have said something more along the lines of: “The school dress code was established to provide our students with a safe and orderly learning environment that is free from distractions.”  &gt;Let’s start with the phrase “Modest is hottest.” Shall we?  &gt;Modest-Having or showing a moderate estimation of one’s own talents, abilities, and value.  &gt;If modest is hottest, then it’s not modest.  &gt;You are literally sending the message to young girls, who are already struggling with self confidence, that hiding their body makes them more attractive. You are establishing a sense of shame in these young, developing minds and bodies. A human has the right to wear whatever they feel comfortable in. Showing less skin doesn’t make you any more attractive. Showing more skin does not make you any less attractive. When someone calls you attractive that just means that they are attracted to you.  &gt;At what point in your career did you find it appropriate to define my “hotness”? Why are you at all concerned with how “hot” I am? You are teaching us, through modesty, to be objects of sexual arousal. I’m sorry, but I don’t dress myself to look “hot” for anyone. I dress myself as a way of expressing myself and my body. “If covering up my body is supposed to make people sexually/physically attracted to me, then how would those people feel if I decide to have sexual relations with them, without clothes on?” “How am I supposed to love and feel proud of my naked body and develop a sense of sexuality when exposing my body is deemed shameful and unattractive?” Since when should being “hot” be my concern. I don’t want to be with someone who just thinks I’m hot. I want to be with someone who loves and respects all the parts of my mind, personality, and body. THAT’S what you should be teaching, not “How to be hot.”.  &gt;My body is not a sinful temptation that needs to be hidden.  &gt;My body is not your personal, sexual object.  &gt;My body does not overshadow my character.  &gt;My body is not any more sexual than a man’s body.  &gt;My body is not here to look “hot” for you.  &gt;Next up is “Boys will be boys.”  &gt;Being a boy refers to your gender. That’s all.  &gt;It does not make you constantly sexually aroused, animalistic, or sexually uncontrollable, but for some reason society has come to the conclusion that you are this stereotype. This is extremely sad. This gender stereotype is unfair to all men. By telling them who they are as a man you are absolutely taking away their moral agency. “But he’s a teenager. He’s raging with hormones.” You don’t think I’m raging with hormones as well? Believe me I am. Men are not stupid. They are not unable to see when someone is not consenting to sex. It’s not ‘in their nature’ to rape because they are a man, it’s not ‘in their nature’ because IT’S WRONG TO RAPE SOMEONE. Raping someone is a cognitive choice. (how modestly the victim dresses does not affect them being raped). When the few people that do sexually harass people happen to be male and you use the excuse “Boys will be boys.” you are not only excusing their behavior, you are condoning it. It’s this “Boys will be boys.” mentality, culture, and attitude that condone sexual assault. Whenever the excuse “Boys will be boys.” is used, it’s just an exercise of male privilege. It’s this attitude that condones sexual assault. You are giving them a free license that makes it okay for them to be sexually violent, that says “Well I’m a boy, it’s just who I am.” Sex needs to stop being about “no no no bad dirty gross shameful” and start being about “Yes. Let’s have consenting sex because I want to.” Consent. THAT’S what you should be teaching, not “Well you know how they are… Boys will be boys!”   &gt;Boys are not sexually uncontrollable. &gt;Boys do not have a genetic, animalistic, violent nature. &gt;Boys are not born with a natural desire for destruction or control.  &gt;Despite what society and culture keeps trying to cram down everyone’s throat, having a penis doesn’t make it okay to sexually harass someone. The false idea that men can’t control themselves is so unfair and completely ridiculous. —————————————————————————————————————————————- .The next day He called me down to his office to discuss my concerns. (Students and teachers told him about it, which I expected) I spent a good hour and a half arguing with the principle about his comments when he called me down to his office, today. I offered to send him what I posted if he was interested in reading it. He said “No, that won’t be necessary.” I explained to him that I wanted him to read what I wrote and I would appreciate it if he did. He said “No, I don’t really care to read it. That’s okay.”  &gt;I asked him what he meant by the phrase “boys will be boys” and he explained that if a girl is inappropriately dressed that it can lead to inappropriate, sexual touching and staring (sexual harassment). If a boy chooses to sexually harass someone, it’s his choice no matter what his gender is. He explained to me that boys are more “wound up” than girls are. I didn’t quite understand what he meant by that so I asked him for a different adjective and after a minute of mumbling he chose the word “aggressive” but then followed that up with “…well I don’t think that’s the correct word to use…”. I agree, not the best word to use, eh?   &gt;I asked him to explain why boys are different than girls in this regard and he said “Well to start, all boys are attracted to girls…” I interrupted with “No. There are actually boys who are attracted to other boys.” He laughed and said “Oh, yes of course!”… I guess that part must have slipped his mind.  &gt;I asked him, in general, what the difference is between girls and boys. He said that boys “misbehave more” and are “outgoing”. He said that girls are “reserved”. That’s all. That’s the word he used, “reserved”. Boys and girls are different because they have different organs and hormones. Being a girl doesn’t automatically make me reserved. Just like being a boy doesn’t make you automatically misbehave. I explained to him that by using the phrase “Boys will be boys.”, he is excusing and condoning bad behavior from boys, such as sexual harassment and rape. “But that’s not reality, that’s your opinion.” he said.   &gt;He explained that his daughters “behave” and that his nephews were disrespectful… because they are boys. I said “That has nothing to do with their gender. They act that way because of how they were raised, the environment they are living in, and the choices they make.”   &gt;I told him that the phrases he used were sexist and stereotypical and unfair to all genders. I explained to him that many students and people of society were offended by what he said and the phrases he used. I told him that I thought he should apologize for what he said and explain to students and society that this kind of message is not okay or appropriate.  &gt;He said he wouldn’t apologize for that, but he would give me an apology, which was “I’m sorry you feel that way.”   &gt;After he dodged almost every question I asked by sharing his plans to improve LHS, he decided that he had had enough of not being able to answer my questions or concerns and ended our discussion by saying “I’m going to end this discussion.” and I was sent back to class. There is so much wrong with what this principal is doing that I can’t even list it, but yeah here’s your takeaway:   He explained that his daughters “behave” and that his nephews were disrespectful… because they are boys. I said “That has nothing to do with their gender. They act that way because of how they were raised, the environment they are living in, and the choices they make.”  They are disrespectful because you have specifically told them they can do whatever they want and you will excuse it because they’re boys!    &gt;Lakeland Senior High School and his name is Mr. Martinez    -Marion Mayer (full story [here](http://www.theledger.com/article/20140127/edit01/140129266))
i had heard about that, and that makes sense. that ain't so good for the citizenry, though...
[deleted]
My first ever reply to say that I am putting my feet on the ground too, and am sending all my love, support and confidence in your direction. Work it, girl! You are beautiful and no one can take that away from you. 
I am here for you if you ever want an ear! I support you, I think no matter what you look like, you are BEAUTIFUL. You never did anything to deserve the hurtful and scary things that are directed towards you. You are a beautiful woman and I hope one day you feel safe and loved and that here, on two x, you feel supported. Good luck with everything :)
I'm really sorry that there are people who can't or won't accept the woman you are. *hugs*
[deleted]
[deleted]
Besides not wanting to hire women, I have come in contact with plenty of men that think that women having equal rights = women get treated the same as men. Many cannot (or I think don't want to) recognize when/how women get treated differently. This blindness still shocks and angers me all the time
Hey girl. Welcome to 2X. Please stay.   I just wanted to say, while I can't imagine what you're going through, that you are certainly ALL woman to me. I don't care if you "pass," and I don't care what your chromosomal makeup is. You are a woman and your experiences are real, and your opinions are valid, and you SHOULD be welcome here. You are to me, and to everyone else posting here.   Now. Chin up and put a smile on your face. We're all taking this thing one day at a time. Let's make tomorrow a better day, ok? We can do it. 
Of course not.
Hey lady; sending you hugs from Canada &lt;3
Only you can decide that, because only you know all the nooks and crannies of your relationship. All I can say is, don't get married just because you desire children, and don't wait around for someone who doesn't want you as much as you want him.
I don't spend all my time in *my* metro area... I split it between several cities in different states. The point I was trying to make is the average woman I see in multiple places (in multiple locales!) is not a size 12.
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
Best line: I am a 47 year-old financially and professionally secure woman in a stable, loving relationship and it took 25 years and your jackass column to get me to speak up about my rape
I don't know exactly what to say other than you're not alone. This internet stranger is here for you, listening. Stay strong and keep on being you. 
Not if you only buy 2-3 things per year... I have friends that spend tons more money on clothes, but all of it is cheap stuff that wears out fast. Because each item is cheap they think they spend less.  I made this post to ask a question... not really to have people pick at things that are hardly related :)
Would help a lot, but many employers would still assume that women would be more likely to give up their career after the maternity leave runs out, or do less work in order to do more childcare.  These types of sexist assumptions are deeply ingrained in our culture, and we'd still need a lot of time and effort to overcome them even after such a law was passed.
I am appalled by people who imply trans* individuals have privilege. I just can't see how the things that you, and other people, experience are from a place of privilege. This is why we need intersectional, trans-inclusive feminism... because people should not be excluded and hurt on the basis that you and others are. I am sorry you are going through all of this. We are here for you.
I simply redirected you to what my initial post was about.   So it was you who took a post about the type of people who downvote an important issue into a post about algorithms.  So go ask yourself how and why the Fuck you did that. 
[deleted]
[Appeal to nature](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Appeal_to_nature).
[deleted]
While I do agree in principal, I am torn. The advancement in makeup and related fields has improved the lives of people for decades. While plastic surgery is not specifically mentioned here, the reason availability has improved is simply the market for it exists. Makeup is very similar depending on the use cases.  For some it is a way to get rid of the grey in their hair, cover over a few blemishes, and get a grin out of her husband, it is just something she does for herself for her own reasons. For others, a bit of lipstick goes well with a dress.  I don't want the pendulum to swing too far so some woman feels that her choice to wear makeup is somehow looked down on, but at the same time we shouldn't be pushing makeup on 23 year old women with perfect skin.
Transgendered people are **41% more likely to attempt to commit suicide**. Does that sound like a choice to you? Science has shown that their brains literally act like the brains of their "true" gender (as opposed to their physical sex). It's biological.  
I guess you mostly came here for the support of your fellow women, so I'm a little out of place as a guy. But I saw this on /r/all and thought I could at least attempt to offer some words of encouragement.  Life probably sucks right now, people probably suck right now. But not all people are terrible, or cannot understand how you can feel like a russian doll with the wrong paint job. And your life won't always be this bad, just as your time before the transition eventually ended, so will this experience. You'll grow into who you are in more ways than just scars healing. I can't imagine having the strength to undergo the physical and emotional stress that you've gone through already... so I'm pretty sure you'll be strong enough to follow through.  I guess that's all I can offer, hopefully some kind words, and i hope you feel better, and can live with more confidence in who you are. You'll be 'just one of the girls' in no time!   Good luck.
Hugs...I wish I could do more. I am sorry the world is this way.
Oh I didn't take it as arguing! No worries!
Look, I'm only telling the internet because the world deserves to know that I'm always right all the time. It's basically my civic duty. 
Feet down... You gals are the best.
Fucking oath he is.
What? I'm not trolling. What do you feel is wrong about the points I brought up? I'm not saying that it's not illegal, it is, but I'm saying what's wrong with that from a moral/logical standpoint? 
Feet down.
&lt;3
I'm dangling my feet over the edge of the bed to touch the ground too. We got your back, OP. 
Opened my car door to put my feet on the asphalt. What a great idea, internet stranger. 
I don't understand rape victims, because I have never been raped.  I don't understand what its like to be racially profiled, because it has never happened to me.  I don't understand skydivers, because I have never jumped out of a plane.  I don't understand trans* people, because I am not one.  Is it clear what I mean now? I can empathize, I can imagine. Calling that understanding is a fabrication.
[Aww thank you!](http://media.giphy.com/media/MwHlEq0rP4Sis/giphy.gif)
I hope you can find a peace in this world. It is rare. No one deserves to be treated differently because of the way they feel. God bless you in every way. And good luck to you on your journey.
I feel you. Have you tried a menstrual cup? It's the only thing that's kept me able to work during 2 days/month. Seriously. That said, I'm going to the doctor tomorrow to discuss ablation.  edit: btw so HAPPY to see a thread here for us "less than young" women. 
OP wasn't asking whether it made sense from a business standpoint. She wasn't asking about the economics of hiring women. She was asking if it's discrimination to not hire women, and yes, it is. It doesn't matter if a company has a monetary reason for it.
She's really just gotta stop calling herself a feminist. It must be so degrading to her uterus. 
[deleted]
Yes, both of those things are possible. Please see a doctor for specific health concerns. We are not set up for that here.
I'm by no means a makeup expert (quite the opposite) but I think that cat-eye type of eyeliner does a lot for making a person look older and sexier as opposed to childish and cute.  I know how you feel though. I'm constantly mistaken for a teenager and I'm willing to bet that learning to apply heavy eye makeup would help with that, but I just do not give a shit about makeup. I don't want to pay for it, I don't want to be bored to death watching tutorials, and I don't want to put in the time and effort to practice applying it properly. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
Yeah, I have the same problem. If you go to /r/makeupaddiction they'll be able to tell you all about it way better than I can.   The problem I have is that yeah, it sweats off and smudges down my face. To prevent that, you need to use primer. Sooo eye primer costs money. That alone has kept me from continuing the use of eyeliner.
Best wishes from Germany. Your post touched me. I really hope everything works out for you.
I messed with the date and time in my phone to get more lives in candy crush which in turn messed with my period app. I ended up having unprotected sex on a fertile day and not realizing until it was too late to take plan B. When my period was late, I figured I was definitely pregnant and/or terminally ill. I'd never missed a period before or even been a day late. I waited 8 days to buy a test because I wanted to delay reality as long as possible. When I finally bought the test, I rushed home to take it and when I sat down to pee I noticed blood in my underwear and sobbed with joy. All that anxiety because I was too cheap to pay for lives on candy crush. 
I read this with interest because I love debates as well. I think it's really interesting to be presented with days that contradicts my biases. I digress. Are you friends with these guys personally? Face to face? Or just on Facebook? The reason I ask is that it kind of sounds like their behavior is subconscious. It did not excuse it, but it might explain it. I think it might help to personally sit down with them one on one. Try to see if you can draw out their biases with questions. Since you're all intelligent, it night be a good debate in and of itself. If they categorically dismiss you, you can present them with counterexamples of cases where they dismissed your information without sources of their own.   If they still dismiss you, then they may not be as intelligent as you give them credit for. (Sorry)
When you have clearly stated boundaries that get repeatedly infringed, you have been wronged.  This has been compounded by the pressure you feel from the perception of the job you have, but make no mistake--you have every right to feel wronged or assaulted, because you clearly have been.  Even more so because of the social contract of being in the sex industry.  There is a lot of trust you offer up front by doing what you do, and its a big risk.  Infringing your boundaries in this case *is even worse*.  Fuck anybody who messes with strippers.
[deleted]
That's not necessarily fair though. If someone stays at home even though they probably should contribute more to household chores they shouldn't necessarily have to do everything. Why does one person get to come home and relax from their job and the other one still has to cook and clean up, even if they've been doing household stuff all day?
Try taking a probiotic supplement, like acidophilus. I'm a big skeptic of all dietary supplements, but probiotics have a lot of good clinical science behind them when it comes to gut health.
You're loved and I probably haven't even met you. I hope your family finds this comment and be ashamed that a complete stranger accepts you for who you are.
You wouldn't want to know if the father of your child was flirting with strangers online? If I shouldn't tell his girlfriend, then what should I say to him?'
[deleted]
I think pretty much what you said at the end there. You got choked up, I would have too (Na, I would have burst into tears). Yeah, and also quietly hint that him, and what he does, is what makes you so happy. Not so much the things he get's and what they might or might not be worth, but rather the symbolism of it. He sounds like a really thoughtful guy, he'll understand. A ring is a really nice thing, I think. Whether it's worth $50 or $5000, it's real value is that it came from him.
Hmmm. That is a possibility. If you're just out of university, and they've been out for between five and ten years, that also might have a subconscious impact. Evolutionarily, our brains developed to make snap judgments, based on incomplete and poor information. We quickly categorize sometimes without even realizing we're doing it. I suppose that if you do decide to present an argument on Facebook, you could just back up your around with links pointing to your sources. It's a little more work, bit it's not trivially dismissed.  What is still a bit weird to me is that, by the sounds of it, you've known these guys long enough for them to critically assess your capabilities. It just sounds like they haven't. I thought they would know you better than that.  I'm nuts. It's 2:50 AM where I am right now. :) Am I right in guessing that your in a more sane time zone somewhere on the other side of the world?
agree.
Your doctor should have some useful information.
[Relevant](http://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Dunning–Kruger_effect).
The big question is, why do we separate men's and women's sports? Because a lot of people say it's because of men's anatomy giving them such a huge advantage, women need their own league to stand a chance. If that's true, then this kiiiind of makes sense? If these women have the hormone levels of most men, and men are kept out of women's sports because of their hormone levels, then I guess that's the next logical step? And then the women with testosterone in the male range can play men's sports? This is complicated.  I feel like there needs to be another goal in mind for separating sports by gender. Something that allows women, despite trans status or hormone levels, to be completely justified in joining in. But I can't quite think of what it could be yet. Hmmm.
I'd like to share my story from the opposite end. I'm a guy. I have 5 sisters, a little brother, and dad is not around. This means that I'm basically the only adult male in the household.   We grew up in a way that meant we all did our own shit. Clean up after yourself. Your own dishes, etc. So I would never expect that my sisters should do my washing. Also, we all share the cooking, one day each for the week for dinner.  HOWEVER, and this is a big however, everything that might traditionally be seen as the male duties still fall on me. Mowing lawns, that's me. Putting furniture together, that's me. Looking after cars, that's me. I realize this may sound like whining, but you have to understand, as a large family, we have huge lawns. There are a total of four cars; my sisters never maintain them properly - they won't even fill it with engine oil or antifreeze. Furniture is heavy as hell and it seems like they buy stuff all the time. Try carrying it up three flights of stairs to an attic floor.  Whenever I try to address this, I'm met with a 'that's the guys job' mentality. The number of times I've heard, "why would I carry it, when I have a brother to carry it?" even if it is jokingly.  I realise that OP doesn't have this mentality or anything, I just wanted to point out that there is a lot of hypocrisy out there, in that you cant just pick and choose. If you want to absolve yourself of duties that were handed to you on some stereotype, you should be willing to pick up new ones that might have been handed to someone else in the same way.
Sometimes to make someone see that they are discriminating, the best thing to do is to draw a parallel to another type of discrimination. I'm not sure why you're so upset about someone using the idea of a hypothetical young man as an example against someone who is talking about a hypothetical woman. I'm not suggesting that they literally not hire young men to prove a point, 
Ask for what you want. Communicate clearly. 
Good god yes.  "We're adopting a puppy!" Ok, cool. You're both doing it.  "We're moving!" Yes, you are both moving.  "We're pregnant!" NO. Only ONE of you is about to squeeze an entire person out of their vagina. Shut the fuck up.
Community service or join a club that helps your interact with people with shared interests in a neutral setting.    The hardest part is getting out there and try to make conversations. Once you get started, you will eventually find the kind of people you like, and the kind that you don't. And its completely okay to not have close friends right away - it takes a lot of time and effort to get that. It's also the reason why it is a lot easier to make friends in school/University. But there are a lot of information out there that helps people get outside of their comfort zone and start making friends.    Additionally, if you don't like your job - start looking for another one. It's going to be a frustrating and scary process, but will give you a sense of purpose, i.e. Working towards a goal.  
 I think a lot of women agree that men should definitely get time off after childbirth. That would be fair. In the US, will never happen. 
I second this. He would love to hear how happy he makes you and what it is that makes you happy! 
Not paid by the employer.
[deleted]
I find it hard to take seriously anyone who rejects logic as vehicle of inquiry. And even harder if someone obviously is functionally illiterate.   What I said stands. But you simply did not understand a single word of it or chose not to.  I said that something is not discrimination just because a bunch of people at power think it is. Something either is discrimination based on objective study or isn't.  You will not find general consensus that refusing to hire a woman because of risk associated with maternity regulations is *discrimination*. Feminists and mothers expecting maternity leave will agree. Most other people will disagree. Currently governments tend to agree because it gives them a lot of new powers. Governments always agree with what gives them more powers.  That is very similar to a situtation where some group of people in power claim that persecution and genocide is in fact legal regardless of what other people -including those persecuted - think about it.  THAT was my point. You quite obviously missed it. But then the question is are you allowed to vote. Because I'm not convinced you're qualified to make those kind of decisions....
How can you possibly know what and how every man thinks without generalizing? 
I agree that it's discrimination, but bear with me in this line of argument.   You're running a fairly hands on business (a trade of some sort, say building) and you have two candidates, a male and a female, both have the same qualifications, both have the same muscular ability, etc. Both candidates have equal ability to do the job, but there is only one position.   Now lets say the male is single or married, but the female is married and intends attempt conceiving a child in the near future. Say between 9 - 18 months time. Who do you give the job too?  Personally, I would go with the male as you need to look into the future. A pregnant woman won't be able to perform certain duties required on a building site, maternity leave, women are more likely to request early release from work to pick up kids from school than men are. Although yes it is discrimination, the employer is taking the best option in their opinion for the business when making a decision.    Ofcourse not every position in the workforce is hard labour and women deserve every right to receive the same consideration for a position as men do, but I think that if a woman is thinking about having a child, I think that should be allowed to be considered when making a decision.   The same of course goes for males, if the man is married and has kids, wife works full time so he is required to pick up the kids when school finishes that would have to be taken into account as well. 
No. Of course not. I get really angry and upset when people suggest there is no such thing as a false rape accusation. It ruins lives.   BUut to say we can't try and help the situation of rape or even worse, like in this case, be sympathetic to people who have been raped because then maybe we might get some false rape accusations is horrific.  We're not saying let's put away anyone ever accused of rape gets locked away and demonised. We're saying how about we get justice working so that people understand how awful rape is, that it is ALWAYS wrong, that there are no cases when, like the recent barrage of comments from Indian politicians suggesting, hey rape happens, sometimes it's wrong and sometimes it's right etc.   We just want empathy and justice. We want recognition that what someone wears or does id not a justification to rape, we want people to understand that rape is not reported because of deeply emotional issues and vulnerability, that just as most men do not rape most women do not accuse someone of rape falsely. That the culture in which a bum being pinched by a stranger or someone being catcalled or made to feel uncomfortable or that sexual harassment in the work place or groping in the streets, all things which happen to pretty much all women, are not just able to be pushed aside and considered collateral damage because some men might end up being wrongly accused. Not that it's even linked.   As for whether they are less destroyed that really is a matter of individual cases, but usually being raped and living with the emotional and physical wounds of that are pretty fucking harsh. You can't just come along and claim that's on par with being falsely accused of rape.   Men don't go around in constant fear of being falsely accused of rape throughout their lives. 
that's what I was thinking! I've been waiting for the big question to be popped at any time too...so maybe he's just downplaying it? hmmm
I demand delicious food pictures to make up for this! ;)
[deleted]
School.  You are young and still have plenty of time to make babies. I would concentrate on your education. It doesn't mean having to go to classes. There are so many options for doing distance learning college and university courses which will allow you to continue working full/part time. A degree doesn't take eight years. It takes 4 (if you continue to masters, add another 2-3 years, if you continue to doctorate, add on 2-12 years on top of that depending on the concentration).  An education will help give you a lot more opportunity within the work force, meaning that you would make more income than a person who doesn't have the education (not in all cases of course). For me, financial stability is extremely important when you want or have children.   It's hard not to feel the pressure to have children sometimes, but it's better not to rush just because everyone else is doing it. Work on your education, get all your finances in check (babies are very expensive, http://www.fraserinstitute.org/uploadedFiles/fraser-ca/Content/research-news/research/publications/MeasuringCostChildren.pdf), secure jobs, then make the babies.  Good luck!
Nobody should treat you like that - not because you're trans, but because you're a human being. 
I'm sending my love. I think it's amazing that you know who you are. Best of luck, we're all here for you. 
Repetitive and wrong.  It's not an argument from ignorance if the person is not asserting the position to be objective fact.
[deleted]
I also think that because a lot of posters feel like they're ignored, dismissed, invalidated, and questioned for *everything they do* IRL, for just being a woman that coming to what is supposed to be a "safe place" online and have it be full of trolls and people mansplaining, and people *continuing to do it* lends to posters being more defensive.  Not everyone is going to be overly defensive, but wading through these posts is like searching for landmines - "Ugh, who's going to be the asshole that posts on this one" sometimes.  It might also have to do with approach. I might agree with someone, but if their comment was condescending or dismissive, I'm probably going to tell them to screw off. The hate sucks, it does, but I just wish these people would leave.  edit: forgot a word
You deserve a better family.  And a hug.
used to do this with a girl i was in a long distance relationship with when we would get sad/lonely. just go outside together and talk on the phone while both looking up at the moon, hah. 
I've lost track of which number I am, but another cis-male here to tell you that you are known and supported.  Don't let them get you down - they may be loud, but they are few.  We are many.  Feet down!
Actually, that not it at all. I was speaking from having read multiple threads about the very topic. ALWAYS most women don't like it.
[deleted]
[deleted]
That's what I was getting at. If you avoid unfriendly, shouldn't you seek out those who look friendly?  I'm not say you have to best friends forever. Hell I could just want a single good conversation about life.  You never know what a person can add to your life until you open up.
So if the interviewer is like "What are your dreams for the future?" And the interviewee says "Well I would like a huge family," the interviewer can consider not hiring her without it being considered discrimination?
How do you know that the male isn't going to want to be a stay-at-home dad or work paternity leave as soon as the mother is well enough to get back to work?  Why do we automatically assume that the mother's going to have to take months and months off?  Shoot, my sister was out of her job for three days while she had her kid and was able to get back to the floor with minimal assistance (no maternity/paternity leave at her job.)  
Before the flood of assholes who post "fat is unhealthy and that's a fact" get here, I'd like to adamantly assert that nobody deserves to be treated badly for his/her body. There's no legitimate dispute to this.
You are a woman, and you are so strong. I cannot imagine how hard your situation is for you, all I know is you deserve to have people accept you and make you feel safe. I can't believe your family are treating you this way, I saw your /r/TrollXChromosomes post and was disgusted. I hope things get better soon, I really do. Are there any trans charities or groups who could give you advice on the family stuff, like how to talk to them etc? I don't know if giving your family some simple scientific facts would help them understand, there's plenty of decent websites that explain gender in a readable way. There's some links in my post history from a discussion about transgender children. You didn't choose to be trans, your genitals happen to not match the gender you know you are. That's not your fault. I'm sure I can speak for many people here when I say that we love you and want to support you. 
This is so sad.   &gt; The court ruled against Smith, concluding that he had known that his former girlfriend had other partners at the end of their relationship and should have realized he might not be the father.  This is such a messed up ruling.
"OB" is all the baby stuff, pretty much, "GYN" is vagina science. Vagi-ence. I think to do paps they just need to have stirrups, lube, speculum, etc., that a family practice might not invest in, and just refer patients to a specialist.
Or it could be up to the individual couples to decide if they want to say "we're pregnant" instead of outside observers complaining without the context of being in their relationship?
I understand what you're saying, and agree that with the default sub status comes the influx of trolls and idiocracy, though I don't think it's fair to assume men take responsibility on the whole for the state of our culture, especially depending which country you refer to.  Anyways, on the topic of your original question- What would you do if you were a mod? Many people think the best answer would to simply stop being a default. This would *probably* help, but at the same time how many women wouldn't find this place then? You yourself said you only found it because of the default status. I think the mods are doing the best they can. They are deleting the messages from the trolls, and the new message that appears in the reply box and at the top of the replies is a welcomed addition.
True that. I would be so happy if every male I got to know didn't act surprised when I'm not dramatic and whiny and entitled. I would say I wish men would understand that the stereotypical woman they've got in their head is not nearly as common as they think.   
I don't feel very self aware when it took me ignoring boundaries and consent for my partner to leave me and forcing me to see what I've done.    I thought once I found someone I truly loved my problems would magically go away.  Without her I wouldn't realize that these issues are real and inside me an aren't going anywhere until I deal with them.  Even if I'm with someone I love.  My heart breaks everyday knowing just how deeply I hurt her.    I'm not going to stop working on this but knowing no matter what I do I can't take back what I've done is overwhelming sometimes, paralyzing.  I can only imagine how she feels.  And the other women I've affected. 
I'm not sure we can have this conversation if you delete your comments.
This submission was removed:  Rule 3. **Grace:** No tactless posts generalizing gender. [We are a welcoming community.](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/comments/9283g/addressing_the_genetics_issue_you_dont_have_to_be/)  Rights of all genders are supported here.    [2X FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/wiki/faq) | [2X Rules](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/wiki/rules) | [reddiquette](/wiki/reddiquette) | [reddit's rules](/wiki/rules)
[deleted]
Amazon wishlists are *great* for this. Throughout the year, you see something you want but can't justify buying right then? Amazon wishlist. You can even add things from other sites. Then, when birthdays or holidays roll around, he's got the link to your wishlist.
[deleted]
It feels as if an interesting, supportive group of people hanging out in a living room got invaded by a hundred angry drunks from the street outside.   Edit: spelling
Thanks! You're pretty awesome yourself too! :) 
[deleted]
No need to apologize. Thanks for the reply! It is a daily struggle, albeit not as difficult as some people face, but it's mine. I can only hope that I am the best role model for my children and that they in turn become the best role model for their children. Again, thank you for the reply.
Yeah I mean we were saving up to get that as birth control, so that plus condoms plus no coming inside, so we wouldn't find ourselves in this situation. Welp /:
Awesome. I guess I can't see it from the perspective of doing it for 20+ years, because I'm in my mid-twenties, haha. But it's amazing and wonderful that you two are able to communicate, be honest, and have an awesome relationship :) 
&gt; but "no" now doesn't mean you can never try again ever.  No means you are not in the clear until you get an actual yes. That's how consent works. You say 'yes' to something.
You've said something stupid, probably realised it, but you're sticking with it! Fair play, I suppose. Dedication. 
[deleted]
Spot on about empathy being a two-way street. However, "you must attempt to empathize with their issues" feels a whole lot to me like a more eloquent way of saying "But what about the men? What about MEN'S feelings?"  This is TwoX, and I don't feel that taking into account men and the male perspective and male feelings in every post is something that needs to or should happen. 
Get a lawyer NOW. 
[deleted]
I think it *really* depends on the GP. I think most GPs can perform pap smears, but if you get an abnormal result back you're going to have to visit a gyno to get it checked out. Most of the women I know just go to a gyno to get it done.
As a female, I was addressing a comment that /u/BlisterBox and your follow up.   &gt; People in here use "as a man" very frequently to talk over women...to say "as a man I have an opinion on what this man did and it's more important than what you experienced"  I did not get that from /u/BlisterBox's comment. In fact I've never come across your "as a man" statement on this sub to date. I'm not discounting that it happens, however if a man wants to be an obnoxious ass the "as a man" part is not the part that offends me. Its the obnoxious comment that follows. 
Talk to a doctor, not Reddit!
I'm sorry that you've had to go through that.  You're a woman just as much as I am and nobody can help the body they're born with. :)
Perhaps because if she does not want to give birth it IS her only choice.  AND it IS her CHOICE.
not to hell, but enough for my comment to be hidden after giving the advice she is seeking, but people only want her to see the advice they like and think is right.:-/ I couldn't care less to get downvoted to oblivion if my answer can make a difference.
[deleted]
I was exaggerating when I said "everything", but I don't think this is paranoia and low self-esteem. It doesn't happen with every interaction, but you know what, it does happen every day. And I personally do try to take action.   I think that these things are part of being female. I think it it happens to most people. Maybe not all, but I don't think it's paranoia if it actually happens. I don't think it's low self-esteem if my boyfriend tells me he doesn't like my outfit, my male coworker makes a comment on my appearance, my contributions to a meeting are ignored until a man makes them, and I'm interrupted 15 times in one conversation, and the computer salesman asks me if my father's with me that I recognize what is happening.
[deleted]
[deleted]
I understand the feeling. I'm sorry that a lot of the comments so far have just turned into yet another debate.   I wish I had more than sympathy to offer - I've been on reddit for a while and just about every thread on women's experiences has the same predictably ignorant and hurtful comments. These commenters are like a mythical beast: for every one you engage with and successfully debate (whatever that means), five new ignorant commenters appear. I try not to debate anymore, just downvote. 
&gt; Moderators: this isn't for you, it's for the OP. There's no need for you to be hypersensitive and delete everything you don't like. Not everything is about you. If people don't like this post, they can downvote it, as is their right. Leave my post up, it's for the OP, I don't give a fuck what you think about it.  This post is tagged "support".  In posts that have a "support" tag, only supportive comments are allowed.
[deleted]
If you actually take the time to look at the new posts here or even scroll down from the top few posts you'll see that most entries here aren't solely about sexism. They're about periods, birth control, relationships, etc. The posts about sexism etc get voted up because they touch on issues that are important and impact a lot of women.   Another problem is that men come in here and want to talk about their issues and their problems and while I understand that desire, this isn't OneYTwoX. It's TwoX. Guys *need* to remember that this sub is about and for issues as they pertain to women and women's perspectives. A lot of the hostility you speak of comes from women being tired of the constant redirect in conversation and not recognising that just like if you went to /r/books and started talking about movies all the time, the users here aren't appreciative of the conversation being redirected to men all the time. /r/OneY does exist, and hell, maybe a sub that's for both should exist as well so that some of the comments should be directed there. 
It's men.  Not all of them (there have been many wonderful posts from males in here recently, and we welcome more of that), just the vocal minority who sent waves of random PM's like "Shh, sweetie. Just lay back and take it," and comments like "You're a whore who deserved to be raped." Once that started, the place went off like a powder keg.
It sucks when you get conflicting informatiob. Better safe than sorry, though. Feel better!
No, they mentioned a case that went pretty much like that and how for some men, once they knew the DNA wasn't there, the love went bye-bye.
Please avoid name-calling.
But the end result is the same: the men ARE the fathers of those children.   DNA doesn't make someone a father. Raising a child does. 
I personally have never understood why people invest so much energy into policing the details of their fellow human beings.  **\*HUGS***
The last time I tried to tell a male to get help after he was raging at me and my sister and scaring our older sister's kids into crying, I ended up with a black eye and crying myself.  Point is, abusers of any kind do not want help. They feel they are right about everything and that they are entitled to everything.  Making a victim responsible for an abuser's words and actions is negligent advice that may often prove deadly. A victim's only concern should be for themselves and any children involved.
[deleted]
[deleted]
I'm certainly not going to argue with default status being terrible for this place. But OP is implying that having to debate is indicative of some kind of losing battle. As though absolutely every claim made by women and feminists should be taken on face value with no criticism whatsoever. I think that's pretty ridiculous. If someone has a valid criticism then it should be addressed. But you can't address valid criticism if you're going to just disregard every contrarian opinion you find on the basis of it being contrarian. 
[deleted]
Exactly. It's just one of those things that is a fact of life. Like 'your SO looks at porn once in a while. There's a good chance your SO has slept with someone before you'. I don't get people who are so upset over just human things. 
[http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Eternal_September](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Eternal_September) is what happened, the only way to reverse it is to demand that the subreddit be removed from the front page and for the mods to start banning the people that are overriding the original culture. A lot of my favorite subreddits went downhill when they were added to the front page back in May and so far none have managed to avoid this effect.
Love this series!  Don't watch the miniseries on Netflix after reading it, though.  It's disappointing how much they changed things.
Book - Elizabeth Kerner's trilogy consisting of Song in the Silence, The Lesser Kindred, and Redeeming the Lost. 
My friends are overwhelmingly guys.  It works because I screen for "doesn't think their feelings of attraction are someone else's fault" in my social groups.    Feelings happen, they can't control them, and neither can you. But they can decide to ride out the crush until it passes if it isn't mutual (it happens).  I've honestly had more problems with guy friends getting girlfriends who can't tolerate our platonic friendship, which I always find very disappointing.  I like to compare attraction to hunger.  People just get hungry because they're people.  We intuitively understand, in modern culture, that when we're hungry, we don't get to blame the person sitting next to us eating a piece of cake for that - they're not eating cake *at us*.  We can mention to that person that we're hungry, and maybe they'll offer to give us some cake, maybe they don't feel inclined to share and we know that we should go find our own food.  Despite how powerful a survival instinct hunger is, we generally know that managing that urge is our own responsibility.  Being friends with guys who understand that attraction is like hunger works - if you don't agree to solve their desire, they need to go sort it out themselves and shouldn't take it out on you.    You're not an idiot, it happens sadly often (see every post in recent reddit discussions where a guy says that he is totally justified in hitting on a woman he finds attractive regardless of social context- if they say "don't be upset, it's a compliment" when you complain about street harassment, for example, they're unlikely to be able to handle friendship if they develop a crush on you.)
I agree that there should be some sort of support if he wants to continue a relationship with the child; but the child also has a second parent living in the home with her. This absolutely should be factored into the amount that he's contributing toward child support.
This might not be completely relevant since I am a woman and y'all are discussing men but I've actually felt more welcome here since defaulting. Used to be any comment I made that didn't align with feminism was downvoted to hell. Now it at least stays at 0 and sometimes, miraculously, above 0.  Those men felt welcome here because they were already feminist. Weren't a threat. I'm guessing you have stayed within the acceptable bounds of comments for your stay here cause I assure you this place was very much a hostile place for many people beforehand. People like to talk about TwoX before default as if it was a magical land of acceptance and happiness and reasonable discussion. It wasn't. At all. 
*hug* take my internet hug as I cannot give you a real one. reading this was kind of a re-opening of the eyes of how society not only portrays trans, but just anyone who is not their cookie cutter beautiful. be who you are and love who you are, screw anyone who can't see how wonderful that is.
&gt; Maybe you can go work in a club where guys aren't allowed to touch you.  You would be shocked how little that changes things. 
But that's the whole point. Mike was the one who was there while L's bio-dad kicked up his heels for nine years. Mike should received *some* compensation for what happened and he shouldn't have to live in fear of never seeing his daughter again.  Edit: I meant to reply to another comment. Sorry about that. 
No of course I didn't and wouldn't  have said that 
That question comes from the assumption that only biologically fathers are real fathers, which is an assumption that I and many others strongly disagree with.
Cool, thanks for the info! Expect a PM from me shortly
[deleted]
Yay, rage fuel!  I'm male and married.  I have eyes.  My genitalia is intact and functional.  I see pretty people who are not my wife *all the time*.  On the internet, in the movies, on the street, just literally all over the place.  Sometimes these pretty people are not 90% hidden under fabric.  And you know what?  It's just not a problem.  I don't love my wife any less, I'm not less attracted to her, I don't mentally cut and paste some other lady's body under her face when I'm talking to her.  Those kinds of reactions *are not intrinsic to men*.  It's not a thing.  If this lady's husband is struggling with those things that's *his* problem.  It's not because he's male, it's not something hard coded into his genes it is *his personal problem* that he can't separate his visual cortex from his emotions.  It's not something men can't help doing and it's sure as chicken scratch not something any other ladies are responsible for helping him hide from.  This woman has no business trying to protect us 'poor, helpless men' from our insatiable, mind-numbing lust.  It doesn't exist.  It's an imaginary condition that lets mean, frightened people perpetuate the myth that sexual victimization is the fault of the victim.  This kind of sugar coated, tangential, indirect reinforcement of that idea is the *worst* kind of misogyny - it's harder to see than the overt kind.
It is just a crappy situation all around. I really don't know what the solution or rectification should be. :/
 &gt;I mean DNA must be really important to that type of man  Why shouldn't it be? The vast majority of people who have children do so under the assumption that the kid is going to share their DNA.  When it turns out that that’s not the case it’s obviously going to be a mindfuck, especially when you factor in the mother’s massive betrayal and years of lying. Where’s your condemnation for the assholes who cause these situations in the first place?
My idea is an unlimited Olympics,  where the athletes are allowed to be on whatever they want, so we can see the true pinnacle of modern athleticism and science. 
&gt;If he is the type of man that would answer "no" to that question then he needs to request a DNA test at the birth of any children before starting to parent those children.   Yes, that’s a totally reasonable and practical way to start off a relationship with a child involved. It really builds trust. /s  You're basically saying that men should just know when they're being lied to and if they don’t then it’s their fault.
At this point it likely isn't even a fetus,  but an embryo (up to 8 weeks). 
Because by the time you've found out in this hypothetical situation you already ARE the father, and the child IS your child that you've been raising, and the fact that you don't share DNA in this situation doesn't negate that you're the father. If you're the type of person who says "no, I am NOT the father" in that situation, then you are the type of person who needs to demand that DNA test at birth to save your child the heartbreak of you abandoning it midway through its childhood.
It's been a while since I read either book, and I've read PotE 3x while I've only read WWE once, but I found Aliena a more compelling character.   I think a flaw of these books is that some of the characters are very much "modern characters" - 20th or 21st century people living in the 1100s or 1300s. While Tom for instance seemed like the kind of guy who could be a 12th century mason, Caris in particular stood out to me as someone who may have time travelled from the mid 20th century, a la Diana Gabaldon's Outlander series.  The other (possible) flaw of these books is that the characters from PotE are largely mirrored in WWE, and while reading the 2nd book I couldn't decide if it was lazy story telling or purposeful symbolism of how history repeats itself. Jack = Merthin was the clearest case for me, but Aliena = Caris was also a little heavy-handed. For this reason, I actually found Gwenda to be a more interesting character than Caris, because, having PotE fresh in my mind, Gwenda was more unique.  While Aliena and Caris both hold valuable the same kind of independence and perseverence etc we expect from modern heroines, I found Aliena's arc to be somewhat more compelling as a reader. She goes from a position of high privilege to one of no privilege, which would be more similar to my hypothetical experience as a modern day woman thrust into the middle ages, just trying to survive and be happy. Caris' story arc starts with a girl in a place of moderate privilege who wants to break tradition and finds the world not ready for change. While this is likely a very relatable plot to many, I found it rather more cliched.
Late to the party, but -- \*hug* from Seattle! I hope things get better soon. &lt;3
[deleted]
[deleted]
That is high end I think.  It was only 400 at a clinic here on the east coast mid-atlantic a few years ago.
[deleted]
Why do you think you should run around spreading your feminism links all through the sub? 
[deleted]
In the US, roughly 55% of men are circumcised, compared to roughly 0.1% of women. If you're arguing from a domestic point of view, then I can see why some men feel annoyed that male circumcision isn't given much attention. However, I agree that they aren't really the same in that one is intended to have health benefits whereas the other is used as a tool of sexual oppression.
And I think we SHOULD have more frank discussions about the circumcision of male infants. I just don't think it is appropriate to piggyback the topic when the discussion is centered around female circumcision. 
The article has tons of sources. Try clicking on the blue text.
Means to an end then... good luck!
[deleted]
&gt; http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Eternal_September is what happened  I disagree. Only the view that Eternal September happened is what drives it and it's self-fulfilling prophecy. For it to occur, it requires the influx of new users to be submitting content and being active enough to steer the direction of a community. They aren't. That's on you and us, the people who were already here that have done this in the reactionary panic.  We were a community that was accepting of everyone. When it hit default, rather than maintain our culture of being accepting and seeing what happens, the community took a radically negative approach guided by confirmation bias. Everything was and still is train downvoted. People blame it on RedPill members just troll voting the community, but we've never taken the time to consider that we've steered the community in a wholly negative paranoid, negative direction assuming that it would become negative and paranoid rather than seeing if it actually would.  So when it did become negative and paranoid, after we flooded the front page with 2 weeks of stories of "Let's try to out-troll the trolls" to protest being made default, we decided to point out "See? It became negative and paranoid, filled with trolls."  All you need to do to see this is the case is to click to the front page of this Sub and sort by Top using differing time frames. Sort it by week, by month, by year, by all time. As you go further and further back in time, the stories we used to upvote, the stories we used to submit were positive, supportive stories. Personal stories. News stories. Pictures of each other. Now, it's how shitty we feel. How shitty this is. And how much everyone is being harassed, raped, suffering. This isn't Eternal September. It's not being submitted and driven by the influx of new members. We drove it and then we blamed them for it and the admins/mods for allowing it to happen or not doing anything about it.
Tell that to the psychological organizations.
No, I'm pretty sure it's been you. If you're downvoting people for expressing polite disagreement you're violating reddiquette and you're the one who needs to grow up.  My prediction: as soon as I post this it's score is going to go down to zero. Prove me wrong.  EDIT: LOL.
[deleted]
[deleted]
&gt; I don't think it is fair to interpret an anecdote that is clearly specific to me to mean that I am denying the existence of men like your family member.  You said "I've never been with a man who couldn't orgasm because he was circumcised."  Now imagine I said "I've never met a woman who felt abortion was necessary" or "I've never met a woman who supported feminism" as a way to support my argument.  I would get called out immediately, *as I should be*.  So why would you do that, unless it's because you don't understand the world is bigger than what you've seen?  The only other option is that you were being deliberately offensive, and I wanted to give you the benefit of the doubt. 
It's certainly not going to triumph in /r/twoxchromosomes with the attitude you've had in other threads. You whip up straw men like it's nothing and immediately downvote any comment that corrects them.  That's the opposite of reason.
Men and women both perpetuate sexism, and that is undeniable. To fight sexism, we all must make choices every day to fight against a culture that is inherently very sexist.   Why do men seem to bear the brunr of the blame? Because they are the beneficiaries of sexism. Men and women perpetuate sexism, but men benefit whereas women suffer. And I'm not saying sexism doesn't harm men, but that the way it harms men is personal whereas the way it harms women is instutional and much, much greater.  I ask you, why does the feeling that some feminists blame men entirely for sexism risk alienating your support for genuine equality?   To me, it seems that genuine supporters of equality would not withdraw their support no matter how personally offended they feel by activists of whatever cause. The cause of equality is bigger than your feelings, and threatening to withdraw your support for women's rights because you think some feminists "blame men" shows that you might not really care about fighting sexism as much as you think. 
Also, people aren't objecting to FGM because it's *unsanitary* or not done in a proper hospital. They object because it disgusts them.  ...Then they go and get their sons circumcised.  (At least, it seems that way sometimes.)
[deleted]
I hate to use the lunch line of an old joke, but...  &gt;We should be focusing on the rational reasonable people - and trying to find unity of message among those rational people.   Who's *we*, kemo sabe?
I don't think they should be forced to pay child support either though. A father who is emotionally invested in the child he thought was his, will provide in may ways for the child anyway (college fund, helping kid with school supplies, buying extracurricular activity opportunities etc.).   I think the men in the story resent being duped, and then being told that pay up x amount or lose all rights. **That is extortion**. 
You're not alone in this uphill battle, my friend. Keep reading. Keep questioning your preconceived notions. All of them. ALL OF THEM.   As a fellow reforming male, I want to let you know that I'm here for you.   #AllMenCan change.
I'm not misunderstanding you at all. I understand exactly what you're saying... and you've missed the point the previous commenter is making.   You're trying to attract bees with a fly swatter instead of honey. That's your problem. 
That's awful, and seconding the posters saying that I've never found that micro beads  are very good for exfoliating anyway. Personally I use two different scrubs with natural exfoliants in them for my face:  Earth Therapeutics Oatmeal &amp;amp; Honey scrub: http://www.amazon.com/gp/aw/d/B000KFVY46?pc_redir=1402405034&amp;amp;robot_redir=1  It has natural loofah fibers in it, and it smells absolutely amazing, like warm honey with spices. It doesn't aggravate my acne like a lot of scrubs do :)   NOW Foods Vitamin C &amp;amp; Oryza Sativa gentle scrub: http://www.amazon.com/gp/aw/d/B004UJ637G?pc_redir=1402145378&amp;amp;robot_redir=1  As the name suggests, this one is a gentle scrub, so I use it more like a daily face wash than a true exfoliating scrub. It uses rice bran beads, and smells like fresh oranges - really refreshing in the morning!  For my body I just use The Body Shop's scrubs that use a mix of sugar and salt. I could probably make my own if I wasn't so lazy, too! 
That's another good thing for the MR to discuss. A man's worth should not be tied to the size or shape of his genitals. 
Okay let's split hairs. A whole sentence mentioned male circumcision. The sentence didn't even go into male circumcision, all it said was female circumcision has no health benefits compared to male circumcision. (and by the way, I'm not saying I agree or think that's true). The article as a whole is about female genital mutilation.   And I've never heard of people circumcising their sons to prevent masturbation. Can you please give me a source to this information?  All I'm trying to say is that females who are circumcised probably have a completely different experience than males who are circumcised so it's kind of hard to compare.   I'm not saying there aren't guys out there who've had terrible experiences after getting circumcised. There are guys who are really messed up mentally because of what their parents did to their genitals. It sucks no matter what set of genitals you have. But comparing Joe Shmoe who is circumcised and has a pretty average sex life, to these women who basically get no pleasure from sex because they've had they're clitorises either partially or totally removed and their labia sewn shut is kind of a dick move.   It's awesome hearing other genders' views on certain issues, but it'd be awesome to have a discussion about women's issues and hear women's point of views instead of being bombarded by "MEN TOO!" We know.   I'm sure guys have tons of spaces to talk about men's issues without hearing "WOMEN TOO!"   
I think it's hilarious that feminists and MRA's are basically the same thing, just focusing on different sides of it, then get all mad at the other one by claiming the other group is a horrible bunch of misogynists. I lean towards feminism (and consider myself a feminist) just because I prefer focusing on issues affecting more women than men. Suddenly that means I am a horrible person who doesn't advocate for equal custody for parents... Even though I do?  It's like watching a pair of siblings fight over the same toy.
I was born with a penis.  Unfortunately I never even began to honestly ponder the societal ramifications of that until I was sexually assaulted myself. A friend of mine who is a gay man drunkenly grabbed me by my penis at the bar. I tried to pull away but for like two or three seconds he wouldn't let go.  I understand that many people would consider this a very minor offense compared to what the term sexual assault can mean, and I wouldn't argue with them. But it was something I didn't want and it happened anyway and even though it wasn't a "big deal" it opened my eyes a lot.  Before this experience I probably would've been one of these super defensive males trying to shirk all association with rape culture etc... But now I've begun to allow myself to see what's happening all around me all the time, and I believe it's slowly making me a better man and a better person.  I'm not saying that men should be assaulted so they know what it feels like, but in my case feeling some semblance of that for just two or three seconds ended up changing everything I thought about not just rape culture but really gender in general. 
&gt; The non bio dad shoudnt be allowed custody rights just because he raised her  Should he be obligated to pay child support?  Because that's what some folks are arguing here, and it's what the legal system requires.  &gt; But the kidnapper idea is flawed  Yes, and no.  It's flawed in the sense that it's illegal, but it doesn't change the child-bond that many are arguing (including the legal system) that forces a man to pay child support in these cases.  &gt; the child should be in full custody of the biological parent.   You're not going to get an argument from me on this point.  But I'm curious what the other folks have to say who argue that the child-bond is paramount in determining parentage.  They are, I suspect, too cowardly to speak to this point.   
I don't disagree with that sentiment at all, in fact I wholeheartedly agree. I just get irritated when articles summarize issues based on men vs. women, instead of acknowledging that race plays a major issue. And in this case, media depictions is way more complex than just sub-dividing it by gender.
When did the author even say she was in favor of male circumcision on kids? If you have a bone to pick with her bringing up medical statistics on male circumcision, that's fine, but what I saw as her overall message is that the "female equivalent" isn't in the mindset of medical cleanliness. It's about making women not enjoy sex so they don't cheat... Most of the time without proper tools or sanitation.   Something that she left out that I read in a book (Half the Sky) is that it can occur when the girl is older. There was an anecdote about a girl, who approached her parents about getting it done because "all her friends were doing it". Once she saw what the procedure entailed, she immediately backed out. And many are done because men didn't want to marry an uncut girl.
Too bad this article doesn't actually reflect a MRA point of view.
Men have been also been oppressed for thousands of years. Even with "democracy" in ancient Greece, most men couldn't vote. Men collectively have had more power total, but that doesn't mean there haven't also been men suffering throughout, from the elite doing what they can to keep the lower classes low, impoverished, and unfree.  We need to fight for everyone's rights, for as much freedom as there can possibly be, and fight against all forms of illegitimate discrimination. Feminism is necessary when only men's rights are focused on, but it's not the case that men already have all possible rights and freedoms. No one should be ignored because of their gender.
You can have a relationship with someone without being financially obligated to provide for them. If the girl has her biological parents in the same household, why does she need a third legal guardian to pay child support?
*huge eyeroll* 10 years to undo what occurred during a 3 year relationship.  A tale of recovery?  You make it sound like you're a cancer survivor...not someone who had a boyfriend who was insensitive about this issue but otherwise was "sweet and supportive."  
Downvotes are reserved for spreading wrong information, going off topic, or personal attacks.  Instead on this subreddit like no other I'm subscribed to, opposing opinions are regularly downvoted. It's as if people have only one opinion and can't acknowledge that another valid POV exists. As if opposing opinions are automatically sexist.  Extremist POV's from MRA aren't welcome, but I've seen more than enough valid opinions downvoted that I can't help but shake my head at the situation. 
They may look at things differently, but this is true of both sides- when one side makes a point about a horrible gender injustice in society, most people on both sides agree with them that it's true. The side that mentions it asks why that side doesn't bring it up and points it as a flaw... Even though the other side is focusing on something else.  If the two groups cooperated on one thing at a time, I guarantee we'd have much quicker change. For now, all I can do is wait for a comic parody of this squabbling.
Often times you can get separate insurance since you are 18. Planned Parenthood is great about being discrete. You can use a different address or phone number than your normal address for bills etc. If you don't want them to leave voice mails they wont. Ask questions when you get to the clinic. They are there to help.
[deleted]
I couldn't even get a diva cup in my vagina. They tend to market their cups as a 2 sizes fit all, but in my experience it is more of a 2 sizes fits few. If you are interested in getting a reusable cup (which you may not be) I would recommend doing some research about the size and softness/flexibility of cups. There is quite a bit of variation in menstrual cup sizes, just like there is a lot of variation in vagina sizes.   The one I found worked best for me was one of the [Meluna cups](http://www.meluna.org/MeLuna-menstrualcups). Meluna cups also come with a variety of grips on the bottom, including a loop which makes it sooo much easier to get out. 
I think the man should be able to sign a document waiving all his parental rights and privileges.  Women fight tooth and nail for their right to choose to become or not to become mothers; men have no such choice.
[deleted]
Thank you! I'm very positive most of the time. I've recently learned not to be insecure and maybe that's coming  off as being conceited to some people. I don't know. I'm the same friendly with everyone, lol.
[deleted]
Simone de Beavoir is another great one, worth reading up on her if you get the chance.
Come see me!
I'll take that hug! My mom, to this day, has always told my sister and I "pretty isn't everything", I grew up on that philosophy. Some may say I'm being vain, but I am not. I'm just doing my job, that I love. You're great, thank you!
Respond to the conversation, first.
&gt;All a girl needs to do is exist and there will always be someone willing to sleep with her.   His fallacy here is that the same is true for guys. If you are willing to trade down there most definitely is somebody out there for you.  Guys who say this don't grasp how much higher their standards are than many womens' standards, because they don't view other guys as sex objects in the same way they view women. Which is not to say that they view them as sex objects 100% of the time, but when it comes to dating / coupling, that sentiment is there.  What he's saying here: *A man needs to be physically attractive, smart, rich, charming among other things to get female attention/sex.* is basically that in order to get in bed with the type of women *he* is interested in, well you need all these things. Because he's not noticing the loads and loads of women all around him who are average in the looks department but still funny and smart and interesting.
You're talking about an entirely new topic.  I said, "MRAs say these things" in response to you saying, "I've never heard one person ever say that male circumcisions are as bad as female genital mutilation."
You're welcome! Thank goodness for guys like you that don't subscribe to the crazy game playing. If I'm interested, I'll be damned if I don't let the guy know!  I felt like I was picky for for wanting a childfree and toichy feely guy, lol. :D
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
Neat. I'll get the popcorn ready.
think globally and act locally. 
But that doesn't mean that he's automatically and legally assumed to be the father. The man can either sign the birth certificate and acknowledge paternity or not. The article states that the man needs to acknowledge or be tested if the mother is seeking child support or public benefits. 
[deleted]
You are actually headed towards a career where you should be able to balance the two. The stereotype is the coder in a closet working 80 hour weeks for a startup, that's not usually the case. Development is actually pretty family friendly, especially at the larger companies or if you just find one with a good work-life balance. My fiances company actually almost all of his co-workers have kids and it works out great since they all work from home so much. 
Well of course it is, but in most of the cases mentioned in the article, the man would have no reason to request that in that moment. My husband has zero reason to believe our son isn't his. (and he is, 100%, no doubts). If he asked me to take a test right after I had just gone through birthing our child, I would have been offended. I hate to say that, because I do realize it's only fair, and of course I have no reason to be worried, but you're super hormonal and emotional and exhausted in that moment. I would have felt like he was saying he suspected me of cheating on him. It would have been awkward. 
You are really not getting the point here. I am kind of thinking the combative nature of your posts has a lot more to do with the "insults hurled" then your opinion. It's more a point of being told you are "too sensitive" is instantly invalidating. It shouldn't be told to men either. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
I'm not saying that's right, but that's generally the court's or the state's justification. I agree the biological parent needs be held accountable. But then what about the non-biological dad? Does he lose custody or visitation? Every case has to be looked at individually, it seems.
This type of horse shit is why you have men in here crying foul. Did any of you who up-vote this consider any alternative facts or points of view? I very much doubt it since along with being god-awful shitty journalism/writing most of this guilty of cherry picking or just plain wrong.  You talk about men invalidating feelings etc. then you invalidate the feelings of the thousands of men who have an issue with the environment in this sub.
Your mother is a smart lady, and so are you. : ) 
[deleted]
Uh. She doesn't point out any benefits because there are no benefits. The point she is making is that circumcision is a debatable issue, while FGM is not. FGM has no benefits and violates bodily autonomy. So it is bad. Circumcision has benefits and violates bodily autonomy, so it can be bad or good depending on which you value more. Circumcision does not have as drastic of an effect on men and FGM has on women. Therefore circumcision should not be placed on equal footing with FGM, and people discussing FGM should not be told they need to give equal time to circumcision. If your cousin is murdered, I don't get to tell you it's equally bad that my cousin got punched in a bar fight. Y'dig?
Girlfriend then ? or Mom ?  Where r u from anyway.
This place is definitely turning into Tumblr-lite. I've been subscribed for years. But now the only content on here that makes my frontpage is reductionist gender wars whinging. This was definitely not the case even two years ago.  I maintain trollx is the far better sub at this point. 
[deleted]
I... folded. I didn't want to face him in court or anything. I didn't know who would have my back or anything. I asked for it to go to mediation and it did.
Dude, this sub has been completely dominated by "AS A MAN I AM PUT OFF BY *some statement someone read on a blog*" or "NOT ALL MEN DO THIS THING YOU ACCUSE US OF".  You are one more person doing exactly that.  You are not a unique and special snowflake; you are just like everyone else in this.
[deleted]
Yeah but you're not a parent of a car. You're a parent of a human being. When you raise a child, you become a parent.   You do not become an owner of a car simply by having it in your house for a long time.   What kind of sick person would think of the time spent raising a child they love and care for a "damage"? 
Or things they don't bother trying to understand. 
[deleted]
Wait what? Child support and custody should be voluntary? You should only have to support a child when it's convenient? 
&gt; The vast majority of male circumcisions are done in a clinical setting by a licensed physician.  Sure - as long as you ignore all the millions of black men in Africa...  Let's compare like-for-like. Both males and females suffer genital mutilation in dirty and unsterile conditions in Africa. You will often find MGM but no FGM in a tribe or community. But you *never* find FGM without MGM.  It's estimated that in Africa, far more male infants, boys and men die from MGM or have their penises amputated then women die from FGM or have serious complications.  **NSFW**: Warning! Extremely graphic video of African male genital mutilation being performed on unconsenting young boys:  http://youtu.be/WPthgNqG1YY?t=2m20s  **NSFW**: Warning! Horrific photo collection from a Dutch doctor of hundreds of mutilated, amputated and seriously infected penises (many with gangrene) of African boys and men as a result of "male circumcision" - ie: sexual abuse and genital mutilation. This is just one, tiny area of Africa - where MGM is widespread.  http://www.ulwaluko.co.za/Photos.html  *But don't worry! It's nothing like female genital mutilation eh?*  [Genital Autonomy for all - Intersex, Female &amp; Male](http://www.genitalautonomy.org/about-ga/) 
And if it doesn't work, and this sub descends into shit, there's no way to fix it, even if you un-default, all the existing subscribers would still be here, fucking everything up.  This sub has irreversably changed, for the worse.
No it's not, dude.  I'm talking about internalized misogyny and how it makes us our own worst enemies,  which NEEDS to be discussed if we're ever going to get anywhere.  I'm not deflecting or making it about "not all men" or just saying women "cause problems too".  It's vital to be reminded of the insidious nature of internalized misogyny. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
Exactly. It's just kinda weird to be getting it from my boyfriend. Usually my Mom gives me money, and I prefer that from her because she would otherwise get me useless crap. 
I think the article only mentions sexism as it pertains to men once, and even then, only to prove the existence of sexist behaviour against women.  If the hope was to provide a balanced article talking about sexism (as I assume from your post), it's a failure, and it certainly doesn't offer anything new.   Sexism against men exists in more than a "call a man a woman" way. This article never approaches sexist behavour by women, only by men.
At least he didn't forget your birthday.  I am surprised how often that happens.
Genetics + not ever having fat legs.   I had the genetics but ruined it by getting fat. Even after losing 85 lbs and maintaining a healthy weight, I still have cellulite. 
What you're really saying is you don't understand child development. That, or you don't care about it.  The child is *CLEARLY* the one most harmed when a father walks out. 
Even if they don't, they can confirm the pregnancy and inform you about your options. They can also tell you where the nearest clinic is to get your procedure.  Deep breaths, girl. You can do this. What IUD were you going to go with? I have a Mirena and I have to say, I absolutely *love* it.
Insecurity makes people act in pretty self-centered ways, that's for sure!
Still a father. He raised a kid. 
This post makes me smile. I went though a similar realization years ago, and it was definitely the kind of thing that clicked into place seemingly all at once.  Good on ya.  One thing I should mention though: Just because you've identified the problem doesn't mean your mindset is going to change overnight. It takes work. I still catch myself thinking like this too often for comfort.
[deleted]
Your boss a jerk-ass.    In regards to those days where you will stink it up and it's just you, girl, I have been there.  I'm in an MFA program for Creative Writing and I'm working on my thesis right now.  There are days when even with all of this experience and all of the learning I've had, I still feel like a toddler writing a novel in crayon.  The best thing I can say is to keep plugging away at it.  You'll have shit days, but that's because you're new to things.  Every day you'll suck a little less until your moments of suckage are few and far between.  Run away from Captain Psycho and go kick ass where you can flourish! You've got this.
Copper one. I had tried hormonal bc before this and had a terrible experience. I wanted something I couldn't mess up so pills was out of the option.  
If it would be helpful then sure. 
[deleted]
Exactly! I notice attractive or unique looking people of all genders. And tremendously enjoy the visual stimulation of seeing beautiful people, things, whatever. Like do they think women never get turned on looking at hot people? Or that they don't visually appreciate the world?
[deleted]
He's not paying "whore ex" support. It's called child support.   He should have all the rights and responsibilities of any other parent.   &gt; can't he still support the child both emotionally and financially without a court order requiring him to do so?  Sure he can. But the court does have the right to make a parent pay child support to their child. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
If you don't like it, ask for a DNA test.   Raising and taking care of a child make you a parent. A parent doesn't have the right to just stop supporting their child because they learn something new about their child's DNA.   What parent's feel doesn't change the fact that they are obligated to take care of their children.  
"their willingness to invalidate the daily hardships women endure, and their unwillingness to merely consider any small responsibility they might have for perpetuating a sexist culture makes me feel an overwhelming sense of hopelessness that we're making any progress toward remedying that culture."  Give me a break, seriously. Do you even realize how dumb, discriminatory, and petty you sound? 
And the father who comes home with herpes can always blame mom.   "Hey, you could've had me tested for an STD if you were so worried about it."  And I suppose, that we might all demand lie-detector tests from one another since there is no law against doing so and since the responsibility of the person perpetrating the fraud doesn't factor into our analysis.    As for bonds, consider that many people form "father" and "mother" figure attachments at various stages of life. Consider that awesome grandpa or aunt who was very much like a father or mother, especially when the actual parents were not stepping up like they should. As much as Aunt Clara may have done some wonderful things for you and stood in like a mom for a portion of your life, this does not mean that she should pay child-support or be morally prevented from moving to another state to take another job.     
Totally fine. My mother keeps in touch with the ex's of all her children, which includes photos, xmas/birthday gifts, even a bit of financial assistance when she thinks it's needed.  She's a nice lady.
Well you can't just take on the role of a father, essentially adopt a child, raise that child, then leave at your connivence.   Edit: Apparently people think you should be able to do that. 
Seconding the suggestions for softcup or divacup- because I've tried what you suggested and it didn't work well. When I had my IUD placed I had a few months of heavy cervical mucus. Tampons... Well, it was almost as if the mucus was too thick to be absorbed. It would kind of pool at the head of the tampon and make a mess when I removed it, which was painful, by the way, without period blood to lubricate your walls. Good luck with the cups or liners!
Not all parents are biological parents.   That man is obviously entitled to parental rights and parental responsibilities.  
What does any of this have to do with Red Pill? Isn't that a subreddit about how to seduce women?
Had to google that but ok?
There are too many "I" statements in that. It's all about him and his pain. He's not worth it. Block him, and don't give it another thought. He's already absolved himself of responsibility with that apology, and will spend the rest of his life congratulating himself for it. 
I sympathize and I think it's incredibly shitty that guys do the things you list.   I'm a guy and I read this sub before it became default. To be honest,  I don't think it should have been made so if it's creating a less than supportive environment.  What also makes me sad is that I get lumped into "evil men" every time I post. The reason I post here is that being a man hasn't been the easiest thing for me. While I am not gay, I tend to identify much more with the feminine side of things than the masculine in a lot of areas. Talking to other men can be incredibly frustrating. Therefore, I liked reading this sub. I do understand why it happens and I in fact empathize with people being defensive. But since it became default I can't post anything without being attacked. Everything from threatening to have me raped to telling me that I need to unsubscribe as I'm not allowed here as a man.  I am not a rude person and have been nothing but respectful. I even tried to reach out to people in PM's to say I empathize, but to please not take it out on me. No responses.  But to be honest, since it became default I've never been treated with such anger and disrespect anywhere else on reddit.  And I know it's way worse for the women here receiving awful pm's and being attacked. Especially terrible for a place that is suppose to be a supportive and safe place for women to share.  It's just sad to see such polarization between the sexes.  Edit: Just out of curiosities sake, do I always get downvoted on here just because I'm a guy? I'm genuinely wondering if what I'm saying is somehow offensive? It is not my intention at all truly. I mean, c'est la vie, it's how it works. Just curious.
Reason will triumph when reasonable people figure out that reasonable discussion is impossible on a sexist, racist shithole like reddit.  One of the mods here keeps deleting comments that suggest alternatives to reddit, but look, there’s a reason reddit has become the laughingstock of the non-mouthbreathing internet.
This subreddit is designed for women's perspectives. Don't complain when women give their perspective.   Don't want to hear the opinions of women on various subjects?   Don't come to /r/TwoXChromosomes. 
[deleted]
Thankfully she's a friend of a family member, not so much a family friend. (If that makes sense.)  She's also in her 60's (I'd guess) so it might be a generational thing. But she had very definite opinions on the gender gap for compliments.  I actually call ladies handsome in certain circumstances. Usually when they're rocking a regal, formal look. (I also love me some regency era lit.)
Ungh, best $100 I've ever spent. Not the person you're replying to, but I'll throw in my two cents. Had mine for over 8 years now. Never had a problem and I've had my share of piercings. 
Yes, the lining is cauterized and destroyed, but it can build back up over years, and if your uterine shape differs from the "norm," the procedure might miss some lining. In my case, I have a heart-shaped uterus, so the NovaSure heated mesh couldn't reach into each "bump." Those two small areas still have lining and still give me a small period.  We decided to go with this option to avoid a hysterectomy. My GYN said if my period came back like it was before (highly unlikely), we'd just do another ablation to tide me over until menopause.  Because an ablation doesn't impact your ovaries, you can still get PMS symptoms, but in some cases, not as bad. For example, pre-ablation, my uterus got so big with lining that it really impacted my bowels. The infamous period shits and constipation hit me monthly. Now I don't get them at all.
&gt;Of course, the men who take the tests **already question their paternity**, and for about 30 percent of them, their hunch is right.  it's 30% of those who suspect. 
Sounds like a normal BigLaw job
I think it's definitely the case that, in order for change to happen, SOMETHING needed to be in the place that 2x is now.  However, as a guy, you don't get the bulk of the backlash, so I don't quite know how I feel about you telling us to embrace it.
So really, it's a subreddit for a one-sided view of things? You would rather sit in one corner that open yourself to other views?   Skullatron responded in a fashion that I don't believe was out of tone. The poster above him stated that, "Fuck that! Fuck any asshole man who would abandon his children during a divorce because he doesn't want to pay for their well-being unless they share his DNA.".   How would this sound if I said, Fuck that! Fuck any asshole woman who would abandon her children and choose abortion them unless they share the DNA with the man of her choice. Clearly one would say that I can't even begin to comprehend her feelings since I will never give birth to a child. Also it's her body and her choice to choose.  
[Looks like the guy removed them.](http://notepad-plus-plus.org/news/response-and-apology-4-sexist-jokes.html)
Your comment made me think of this song. http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=6honxJ2uzwo  ~~*I'm so sorry*~~
Lol. I take it you know the rebounding misery as well. 
   I'm sorry that you've gotten so much hostility, it is quite clear that many people still cling to traditional gender roles or their learned oppressive behaviors.  While I'm not advocating for the dismissal of anyone's emotions, I, yes a person with a y-chromosome, often feel as if I have to defend myself from "feminists".  It was always my understanding that while feminism was originally focused on advancing women to a social equality denied to them, the philosophies incorporated in it are applicable to all people, XXs and XYs alike.       I see negative stereotypes of males, I see women dismissing men as inferior intellectually, emotionally.  Often, when I speak up, I am met with "Oh, you're not the kind of guy I mean."  Still I ended up feeling forced into that tiny mold with those that were meant.  I find that (in my locale) it is expected of me(n) to "not care" or be emotionally detached, or even have no expectations aside from the paycheck (i.e. work, come home, ignore family, watch sports, drink beer) when that is simply not the case for myself and what I assume is some portion of other penis-people.       Still, the expectations manifest when I am dismissed. "Get over it", "I can't believe you even care about this sort of thing", from women and men, alike.  Often, I find the best solution for me in a situation where I am uncomfortable is to remove myself and remove the discomfort from my mind, remove those people from my life, in order to spend as little time as possible feeling that way.       While I try my best to lead by example and accept all the kinds of people that make this world go 'round, sometimes the case is that my best option for feeling better is to let it go and avoid the situation in the future.  I can only change so much and even if I engage in conversation, there is no guarantee I am heard, or at the least, not ridiculed for my position.      I'm not trying to attack, or defend really.  I am attempting to relate.  Life is hard for everyone.  I don't think I really do, can, or will understand "the daily hardships of women."  For me, the whole situation of treating people(women) differently based solely on their genitals is quite parallel to racism, which, when I was young, thought was something we had all moved past.  If not globally, then at least in America.  Imagine my surprise when I stepped into the real world.  I am lucky to have been able to reach that naivete as a child.  I think it shows that my parents showed me what the world should be like, albeit shielding me from reality.     I often feel as if *edit* &gt;**some**&lt; feminists seek dominance rather than equality.  I understand history and even the present shows us the patriarchy, but surely changing who is oppressive isn't an answer.  Right?  I am not promoting submissiveness, I assure you.  I simply want to point out that all kinds are capable of emotional dismissal or oppression.     At the risk of leaving myself open to be ripped apart by this sub(it is also my first post here), I would like to share an example where I was prevented from doing something by a group of women.       It was a Tuesday night and also my only evening off from the restaurant I worked at at the time.  I fancy myself a good session of indoor rock climbing at the local college's rock wall.  There use to be a "two-dollar Tuesday" which always appealed to me because I was seemingly always broke.  Well, they moved it to "two-dollar Thursday", and sure, I would have known that had I not presumed it hadn't and checked the gym's website.       If you don't know, rock climbing is pretty physical.  Being the tall, lanky, scrawny guy I am, when I first started rock climbing, I was intimidated by the more skilled, more muscular men who climbed more frequently.  Aside from performance anxiety, there were doubts formed about my body's value or attractiveness.  I had already made the habit to come during slow times, but that wasn't always possible or predictable.  If I wanted to climb and progress, I needed to shelve my anxiety and push on.       Anyways, I show up at the rock-gym, my only chance to go that week, after wanting to go for a few weeks, maybe months.  It was a little chilly that evening, but anticipating some sweating, I did not wear my usual hoodie.  Not relevant, I am just setting the setting.  I open the door to the gym, walk to the counter to check-in and pay, as was the usual and expected.  The middle-aged, brown-haired(where did "brunette" come from anyways?) informed me that I was not eligible to participate in climbing that night.  The entire gym was closed to men that night for a "Women's Night".  Now, I've seen women's nights at bars where XXs get in for free or have a special discount on drinks.  Never before had I seen a women's night that was meant to shun XYs.  When I explained my horrible schedule and asked to please climb if I gave priority to the women, the person at the counter explained that this night was meant to be exclusive so that women would be "more comfortable."      Needless to say I was *edit* &gt;**hurt**&lt;, disappointed in my timing, and frankly, the policy.  All I could think that night as I left and returned home was "Why do they have the right to exclude?", "Where was the scrawny shy-guys' night?"(or even just guys' night for that matter), "What about my discomfort?"       It didn't exist because it would likely be construed as a sexist exclusion or "boys' club".  It didn't exist because men were supposed to be confident and comfortable anywhere and everywhere, no matter the audience.  At least, those were my attempts to imagine the situation or understand it from the other side of the river.     Now, I'm not saying that it's wrong to provide a discount to a demographic in order to lure them to your establishment of business, or even provide a minority demographic extra incentive to join in. There is an item called a "silver bracelet" in the video game *Demon's Souls* that can only be worn by female(characters) that provides an increase in experience gained and is found early on. No equivalent hand "armor" exists for male characters.  I guess that this was to help the assumed to be more casual, less present female gamers enjoy a game marketed to a "hardcore" audience, assumed to be almost entirely male.  I understand the gamer nation has been changing and that character sex is not directly related to the gamers', but I like to make a character that is like myself in order to add that much more to the fantasy.     All I really wanted to know was how it is justified to exclude people based on sex.  And if you think that you can dangle history in front of my face and say "you had yours, man, it's our turn." I would have to reply that though, by most if not all accounts, pale-skinned people enslaved brown-skinned people, it isn't justified to enslave me, is it? I hope not.     In closing, before I give too much more ammunition to be hated on:  It sucks that women and feminists are dismissed, ignored, portrayed to just be man-hating idealists all hopped up hormones and hysteria.  I don't think anyone can really understand the struggle of someone with whom they haven't shared experiences with.  It is easy to imagine if you try, but our imaginations are still biased representations.  The kinds of people who are unwilling to listen or consider, are the people that are preventing growth and an egalitarian philosophy from taking root in society.  I'm not saying I'm perfict, of course I'm not. However, if I dismiss someone for any reason, it has nothing to do with their genitals.  It sucks that people, knowingly or not, are influenced so much by breasts, long hair, a skirt, or the absence of any of these.     You have the right to feel overwhelmed.  Like racism, sexism is disappointingly prevalent in my region and seemingly most of America.  It doesn't even have to be straight up, outspoken rudeness or bigotry.  It can be as little as clenching your purse when a bearded guy walks by, laughing when a woman says she wants to pursue a career in science, or just thinking less of a man because he cried the first time he watched *The Lion King* with his daughter. (Yes, when Mufasa died.  Why does Simba have to grow without his father, and why can't Mufasa watch his beloved grow?)      Like /u/kallista_gold says, and like Ghandi is paraphrased to have said, we can only lead and change the world by example and action.    EDIT: some formatting, *italics*, and two extra words
I read the damn stories.  I just didn't reach the same conclusions as you did.  And if you want to make an assertion of fact, it is you who are required to provide documentation for that fact.  It's not the responsibility of the person you're trying to convince to make your case for you.  But as for the letter (which you did not provide before.  As I told you, (twice) the link didn't work).  Well!  It's *oodles* of fun!  Check this out:    &gt;Schools also should inform and obtain consent from the complainant (or the complainant’s  parents if the complainant is under 18 and does not attend a postsecondary institution) before  beginning an investigation. If the complainant requests confidentiality or asks that the  complaint not be pursued, the school should take all reasonable steps to investigate and  respond to the complaint consistent with the request for confidentiality or request not to  pursue an investigation. **If a complainant insists that his or her name or other identifiable  information not be disclosed to the alleged perpetrator, the school should inform the  complainant that its ability to respond may be limited.**   Also!  &gt;As discussed in the 2001 Guidance, if the complainant continues to ask that his or her name or  other identifiable information not be revealed, the school should evaluate that request in the  context of its responsibility to provide a safe and nondiscriminatory environment for all  students. **Thus, the school may weigh the request for confidentiality against the following  factors:** the seriousness of the alleged harassment; the complainant’s age; whether there have  been other harassment complaints about the same individual; **and the alleged harasser’s rights  to receive information about the allegations if the information is maintained by the school as an  “education record” under the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (FERPA), 20 U.S.C.  § 1232g; 34 C.F.R. Part 99. 15**   &gt; The school should inform the complainant if it cannot ensure  confidentiality. **Even if the school cannot take disciplinary action against the alleged harasser  because the complainant insists on confidentiality,** it should pursue other steps to limit the  effects of the alleged harassment and prevent its recurrence. Examples of such steps are  discussed later in this letter.  (emphasis mine) Wouldja look at that!  "If we can't name you to your harasser, we may not be able to take disciplinary action."  Tell me again about how the letter totally suborns suspension of due process.   
I'm a woman and I don't believe in a sexist culture towards women  I'm happy I can have an abortion, that I make the last decisions. that I can take a very effective contraception.   Women magazines are harder on women confidence than mens and men's magazines.  I don't complain that I don't do the same salary, at my desk, with 9 to 5 schedules than a man who is on call at the middle of the night, or risking his life in a fire   Women chose jobs that are less dangerous, more stables, that are more family friendly and chose to have more benefits over salary   oh and it's not legal here to mutilate my sexual organs, which is still legal for men 
It really does just depend on the doctor. I've been to doctors that did and ones that didn't. More that didn't. It's a good idea to just establish a relationship with an OBGYN anyway, IMO.
This exactly!
[deleted]
I just thought you somehow took that as me calling you out and wanted to be sure you knew it wasn't the case.
Yep. About 9 decades. Which I believe is ~90 years.
You have to look at what constitutes an "attack" in this case. If a woman posts a story and a man says "nuh uh, men have it bad too!" I consider that an attack as it's trying to steer discussion away from her experiences. If a woman makes a post about a problem with many men in this sub and men say "She's making generalizations about *all* men!" then I don't consider it an attack because the people complaining apparently can't even read.  As much as people want to accuse the OP of making a blanket statement, she didn't. They *want* what she said to be an attack on all men, because that would completely invalidate any complaints she has about the way many men behave in this sub. Unfortunately, the defensive, polarizing men came out in droves to be offended and prove her point.  That's the thing about emotional responses, they aren't always valid or invalid based on the emotion being expressed and the person expressing it. You have to look at each situation on a case-by-case basis. Your attempt to generalize my argument into something you could be legitimately angry about is what I'd consider an invalid emotional response.
[deleted]
[deleted]
the whole idea of morals and right/wrong is just human subjective thinking.  There is no right/wrong in Nature.  What is, is what is.
No issue whatsoever! I've never got it caught on anything. 
Agreed! Best money I've spent! 
I forgot where I was and the echo chamber view that women are dumb helpless creatures . So when a child goes to his Mother and says that *Daddy scares me when he threatens you and you should get him help*  That a woman has no independent thoughts of her own and  just can not think on her own  of counseling or a woman's shelter or going to a relatives.  no here on TwoX a woman does no have the mental capacity and must do exactly what her child tells her. Or that the Child must make decisions for the mother like calling the police  because obviously she does not have the intelligence to do so ,  Right?   I, unlike you, believe that after hearing that this affecting her children will take action and *make her own choices as to what to do* and hold the agency to do so her self . The important thing is that she is informed that this is effecting her children.         
TIL men can't agree to have their children put up for adoption. 
Yeah - me too! I mean, they're a source of entertainment for me, but they also represent real people who really exist and who really feel entitled to say those kinds of evil, disgusting things. That makes me feel a little hopeless, sometimes.
[deleted]
Comparing Kobe Bryant to Inbee Park is such a weird comparison. Players like him and Lebron make more money than even elite hockey players like Sidney Crosby and Alexander Ovechkin because they make a shit ton of money for their owners due to their popularity and rarity of skill. That's like comparing a male CEO who makes more money than a female CEO and complaining that both should be paid the same.  For team sports like basketball, hockey, soccer, baseball, and American football I'd place more emphasis on the physiological differences between men and women than cultural bias. I won't speak to basketball but in hockey, men's professional leagues size and strength are hugely important. Short guys like Martin St. Louis are the exception. Some of the best women in hockey like Hayley Wickenheiser can't compete at the same level as the average NHLer. Hell, there are men who are ridiculously tall and big who don't even pan out in the NHL. So when these players do make it to the big leagues, they've beat out thousands of potential competitors still in the system. They are that much better than the typical female hockey player who typically don't face the same level of competition in either size or skill.  The reality is people tend to pay money to see the best and strongest. The AHL doesn't make that much money because all their good personnel gets called up the NHL. Most people wouldn't watch soccer on a weekly basis but would watch FIFA World Cup because it's the competition of the best talent around the world. I don't not watch women's basketball and hockey not because of the fact they are women, but rather the level of competition in the respective men's league is significantly higher. It's not like I watch the AHL or D-league either.  Now when we're talking about individual sports like golf, I do think it's ludicrous that women get paid significantly less. 
SHUT UP, GARY. /Dee
Actually, it seems that he/she made the concession that it might be true for a certain period of one's life.
Let's try a little experiment: You adopt a female non the plume for, say, a week or two. Then tell me if you feel like popping pop corn.   The systemic disregard of one's opinion on account of one's gender within the context of that used to be a safe place and a steady stream of misogynist PMs possess little in terms of entertainment value.  Seriously, dude, I'm sure you mean well, but get a clue.  
I think I did. Why pass judgment on our sub when there are far more vapid and disturbing male-oriented subs out there? What is your superiority complex that you so desperately need to fulfill here?
In the first sentence, the person said that she became anxious because he came home late.  One specific incident.  In the second, she complained that he "never" came home on time.  She generalized his behavior into something that he ALWAYS does.  I think this is not the best example though, as if your SO has a pattern of coming home late you should be able to address that pattern.  While the "never" is an exaggeration, it's not the same as turning a behavior into a character trait.  It seems to me that OP is describing a fault in communication (using extreme words like never or always) other than the one she intended to describe (ascribing actions to innate personality traits rather than just being like yo i do not like this behavior).  So yea your confusion is valid IMO, the example tibataw uses is better.
The problem is him, not you. I suggest sticking around 6 months if you can tolerate it, add this to your resume, and start the job hunt. The only reason I suggest sticking around 6 months is so that potential employers don't question why you left so quickly.   Everyone makes mistakes, especially in their first year on the job. You are no exception, and that's OK. In my first year, I dumped a lot of data in the wrong database configuration and it took me two days to weed out the incorrect data and put it in the right place. Earlier this year, a coworker, who has been here for15 years, didn't backup her configuration on schedule, it got corrupted, and we all spent a few days rebuilding her last month's worth of work. In a healthy office, you take a deep breath, take a 15 minute walk to get a cup of coffee and clear your head, and then deal with the mistakes.  You will do a great job as soon as you're in an office that lets you. Good luck!
Some of us just aren't the diva type I guess. 
&gt; It shouldn't happen against ANYONE, but if two boys or men are fighting because they've both chosen to be violent, that is a very different situation than one person beating on another. It's wrong no matter the gender of the person beating the other, but often it's a man beating a woman. Yes, that's abso-fucking-lutely disturbing.   Where'd you get the idea that most violence between men is when they've both chosen to be violent?  I honestly think this is part of the problem...people see a man assaulted and assume it's partially his fault.  So you say it's bad...it's just not *as* bad.  In another context, that would be called victim blaming.
I will be called as a lawyer in a week and I work with a bunch of lawyers who've been at it quite a while and not one of them would treat an employee that way. It sounds like he's a bad lawyer and takes it out in you.
Yea, I don't think this is meant as a strategy for literally every interaction you have with your SO.  I agree it'd be way overboard.  I think this is supposed to be something you do when your normal methods of problem-solving aren't working and you are trying to figure out why.  Perhaps someone has used sentence 3 over and over again, but their partner keeps forgetting to put their damn dishes in the dishwasher!  Partner one is getting more and more annoyed, the relationship is negatively affected, and all because of some dirty dishes.  That's when you break out sentence 4, and probably some other stuff about how you don't feel listened to and such.  Sentence 3 works for most of the time, sentence 4 is for when it's starting to become an issue and you want to make it clear to your partner how their behavior is affecting you.  Edit: spelling
We live in a time where trans in the US are just beginning to get the tiniest bit of acceptance. It's going to be rough; but that struggle means something. The more you kick and scream now, the easier it will be for trans people in the future. I wish you the best of luck, and to know that even when the path ahead isn't clear, all you have to do is keep on going.
Does it matter? We don't make laws to protect people from getting offended. 
I know that sometimes commenters here attack men who post here, and I don't agree with that.  What I see more often, though, is women getting frustrated because men continually make the conversation about them, or say "that happens to guys too" as though that means that if an action had ever happened to a guy, it means the same action isn't sexist when done to a woman. I wish that men commenting here would pause to consider that not everything is a personal attack on them.   Generalizing does happen and I'm trying to work on that, personally, but I see a lot of posts like the one where OP took steps to make it clear that she wasn't talking about all men and men still get defensive.   Personally, I don't mind seeing guys commenting here as long as they're not invalidating the OP, etc. I like seeing their opinions and thoughts. 
Username relevant.
[deleted]
No, they already stated they would not help me at all. It's my body. I don't want it. End of story. 
I've never heard it in real life either but personal experience is different from suggesting that it never happens. You really think dudes aren't doing this?
this is absolutely disgusting. and people think misogyny and racism isnt real
How scary! I'm so glad you're alright.   I'm not sure it was an attempted kidnapping, but I did have a weird experience when I was young, somewhere between 6 and 10.   I got off at my bus stop with an older boy who lived at the top of the street. Once the bus drove off he grabbed me, and tried to drag me towards his house. He must have had his hands somewhere near my face, because I bit down really hard on his thumb. He let me go, and I ran off to my babysitter's house.    I didn't say anything at the time, and the memory is so strange and long ago it feels more like a dream, but it's something I've always remembered. At the time I thought the dude was just a little weird, and it was only when I was much older that I worried about what would have happened if I hadn't gotten away so quickly. 
[deleted]
Well, at least today, I managed to go out in public wearing some women's clothes without getting any trouble from anyone. Hopefully it won't be long before people never face discrimination for dressing how they want.   One cool thing that was pointed out at the conference by the awesome Janet Mock: only about 15 years ago, trans* people were basically a complete joke, and our civil rights and our human rights were essentially non-existent. But just earlier this month, we had a transwoman of color on the cover of Time magazine. We're not nearly where we want to be yet, but we're making real, solid progress! I don't think it'll be long before trans* people truly have the same kinds of rights and protections that gay people, black people, women, and other historically-oppressed minorities have earned over the past century!   This is an exciting time to be alive! 
I'm being genuine, I guess you've seen things that I haven't, which is entirely possible given the volume of posts and comments here.   Depending on the commenter, it can either be an attack or at the very least, an attempt to invalidate the feelings of the poster. Some commenters here go 'shut up, this happens to men too' - that's an attack. Some go 'that's just someone being a jerk, it happens to me too' - that's invalidation because it frames it as 'this happens to me too, and I am a man, so this can't be gender related or sexism' - which isn't correct.   I do think that both sides have something to learn here, but I still understand OP's frustration. 
[deleted]
OF course they google the potential employee.  That does tend to have more to do with whether they will embarrass the company than dangerous habits.  
Feminism is a movement that aims to advance women legally and socially to equal with men, and break down the patriarchy that prevents such gender equality.   Nobody stole feminism. The same criticisms of feminists and feminism (harpy, nagging, man-hating, butch bitches that want to oppress and be superior to men) have been around since the dawn of feminism. And the same things have been said ("men are bad!") by extreme feminists since the dawn of feminism. And the rest of the feminists of the world have been ignoring and rolling their eyes at the extreme feminists since the dawn of feminism. And anti-feminists have been using these extreme feminists as examples against feminism since the dawn of feminism.
http://www.who.int/violence_injury_prevention/key_facts/VIP_key_fact_6.pdf?ua=1
http://www.bjs.gov/content/pub/pdf/cv12.pdf  page 7.  Rate of victimization of violent crime by gender per 1000 in 2012. Women 6.6, Men 9.4.
[deleted]
Really? You think sexism is over? You think there's equality?  For the love of...
Egalitarianism isn't a movement. To my knowledge there aren't any egalitarian organisations and there haven't been any egalitarian movements to make change. As you know, there are plenty of feminist organizations and recorded instances of feminist movements enacting change. So a better question than "what purpose does feminism serve?" is "what purpose does egalitarianism serve?" I have yet to see any Egalitarians do anything other than tell me how their -ism is better than feminism and MRA because it isn't gendered.
[deleted]
Male engineer here. If you want to be a female engineer, great! The only thing: if you want to be treated with respect by your male colleagues, then it's up to you. I can think of two female engineers at work. One is hardworking, smart, always on time, and dressed appropriately. The other is slothful, not too bright, shows up late, and comes to work all dolled up in a different hairstyle and outfit every day. (Serious. Never saw her wear the same clothes twice AFAIK). You can guess which one I respect more, and want to work with.
Like what?
I meant the past of the main character, who is a male,  but then again, I haven't finished the series, nor do I know what Unity has in store; perhaps it's the main character, or maybe he had a secret son. I'll wait and see until it comes out and see the story line before I decide whether they screwed up with Unity. Based on the Footage, it seems to be early 1800's or late 1700's. A Man would have made sense in this time period. Late 1800's or early 1900's and a woman would be ideal as a character (especially early 1900's if they ever do that time period, which they could seeing how they mentioned Tesla, the banks, and Edison in AC 2).
How can the speed and action be addressed? Are you suggesting that coaches are telling women to play slower? These women are going out and giving it all they have to win. But it's noticeably less exciting.
I got my first PM of that sort yesterday. It basically said I was a massive bitch and that I was the reason that no one took women seriously. My horribly offensive post that seemingly triggered this? I said that being a stay-at-home mom taking care of 7-8 children was not easy and was a job in and of itself.  It wasn't the username of the guy who I'd responded to, and the tone was vastly different, so I have no reason to suspect it was the same guy. Without realizing it would delete the PM, I just blocked the guy. Wish I'd reported first, since it was my intention to block, then report. Oh well.
She's made her decision.  How rude of you! She needs support....not people invalidating her choice.
You brought up popcorn, and these are your words elsewhere in this thread:  &gt;I'm enjoying guys getting a smackdown in here.  You seem to see this whole thing as an entertaining, enjoyable, positive thing. It isn't. It's reality and life for many women. Constant. Everywhere.  You telling us how to react/see it, and the way you're talking here... It's just so fucking clueless and ignorant.
You're being ridiculous. Because I disagree with the way you spoke to someone, you think I don't belong in your club? Grow up. I've invited you to take a look at my "actions' beyond this conversation. You don't have a leg to stand on. I'm in TwoX because I'm a feminist. I'm not obligated to humor your consistently hostile attitude toward other posters and me. You keep trying to lock other people out of discussions, as though people who don't agree with you don't have anything to contribute. There's more to this world than you.
I'm curious as to what is posted here that does not correspond with your view of feminism. Do you have some examples, or a sort general view to give me an idea please. 
[deleted]
That would be nice. Noticed my breast looked a bit bigger today after a swim/ :
So, i'm in a similar profession as you. I'm currently studying to achieve my CPA (Chartered Professional Accountant) in Canada. This means 40+ hours at work, and 40ish hours on school work every week.  I'm kind of surprised by your reaction. You should have been expecting something similar to this. EVERYONE told me in school, while getting my BBA, was pretty clear that the environment for a student in an accounting firm (or law firm) is pretty much shit.  The partner/lawyer has clients, who honestly, do not want to be there. No one wants to see a lawyer. A lawyer is something out of necessity. That means the client is pissed off to begin with. As well, EVERYTHING on the invoice is going to be questioned. So, the lawyer is going to be writing a shit ton of your time off. Because he can't bill the client for your training. So that's time he has to 'eat'.  He can't tell you 'good job' because that's wasted time for him. he bills out a LOT higher than you do. So even 5 minutes has to go to some client. So that's more training for you, and more time he can't bill. So a 'good job' at the end of the day is SIGNIFICANT. Holy shit, I WISH the partners at my firm would tell me good job.  I have felt what you have. At the end of my first audit, I swore I was going to be fired. I fucked up soo many accounts, had half my time written off. But, a year later i'm still there. I'm doing more and given more responsibilities. I see my own progression. It gets better. You need to remember that you are in a very high stress work environment. What you do can cost a client significant money if you fuck up.   Honestly, I watched my own progression. I'm also asking for feed back constantly. At the end of the day i'm asking the partners to re-explain something to me, to ensure I get it. Tell your boss you need/want to retry things you make mistakes on. That way you can learn. You won't get it right away, but in a while you will.  You'll also need to de-stress at home. Like I said, this a high stress job that you went for. During tax season I come home, grunt at my SO, and all we do is watch the shittiest TV. Its because i'm so dead, I physically can't do more than that.  It does get better. Some offices are run better than others. If you do decide to leave. Ask the jobs you apply to how things are run. Do people get their work back to fix? Are there 3 month, 6 month reviews of progress? etc.  Keep your chin up. 
&gt; What's your point, here? You're sounding a bit as though you think that no 'real' man could learn anything here or possibly agree with anything said or discussed here.  It's not up to me to ultimately define what makes a "real" man, although I have an ideal that I think I should strive for and others should as well. Largely unrelated to the interactions of the genders specifically.  As it is-- when it comes to discussion or commentary on gender and society, or interaction between the genders, no I don't think you can really learn anything apart from a lot of third wave rhetoric and what they think is the obvious truth. You can most likely learn other things on posts that don't become bombarded by the majority opinion here or that aren't to do with gender partisanism, I will say easily.  &gt; Also, no, that's not at all what I'm saying. I've had a few conversations with guys here where we disagree but both sides were respectful and polite - those are the types that I'm speaking of  Ok, that's a bit of assumption on my part. There are seemingly a lot of women on this post pushing this idea that any man coming into the subreddit that disagrees with anything must be a troll or a redpill neckbeard or something else of that nature.  &gt; I don't need guys to agree with me all the time to consider them 'good' and it's silly for you to assume that that's the case. A guy can disagree with some stuff here and still 'learn' in general.   Well apologies again for that assumption. But it does seem to be a fairly common sentiment from a number of people around here.
I really like [Captain Awkward](http://captainawkward.com/), including the comment sections on the articles and the fan forums. The blog is my favorite for advice because all of the examples are very specific and useful - she gives a lot of scripts - but also she explains the reasoning and principles behind her advice. For example, in [this article](http://captainawkward.com/2012/08/07/322-323-my-friend-group-has-a-case-of-the-creepy-dude-how-do-we-clear-that-up/) she talks about How To Deal With Those Creepy Dudes and ALSO Why These Two Creepy Dudes Are An Example of Rape Culture That Other Men Are Perpetuating  Captain Awkward's [feminism tag](http://captainawkward.com/category/feminism/) is very good place to start, btw, and I believe the forums have a Feminism 101 space as well that should help you find other resources. 
Work at your career as if you're going to do it forever. Don't ever turn down promotions or opportunities because you think that in five years you may be at home raising kids. Maybe you will - but maybe you won't. You don't know what your future may hold or how your plans will change, but don't hold your present self back on account of what your future self may want. I'm saying this as a designated actuary in the workforce who dreams of becoming a stay at home mom one day.
The only reason someone should need for seeking an abortion is "I don't want to be pregnant." I'm really glad you're sticking to your guns and not letting people bully you out of the decision you already know is right for you. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
Yeah, no.  In a day and age where politicians still talk about legitimate rape, and claim that female rape victims see being raped as a coveted status, the issues of men aren't the only thing that needs attention.  Why must it be one or the other? Why do you think that way?
Well pretty boy is used to describe effeminate (attractive) men
Well first it uses the basis for gender discrimination to change the burden of proof on an offense from the previously accepted clear and convincing to the more lenient preponderance of the evidence. This is fine in small offenses, but in criminal matters being investigated by colleges there should not be a lower threshold for ones guilt or innocence than you would be afforded by the criminal justice system.  Second by dangling the purse strings to force changes to the investigation process such as quoted directly from the letter below, the DOE is eliminating due process, unless you think you shouldn't have to face your accuser after they give testimony.     **OCR strongly discourages schools from allowing the parties to personally cross-examine each other during the hearing. Allowing an alleged perpetrator to question an alleged victim directly may be traumatic or intimidating, thereby possibly escalating or perpetuating a hostile environment.**  Third you highlighted comments regarding a victim who wishes to remain anonymous, which I never addressed. I addressed anonymous witnesses. Big difference.
&gt;Guys who say this don't grasp how much higher their standards are than many womens' standards  Have you [seen this?](http://blog.okcupid.com/index.php/your-looks-and-online-dating/)  Its not a peer-reviewed paper, but the data doesn't lie.
&gt; I don't think you could have been any more annoying if you tried.   Touche. N'est ce pas?   &gt; First...    This is a counter-point to those posts. If you don't think it has value, so be it.   &gt;  &gt; Second, people are having understandable trouble with the 'point' of this sub being understood as a subversive viewpoint from standard Reddit culture, instead of a fostering, supportive community. It seems almost callous and malicious of Reddit to have the expectation that this lone default community of 'different perspective' will help the problem, while not simultaneously addressing the pervasive misogynistic culture on the rest of the site. You can't foster and hinder an attitude at the same time, and a lot of the people here are simply not willing to live up to that expectation. While I think it's important to fight, I also respect that most people need repose and this was considered a nurturing place without a constant need to be on guard and vigilant.   I empathize, but the default status makes this a reality.    &gt; Lastly,    Perhaps my enjoyment of watching the uneducated be educated is callous, but it still stands. I don't fight my part of the fight on reddit, I do it in the real world but living a just life, rejecting inequality, and promoting courage when I am faced with doubt.  
&gt; How exactly is the draft a product of sexism against men?  How is it not?  &gt; I have never met a feminist who wanted any draft, much less one that excluded women.  I'm not disagreeing with you.  I've never met a feminist who spoke out for men being allowed to vote if they don't register for the draft.  There are two sides to the suffrage coin, and if you're an equality fighter, then you should speak out against injustice toward any group.    &gt; it's a perfect example of how sexist culture views women as too weak  If this is truly how you see, as offensive to women, then you should be fighting for women to be forced to register before they're allowed to vote -- like men have to *today* in the United States.  This isn't something historical.  It's happening today.  &gt; You realize sexist practices existed before feminism, right?  Sure do.  And many of them impact men.  Feminism has had decades of people addressing women's rights, and rightfully so.  I congratulate women and feminists alike on the gains they have made, and I think they need to be protected.  By the same token, there are struggles that men face that have been ignored for an extremely long time.  Feminism gave women equality, but issues that impacted men for centuries have gone unnoticed.  Worse, when men try to speak about it, they're shut down, quite often by women who identify as feminists.
[deleted]
Congrats, now that you're a default subreddit you get men in here too. Do not EVER call your son pretty. The problem with being girly is that you have a son, who is not a girl. If he wants to be a girl or whatever let him make that decision later in his life after he matures. Do not force female instincts on your male offspring. 
Endocrinologist needed?
[deleted]
[deleted]
Seriously, stop replying to sericatus.  He is deliberately taking arguments obtusely to try to prove points.  He is here to troll.  I also believe he's here to martyr himself.  While none of his statements are filled with ad hominems, they are all rude and abrasive.  He probably has other accounts and is hoping to get banned so he can decry the horribleness of women and their conflating lies and how unreasonable feminists are.
At a young age it may not bother your son too much, but I can guarantee, being called pretty by your mother is completely embarrassing and it's true, pretty is more of a word used to compliment girls. I don't see much wrong with calling your four year old son pretty, but as they get older it will have an effect on their life.
also we live in a post racial world now just so you know.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Also for things like flowers.   Oh, those flowers are so pretty. I want to fuck them *so hard.*
I have a 10 year old niece with red hair. Of course she gets some razing at school.  Every time I see her I tell her grown women pay a lot of money to have hair liked hers.  She loves it! 
&gt;without having to resort to trying to force men to "take responsibility for rape culture".  Why should men not take responsibility for rape culture?  Cultural problems are everyone's responsibility, and right now it's mostly women who are expected to deal with rape culture (and its consequences).  &gt;People shouldn't have to feel guilty for doing nothing.  Sometimes people feel guilty for doing nothing because doing something is the right thing to do.
YAAAAAAASSSS! Get it girl!
If *you* don't want people to call you "pretty", that's your business, and people should respect your wishes.    If *other people* screech in horror at the fact that someone's calling you "pretty", without any consideration of how you feel about it, those people are assholes who don't deserve any respect.  
I read about the practice being done on girls under the age of 10 or so.  I think I missed the part where you were talking about adults having it done.  Sorry for the confusion!
personally for me, i had extremely irregular periods in highschool due to stress, i remember one time i went 8 MONTHS with out a period. I went to a doctor and they found nothing wrong with me, but i also wasnt put on any medications to regulate my period either, because of potential side effects and the fact i was not sexually active as well. After highchool i started having the periods like clock work, every month with no issue only skipping when i had an extremely stressful month.   Basically it could be nothing, but you should still go to a doctor obviously. 
I remember reading once a long time ago (like ten or eleven years ago) that sometimes when you first start having your period, it can be erratic, as you described, skipping months. Though I do think that five months is unusual and a valid reason to go to the doctor....
If Kobe Bryant played the best player in the WNBA 1 on 1 it wouldn't even be a competition. That is why he earns more money. However, I see your point with golf. There are other sports that really do discriminate against women, like chess for instance. There really shouldn't be separate tournaments or rating systems in a sport with no physical aspect. If women focus on those sports I think it would be more reasonable 
I may be wrong, but do people not say, "you make a handsome couple", when that's primarily a male only term. Who the heck cares?    And pretty is not sexual, maybe hot or fine, but NOT pretty. I think your family friend has lost a few marbles.
Well, traditionally "handsome" was used for either gender.  Specifically in the case of handsome vs pretty, they have very different connotations. Handsome implies strength and well-proportioned, which we as a society have come to match with masculine. Pretty implies delicacy or grace, which is considered feminine. The "scene" described in the original post certainly evokes more of a delicate or graceful image than a strong one, so it seems like "pretty" would be the appropriate word.  I think my partner has very pretty hair and eyes. I've told him so before. I'm not emasculating him by this, it's just that "pretty" is the appropriate word for the context.  Finally - in Japanese there are different honorifics. Generally "-chan" is used for girls and "-kun" is used for boys. While it wouldn't be *common* to call a boy "-chan" it wouldn't be inappropriate, and same for using "-kun" for a girl. In some languages, gendered nouns are very strict and must be said a certain way to be grammatically correct (Spanish, German), in others, language is more fluid, and while some words have gendered connotations, they aren't bound to that (English). 
[deleted]
[deleted]
I guess it's a love story from a certain point of view....
I love these!   The main character refuses to be rescued and just goes around being her badass self.   They are by Patricia C. Wrede.
I read your post this morning and I'm still happy about the PHENOMENAL sisterhood that showed up there. Feet on the ground, lady; feet on the ground.
[deleted]
For someone to write that post, (edit 1: that 2X post), they'd have to recognize that there might be an issue within themselves.  This woman is requesting that everyone else change to solve her own problems.  She shows two of the ideas of the "rape culture" supportive ideas in her blog, (yes, I brought that up):  the idea that women must be the ones to cover up to not lure others, and the idea that men cannot control their urges.  She didn't ask for help in changing herself.  She asked others to change their way of life for her, (and by how it came across, all other women, everywhere).  When a change is desired, the only person that you can change is yourself.  If you find yourself wanting to change others, then maybe you should look inside first.  (generic 'you')  Edit 2:   I'm sure someone else could write these thought better than I can.  I can only hope I expressed why it is such a significantly different situation between coming here and asking for help vs stating on her blog that others need to change.
A lot of women have trouble with the pill, especially in regard to fluctuating libido as a result of the hormones (lowers libido dramatically, from what I've heard, in some women).
&gt; At least in the 50's and 60's, there was the notion of a "lady." Some women were treated with respect (moms, sisters were a start).  So long as they were white, at least.   I've heard this mentioned before, and really, a lot of the "benefits" to being a woman, especially some decades ago, were not afforded to women who were not white and conforming to gender standards (i.e. out lesbian).
[deleted]
[deleted]
Ya. But he'd probably prefer a more masculine word. 
The Summer of My Indian Prince is a GREAT summer read about a girl who gets tuberculosis and has to spend a year in a Sanitarium in the 40s. It's very romantic. She never loses herself due to illness or falling in love. It's grand!
I know, I've been sexualizing my baked goods. We're such sickos. 
Sorry to say dawg, you really MAY be part of the problem. Take a read of this and tell me if you feel differntly about the words rape culture. Its hard not to take offense when you are being blamed as part of the problem, but it's not blame directed at you more so the world that allows these behaviors to continue  https://medium.com/@zaron3/a-gentlemens-guide-to-rape-culture-7fc86c50dc4c
Hi there, pretty.
Handsome was actually originally used for girls mostly. Read a book like Jane Austen's *Emma* and you'll see the word "handsome" being used all the time to describe females.  And even regardless of this fact, why the hell should it matter?? I call my boyfriend "pretty" all the time. Also lots of boys love playing with "girl" toys like Barbies or wearing pink and lots of girls love things like cars and trucks. As a kid I was obsessed with the Ninja Turtles and my male cousin used to adore playing with my Barbies.  This woman is intolerant. I would have taken *her* aside and given her a piece of my mind if she had done this to me... Ugh.
[deleted]
Mine chose green!
Yeah seriously. Koreans say many things are pretty. Pretty in design. Beautiful in put-togetherness. Guys outfits can be pretty as in gleaming and well put together and beautiful exhibit of current fashion or tastefulness. Americans can be quite ignorant. I mean many other countries learn english and by default learn about america. True european coffee culture not starbucks instead of sloughing off europe as a whole as pansy europeans. what do children in this country learn? Especially in e countrysides...that mexicans are trashy basically.
:) no, she's Roger Rabbit's human cartoon wife. But it's my clit and my imagination so Jessica Rabbit hiding in the middle of a verdant pasture it is
[deleted]
You do realize that by saying, "...those freaky crossdressing sexual freaks," you're expressing a narrow view of sexuality and gender identity, right?
[deleted]
I spent the whole day last Saturday taking my daughter to an art show, the pool and then outside to play. It was awesome. But you know what? I loooved my solo Sunday shopping trip. Granted, my kid is under one, but at 2 or even 5, the merits of this "lesson" are likely lost amid the demands for this cereal or that toy. Like those Moms who Pinterest their kids childhoods and then look down on you for tossing your kiddos in the backyard with some Tupperware and the hose.   Your coworker was being a bitchy, one-upping snot. SanctiMommy. Great word. Perfect fit.
A recent video from [women working at Google](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=5YjGFleJjzc)   (**Disclaimer: I'm paraphrasing**) For those that can't watch the full video they are both are asked if they experienced any additional difficulties/roadblocks because they are women working in tech.  Both answer that generally no, nothing specific because they are women. Or at least they don't experience blatant outright discrimination at work because of their gender.  This is only two women and of course it will vary immensely from person to person, university to university or, company to company.
[deleted]
Hello I am a lesbian, I understand that the LGBT community faces unique struggles, gay men do not benefit as much from the patriarchy, etc. You're absolutely right that oppression isn't just based on gender. There are tons of other factors and they all interact in complex ways. That's what intersectionality is about, and I think it's very important to understand.  But that's my point! It's important to talk about oppression, its complexity, its interaction with other social factors, etc, and it's pretty impossible to do that without talking about who does the oppressing. That does mean "pointing a finger," you might say, but I don't see anything wrong with that. Placing the blame on those who benefit from oppression isn't demonizing them as people, it's just a challenge for them to try to change their behavior.   Although there are still gendered power structures within the LGBT community, I think it's fair to say gay men do not benefit as much from the patriarchy as straight men. So as a gay man, I would think you would be more likely to see how harmful these oppressive systems are because you do not have heterosexual privilege. How can we talk about the injustice without mentioning the perpetrators? How can we get rid of oppression without calling people on their shit?  The point is not to demonize men (white people/straight people/etc...). It is simply to call people on their shit so that they might take actions in the future to be better, to not perpetuate oppression, to live in a way that promotes justice.   I know for a fact I have been called out for my shit wrt trans people and POC. And while it didn't feel great to be criticized, I'm glad it happened so that I could recognize the ways I was fucking up adn try to be better. Why don't the men of reddit want to challenge themselves to be better? I do not understand why they want to sanitize this issue, remove its thorns, make sexism palatable.   Being called out for your sexism isn't a personal attack. It's a challenge to be better. 
This puts an entirely new spin on "Pretty bird."  Apparently, some people want to give Polly more than just a cracker. 
People are downvoting you? What in the world for?
"all men are rapists, and that's all they are."  -- *Marilyn French*  "if it was rape, it was a good rape."  -- *Vagina Monologues*, on lesbian rape.  Is that hate speech?
So you admit that when you talk about "equality" it's not about men and women treated equally?  Feminists who argue that they only seek "equality" really got on my nerves because it's pretty obvious that they were not talking about being treated just like men. It wasn't about being treated "equally." Equal to who? Other men?  So let's be clear, when some people mention how feminism is a movement to treat women "equally" what they really mean is **their own ideas of how to improve the treatment of women**. And that does not mean treated exactly like another man.  Also (I gotta ask) do you really think a white woman from a middle class background is treated so horribly because she has a vagina?
Third world countries are basically the savages in the current world. We could either invade and force law, causing a war, or let them destroy their own people.   I'm all for staying in a somewhat stable nation. I'm tired of governments wasting money on third world countries.
You sound like a very kind and loving mother. If your kid isn't bothered bothered by being called pretty then there should be no issue.  People should learn to mind their own goddamn business.  
[deleted]
"Brown chicken brown cow" is the more current spelling.
Response:  The fact that you think that says more about you than it does about me.  EDIT: Your son's reaction made me smirk.
I've got a buddy from high school who's son is in ballet and he gets derisively called pretty boy all the time to the point where he's defensive about it. It makes me irritated because yes, he's delicate-looking but the kid can lift a girl with one hand no problem. That's not generally pretty, that's athletic as hell.
[deleted]
[deleted]
"Cute" vs "beautiful" have more to do with your genetics.   "Sexy" vs "hot" vs "pretty" have more to do with your presentation.   
Thank you! There isn't anything wrong with being girly. Heck, I wish I were more girly sometimes.
Jesus fucking Christ, what are you even arguing? Is there some reason you can't just admit your assessment in your original comment was wrong instead digging yourself into a huge hole of stupid?
[deleted]
I get the feeling that pretty is supposed to be an explicit term to her. Like "girls are pretty and boys are handsome and never the twain shall meet".
I feel like if you were really a wuss you wouldn't willingly get pieces of metal stuck through your genitals. (No judgement, just saying it seems like it would take some guts.)
Tell them to STFU. If you want to do it, you'll do it! Why talk you out of it? Do THEY question your choices and do THEY believe women don't belong in engineering. Because if they go on about it so much part of me questions what the motivating force
[deleted]
They made this a thing in the video game Conker's Bad Fur Day where a bee was really desperate to pollinate a sunflower.
[deleted]
We internalize stuff so quickly and so young.
I'm giggling at the thought of Mashimaro in heavy makeup asking if he's pretty now.
Preach!
[deleted]
I wish there was a network of trustworthy women (or men I suppose) that people in situations like yours could contact for anonymous support. I would have gone with you in a heartbeat!  I think you are a brave woman, and obviously care very much for your family since you made a really hard decision thinking of them as well as for yourself.   I hope your recovery keeps getting easier! *hugs*
Prettily put!
I think her head would explode. Thank you!
I think part it's neither of us really particularly liking our hair (not dislike, more of a "whatever,it's just hair") and being tired of people, especially strangers, making a fuss about it. I don't want to deal with it as a parent or have them deal with it. Also I have a weird sense of humor and love to see the people who are *so* convinced be wrong and us be pasty gingers with kids that look like my Italian side or something.   Edit: phone "correction"
Hah yeah, I know what you mean! Having run into the same issue we've started giving the two of them "combined" christmas gifts of books and gender neutral toys like Lego city.  Actually, last book we gave them was: http://www.amazon.com/Professor-Astro-Cats-Frontiers-Space/dp/1909263079  The book was so cool I nearly bought a copy for myself :)  The most telling thing for me was how confused the little girl was when I first started to have actual conversations with her about the books she likes and what school is like for her. I think her entire experience of talking to adults was being baby talked and told how pretty she was ad nauseum, and so she was simply not used to conversations like that with people other than her parents asking her legitimate questions and interested in what she had to say.  And I really wish they would stop freaking out about the boy being girly and flamboyant. He is such a natural entertainer and it sucks to know his parents may be discouraging him. I also think they are worried that he'll turn out to be effeminate and gay, which was a shock to me as I didn't think they were homophobic.
[deleted]
I gotta say I was a super pretty red headed boy.
I actually find this comment kind of sad, because it implies that you think that it's gross for either gender to talk frankly about their bodies and appreciate them. 
Or, you know, she could be justified if it was "just" affecting her emotionally as well...
Because females are sexual objects and males aren't. They're too busy building pyramids and being warriors and shit. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
You're fine. Your friend is stuck in 1963.
Well yes, her doing almost nothing certainly adds to my frustration. But she actually gets insulted if I want to do my own laundry...  And again, she has two other kids. It would be nice if she could at least facilitate family dinners happening while I'm gone if she's not going to cook anything. She could work with my sister. But they want it to happen, and I can't facilitate it when I'm not there.  And he's getting tired/older, like I said. He definitely could use some help. He's said directly before that he gets tired of how he feels like he has to come home and do all the chores that didn't get done while he was gone. He doesn't expect to come home and be pampered, but he doesn't want to have to do other people's work in addition to his own. My mom ultimately did nothing about that.
[deleted]
I don't believe I understand them either. I just know she sees guys shaving their legs as really, *really* gross.
&gt;the CBS poll doesn't address belief in gender equity at all.  On second read, I may have made a rather unartful attempt at what I was trying to say. That many women who would otherwise fit the traditional feminist mould resist the label. Why? Who knows. But that CBS poll is not the only one that shows that many women do not like the title of "feminist" even if they explicit hold feminist beliefs.  &gt;Who are you talking to that denies that discrimination against men exists?  In my experience, any woman who leads with the label of feminist (as in, that is how she defines herself) is going to be the kind of person who refuses to acknowledge anything other then total female subjugation to patriarchy.  &gt;The issue you seem to be missing  No, I get that and I agree that rigid gender norms are harmful to both sexes. But I don't believe that the leading voices in feminism today give a shit about what anything does to men. When someone who claims to want equality says that I, as a man, cannot participate in the discussion because I am part of the oppressors without even knowing me or considering my point, it makes it very obvious that person is not actually interested in extending the same respect that they are demanding of others. And while "not all feminists" are like that, "not all men" is called shutting down the dialogue. So "not all feminists" must be the same thing, right?  &gt;It's a system that arose out of a strict differentiation between men and women.  No it didn't. It doesn't exist. The history of the world has not been shaped in any meaningful way by competition between the sexes. It HAS been shaped in a VERY meaningful way by competition among men for the privilege of reproducing. I'm not a huge reader of feminist literature, but to date, I've yet to hear one examine that crucial fact over pre-Victorian era history.  &gt;Most of us have a lot more in common than we have apart - it's too bad your anger at feminists keeps you from actually working with people like me, when we probably agree on a lot of issues  It doesn't, really. The internet doesn't count and I use it as a bit of escapist fun. Also, I don't have anger towards anyone who might call themselves a feminist, but I do know that such a person a.) doesn't really do a lot of critical evaluation or b.) is not really in touch with today's loudest feminist voices. (or c. is actually a man-hater and is about to tell me why I am scum.)
Title IX requirements have no bearings on campus legal systems.  Their purview covers a separate process entirely.  If campuses choose to accept a lower burden of proof during disciplinary hearings, that decision may be challenged in civil court as it always has.  It has nothing to do with title IX.
&gt;the world doesn't revolve around what works for you personally.  Thank you for proving my point for me. You can do whatever you want - until it starts affecting other people. I don't care what people joke about *amongst their friends* and I don't think most people go running their mouths in public about rape jokes - with a good reason considering you don't know which affect it will have on people.  &lt; rape seems to be the only one given special significance.  I'm betting that's because of the wide scope on the way it affects people. At any rate, if you joke about murder or abortion at least neither person exists anymore to hear you mocking them.   I'm not implying anything. I think I stated it outright. Some things are not funny. I don't think all dark humor should be taken literally, but I think you'd be pretty sick in the head if you actually agreed these things you were joking about would be anything to laugh about it real life. And I don't want to trick myself that they are. I'd rather just deal with the reality that some things truly suck and all you can do is face them for what they are and hope you're made stronger by it. I truly believe people can and do do this. If you want to do it your way go ahead. I am not one to stand in the way of your recovery. Just don't bitch about the consequences if you are ever in a room with another survivor and you send them over the edge because you were careless and you didn't give a shit about how your actions could impact someone else.  And maybe it's my personal pet peeve. I doubt it though. But since high school and onward, it seems that the fact that everything can be excused as a joke has been exploited a little too often for people to excuse themselves for being *assholes.* That's my main gripe. 'Oh I was just joking...geez.' No you weren't, you little bastard. You were trying to garner attention for yourself with shock value. Good job. Did I mention this was a pet peeve?   ^____^  It's like a smoker. I don't care that you smoke. But don't blow it in my face and expect me to kiss your ass.
No feeling, just like with tampons. A combination of suction and internal muscles keep it in. I worry less about it leaking than I worried about tampons. 
Yeah.  Groups run by Paul ["Beat-a-bitch"](http://wehuntedthemammoth.com/2013/10/18/paul-elam-of-a-voice-for-men-in-his-own-words/) Elam are "amazing". /s
I was breastfed till I was 2 and that was 30 years ago When does the lesbianism set in? I'm currently engaged to a man. Should I call off the wedding?
Being called manly would depend on the context.  "Hey, KDMCENTIRE, you kicked that robber's ass! You're so manly!" Ok! "Hey, KDMCENTIRE, I like the way you went up and asked that chick to dance! So manly!" Um, ok? "Hey, KDMCENTIRE, your chest hair is luxuriant like a tiger's pelt and I want to skin you for my fireplace rug! So manly!" Well, shit, now I'm offended. And apparently I need to bust out the tweezers.  That said, my kid is four and still in that generally genderless state that I figured "pretty" was the apt word. He was friggin *pretty*!
Thank you! He's looking to pretty fantastic so far, so here's hoping.
Someone else who thought of Grease 2 in response to "stamen."  I love you.
So according to this friend,  every time my sister calls me pretty it's sexual? Yeah,  no.  Why is pretty magically a "sexual"  word when you use it on a boy,  but the millions of times people call little girls pretty in a platonic way it is perfectly OK. Seems to me this friend needs to think a little more before she speaks.  
Well, I was trying to be succinct. Also the flowerly language there amused me. I didn't expect this thread to blow up, I figured on maybe ten 2Xers commiserating.
[deleted]
From youtube, reddit, etc.
there is a distinctive difference between "pretty" features and "handsome features. it is equally plausible to be a man with "pretty features" and a woman with "handsome features". neither of these words have been developed to infer a sexual connotation and those that attribute such a connotation are often projecting their own prejudices or insecurities on others. it is frustrating, no doubt, to deal with such confrontrations, especially from family as you can not rightly respond in anger, but it is equally as important to stand your ground and help educate them of that which they choose not to see. it seems your relative is responding with fear as the major motivation and that rarely ever leads to beneficial circumstances. 
After reading this, I am never EVER going with a diva cup. You handled this so well. After 15 mins I would've cried and started freaking out
[deleted]
Yeah, I thought that, too. They will delete comments (without even notifying you) that link to any other subreddit, regardless of content and whether or not it's "drama-inducing." I asked about it once when I got a comment deleted and this was the mod's response:  &gt;I removed that comment because of the link to the other sub. In general, if we let one through, it gives implied permission to let others through, so we try to enforce that rule equally across comments and posts. As to drama-inducing or not, linking elsewhere can send users into other subreddits in large quantities which is unfair to those communities. We're a big sub, and even bigger now, so linking into smaller subs can cause problems for the other communities out there.  I responded with this:  &gt;Sorry, but I read the sidebar rules as saying no drama inducing crossposting, not no crossposting in general. &gt;&gt;No drama-inducing crossposting of content found in other subreddits  but no one ever responded. Plus I've seen comments deleted that linked to larger, not smaller subs, so I don't even bother. It's a pain in the ass to spend time writing a comment, especially ones meant to genuinely help an OP, only to have it deleted, and not even be notified about it so you have no idea that it's no longer visible (comments that are removed will still be visible on your own overview page). 
And are women any less socialized to be sexist?
&gt; she was elected  Pedantry: We don't elect premiers, we elect MPPs.
My sense of it is that it is now majority male, and the discussions are getting very heated.
Juno, I guess.
Yeah, this. Universities cover up rapes because they know nobody wants to send their daughter to Rape U. It's all money.
What is WOP? 
Guy here. Have been called pretty, it honestly felt really weird and awkward. Would much rather have been called handsome. IMO if you say a guy's eyes are pretty or beautiful, yeah whatever that's cool. But in general, it's just odd to me. I grew up with pretty being a feminine word, so it feels really odd to be described in the feminine sense. I have a beard and high testosterone features... I just feel there are more accurate words that wouldn't feel awkward.   I don't have anything against the word, I just feel that it's not a proper use of the English language.
[deleted]
Welcome to 2x, where opinions are downvoted just because someone disagrees.   Downvotes are for people stating wrong facts, and for people bringing the topic away from relevant discussion. Please be sparing with them people... His post was both relevant and insightful.
That makes much more sense. 
Men are on average less sexually selective than women are, and it is therefore easier on average for women to find willing male sex partners than it is for men to find a willing female sex partners.     That is all I am saying.     It seems like people here disagree, and it boggles my mind.
Holy fucking shit. I would have had a hard time not assaulting that "friend". I applaud you for letting your son be "girly" and pretty and for knowing that that is okay. More boys need to be allowed to be whoever they are without being forced into the stereotypical boy mold. Every kid should have the right to embrace beauty, in themselves and everywhere. I'm so sick of all the genderizing that makes boys wear and play with ugly things.   My son wore a sequined skirt and sparkly shoes today. He was super pretty. He also covered the stereotypical boy things today; roughhoused too hard, got food and dirt all over himself, snuck on the computer to play games, stomp-walked through the house like he weighed 600 pounds, built a toy helicopter. Sure is a mystery that the power of the skirt didn't magically make him quiet and gentle and "girly". Stupid stereotypes.   Sorry you had to deal with that person's idiocy.   
Me too. Whenever people tell me to go back to where I come from, I usually end up resorting to something along the lines of "I don't know what you're talking about" or "well this isn't your native country either". It's wearing thin on me though the older I get, I might end up throwing some curses at them in Mandarin or Korean or something.  The worst part is I'm usually more "American" than they are - I vote in every election, I pay my taxes without bitching too much, I was born and raised here, I'm more educated *and* speak English better than a lot of "Americans"... but my skin color is the only thing that matters? Hahahahahahahahaha. And it's not a matter of me not wanting to be Asian - I'm Asian and I'm proud of my heritage, but at the same time I'm American and proud of it too. (Well, most of the time.)  On the bright side, I just got married and my new last name is super duper European so I've been fucking around with a lot of racist people lately  ("what are you talking about, that's my name...") even if I don't yet have a drivers license that shows the name :D My husband doesn't quite understand why I am really desperate to never move to anything but very large/populated suburbs if we have to move out of the city though - I hope that when we have kids they will never need to feel that way near their home. Fucking bullshit, that's what racism is.
&gt; First, we need to address why they don’t want to watch.  ...because it's not as good or nearly as competitive. There's no female equivalent of Blake Griffin dunking the night away or Michael Jordan awing us with things we haven't seen before. Me, you, and society have the power to make women's sports gross high in money and viewership, except we don't watch because (for most of us) we find it boring.       It's just such a silly thing to call it "misogyny". I think Oprah and Barbara Walters are the greatest at interviews ever (and their ratings dictate the same), but it has nothing to do with them being women, it has everything to do with them being *great* at what they do. I'm not hateful towards men because I prefer Oprah over Charlie Rose.
"WTF face"  Yup, don´t see problem there either.
Well, congratulations on a healthy 5-year-old!  I'm not planning on having kids for awhile, but it's always good to have a plan for when I do, and preventing another one too soon! 
It wound up going very well, thank you for the well wishes. :D
&gt;  At a certain point you have to realize you're raising him to become a man.  If I understand OP correctly I'm assuming she's of the school of thought that you shouldn't raise your sons and daughters differently.
[deleted]
[deleted]
I feel bad fort this lady - she will never know the joys of a completely trusting relationship with her husband.    Apart from that thought, I honestly couldn't take this blog entry seriously..   Also, glad to see it's cross-posted in tumblr in action... where it belongs....
It was something of a fad in the 70's to have the clitoris hood removed for easier or better orgasms.
Uhhh. Hon, I would kill to look like you. My teeth are more fucked up. Your smile is beautiful.
Force is a very blunt instrument.  You're proposing making this mandatory.  Try thinking that through.
Damn what utopia do you live in?
Honestly I think the best reaction is to silently mute them and get on with the game. Most likely they know what they're doing is wrong/offensive and they're literally just doing it because they're trying to bait some sort of reaction or because it gives them some wierd sense of power if they can make you leave a server. Don't acknowledge them, even to tell them that they're muted, just shut them out. 
recently walked into a college party sober. there were plenty of unattractive men and women hooking up. relationships are different, but as far as sex goes i think convenience can often trump actual attraction.   also maybe theyre lying to me, but from what ive heard from the homeless people where i volunteer, a decent number of the guys have killer sex lives. i'd assume the women have sex also  i cant think of an example of a social pariah, so no contest on that one.
[deleted]
&gt;Not only did she disrespect her parents for having sex before marriage  what the fuck? her parents don't own her body, she can have sex if she wants. she was clearly doing it safely, too, so what's your gripe? that she disagrees with her parents religious ideals and has thoughts of her own that contradict theirs? how *terrible.*  it's none of her parent's business if she is having sex, and none of their business if she gets an abortion. it's her body, and she's not hurting herself or anyone else by having safe, consensual sex before marriage.
Flowers are some of my favorite things to paint and personally (at least until know) I wouldn't have brought sexuality in to it at all. Aside from that sexuality is only vulgar to the prudish to the rest of us it's something else.
[deleted]
It completely depends on my mood.  If I'm feeling anti-social, I mute and let my bullets do all the talking.  If I'm riled up anyway, I make fun of them as long and as hard as the sex they want to get but can't.    I play BLOPS2, mostly HC TDM, and consistently run 20+ kills a match, with or without friends on my team.  (For stats sake, my overall K/D is 1.26, TDM K/D 1.89, all diamond except launchers, and no reset.  What's up?)  So on top of being female, I'm a better shot than, say, 85% of the guys out there.  That either pisses them off more, or suddenly they want to be my friend.    My first piece of hate mail was "aim bot cunt".  I have come into a lobby continuing a conversation and the first thing I hear is "shut up bitch".  It's annoying, but I've also gotten desensitized to a lot of it over the years.  So sometimes I respond and sometimes I don't.  Sometimes the guys and girls on my team get to them before I do.  There's one friend, also female, who lives for shutting down the shit-talkers.  (She also gets volumes of hate mail.)  In your situation, if you didn't want to mute him, you could've embarrassed the hell out of him.  Asked questions about the size of his dick and how many pubic hairs he has.  Questioned his sexuality or intelligence.  Get creative.  On the other hand, he may have genuinely wanted to know these things and doesn't have a female to ask.  Not excusing it, but in 6th grade I asked a guy friend how guys walk with stuff between their legs.  He turned about 50 shades of red.  I've since realized that meat and veg are a little higher up than I thought, and some questions you should ask more carefully.  &gt;the other people who play it do one hell of a job to make you NOT want to play it anymore.  Yes.  I view it as psychological warfare - trying to make you forfeit so they win without contest.  If somebody calls me fat (or whatever), they are trying to make me so upset that it throws me off my game.  I use the anger to kick butt even harder.  Often I'll respond jokingly, "OMG, I'm going to cry now.  Oh no, gonna call me a bitch/slut too?"  I take away their power to hurt me by showing that it doesn't hurt, that they're just one more in a long line who thinks he's a badass, but doesn't measure up.  And yes sometimes it does hurt, but this person doesn't know me personally, so his or her opinion means less than nothing.  (Some female gamers are worse than the guys.  In one case two women ganged up on me, calling me stupid, etc., simply because I have a Southern accent.  Little did they know, or care, that I got my first C grade while working on a B.S. in Biology.)  I also make judicious use of the "report x" and "file complaint" options.  Being a female gamer has its own special ups and downs, but don't let idiots, trolls, and genuinely ugly people run you off.  It took me three years to respond to these people in kind, because respect and all that.  
That's what I was thinking...isn't "hot" or "sexy" usually sexual? A flower can be pretty, a flower is never sexy IMO.
I was merely making a joke.  Vulgarity and prudishness are not implicit, merely imposed by culture.  An African tribes woman walking around topless isn't taboo, but in the US, it would trend online esp. if you happened to be the daughter of two famous Hollywood actors.
You are just full of interesting factoids! I'm tagging you as "Linguistics Nerd", which I sincerely mean as a compliment.
Plus Keira Knightley portrays Lizzy as such a tomboy - SHE'S NOT. She's repressed by the customs and propriety of the patriarchal society she exists in.
[deleted]
And you get over that feeling eventually. I haven't been allowed to exfoliate by my derm since 2007. I got over it in about 2 weeks.
This sucks.   Sorry you have to deal with that. That has the potential to be a very damaging rumor indeed.
[deleted]
That's because there's a difference between words such as "pretty" and "handsome" in the English languge. They mean a different thing and while your family members did not graps the meaning of the word they got the difference right. You did compliment your son in a not particularly flattering manner.  **pretty**  1.pleasing or attractive to the eye, as by delicacy or gracefulness: a pretty face.  2.(of things, places, etc.) pleasing to the eye, especially without grandeur. 3.pleasing to the ear: a pretty tune. 4.pleasing to the mind or aesthetic taste: He writes pretty little stories. 5.(often used ironically) fine; grand: This is a pretty mess!  **handsome** 1.having an attractive, well-proportioned, and imposing appearance suggestive of health and strength; good-looking: a handsome man; a handsome woman. 2.having pleasing proportions, relationships, or arrangements, as of shapes, forms, or colors; attractive: a handsome house; a handsome interior. 3.exhibiting skill, taste, and refinement; well-made: a handsome story; handsome furniture. 4.considerable, ample, or liberal in amount: a handsome fortune. 5.gracious; generous; flattering: a handsome compliment; a handsome recommendation.  As you can see calling a woman "pretty" means something else than calling her "handsome" (or more typically "beautiful")
It's funny. I just reread your comment about how you'd like to know how to proceed after "Hello". I always had that issue too. I never knew what to say next. The eerie parallel made me smile. It really does show how similar we all can be. As for where to go next in a conversation, I guess seeking something in common is a good place to start. If you find something in common, great! If you have nothing in common during your conversation, then it wasn't going to go anywhere anyway. 
because your dad is intelligent and so is your mother?..KUDOS to them. Youngsters think 60 and 70 years old's are OLD. No we are not! We are just as "up" on things as you are...just with a little more "life" experience.
Wow! It had literally never crossed my mind there where any.. reddit has really opened my eyes in a good way to all sorts of stuff :) Making generalizations about Men do....  Women do... really is unsound I guess. I'm college age, and maybe Women wise up but I kinda feel responsible where ever he is :/ Like, don't I look good enough?, is there something wrong with me down there? My own neurosis maybe.
I did both thanks :)
Because a sub full of people who think the internet is their own private club where dissent will not be tolerated, probably shouldn't be a default.  
Oh my God, one ignorant person was rude for a minute or two! Time for more than a thousand comments of outrage.
Like I said in my post; it's not the airbrushed porn stuff.  I've been on all the usual sites, like the large labia project and the vulva wall and whatnot.  It only makes things worse because I'll realize just how much bigger and lumpier my labia are than everyone else.  I'll see posts about other people who went for labiaplasty only to realize my lips are way bigger than theirs.  If normal women with labia smaller than me think they're too big, what does that make mine?  As for the feeling, I can barely feel anything in the labia.  If anything, they're just floppy nuisances that trap moisture and make me more susceptible to disease.  My biggest worry would be surgery gone wrong or screwing up the clitoris with so much skin removed, as the poster above you discussed.
[deleted]
Go ahead and call him pretty. Break socialization norms a bit, he'll be a better human for it.  If he gets a truck when he's older, though, don't call it cute; that's how you'll end up with a son with a huuuuge truck with a 10-inch lift kit on it.
Which western 1st world country does not treat women well? I'd say women in general have it awesome in the west, slightly above most men.
The weird thing is that PP puts breastfeeding as one of the most effective birth control methods.  GOOD TO KNOW THAT'S NOT TRUE I GUESS.
Feminism is often about choices. The way I see feminism, when it comes to these matters, is that we should advocate for people to have the choice. The choice to either partake in such activities or not.   I'm a sex positive feminist, but due to my religious beliefs, I'll only have sex with one person. But that doesn't mean I will try and convince anyone that they should do the same, because it's their choice.   Many pro-choice people will not personally have an abortion. I'm pro-choice, but still undecided how I feel about abortion personally.   So yes, you can believe that people should have access to something, without wanting to use it yourself. That's ok, that's not hypocritical. Choice is the key word here.
Vitamin B supplements have helped me.  Can't remember where I read that... 
&gt;'distinguished'  Oh yeah, a four year old is distinguished. I think your problem stems from this "family friend" not knowing "English"
People like you are the reason why lots of women don't go to the police after being raped. I hope you get trampled by pissed off elephants.
[deleted]
[deleted]
b-e-a-utiful
Speak to HR. As much as it's "just a joke" it shows incredible stupidity on the part of the manager
&gt; (anyone else remember no-heat curls? :P)  It seems like when those posts went away (were they banned? I can't remember) was around the time the tone here really started to change. That was a couple of years ago, right?
[deleted]
I am a breastfeeding counselor, so questions about birth control are one of the most common things I am asked as well!   The mini pill is very interesting in terms of its use during breastfeeding. Your note about missing "just one" is really spot on! I've also had several women who notice significant dips in supply after about 2-3 weeks on it, despite claims that it will have no impact.     For moms who are nursing exclusively (and some research even suggests this means NURSING only, meaning no pumping) a baby under 6 months who has not started solids and does not sleep through the night, LAMNFP can be pretty damn effective, but VERY few American women are able to meet the criteria.   I always get the most curious looks when I say, "Well, have you considered barrier methods?" Apparently the are out of vogue!   TLDR: Bodies are different. Whodathunk? :)
[deleted]
We used pull out and fertility planning for 10 years, as stated in the edit. 
I can't believe so many people think its fine? I can laugh at a basically sexist joke from a work mate, or laugh off if it is bad. But manager, sent to everyone.. ??? He is an idiot of the highest order.  Edit: Missing word
You said he sent this email to the entire office. Does that include HR? I would like to think that someone who is not his subordinate will point out that his actions are inappropriate in the workplace. However, you could remind him gently that there are a number of females who received the message and any one of them could be offended enough to make a formal complaint. If you truly believe that his actions stem from pure ignorance, perhaps pointing that out will be enough.
Thanks!
The best proof I can give is the screenshot of the original message (the images were attachments). Time stamp is also visible. http://imgur.com/f8xcAIN
to add another one, my girlfriend in high school forced me to let her paint my nails (she water marbled them).  now I'm a cheerleader in college, know how to water marble nails, and I'm still straight and conventionally masculine.   shit's weird sometimes
Man who was told he was pretty here. I turned out mostly ok. I like and respect and am attracted to women. I only cross dress roughly semi-annually. And other men have done an admirable job of pretending to like me, despite the fact I was told i was pretty as a child. I am insufferably vain, though. It's a mixed bag, come to think of it. 
CAFE is basically an offshoot of AVFM.  Elam isn't on CAFE's board but they're closely associated with him and he had an instrumental role in its foundation.  Many of the board members on CAFE are AVFM regulars and both Elam and other repellent AVFM writers are frequent contributors and interviewees on CAFE's various media outlets.  This information is really easy to find.    I'm not sure why you think they're such a great organization anyway.  Just recently, they invited Warren Farrell ("Survivors of incest have negative feelings about their experience because society has taught them sex is dirty!") to speak at U of T.  They are not good people, even if they do eventually distance themselves from Elam.    And I don't find it hard to find group that strives for equal rights for all genders at all (and even if I did, CAFE doesn't even slightly fit the definition).  Maybe you're just not looking hard enough.
You should. She's expressing what probably half of us who read your post and downvoted it without commenting were thinking.  Like 40% of the new queue is now dudes telling us how they feel about the state of 2X and mostly why we should like it.  I don't come here to hear about dude feels. At least, not anything close to half of the posts and comments' worth.
Idk, what if the father looks like David Bowie from the mid 80's?
Up in bunny heaven, here's the thing   You trade your legs for angels wings    And once we’ve all said good-bye    You take a running hop and you learn to fly     Bye Bye Li'l Lopl    Miss you and your cute bunny waddle    Bye Bye Li'l Lopl   You’re 5000 candles in the wind    And though we don't know if we can bear it    We know you're up there eating heaven's carrots    And here's the part that hurts the most    Humans cannot snuggle a ghost     Bye Bye Li'l Lopl    Miss you and your cute bunny waddle   Bye Bye Li'l Lopl   You’re 5000 candles in the wind    Maybe someday you'll snuggle up again   And /u/Scarlett_ptista will always miss her floppy eared friend   Spread your wings and fly   Spread your wings and fly   **RIP Lopl**
Seriously, WTF - that totally got me too.
[deleted]
[deleted]
5 AM! I am so impressed that you found the willpower to do that. 
I hope this family friend is not a parent. The thing that I learned from having children was was the absolute feeling of what true unconditional love is.
Taken from dictionary.com:  pret·ty/ˈprɪti/ Show Spelled [prit-ee] Show IPA  adjective, pret·ti·er, pret·ti·est.   1. pleasing or attractive to the eye, as by delicacy or gracefulness: a pretty face.   2. (of things, places, etc.) pleasing to the eye, especially without grandeur.   Your family friend is silly. There is nothing in the definition explaining it's a feminine term or has any sexual meaning behind it. I have called my SO pretty and beautiful many times. He thinks it's a compliment and doesn't feel like it's an inappropriate term to describe males.   I would highly recommend the family friend to buy a dictionary, open it, read it, and realize the error of her mentality. You did nothing wrong. If your son is pretty and beautiful, than there is no shame pointing it out!
[deleted]
Amy Shumer. The girls on Broad City are hilarious too.
Right on.  Two months is a long time to put up with bullshit, but in life you'll find that so many people are willing to be miserable for SO much longer just to avoid going through the motions of finding something else.  Kudos to you for stepping out with both feet and moving on!
That sounds ultra-sweet. But I have to ask: What does it have to do with anything here?
Well what are your reasons for wanting to wear a bikini? Youthfulness, you said. So, to show off? Not because it's cooler/less hot, you want an all-over tan, or any other reason?  It makes sense to wear a one piece now and return to a bikini when you actually want to show off. Perhaps it's not "body acceptance" to say, but if you don't yet have what you want to wear the bikini for.... don't wear it?   I am aaaalmost 39 weeks pregnant and just exploded with stretch marks two weeks ago. I don't mind letting my belly/marks show right now, because I'm proud of the bump, but I doubt I'll be wearing a bikini any time soon. I've always felt uncomfortable with them, like I was going out in my underwear. 
[deleted]
1. This solution is not a solution. There are not enough members of the community to upvote good content; we are outnumbered by people downvoting community-centric content. You can see this when you look at the New posts and see that most of the self posts - which were the bulk of this subreddit before default status and were the thing that most of us were here to participate in - are usually downvoted to 0 despite upvotes from the community. /u/i_want_hard_work said it better than me [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/comments/27ytf1/meta_twox_has_me_losing_hope/ci63741).  2. Great comment. No two ways about it.   3. Do you not think this is a bad thing? Because I think this is a bad thing. I was hesitant to comment on this thread for the same reason, and because I was wary of having an influx of replies tearing me apart.   However, that's not the #3 comment now, nor was it the #3 comment when I wrote my original post. #3 right now is:  &gt;While I can agree with you on some points and I think the defensiveness men seem to be posting is somewhat exaggerated I also think that comments such "any small responsibility they may have for perpetuating a sexist culture" is as much part of the problem. Many posts I see on hear seem to be describing hardships in a us vs them all men vs me manner and this is just dishonest. Tons of men and women alike treat all people respectfully and have worked hard to get rid of the degradation of women and women's issues. When you say stuff like men should take responsibility for the sexist culture like it's solely our fault, responsibility. We all have a part to play and I think language like that leads to upsetting some men. And this isn't to discount anything you may have experienced but I think charged language placing blame and responsibilities on every man is not the right approach and may lead to some of the polarization you mention  Which is someone telling OP that the problem is her tone and language, not the people who are derailing conversations. In reality, she doesn't make any blanket statements or accusations and does a great job of not accusing any particular group of being wholly responsible for issues in this subreddit. I also said the replies were an issue for me, and this user in his replies said "The defensiveness is a natural response to being called out in generalities," which is silly because defensiveness isn't a natural response - there are many possible responses, e.g. receptiveness, consideration, open-mindedness, arguing, changing the subject, leaving the conversation, and some are better than others - and OP certainly wasn't calling out any user or group blanketly.  Also, bear in mind that the woman's comment about being harassed (the #3 you listed) is now below the man's comment about how OP needs to change how she writes if she wants better results and that men aren't as defensive as they're portrayed to be (which is ironic - getting defensive about being told you are being defensive), which is mini-evidence that comment #1 doesn't work and community-based content can't compete with outsider content in the upvote game.  4.Basically, it is what it is  I also said "and their replies." One reply, which included accusations like "women are sexist against men" and "you are a member and proponent of the red pill for women" and "men deal with just as many hardships.." has since been deleted, but was a particular gem. He went back and forth with some people for a while, if i recall correctly.  ALSO, even though I clearly said I read just the top four comments and their replies, you're saying that my problem is I scrolled "way, way down" and that "it's inevitable to hit bad comments if you do that on "any sub." You are wrong. In fact, all of the subs I particularly like are not like that. People comment in a way that is at best on topic, funny, interesting, and illuminating, and is at worst boring or unoriginal. Not malicious, accusatory, inflammatory, off-topic, defensive, or argumentative. This sub used to be that way as well, and now it's not, and that sucks. And that's my TL;DR.   edit: added a few words 
I tried.  That post was deleted by the automod because of rule #2.  I would prefer a link to the original bc the discussion thread was also worth reading.  When I messaged the mods saying that this was not "drama-inducing" and asking them to please reinstate the post, I received a message back saying that if they made an exception for this one, then they would open the flood gates for other exceptions as well.  They suggested that I post a (anonymizing-no usernames or subreddit links) screencap. Actually this is my third time trying to post this, since my screencap was automod deleted yesterday because it is an image, and images can only be posted on Fridays.  Weird.  Edit: Actually, it wasn't the 2X mods who suggested that I post a screencap.  I PMed the OP of the original and asked he to x-post it here herself, and if she didn't want to copy/paste it if it was OK if I screencapped it.
I say bring both- maybe the first day you feel more comfortable with the one piece by the end of the vacation you want to wear your bikini. Or the other way around. Or maybe you'll just stick with one the whole time. It's completely reasonable that it's taking you a little time to adjust to your new body- it grew a human being!  You don't owe anyone anything. You are not letting your friends, sisters, and children down by not wearing a bathing suit that shows your stomach! You don't have to be showing you stomach to show off the body you've been working so hard for.   I think it's important to realize- there is nothing wrong with one-pieces. One-pieces can be sexy, they can show off your body and your hard work, they can be more than appropriate for someone young. 
It also wasn't tactless, I'm asking a valid conceptual question based on a conversation me and my husband have had.
I took my girlfriends nail polish and painted one of my nails the other month.   Now I'm banging dudes left and right.    Nail polish, not even once. 
I'm a wee bit surprised this thread blew up the way it did.
[deleted]
I had an ex who literally compared wearing clothing like this to leaving your car door unlocked. The ignorance.
Whats magic is that you are all this deluded..  I'm also not subscribed.. doesn't stop it from coming to the front page. 
On the abortion thing....most states require consent from both parties before following through with the procedure. Just sayin'. Also, let him know that carrying (and delivering) a child is a risky and even life-threatening process, therefore it can only be decided by the mother. It would be inhumane for a man to decide whether or a not a woman risks her life.
Yes, your post surely is that.
Exactly! If they're happy and healthy why stomp on their innocence? They're FOUR!
My kid is hella rough and tumble. His favorite things are trains, trucks, and teeball. But when he expresses a desire to put on nail polish because I am, or wear a skirt to the store, or carry a baby doll around, I'm not going to diminish or discourage that.  He can be whatever he wants to be, it's my job to provide options.  And he was pretty! Pretty! Not distinguished or handsome or dignified, he was a delicate little thing and he's not going to be one for much longer, so I don't see a problem with calling it like I see it. One day he can stomp around and eat all the food and try to sneak girls in the house. Until then I'm going to enjoy my cute kid.
I have no idea why your comment was a relevant response to my comment, but I will respond to one point of your comment anyway...  You're conflating why women choose to abort and why abortion is legally accessible. Women choose to abort for all sorts of personal reasons, including the desire to not want to be a parent. But women have that legal option under the law for the reasons of bodily autonomy and medical privacy.
Brett Butler, Elaine Boosler, I'll finish my coffee and edirt in a few more. The fact that I'm even awake at this hour violates every comedic instinct I have. I don't do thinkings before noon &gt;.&gt;  That said, as a female comedian, it never ceases to amaze me that male comedians can simultaneously steal my jokes AND claim women aren't funny. Motherfucker, I just wrote twenty minutes of solid material that you KILLED with. Have some [FLOTUS](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=kdRGdPb7Izg)  Also, heres a link to a female comedian I know who is funny as fuck. Ladies, I give you [Gayla Johnson](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=5kB8H7GaqDM&amp;list=RDAeyMtZH1rfs&amp;index=2).  Edirt 1: to fix linky. God I hate morning. Edirt2: formating. speeling. Hate for whomever downvoted this comment. Moar coffee.
Half Asians represent!   My Asian features faded with age. I was an adorable Asian baby now I'm just a silly white girl. But for me I was always on the "borderlands" not white enough but not Asian enough.   My Asian side is a large part of my identity. But certain white people I've met think in just a weeaboo. If I choose to pronounce a Japanese word with an English/American accent I get called out being told I'm not a 'real Japanese person'   I had a roommate who used to say "hey sushigoldberg no offense but chingchongchang!" "No offense but why do Asian people have tiny dicks?" "No offense but don't eat my dog ok?"   It's frustrating and annoying. I know exactly how you feel. :(
[deleted]
[deleted]
&gt; A young woman walked past, asking others for a cigarette, and while returning to her seat was treated to a rude remark about her weight by a patron seated nearby me.  &gt;She turned, and without hesitation, called the remark out for what it was, insulting, and proceeded to cast a half pint of beer directly into my face and chest.  Does anyone else think that is an unreasonable escalation? There might be a time and a place for a drink throw (which I generally find to be rude) but, mind you I was not there, to combat harmful words with physical antagonism does not cast this lady in a favorable light.   Consider if a man had done the same. Gentleman A makes a rude remark to gentleman B, B let A know how he thought that A's remarks were rude and throws a drink in his face and chest. I don't see too many ways out of B and A getting into a fight.   This lady was banking on the assumption that the gentleman was not going to counter her physical antagonism with the same. That is sexist.  Use your words ladies.
[deleted]
From a male's perspective, I really wouldn't delve too deeply into the psychology of a 15yo boy playing fpss online. There's really not alot going on there except 'hurr-durr, gurl' and anyone else past that age behaving in that manner is just butthurt because the last vagina they saw was their mothers and due to their present attitude, this is a situation likely to continue till their mid-thirtes. If they really start getting to you, you should remind them of this... I have plenty of friends who game online and would never speak to a lady in this manner because they are normal well adjusted people.  And keep in mind that in any exchange with one of these misguided, misogynistic assholes, you are the one who holds the real power. Taking a beat down from you either verbally or in the game will effect them ten-fold. And for gods sake, don't mute them. Like you said, you shouldn't have too.   Just remember; you are bigger, better and badder than them. Keep doing what you do...
I agree that there should be a grace period but after being a parent for 10 years, you're a real parent no matter whose DNA that child has.  Its not as of your entire relationship is invalidated when you learn something new about your child's DNA.
Honestly, it depends. If it's someone I've been going out with for a bit of time, sure. At that point, it's become routine.  But if this is within a first few dates, I'd prefer finding an excellent restaurant that is't pricey. It's pretty rare to find such restaurants that issue coupons because they don't need them.
Yes but the obligation to take care of and provide for your child might end at 18 but it doesn't end when you find out something new about your child's DNA after 10 years of being a parent. 
Yeah, sure, why bother explaining why you can just back out at every uncomfortable question.
There is no shame in making an informed decision. 
[deleted]
Anyone who thinks that men can't be pretty has never seen Lord of the Rings. 
We don't have the same laws regarding freedom of speech. Ours is worded as such:  The Canadian Charter of Rights and Freedoms:  Section 2. Everyone has the following fundamental freedoms: ...  (b) freedom of thought, belief, opinion and expression, including freedom of the press and other media of communication  But there's the "reasonable limitations" clause which states that the guarantee of freedom of expression and other rights under the Charter are not absolute and can be limited under certain situations:  The Canadian Charter of Rights and Freedoms guarantees the rights and freedoms set out in it subject only to such reasonable limits prescribed by law as can be demonstrably justified in a free and democratic society.  So it's a little different here.  
Why do you shave anything?  I shave things nobody's gonna see out of personal preference. I can imagine other people can have that same or a similar preference.  Gotta love that smooooth feel
Natasha Leggero 
This quote sticks out to me:  &gt; It might seem like a big leap to go from “an innocent kiss” to rape, but let’s get real for a minute. Six-year-old boys turn into sixteen-year-old young men who grow into twenty-six-year old adults.  is it just me or is this blogger *fucking insane???*  you CANNOT equate a 6 year old child to a 16 year old teenager or 26 year old man! At 6 years old, puberty has not kicked in there is no sexual desire, he is just mimicking what the adults around him do. And because of this gesture, the school is introducing him to the world of sex way younger than is necessary, and through labeling and shaming, *because that always creates a perfectly healthy human being, right?* /s  &gt; He’s the one who’s receiving a consequence, yes, but that doesn’t make him a victim. That makes him the person who acted inappropriately.  He's 6. Years. Fucking. Old. How the hell is he going to know about sexual interaction and it's consequences? who the fuck would deem it appropriate to have 'the talk' with him, let alone a discussion of what is sexually appropriate? *How can he know better when he has no notion of sexuality?!*  &gt;  If Hunter continues to touch other students in ways that aren’t appropriate or wanted throughout the years, the school will have records indicating his continued behavioral issues.  Or, how about stop judging kids like they are adults or even teenagers, and teach them appropriately, as opposed to through labelling and shaming, which will most definitely exacerbate the problem if anything?  The blogger and the school should most definitely have known better than to judge a 6 year old's actions based on adult knowledge and experiences.
I honestly think you should try this. I feel like most people would be super down to save some money. It's a universally loved concept.
I think her response was appropriate self-defense considering an unprovoked and unknown attack. If someone is trying to pin your arms that is an incredibly oppressive move and not consistent with "normal" roughhousing (that some people consider appropriate to shrug off or that can be appropriate depending on the relationship and setting). I would freak if that happened to me.
&gt; But what they're usually trying to say is "this has happened to me, so therefore this isn't sexism", or "I've had something similar happen to me, so therefore your feelings that this was related to your gender are wrong" - even though they know nothing about the OP or the situation.  Funny, I very rarely see this kind of response. And whenever I do, I can't help thinking they're right. Let's say, two people in different areas get attacked at the same time (only attacked, not raped). One of them is a man, another a woman (both the same age and social class/status. Why would feminists insist that the woman was attacked because of misogyny, but the man was attacked because... well, just because?  &gt; even though they know nothing about the OP or the situation.  Well, of course they can only know as much about the OP as she reveals on the post and respond accordingly. That's why it's important to reveal as many significant details as the OP personally feels comfortable with.  &gt; You can see the sort of response (and my explanation in reply) in this very thread, here.  Regarding that post, don't you think that all people regardless of gender usually try to make the conversation about themselves? One reason being that we are all to some degree ego-centric, whether we admit it or not. We do care about the feelings and lives of our friends and family, but in the end, we often still think about themselves a bit more. And the other reason is that people usually tend to contribute to conversations to something they know about, and it's only natural that their own lives and experiences is what they're most knowledgeable in. Most men saying the "x happens to men too" simply mean to say that x is not something that only happens to women. Some of them also say it to kind of comfort women by informing them that having a penis doesn't make life automatically easier and such. It's debatable whether hearing this is comforting or not, but I really doubt that every man, while saying this, thinks: "Oooh great, now I have an opportunity to devaluate her experience because she's a woman!".  Sometimes I fee like this never-ending tension and gap between men and women on Reddit and internet as a whole is due to both sides being overly-defensive, always expecting resistance and insults as a default reaction and failing to see and empathize with the other side's point of view. That's the problem I've noticed with both feminism and MRA occasionally. That's why I don't identify with neither, nor do most of my friends, both male and female, and yet we manage to respect and value people equally regardless of their gender without having to subscribe to any gendered movements.  &gt; Also, imo, while some guys are commenting here in good faith, some guys aren't. They hate TwoX, they hate the women who comment here, they don't want the sub to be default, they think that sexism doesn't exist, and they're trying to shut down conversations here. That's not cool.  Of course these people exist, and they're assholes. But I don't agree that the majority of male Redditors are like that, which seems to be a popular opinion with some people in TwoX. I have no doubt that the default subs are filled with immature teenage jerks, but (I've lost the count of how many times I said that) Reddit is more than its default subs.
they wouldn't market that way if it didn't work so well.    they have empirical evidence that those ads appeal more to their target audience. 
He's really the most significant outlier in the country. Most of our politicians are very dry, phlegmatic people. Also: they overwhelmingly don't smoke crack.
[deleted]
[deleted]
I would like to take her class.
That's so terrible! And plus, it's been shown that rapists often don't even remember what their victims were wearing. So leaving a car door unlocked really isn't even comparable to wearing a revealing outfit.
The police only gave him a citation. I think what they meant was she agreed not to sue the company in exchange for the discount, which, as /u/_refugee_ said below, is a settlement.
[deleted]
You'll prolly enjoy this article.   http://www.xojane.com/issues/im-a-sex-negative-feminist  Also, no feminist is a perfect feminist. We all have our demons. Growing up in a Patriarchy will do that to you. 
Even if it isn't the norm, who would say that at all to their wife with a health condition?
I have told my son he was beautiful since he was born. I also let him play with dolls of he wants and I paint his nails if he asks me. Good on you for not caring about gender specific words. I don't want to push my son into a "boy" box, I think it's important to let kids like what they want. It bother me when people describe as being a "typical boy," when he is actually just a typical toddler. 
Your first reaction as you have described it is a very clear expression of your displeasure and should have given her a very clear social prompt that it's not acceptable.  Since she is a young lady, it sounds to me as if she is trying to provoke you into a reaction so she could play the sexual preference card and turn the harassment around.  The best course of action?  Accept it, play along and let her do all the work in the "relationship".  Meanwhile you just keep pulling a fade as soon as she walks away and do nothing to follow up on "your end".  No smiling, no warm tone, no prolonged eye contact.  Keep your interactions with her as plain and neutral as possible and let her take the initiative in all things.  She may have friends who would serve as "witnesses" and you don't want them to say anything about you other than "Well, she seemed aloof and uncomfortable...."  Subtly document anything that could be quantified as an "advance" until you have enough instances which could constitute a pattern of continued unwanted attention to even the most clueless of reconciliation personnel.  Then and only then would I suggest taking this whole thing to HR.  It'd be easy for them to brush off one small pattern, but a larger sprawl of varied approaches couldn't be ignored.
[deleted]
You two are adorable. :D 
Congratulations! That's a helluva an accomplishment! Wahoo for you!
[deleted]
[deleted]
Have you read the pamphlet that comes with your birth control?  If you're taking a combination pill, a few hours isn't going to compromise the effectiveness.
You never know!
Thanks so much! My boyfriend was really cute and made a fuss over it. 
[deleted]
Agreed. 
I think that drafting only men and **denying them the right to vote in democratic elections** if they do not register to do so is sexist, and it's so self-evident that it doesn't need further explanation.  Any law that excludes or includes only one gender on the basis of the same is sexist in my books.  If that inequality isn't obvious to you, then there's not much more I can say to convince you otherwise.
Not to argue, but the OP states "junior network admin"  But yeah, she could be the go-getter type
Your comment made me smile. Thank you a lot for commenting, it actually brightened my day. I shouldn't have to mute them and to be honest, I don't. I keep dishing shit back whenever I kill them, avoiding using stuff like "Oh if I'm supposed to be in the kitchen, how could I have unloaded that round of bullets in your ass?" just because it's condoning them saying I should be in the kitchen, from my perspective anyways. I usually just tell them they should stop talking so much shit since it's clearly distracting them from the game and leave it at that.   In all honesty - most stop after awhile (I think I end up being the one getting muted) and I have had a few who completely changed their attitudes, which was nice, but why were they doing it in the first place?  Again, thanks for the comment!
Who knows what she called him before he called her that, too.
You can be an asshole without *meaning* to be an asshole - the outcome is not affected by intentions.  It seems like this strikes pretty close to you. Your justifications for this kid's shitty treatment of people is pretty specific. Are you perhaps speaking for yourself?   If so - look, it's easy to justify being an asshole. It's easy to make excuses for doing the right thing. It's much harder to be a decent person - but it's worth it. If you see yourself in this story, I think you should take a good long look at yourself and make sure that you're really becoming the sort of person, the sort of man, that you really want to be.
[deleted]
Excellent!
Btw, if you post text or a link, then this would be readable on a mobile device too.
[deleted]
I remember this one. I've been hoping someone would come out with a pretty smart ring, but... these only come in gold, and have gigantic 'stones.' How is that supposed to be something that has options??
“In theory, theory and practice are the same. In practice, they are not.”  *-- Albert Einstein*
Okay, you first. 
Just very disheartening the whole situation. What is the right answer? I've scolded my cousins when they used to be disrespectful.  I would always tell them how come when some one whistles, licks lips, talks stupid to your sisters do you want to fight the guy yet you are doing exactly the same and think it's funny.  On the other spectrum I was walking/exercising with my 1.5 year old daughter and had a 20-25 year old lady following me around asking joggers if they knew me or have seen the mother of my child.  She was about 10 feet behind me and i finally turned around and told her what her issue was. At which point a guy joined in and said I'm calling the cops.  I said go ahead and continued to walk.  when I run alone from the reactions I receive I'm either a pedophile, rapist, or a jogger. My conclusion is that our society is very sick and it will take all of us to work together to get it back on track. 
[deleted]
Is Lane Bryant sexist because it only offers womens clothes?
I think you're missing my point.  I don't think they shouldn't be allowed to express their opinions.  Marching around with anti-abortion signs is fine, or holding rallies, or distributing pamphlets.  I do not think they should be allowed to express their opinion using *giant pictures of dead bleeding fetuses.*  Why is limiting the use of shock images limiting expression?  If I were advocating that people should not be allowed to express anti-abortion opinions, you would have a point.  I am not advocating the prohibition of anti-abortion opinions.  I am advocating the prohibition of gory images in a public space.  EDIT: Okay, whoever is downvoting me.  Instead of downvoting (which should be reserved for posts that do not contribute, rather than posts you personally don't agree with) explain this to me.  Why is restricting shock images specifically restricting expression?  Can someone actually coherently explain this train of thought to me instead of just downvoting?
I don't think this guy needs to be downvoted. He has a legitimate right to ask for clarification, and this is a real teachable moment to him and others like him who may be unaware of exactly what constitutes "assault". [Check out the legal definition](http://www.law.cornell.edu/wex/assault), specifically *Intentionally putting another person in reasonable apprehension of an imminent harmful or offensive contact.  No intent to cause physical injury needs to exist, and no physical injury needs to result.*  Basically, if you are a larger guy, and you sneak up behind a smaller woman and surprise her by binding her arms and restricting her movement, she is perfectly in her right to assume that she is in danger of imminent harm. She would only have seconds to react -- if she waited to make certain she was about to be physically harmed or sexually assaulted, it would be too late. 
Golly.  Guess you got me.  That source seems very reputable, after all.  Policymic is a renowned legal journal beyond disrepute.  This article explains all of the divorced dads I've met who have primary custody, and the 50% custody when they ask for it.
I am in love with Susan Calman right now.
That was immensely satisfying and totally worth the read. Thank you for posting this.
You're speaking with someone who was continually sexually harassed by a schoolmate in elementary school, btw. I have a pretty good grasp on its effects on the victim.
&gt;Due to both related issues having unrelated and extremely diverse causes, one solution, and asking about general solutions, is not appropriate. As much as we might want to have one solution that everyone can throw weight behind an immigrant group participating in international smuggling has a much, much different solution than domestic medical procedures performed in hospitals.  The solution is quite simple: domestically, you can educate people so that they will vote for politicians who will enact laws that enforce individual rights, including laws against circumcision. Get to the voting booth yourself and pull the lever for those politicians. Internationally, you can educate people in other countries to do the same.  As long as societies deem it to be acceptable for individuals to use non-consensual force against other individuals, these sort of problems will not go away.  &gt;The moderator has no agenda to speak of. They simply understand that the topics must be discussed within their own contexts. One for medical reform, one for immigration and customs enforcement to stop international human smuggling.  I never disputed that the moderators understand that the topics must be discussed within their own contexts.  I disputed what the moderator considers to be "within their own contexts", so yes, the moderator clearly has an agenda against discussing male circumcision.  Others have agreed but their posts have been deleted because of it.   &gt;As I already covered it, no matter how horrific the issue is, you can't attempt to have one solution for issues with unrelated causes. You can't bring about medical reform through customs enforcement.   The causes are not unrelated, they are the same: individuals using non consensual force against other individuals.  Your argument is that because they are different forms of force that the causes are unrelated.  That's illogical and you are ignoring the principle of the issue.  The solution is what I posted above.  &gt;Finally, have you contacted any organizations like this: http://www.intactamerica.org/? If so, what were your experiences? What real, meaningful action can people take on the ground to correct this issue in 2014? If you want to have a conversation about solutions to the issue, you have no enemies here. Nobody, not even the moderators, want to see the procedure performed. So, what should be done to stop it?  See above.
[deleted]
No, because that argument could be said about ANY sport because ALL men's sports are more popular than women's sports, and it's a circular effect. Because men's sports are more popular, they continue to get more funding, and thus continue to be more popular. When Title IX was enacted, the legislators recognized that this cycle would be never ending unless they stepped in and demanding equal funding for women's sports programs. 
How is it satirical? They dont seem to be parodying the point, they seem to be expressing sexist views because its edgy. How many people watch the show and go "ha, look at that dumb bitch", rather than "damn, it is funny/sad that men look at women like that and think that they are lesser". If its honestly the latter, ok, ill give you it as parody. But the people i were watching it with were more of the "LOL, women" reaction  Edit:thanks to the person in here who defended him and said "shut up bitch" (comment deleted now) for proving that people see it not as satire of sexism
[deleted]
1000+ ft in elevation. Would not recommend.   Road running is tough on the knees, but easier on the ankles. 
I did 2 marathons, then decided to go for the ultra. Addicted is a good way of phrasing it. 
Exactly! Let me get a tip, not him!
[deleted]
I read this in the news a couple weeks ago, and picked the Neutrogena body wash with no beads instead of the grapefruit one I'd been using.   I feel like those beads don't do anything anyway that I couldn't accomplish more effectively with a washcloth or loofa. Poor fish.   Edit: yikes, I use Crest! Guess I'll be buying new toothpaste too. 
Funny thing is there is this lawyer he HATES. He told me once she made an assistant cry. He does a LOT of shit talking (if he's read a book on something he's an "expert" and he doesn't know the difference between a fact and his opinion) and I don't know if he was just over exaggerating or what. I'm terrified of getting back into this position so I don't know if I'll apply there. Guess I could just check it out.
It seems to be made a bit more complicated by the fact that the police were called and had done what they were going to do, which didn't involve arresting Mr. Touchy. So, it seems like criminal prosecution wasn't really on the table.  If criminal prosecution really wasn't possible, then all that would remain is a civil trial, which would be between Ms. CleverClient and Mr. Touchy or Ms. CleverClient and ABC Corp, not The State and Mr. Touchy. It isn't legal to prevent The State from fulfilling its duties to protect its citizens, but they already did all they were going to do. It should be okay for Ms. CleverClient and whomever to work out a deal outside the courts instead of having a judge settle it in a civil trial.
Just not sure the relevance to 2X. Also feel this would be more at home as a Fb status. 
Yes, it gives a deeper understanding of her experience and it's inspirational.  [Here is the video](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=1MfxtM9N3fw) for anyone interested. I also think many of the people who are arguing her views of societal misogyny should give this video a watch to understand just where that perspective comes from. Also, try to remember this is not a singular person's outlook on these issues. It may be her own unique story as to how she discovered gender inequality but the message has been shared numerous times by different intersections of men and women time and time again. 
Thanks for the clarification :) I agree with you, there is defiantly a difference between being "Gay" and being a homosexual. I'm not sure i'd call the difference cultural, but i see why you do and it makes a lot of sense
&gt; If my kids had any desire whatsoever for high heels  Erm, the high heels were just for sake of analogy. But thanks for getting so in-depth with your reply all the same.  &gt; People made fun of me for wearing glasses and daring get my period in the fifth grade.  Glasses have practical and medical purpose, and your period is biologically unavoidable... But I fail to see how this relates to the subject at hand.  &gt; If he wants to wear a dress and people make fun of him, we'll discuss his options  Well, at least you can be proud of him for sticking up for what he believes in if such a scenario occurs. "Forget being pragmatic son, wear your favourite dress and don't worry about what the other boys say!"  &gt; I'm not going to tell my son he can't wear a dress because there is nothing wrong with wearing a dress. They are comfortable.  I agree, absolutely. Dresses are very comfortable. But something being comfortable doesn't make a strong argument for its being worn. I think being naked is comfortable, but I don't arrive to work that way because their are a variety of complex factors behind social norms and human psychology that; while somewhat tedious, have to be taken into account for various other reasons that don't need elaborating because we both have common sense.  &gt; I'm sorry you feel so strongly about this. I hope that you find some peace.  This last comment implies your own ignorance. "I'm sorry you have an opinion that doesn't conform to my own". I'm sorry you feel sorry, because that's just sad.
Exactly! It's just a bit demeaning. A little infantilizing.
and I am talking about not using pretty boy as a term to describe 'effeminate' men anymore. 
What a great video! Thanks for sharing :)
You're not being unreasonable, but it's pretty clear that that dude is seriously depressed.
That's what I generally do. Try to make my footfalls a little heavier so I know they can be heard or adjust the volume on my phone.
I call my son pretty all the time, because he is! I haven't had anything as wtf as your experience, but I've gotten "aw does your momma think you're a girl?" Oh shit he's not?! I only change his diaper 107 times a day. Guess I failed to notice he has a penis.  Some people are just fucking wack jobs. 
Exactly how i feel, but it seems popular amongst 20somethings. At that point the whole "oooooohhhh, hes saying offensive stuff" shouldnt be all that funny anymore, and i feel like its mostly just laughing at women
[deleted]
Its a commentary on the spectacle saying women need to work to look good, whereas men are already good. Im sure you seem the issue
Because stress delays periods and once you see that negative pregnancy test you're no longer stressed. ;) And buy tests from the dollar store, they work like a charm and they are 1/10th of the price. 
Completely untrue. Most rapes are commited by people you know and trust. Doesn't mean you can't get murdered, robbed, or something else, but rapists probably won't be hiding in those alleys.  What might happen because we are women is that people may be more likely to assume we are easy targets.
[deleted]
[deleted]
KRISTEN SCHAAL!  Also [Jenna Marbles](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=8wRXa971Xw0), [Marina Franklin](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=EGIFu7M7Ugo), and [Hanna Hart](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=glwkK7turPY)
Is she 12?! What's next? Is she going to say "haha, I'm not touching yooooooouuu"?
My teeth are worse, kid.  :P  ...and honestly, the biggest critic towards them?  Me!  Some people even say I have a nice smile - it is a nice smile, it's just full of crooked teeth.  How old are you?  If it's really bothering you, save up and get them fixed.  I'm 31 and am getting mine straightened next year.  I honestly never thought I could when I was younger - my parents didn't even take me to the dentist and I had no insurance for a long time.
yay! auto girls :D
So wait - someone of questionable mental capacity was beaten up by someone trained in self defense, then the person who did the beating blackmails the company for an 80% discount . . . .  The guy was a jerk no doubt, and even though he finally got what he deserved (fired) for 'invading space, really a beat down by someone who could have the knowledge to perhaps kill him, and a company raid?  ... and comments about how "we need more of these stories".  I just don't understand "equality" these days :(.
You realize almost all photographers do this.  They post a few photos of almost every session they have to their blog and facebook accounts.  I'm surprised you didn't realize this when you were researching photographers.  Anyway, start with a very friendly request to her to remove them.  Be nice about it!  Don't get all lawyerly with contract stuff -- you're more likely to have a positive reaction from her if you don't.  Then, if she refuses, THEN you can start pointing out clauses in the contract.  She might still refuse.  You then have to decide if it is worth going to court over...or if you should get on with enjoying your newly-married life.
It's a gut reaction to someone coming up behind you and messing with your head.  It has happened to me from the front, and in that respect it is a little different, but I usually just step back before they actually do it.
First, just want to say that is definitely not okay for anyone to touch your hair like that. It's definitely something you should be able to bring to your HR's attention without fear of retaliation and should not be taken any less seriously because of your gender. I'm sorry it's happening.    Still, remember that the client in this story was reacting to being restrained by someone she couldn't see, with her arms held at her side. She didn't just hit him because he touched her and it made her mad; the guy took away her ability to move freely and she pushed him off. Ideally, she was using necessary force only and not escalating things. I'm afraid that's the difference you'd run into if you punched a colleague who touched you, then called the police and said "she touched my hair so I punched her, now I want to charge her with assault."
There ya go, evened it out.
Fuck that. You're awesome.  [Here's two of my favourite funny gifs](http://i.imgur.com/fBkWS.gif), [maybe it'd cheer you up?](http://www.damnlol.com/pics/961/b433028a3623d899bda3cef4fdfdf1d6.gif)
Fucking. Justice.   This should be xposted to /r/justiceporn
[deleted]
Link? To buy? 
I ran into this same problem like a year ago, and I'm shocked they haven't changed it to "no crossposting" yet. Say what you mean!
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
Love the Jeopardy cap!
Good call.   OP, how well do you know this guy? For the first few dates, I like to travel separately, just in case. 
Well downvotes mean that people do care. Shaved and proud won't get the same attention because it's the norm. Let's not pretend that there isn't a ick factor associated with female hairiness. That gets you downvotes. 
What are we moving forward toward, if not to a world where we can define our womanhood - our PERSONhood - for ourselves? 
I am, hence why I asked for it to be elaborated on?
Thanks for the response and clarification, yes I did generalise so allow me to clear that up. I was speaking about the majority of boys in that age group, and yes the majority of boys that age do feel compelled to act in a typically boyish manner this is proven by the sheer amount of pressure to conform they place on boys who don't.  Of course there are exceptions **and that is completely okay**, such as OP's son, however when he enters school such attitudes could lead him to be isolated by his peers. Furthermore as he matures he will grow out of the behaviour exemplified in OP's post, and if his mother's opinions and actions (such as calling him pretty) do not mature along side him then not only their relationship but his ability to get on with other boys (or other boys willingness to get on with him) could deteriorate as a result.
Enjoy yourself!  But also don't forget to be safe.  Let someone know where you're going, what you're doing, and what time to expect you back.  Make sure they have your contact info, etc.  Make sure you know your limits, especially if this "drink" is alcohol ;) Depending on how well you know him it may seem excessive, but y'know.. better safe than sorry, especially if it's in a secluded place (which it sounds like)!
There are people who are reversed or the pain refers to the wrong side. It is always included in the differential dx for lower abdominal pain. 
among others.
I really hope years from now people will look at it the same way we look at minstral shows now
[deleted]
This makes a ton of sense. I have the kind of guy now where if for some reason I don't need a turn that time (extra sensitive, tired, need to pee, it's weird but hey sometimes I just want something fun and quick) I actually have to stop and explain otherwise he is too "giving" to just let me give my turn up too easily. But in the mornings, he can be a little quick for himself and has forgotten me, which is pretty confusing since it's not his norm. Your story sounds a lot like that to me. It makes sense it'd upset you more than normal because of your past experience.
I would just like to point out that my previous comment was directed at Neptune, not you.
Nice! Diet/routine? 
You look awesome! Congratulations.
All the time- I did it when I lived in cities, and I do it now that I live in a small town.  I am definitely aware of surroundings and lighting (especially in cities...here I'm more worried about bears than I am about male assailants), and always felt more comfortable in cities when there were lots of other people about.    I don't dress any differently.
This cultural "hypersensitivity" is a *good* thing. Trying to stop bullying, trying to elevate people to the same level of comfort and happiness, trying to instill general kindness and empathy aren't signs of weakness or being offended. They're signs of a culture that has met its basic needs and is trying to become something more, something *better.*
I just had to be less of an asshole. Change is good sometimes.
Also chaffing is a thing
[deleted]
No offense, but you should have filed a harassement suit on his ass. Don't let people speak to you like that, but taking the easy route out (not easy for you) for this guy is the wrong thing to do. Send a clear and definitive message: Your treatment of me is breaching legal levels and I, nor anyone else, will tolerate it.   In fact, and I hate to tell you this, but quitting was not the best option. By quitting, it makes it easier for them to challenge your right to seek unemployment insurance. I know you have your boyfriend/father, but it's a little hypocritical that you are saying "You go girls!" when you are now relying on two members of the opposite sex. Not everyone has the same privillege you do as far as safety nets, so consider yourself very lucky.   Back to my point though, I highly recommend you seek legal counsel. Quitting gives that particular person an easy way out. They'll just assume that you weren't cut out for the job. Work place harassement is bullshit, and as a male I went through the same stuff. Do not put up with it. Please seek some help to at least file SOMETHING against this guy. 
That looks like the least interesting toy ever.
Did I ever say that no one would get offended? Clearly they would, or this wouldn't be an argument, so please do not put words in my mouth.   All I've been saying is that:  a) My son likes being called pretty.  b) It's no one's place to tell others what compliments they are allowed to give to their children.  c) I think it's pointless to be upset over the perceived gender of a word, because in general, attempting to force people into neat little boxes does not work, so the forced differences between sexes does more harm than good. If a guy is pretty, I'll call him pretty. If he gets offended, that's his own deal. I think that a guy who's secure in his masculinity will just take the compliment.
Thank you for the support. I've thought about getting it removed just for the medical purposes mostly (some history of skin cancer in the family) but occasionally I think about getting it removed for my self confidence. I might come to like it eventually. My boyfriend calls it my hard reset button XD
I've tried OKCupid and Match.  I met a lot of guys on both, most of whom were awesome people. Many of them I'm still friends with - we had a lot in common, it just didn't work out for us romantically.   In my profile, I made sure my photos were very recent (I found a lot of both men and women had photos that while flattering, were several years old). I didn't want someone to be surprised when they met me in person.   I also learned to be very specific about what I wanted and how I like to spend my time. I'm very active and enjoy creative pursuits, so I definitely wasn't interested in a relationship that was primarily sedentary or where someone felt art was unnecessary or fluffy. But I also didn't put my whole life story up there...you want to have something to talk about later!  You may feel overwhelmed by the number of messages, but something else I did was to make an effort to write back (if it was obviously not a copy/paste message to a bunch of girls). If a guy took the time to write a thoughtful message, I felt the least I could do was reciprocate, even if it was to thank him for his time but that I wasn't interested for a particular reason.   I met my current BF on Match. His profile and smile were so open and genuine, I couldn't resist messaging him. Oh, that's another thing I learned - I had no problems sending the first message, which did surprise some guys, including him. But it was much better than waiting around and hoping someone noticed I visited their profile.    All in all, I've had really great experiences online. Best of luck!  :)
[deleted]
[deleted]
Please join us at /r/sysadmin!  Also, /r/girlsgonewired is pretty awesome.
Great, this brought a smile to my face :))) Keep it up!
[deleted]
I guess that's the saddest bit, I did not think my post WAS a criticism. I though that my statement was consistent with most that the cake was .... you know, scared to say anything now ... a bit crazy, but very sweet. Indeed my other comment said better than shop bought. Other people have a different idea of a criticism to me.. they can downvote it to hearts delight .. I need to be above it, I resisted deleting the comment (I'm trying, I'm trying), I wanna be less pleasing, deferential, and so on .. at least on-line, can I just manage that. Truth is deep down I'll still go to bed thinking 'oh no, did I insult someones lovely cake' Why can't I be tougher ha ha! :) 
I see fancy romance.
Me as well. Was having problems from some extreme stress. It would start back up a day or so after the test each time.
In the interest of fairness, he should be able to opt out early in pregnancy. The woman can opt out by abortion. The man can't force the woman to have an abortion, but he should be able to let her know that if she does decide to have the baby, she will be raising it alone. Then she can decide if she wants to raise a child alone or abort. This way, nobody's rights are infringed upon. (Except the fetus, if you believe in that sort of thing)
dude he said one thing let it go
[deleted]
I would try and practice my "startled" reaction, so any time they touch your hair, massive jump, hand on heart, "oh my GOD, you STARTLED me" kind of thing. If you happen to "accidentally" elbow them in the process, well even better.  If that doesn't work, or you can't pull out off, I'd start retaliating - when she says she wishes her hair was more like yours, reach out, and start stroking her hair nonchalantly "actually, yours feels really nice, what do you use, etc etc" keep stroking her hair until she stops touching yours. She can hardly complain that you touched her hair when she started it.  Unfortunately, I don't think you could get away with punching them, as much as I think they deserve it. 
I'm talking about context. That means things that aren't in the post itself, but things that differentiate rape from robbery which aren't included in the post since they are self-explanatory . But if you're looking for things in the post itself that are different as well: The part where psychological tests have shown that all robbers think that what they are doing isn't actually robbery, and further think that all men are actually robbers, and that they are afraid to admit it. 
Nobody's trying to convince everyone, just make media a lot more diverse and honest and give more options to women.   &gt;If some asshole comes up to you on the street and says "God damn it woman, shave your legs!" that person is just an asshole. Did it stop you from getting that job you wanted? Or impede your access to clean water and air? Did it somehow prevent you from getting the apartment/home you wanted? NO!    Why are you even bringing this up in this discussion? You're using nonsensical arguments to dismiss this problem.  &gt; NO! So what's the fuss about? Are you trying to eradicate assholes from the world? Because if so, good luck. That will never happen. You will always have a percentage of the population who feels the need to open their mouths and give their irrelevant opinions.   They can be assholes about other topics, not women's bodies. Laws aren't the only thing that can limit your freedom, culture and social attitudes can do that too. I want women to have more free choices when it comes to hairiness. That requires talking and posting pictures.   &gt; Furthermore, society insists women go hairless because of capitalism and issues of wealth. Companies sell products that assist women in removing hair. If you push forward the idea that women should be hairless, it's not a gender issue, it's a matter of deceptive business practices. This attempt at making everything about gender is seriously avoiding the even more overarching theme of capitalism and the pursuit of profit at all costs. If you can't see that, then they've already won.    And this is the only argument I agree with, but it's still a gender issue. Capitalism exploits cultural beliefs that are already there (You won't convince East Asians for example that darker skin is beautiful no matter how much marketing you put into it). So the only way to combat this is to change cultural ideals through talking about it. I can't fix capitalisms, and this conversation isn't about that anyway. A woman wanted to tell other people that she loves her pit hair despite cultural resistance. Can this thread be about that? 
your glasses are the coolest
Hah, you should check out my birthmark. It's like having a footprint (it really looks like a footprint) on my stomach.  If people are looking at you... I'm pretty sure it isn't because of your birthmark.
This "financial abortion" MRA dream has already gone to court in [Dubay v. Wells](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Dubay_v._Wells) and it has failed originally and in appeal.   &gt; The National Center for Men appealed the case to the United States Court of Appeals for the Sixth Circuit on May 14, 2007. Oral arguments began September 10, 2007, and in November the appeals court affirmed the District court decision, noting precedent stating that "the Fourteenth Amendment does not deny to [the] State the power to treat different classes of persons in different ways."  &gt; In its dismissal of the case, the U.S. Court of Appeals (Sixth Circuit) stated that:  &gt; "Dubay’s claim that a man’s right to disclaim fatherhood would be analogous to a woman’s right to abortion rests upon a false analogy. In the case of a father seeking to opt out of fatherhood and thereby avoid child support obligations, the child is already in existence and the state therefore has an important interest in providing for his or her support."  Kind of moot to keep up the fight in finding a way to make it legal to abandon your children.
Or it's up to their kids to throw a party, or some family member.  just generally, i do feel as though it isn't my duty to remember any else's anniversary.
Huh, I never really thought about it but it kind of makes sense that dressing less modestly makes you less likely to be mugged... If you look fabulous and confident mugging you would probably draw more attention than mugging the girl in dark modest unassuming clothes
indeed lassie, indeed...you're welcome to island anytime ; ) 
expect a lot of one-line messages rife with misspellings asking you for casual sex from a profile with no picture  like, more than a couple  if you can ignore those (and really, who can't) it's pretty OK. take everything with a grain of salt. for some reason the ratio of crazy to normal is generally a little higher for online dating but the online thing makes it easy to brush them off before you meet
hmm, I don't want to be rude, but something your comment rubs the wrong way. To me, the main point of the post is that she is happy with her body now. It's not about size or beauty, its about acceptance and maybe even a little bit of celebration.   Of course you can be big and beautiful, but if OP didn't recognize that in herself, then it didn't do her a whole lot of good.
I'm definitely an introvert as well. That's why I think exploring this avenue might work well for me :) Thanks for the link!
More or less true.  I guess we could start being more humorous (i.e., satirical) here on TwoX.  
[deleted]
It makes you human.  I know not one perfect one.  But when we're not perfect, it's good to apologize.  There are things about my self, safe to say, that I will *never* fix.  It's getting too late for that.  But good luck on your quest for perfection!  Don't forget all the apologies along the way, though, they make a difference to others.
&gt; a cv boot on the front is torn  This is not good.  Road dirt *kills a cv joint pretty fast.  They're not terribly expensive (from what a quick Google search told me - $40-60), but they are a PITA to replace.  CV joints are (very, very roughly) kinda like 3 hip sockets in a circle. It's packed with grease. Road dirt (a most excellent abrasive) gets mixed with the grease and wears the ball AND the socket.  There are replacement boots that can be put on without pulling the axel off - they're split &amp; wrap around. I have no idea how effective they are - but do whatever it takes to get that split sealed off.  On the oil pan, you can coat it with tar or heavy grease to halt/slow down the rust.  Or you can get it all clean and non-oily and spray it with spray zinc.  Zinc is a sacrificial metal and the zinc 'rusts' instead of the steel.  Look for chain-link fence repair paint. Be sure it says 'spray zinc', NOT aluminum.  Lots of luck!
You're not being vain at all!! I can barely recognize you. I too lost 60 pounds (220 to 160) and it was amazing looking in that mirror after hitting my 3/4 mark (GW was 140). Recognize your hard work girl. You look absolutely stunning! Congrats!
I honestly do not think there are two sides to this coin (and I'm not alone). Many times there are, but in this instance, she was polite, and he was very, unnecessarily rude.  OP has said multiple times that it wasn't his approach that insulted her. It was his completely rude reaction to her discreet decline for a conversation. So yes, she has every right to act insulted.  Also, even if he didn't realize it was the wrong time to approach her, there was no need to call her a rude bitch. He should've put his big boy pants on and moved on.
Sorry, in the context of my reply I meant no support from the father. 
[deleted]
I wish.
I have no knowledge on hormones, breast cancer, or Nuva ring.  However, I do have a Mirena IUD that I got 6 months ago and I am so incredibly happy with it. Yes, insertion was uncomfortable and a bit painful... but it was only painful for a minute. I continued to be uncomfortable (as you are at the gyno when they are sticking foreign objects up and prodding you!) for the rest of the appointment and only a few hours after. Honestly, I think it is no big deal in comparison to the absolute carefree feeling I have now about birth control. I don't worry about it- at all. I had a check up, it was perfectly in place, and it has been a godsend. No more worrying about daily pills or taking or inserting anything, and a really great way to not worry about pregnancy for 5 years!  I used to be paranoid about pregnancy before my IUD. I was always convinced the condom broke, that the minute I was late taking my pill would make me be pregnant. I knew I was being irrational, but I was so freaked out! Now, I have unprotected sex with my monogamous boyfriend, and I don't worry about a thing. He can come inside of me or not, we can have spontaneous sex, and I don't worry anymore about pregnancy!  For the 5 minutes of uncomfortableness, I'll take 5 years of worry-free sex (but please, use a condom with non-monogamous lovers!). Not to mention, the price should be covered by insurance (national or otherwise). 
[deleted]
[deleted]
I watch the Daily Show a lot.  Samantha Bee has long been one of my favorites, and in the past year or two I've been really impressed (as in, falling over laughing) by Jessica Williams.  Locally, here in Boston, one of my favorite comics that I've seen a number of times at my favorite local comedy club is [Erin Judge](http://www.erinjudge.com/).  Sadly for me, she moved to New York.  A few years ago I attended this panel, [Funny Feminism: Joking Our Way to Gender Equality](http://www.netrootsnation.org/nn_events/nn-12/funny-feminism-joking-our-way-to-gender-equality/), at the Netroots Nation conference, and the panelists were thoughtful and interesting and quite funny at the same time.
I'd think you'd be safer in a small town without anyone there to attack you!
Why do you talk to your sons girlfriend, why do you invade his personal life as if his decisions are yours too make?
"hey while your at the store buying that test can you grab some pads too?" if i ever called my boyfriend and told him that he would probably cry tears of joy.
Very happy for you that you were able to return to work doing what you love.  Keep up the good work.
put myself through college working (cooking/training/managing) in restaurants, got out of it to blacksmith/weld, then worked in mortgages... my little town needed a decent place to eat, I had experience, hated the local dives... so I jumped in, put things on my menu no one else had (no fryer, no shitty burgers, we have great fresh fish and great quality innovative sandwiches)... part of my issue is my landlord is my ex girlfriend, she is raping me on rent, and we cannot agree on who owns what equipment.  But most importantly, there is no consistency to the sales... 
You look amazing! Wtg!
If you are not a male, remember this: this is very common in our culture to begin teaching boys how to be men.  We then teach ourselves to not express ourselves through sadness, anxiety, any kind of emotion that makes you vulnerable.  Hell, I remember I wasn't allowed to cry at my own cousins funeral when I was 9, my brother saw to that. 
I am super excited about my design ideas and the other I wanted on my ribs, might do my upper thigh because I've heard it's difficult for artists to tattoo if you're squirming around. In know I just need to make the plunge but maybe I'll consider a meatier spot for the first time. 
Congrats on that,  I'm happy with my pace and there are a lot of others who support me. It isn't always about being faster than someone else but doing your best and not having to drag others down. 
&gt; we only see a mistake many legislators made.  "a mistake"?  Every legislator makes some mistakes.  My favorite candidates have all made mistakes, and been criticized about it.  But do not minimize this.  It's a horrendous, massive, voluntary fuck-up that caused the deaths of hundreds of thousands of people and destruction, misery, and displacement for at least tens of millions more, for more than a decade at least.  And it's the biggest self-inflicted foreign policy blunder in US history, most likely.  I campaigned hard against John Kerry in the 2003/2004 primaries, and he at least waffled then about whether he'd made a mistake in voting for the war, and admitted it was a mistake shortly afterward.  Clinton, on the other hand, in *2007*, at a campaign event, told people that not only does she not think she made a mistake, she thinks anyone who wants a to support a candidate who says that vote was a mistake should just go look for another candidate.  Not her.  This is not "all of her policies".  This is the big one.  What would be "unfair" would be to overlook this and support her anyway.  To minimize the invasion of Iraq as just another issue among many.  I think all of us have a duty to do our best to ensure that no supporter of that war ever gets the presidency again, and I think that overshadows almost all other issues combined.
A 20-year-old is NOT a child. A 20-year-old is a fully-functioning adult, almost a college graduate for chrissake. I'm tired of people acting like 20 is the new 10. It ain't. Grow up. 
Sounds like the romance is missing from your relationship, which has you guys feeling like roommates. I've found, in my own relationships, that effortless romance is usually temporary. You two seem to have picked up some lazy habits over the course of your BF's recovery, and you'll have to break them. Make a concerted effort to get out for a date regularly and spend time together away from electronics. Spending more time apart might be helpful too, absence really can make the heart grow fonder.
The ad is different because men don't react to personal beauty as much as women. Advertisements for men usually appeal to narcissistic qualities, which isn't a positive trait. Women react more to beauty, so they make advertisements suggesting women can be better or aren't there yet. If people want to change how advertisers present their product, then avoid buying the ones that are distasteful.    We're all targeted by it. I don't know how many commercials target men and women, but if you feel it's disproportionate, [this article](http://www.forbes.com/sites/bridgetbrennan/2013/03/06/the-real-reason-women-shop-more-than-men/) might help. Regardless, when it comes to selling a product, advertisers don't have much choice. It's do or close shop. But consumers still hold all the power. We can debate the morality of it, but that's the bottom line. 
Some men are religious/pro life too, and nobody gives a shit if they have their clumps aborted. I'm not saying men have any right to choose, but if we're going to throw religion out the door, let's do so consistently.  I didn't name the concept, but do you disagree with the idea that if a woman can choose not to be a parent, the man should be able to as well?  I'm sure I sound like an MRA here, and I assure you I'm not. I just find the arguments around this issue absurdly hypocritical.
I've heard a lot of good things about the "You Are Your Own Gym" app. It's three bucks on iTunes or Amazon Play.
My homemade sugar scrub works amazingly well. And it's ridiculously simple to make and it lasts for a few months.  It's just sugar, honey, and olive oil, with lemon juice and zest added. It smells fabulous.
Tattoos have a long history and aren't an "American fascination".  [History of tattooing.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/History_of_tattooing)
[deleted]
To add to this comment, muscle is denser than fat. You could be losing inches and body fat % but theoretically gaining weight. I think it's ultimately, like you said, how the measuring tape holds up and how your clothes hold up, or perhaps, no longer hold up.
[deleted]
Yep, yep, yep. I've gotten the same shit from my in-laws about my pretty, pretty 6 month old son. Fuck them, he's so pretty! His big eyes with those long lashes! Pretty!  People need to get over the damn selves.
I was just going to leave a comment about that.  She looks JUST LIKE Mae Whitman!
It sounds like you've done all you can do. I wouldn't worry about it.
Thanks. I'll try posting there instead. 
[deleted]
This sub has &gt;400k readers. That comment has 19 measly points, and it's written by someone who is not a mod and not writing in this thread.   Maybe this sub does need to be a default, given you're out here believing we all share a hive mind...  Even if it was written by the same person and both had two thousand upvotes, Begrudging is generalising to young people, for the most part. She's also not making any controversial claims, IMO. The other commenter said there is no misogynistic society *anywhere* (read carefully). That's controversial in a way that "young men are immature, not just men, young people are still figuring out adult behaviour and ethics" is not. 
Ugh, too many to pick favorites.
[deleted]
As someone that also started learning about beauty routines from scratch as an adult, I am so proud of you for that! It takes a lot of courage to make an effort with your look. Weight loss is a net positive no matter what, and I still worry that the thing I am trying with my hair is making it worse rather than better. It helps to have honest friends!   You are doing a great job, your hair is too cute!! Well done all around!
The fact that the child exists at all was the mothers decision. She should be responsible for that decision, if she had a child knowing she couldn't support it, that is her fault. Not the fathers fault since he had no choice in  the matter.
Yes, usually. I don't have a problem with it most of the time.
You look like Maggie Gyllenhal...o.O, which is definitely a compliment.
[deleted]
You are asking why the woman would not want money for herself and instead wanted the  monetary advantage for her company?  I think, and this is just an opinion, that seeking or accepting money for herself would have   been coupled with a label of  being a victim. The customer lady was the recipient of unwanted advances but  she has the opposite of a victim mentality.   Taking the money for her company is punishment against  the Huggy Bear guy and Huggy Bear's employer without allowing herself to be   labeled as someone who needs  reparations.  I have known a number of people over the years to whom bad things have happened. Some let themselves be defined by it and some wipe their hands and move on. I think customer  here was  in the latter group.  I'd bet that if you asked her if she recognized teh guys name 2 years later that she might find it vaguely familiar and nothing more.
She was in in no way using a gendered word in a non-gendered way.  She conceded that she was using the gendered word in a gendered way that was inconsistent with the childs gender.  'girls are awesome' in response to criticism of using a gendered word for the wrong gender isn't suggesting that someone is using it in a "non-gendered" way in the slightest.  It's a concession that it is being used in a gendered way, but that the particular gender it's attributed to 'is awesome'.  If what you were suggesting was in anyway accurate, the defense from OP would have been a simple, 'pretty isn't a sexualized or 'girly' term.  That wasn't the defense.  The defense was "why wouldn't i want you want him to be 'girly', we're girls and girls are awesome".  We all know these aren't the same fucking thing, so why exactly are we pretending as though they are.  Look at how much fucking mental gymnastics do you simpletons have to do to pat this person on the back for reinforcing gender roles.  If the roles were reversed, this person would rightfully be a pariah and unless you're a complete moron you're fully aware of that.
Or maybe he hooked up with someone else and doesn't know how to tell you/want that confrontation/feels guilty.  Get yourself to a good spot emotionally and psychologically.  Whenever I hear guys say "girls are stupid" what they are generally saying is "I'm putting my issues on the other gender".  That generally goes for women too.  You have to be able to take rejection without it crushing you.  In my limited experience, if something like this is crushing you that means you're using the fantasy of it as an emotional crutch.
I really enjoyed this article, thank you!
[deleted]
Right? Like it's a surprise or we should be grateful. "Oh thank you, supreme intelligent being. I am not worthy of your compliment but only live to serve and adore you." 
[deleted]
[deleted]
Why must they be men/women? Why not extend them the courtesy of referring to them as the gender they want to be perceived as? It costs you nothing and makes another person happy.   I'm not even going to debate the *mountain* of scientific evidence for why being transgender is valid and not some kind of delusion.
No, I'm not forgetting that at all. I fully accept that Person C (the baby) is owed support and deserves it. It deserves it from it's biological parents, not some random person. At this point it's not better then grabbing one of the mother's friends and randomly making them supporting, or if there is a babysitter, making them responsible for a % of the babies upkeep. 
Keep up the hard work! You are looking amazing, and more importantly feeling amazing :)
[deleted]
Agree, at the very least the terrible bio-dad needs to be financially responsible for the kid. Are you kidding me with this bs? Apparently it is not only ok for women to cheat but the "attractive" men they cheat with have no responsibility to their children because there is a less attractive man to burden with that responsibility? It is no wonder there are Eliot Rodgers out in the world when this what they are faced with. This is slavery plain and simple. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
From the FAQ:  &gt;All are welcome. It's not really about who you are, but about the quality of the discussion you'll generate.
This is going to sound counter productive, but... Some emotions can be ignored and it's not a big deal.  Yes, you've had a terrible experience. But not because you actually did anything *wrong,* you tried your best to make a connection and give someone the benefit of the doubt and they did not have the same ideas as you did. Which was awful of them for lying and so forth, but you can move on with a clear conscience. Feeling awful about other people treating you badly is something that you actually *can* choose to ignore or not to 'deal with,' because those feelings ultimately have little to do with you yourself, they have everything to do with what that person has decided is acceptable behavior.
That is very difficult to fix because fat is very hard to get rid of as it is one of the first things your body maintains, just keep at it, you'll get there.
From what you've described the customers were out of line with their behavior and your boss was out of line for trying to get you to do something you didn't want to do. Your boss should have given you your share of the tips. Talk to your boss about the situation, how the customers made you feel and how your boss made you feel. I would also document everything. If you talk to them in person, send them an email reiterating what was talked about. Get a copy of the receipt, statements from co-workers (notarized) or any other supporting documentation. If the tip situation is not resolved then contact your local chapter of department of labor. You can talk to them and see how they can help you. 
wow, so much over reacting, hipster-esque whining.  It's people like this reporting things like these that get people FIRED in the real world (and I'm not talking only about the boss...you'd be surprised how many times I've seen things like this backfire), when you step out of the fantasy land where you "report" your boss for joking about you baking cookies to make the IT guy your friend.  ffs, it's issues like this and people like you that give ammo to all those people who justly or injustly automatically assume that all complaints, even the valid ones, are just dumb complaining.  Pro tip: How about you go be a decent human being to the IT person and make a friend, sans the cookies/beer/w/e? Shocker, human contact might be a wiser thing to try than reporting your boss.  ffs lol the logic in this thread...  IT guy needs to fix it &gt; he hasn't fixed it yet &gt; ask boss &gt; report boss for joke &gt; ???? &gt; IT problem fixed.  LOL
Janeane Garafalo
[deleted]
....why does this post have 0 upvotes? 
Not only do you look great physically, but your air of confidence is so beautiful! Way to go!
Plan B is crazy effective, just incase you're not sure how it works I will quickly explain. If you haven't yet ovulated Plan B will postpone ovulation so that there is no chance of the sperm running into an egg and becoming fertilised. If however you are ovulating or have ovulated it will cause your body to begin menstruation thus flushing everything out and not allowing an egg to implant into the uterus.   If you have taken Plan B it is really unlikely you will be pregnant, relax.
[deleted]
My last period started on 5/30 and ended on 6/5. The condom broke on 6/10. My periods are pretty regular and ovulation should most likely happen within this time frame. Im not a 100% sure though. 
i kind of had similar experiences but it was more the pressure of having to do well and be smart that gave me a hard time.  I grew up in a family of phd educated scientists and I am the only one in my family to be a working professional (failed out of my original bachelor's degree but made it through to another professional bachelor's degree).   I agree emphasizing kids' skills isnt the final word...but I think people need to realize that kids need to be given feedback on things they do well and things they do not do well. When they do something well that is skill or intelligence related they need to be praised but if you only focus on how the child looks you are not being helpful to their development if you haven't given any feedback on their intelligence or how they act and behave.  There is also such thing as over-inflating a child's ego (saying that they did a great job just for the sake of praising a child).  It isn't easy for me to say this but constructive criticism is indeed important.  I received plenty of criticism in my lifetime from my parents and whether or not it was constructive is to be debated but I did end up learning that doing things well is important. I am sorry you had such terrible experiences but i think these kind of experiences often make us stronger and give us better perspective on life.  
Please translate for non-Australians :)
&gt; Passive-aggressive female jealousy in action.  That's assuming that most voters at twox right now are women and at the same time perpetuating the "women are jealous creatures who hate to see other women succeed!" stereotype. Good for you. 
Me neither... and anyway, are gender-segregated places that common in the West? (besides single-gender schools or colleges)? Haven't heard of one, in my country at least.
you look fantastic! Congratulations, so inspirational :-)
[deleted]
You said you still have a ways to go in your last picture.  Do you have an end "goal" in mind? If so, would you care to share?
[deleted]
I don't know what the total cost was, just that it was very expensive, they had to go to another state to have it taken care of at that late stage, and that they had to sell a lot of their things to pay for it. They're a younger couple who were neighbors at one time.  The equivalent of what it cost was likely around 1,400 though, given what money was worth back then compared to now. Then again, having to go out of state, and the procedure being different from what you would normally get done because it was so late...that was likely the cause of the extra cost.  
If he continues after I talk to him I guess I will have to, but I don't want him to die with his last memories dealing with the police. It may not sound like it in the post but he genuinely is (or seems to be) a nice guy. Always offering to help, offers lifts and stuff, though typing that I've just realised that probably not a good idea...
One person's experience is just that, one person's experience. The way we live our lives and the way that that we feel about the lives that we're living is as unique as we are. What brings you happiness and fulfillment will not necessarily bring another person happiness. Just live your life the way that you want, pursue your dreams and goals, be your true and authentic self.
keep it going!! great progress!
Sorry for the delayed reply -- I just spent the last day traveling to Japan for a conference.  Retention is a problem for sure for women in engineering.  In my experience it seemed first few years of undergrad is when you'd see women dropping out the most.  I was almost one of them -- I ended up transferring to a smaller school and was way happier.  To be honest, lots of guys dropped out too.     I hate the way engineering is taught in university.  It's a gauntlet of equation cranking, most of it you never actually use as an engineer in the real world.  There's that whole "weed out class" mentality of designing a course to be so hard it effectively thins the herd and only the ones who can study and get good grades end up advancing.  It sucks, I think it alienates a lot of smart creative people who might make better engineers in the long run.  I think what helped me survive coursework was learning to be 'one of the guys' and forming study groups with other engineering students, and sacrificing a social life to study my ass off.  If, on the other hand, you don't have that social network, are struggling grades wise, and feel constantly reminded you're an outsider, I could easily see reaching the conclusion that it's just not worth it.    So you bring up a great point.  Grades should NOT be all that matters.  Engineering curriculum should be way more hands on.  It's the hands on stuff that makes it fun.  Communication skills, teamwork skills, creative thinking, all of these are so important too.  
[deleted]
If you haven't seen the episode he did of the X Files, you should get on that.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Jose_Chung's_From_Outer_Space  It's my favorite ever episode
[deleted]
Even when you were overweight, you still looked fantastic. You have a lovely, kind face and look like an amazing person. Keep up the great work and be proud. Motivation and perseverance are rare qualities and luckily you possess them.
No, i believe misogyny (and misandry for that matter) exists in western culture, but it's not a culture of misogyny or very prevalent. "Lacking balls" is not sexist, simply means get some spine/confidence, how is that sexism?
Try not to be like this for your whole life.    Apart from anything else, it's boring. I came straight here looking to see if somebody had said this. I am not surprised or entertained by it at all.
She's probably got so much going on in her head. The best thing you can do right now is be there. She's probably nervous that her marriage will be like her parent's. You've not done anything wrong, but it's not uncommon for our parents to taint how we view our own relationships. Being present, kind, and reminding her that she's beautiful, wanted, and that you're committed to only her will be helpful. Be ultra sensitive that your actions might be construed as "straying" behavior and that she's going to read in to certain things because of the situation. I'm sure she feels vulnerable and betrayed...and unfortunately it's transferred to your relationship. She's building a wall to protect herself, you don't want to get shut out. 
Lookin' Cute!
That shit is rough. Congratulations!
Ugh. The idea that we have to restrain ourselves so her man's eyes don't wander is ridiculous.   Dare I say it, but if she put on a low cut top and short skirt in their bedroom I suspect it would be on like donkey kong.   Doesn't she realize that we are making ourselves feel good with our warddrobes? Just ugh.  Incoherent rant over.
He was not hugging her he was basically putting her into a restraining hold from behind so he could feel her up and given that she has probably been abused before which led her to teach a womens self defense course she reacted appropriately by breaking the hold as best she could. All she did was headbutt backwards and send her elbow back to get free that seems perfectly reasonable.
Just a man's opinion, but I think when women dress to make themselves feel good then it also makes them look good. Not necessarily the skimpiest stuff, but the whole package. I certainly appreciate some skin, but not all men can control themselves. Counterintuitively, if men could behave themselves around women a little better, that would free women to dress more liberally, and I think we all would appreciate that.  Many people appreciate modesty, and I respect that. You can make a great argument for modest dress being a great equalizer for women.  Not an incoherent rant at all. If we don't talk about this stuff, we'll never make any progress.
Nothing's black and white. Only shades of grey. I'm not perfect but I believe in the rights of everyone. Men and women alike. I don't believe women should sever as front line troops. But I believe they can play an important roll else where, such at intel.  Edit: clarification: if they want to server as a front line soldier they need to have something that stops their cycle for the duration of a deployment. It's not that they can't, it's that the nature cycle presents problems and endangers them when it come to 3-4 day long battles where you can't change things out and could fall to shock from being unable to.
He's definitely an asshole.  I don't know 100% if he's abusive (there are definitely some red flags IMO but I'm not an expert, he may just be dumb and inexperienced), but he's DEFINITELY an asshole.  And honestly I think that's enough reason to break up as it is.  If he seriously doesn't want to talk things out and won't try to make anything better, I think you've done as much as anyone could reasonably do.  And if you are working far away from him that seems like a good opportunity to end things and be far away to let things cool off.  Whatever you decide to do, good luck.
He's indirectly asked me to stop hanging out with BGF. He said, "Think of what I would want you to say next time he asks you to hang out." To which the answer would be no.  If we had been dating for a longer period of time or engaged or something, I could understand this better but we just graduated high school. It seems a little excessive.
And if that was the case it would have been different! But my lights were working and nothing was on my roof. But I'm sure you don't get someone's attention by making kissing faces and lewd hand gesters! 
[deleted]
[deleted]
&gt;Because men's sports are more popular, they continue to get more funding, and thus continue to be more popular.  I'm going to disagree here. Men are more capable of high levels of physical activity. Any sport where M+F athletes compete at the same level, the male sport is usually much more popular for a variety of reasons. This isn't some self-feeding cycle of male shotputters, sprinters, golfers, hockey players, lacrosse players, etc etc etc being more popular because they get more funding.   Funding female sports is important because everyone deserves to play. Yet, saying they're more popular *because* they get more funding is misdirection. 
I've found that this is just how some guys seem to interact. They perceive talking over each other and battling for the "mic" as normal. It's an exhausting pissing contest, but somehow they don't see it that way. I had always asked my boyfriend where he got his tendency to be the loudest in a conversation, until I met his friends. They will literally all talk over each other, and the first time I witness it I just sat there staring, trying to figure out how anybody actually gets a point across. I chimed in at one point, and the conversation just died, because I was  speaking as a singular person trying to remark about something, not participating in the cacophony of vomited syllables.
How so? OP was talking about her SO looking for other booty on Craigslist.. I posted a quick story about how men are looking for sex and women are prostituting.   How is this unrelated? 
[deleted]
I dont see how making conversation and cracking jokes is flirting. Flirting usually means letting the other person.Know you find them attractive 
I make racist and sexist jokes, based on all races and both sexes. I also have given a lot of money to egalitarian charities. A joke is a joke. However, if I was making a sexist or racist statement, then you could call me sexist/racist. Don't tell me my analogy was wrong and fail to explain why.
This makes me sad. Tbh I feel like bodily autonomy is an integral part of feminism and since anti-choice rhetoric is so often associated with sexist beliefs I have trouble understanding someone being feminist but pro-life. Wanting our society to improve to where abortion isn't necessary so *often*, I understand, but pro-life in the meantime? I don't understand that.
[deleted]
I am a male, and some of this seems extreme, while some not. Let me start with the not. First, being jealous of BGF is something very normal, and your bf is still very young. Even him saying he would want to fight him is normal ( he is just trying to seem alpha to you). What's not normal in a healthy relationship is all the fighting.  My gf and I have had our fair share of arguments. But we don't argue much more then we do.  For him to say he would rather fight it out then talk it out, spells trouble as that is a sign of a serious anger issue. He sounds like he isn't ready for a relationship. Give him 5 years and see what he is like. Or just move on.  Either way you need to let him know this is not working. People who hold you back and build you up are quite frankly people that you don't need in your life. Goodluck.
All I have to do it put on nice, pretty underwear. Or make plans to do something fun.
Really?? he is supposed to fully understand AND accept both your immature feelings and actions...but isn't allowed the same courtesy? Snooping is a double-edged sword...and never, the right thing to do. To this point, only ONE of you has done anything wrong!
&gt; It's pretty generic stuff for teenagers.  No, they aren't.  None of those should be generic stuff in a relationship regardless of age. 
Really not enough evidence to base action on that, in my world.  
Why the fuck were you snooping through somebodys phone? I understand it sucks finding these things out. But the part where you disrespected another individual by violating his privacy is a little off setting at the least.
My default is to assume that they're just being nice, thankfully. I mean, I see the signs when it's not so, but... I dunno.  He mentioned that people in our area never just stop to talk to someone, and he thinks that's a little sad. I agreed.
You are not overreacting, this is not a good relationship, it seems abusive to me and based on your comments he talks about physical violence a lot.  The good news is that you are 70 miles away and it is the summer, the perfect time to reassess what you want from a relationship and your future. I would not break up in person, as he may become violent or talk you into "another chance".  I don't see a need to go into the explanation that the relationship is abusive.  Breaking up over the phone or email may seem impersonal but it is safer.  Keep the conversation or text short, something like...  "Being away has given me time to consider our relationship and it is best that we don't continue to see another".  Then stay at the camp on your days off, enjoy the time with new friends and your camera.  
Not every guy is as desperate and bitter as you, bro.
[deleted]
[deleted]
You and I are on the same exact flares-skinnies belief timeline. /fistbump
Oh god, anything messing with the ears is such a pain in the ass. Zit in the ear? UGH. Sunburn? DOUBLE UGH.  In college I got a cartilage piercing in the ear I sleep on because I had a brain fart and forgot about the fact that I sleep on that side. Pain.For.Weeks.  We look like such freaks at the beach. Everyone around is is in strings and tiny triangles of fabric, my family is covered from our heads (sun hats) to our knees *and* we wear swim socks. So essentially our shins get some sun but I slather us down so much we end a seven day family cruise just as pale as we began. My older sister and her husband were damn near purple on day two. My little family unit? Like ghosts even on the last day.
Honest question, I really hope this doesn't come across sounding judgmental… Was it worth it? If you could go back and change things, would you have done it differently? 
Hey girl,  just letting you know it gets better. I've had hsv2 for almost four years and I have never been rejected because of it. In fact,  the last two guys I dated (both older than 25) had it themselves.   Also,  I would avoid getting involved romantically with this particular group of guys from your school because they seem very immature. 
OK I mean if words are not definitive then how can we even communicate an idea to another person? Like what if I called my son "Shit-for-brains" and someone else heard it, but in reality I'm using that term to mean he's intelligent. I wouldn't say there's truely an objective meaning for every word but for a word such as pretty the meaning is pretty universal.   For calling a boy delicate that really should never be a way to raise a son. As I said before that's forcing female characteristics on a male offspring which will harm him as he grows up.
Thank you for your honest answer!
Theirs? No mostly, some of the guys were a bit more friendly but as a whole they were equally snotty  Mine? Well turning 40 has been a weird time, because I've kinda struggled with the 'not having kids' thing. I've focused on my work, and I've always known if I had a child I couldn't live the same way or take the risks I do. I would have to sacrifice what I want in life to give my child what they need, and that's probably something I'd have to do alone (I'm not good at LTRs). I don't want that for myself, and now at this age while I technically can have kids I'm realizing it's *really not going to happen*. I'm ok with that most of the time but occasionally the thought makes me a little sad.   I'm not around kids much except off my friends and family's kids, most of which are very young. I practically never am around preteens or teenagers, and while I remember being one this experience has emphasized I can't relate to them generally (and I'm a pretty cool person). So maybe it's ok, maybe I made the right choice for me.   I've run into women who have told me to get knocked up and have a kid so I'd be "whole". That has always sounded really irresponsible to me, for both myself and any babies that I'd haphazardly have. My family has always assumed if have kids, even now my brother gets on my case about getting wifed and starting a family.  I'm just musing… I know some women really feel called to motherhood and I never really did (except a twinge of two), and I think that's ok. I don't think I'm less of a lady because I don't have kids.  It's just weird sometimes when life kinda tells you in it's own way that going against the norm was the right thing for you to do (or that's how I'm seeing it). 
If they want to inquire about something, they should ask their own husbands at home; for it is disgraceful for a woman to speak in the church.  Ephesians 5:22 Wives, submit yourselves to your own husbands as you do to the Lord.  1 Timothy 2:11 A woman should learn in quietness and full submission.  1 Timothy 2:12 I do not permit a woman to teach or to assume authority over a man; she must be quiet.  No offense, but all of this is in your Bible. So it seems odd that you find it odd that this woman apparently follows the teachings of the religion that you profess to share. 
[deleted]
"My only question is, should I tell him that I am concerned it's an abusive relationship? That seems like a horrible thing to say to someone..."  Don't use the word "concerned." Say as little as possible and make your point. "I don't think we should see each other anymore." If he asks for a reason, say, "because I don't want to be with you." If you say, "I'm concerned this is an abusive relationship," he will try to convince you it isn't and might succeed. By using "I" statements, you leave less room for argument. "I don't like how I feel when I'm with you," etc.   Good luck, get out ASAP. Do it over the phone if you're afraid, and then do not, do not, do NOT give in and "meet him to talk." Do not go see him to make him feel better. Breakups suck for everyone, he'll get over it. 
[deleted]
It's not a justification for their behavior, it's just a fact of existence that if a man is raping a woman then the man is not in control of himself. That's wrong and should be addressed.
[deleted]
Only a SoccerMomXena would have this much self-respect and respect for her girls. Kick it, Xena!
Oh man. This is the touchiest subject ever for me. I was raised in a seriously cultish religion that strongly taught it was the woman's duty to be modest and not tempt the men of the church. As soon as my brain started developing I eschewed all of these ideas, but not all of my relatives from that sect have. Just a few days ago, my cousin had shared a photo that was VERY pro-feminist, anti-rape, empowerment type stuff, and I was shocked.. until I read her comment for it, which was, "This is ridiculous. It IS a lady's duty to cover up. I wish they would put some clothes on and stop tempting my husband." She's raising two young daughters in super-strict gender roles, and with these ideas. *rage*
No worries, and don't worry about what other people think when you leave. You don't have to make a scene or tell them why, just go. If they do ask, or get rude about you leaving, remember you have a right to how you feel and you snubbing them because you don't feel comfortable does not make you a bitch. You don't have to make people happy by sacrificing your own comfort or safety. Beware of [gaslighting](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Gaslighting), you aren't being rude to someone if you walk away from a situation that makes you uncomfortable no matter what they say.   My only other thought is perhaps you should look into a self defense class to help you feel more empowered… or anything women supported that helps you feel more empowered. That may help too. Good luck. 
I would agree in the cases of real severe mental health cases or your example of a brain tumour. I don't think those are the majority of rape cases though.
[deleted]
Well then sure, not murder.  But that's just not the case.
[deleted]
Adoption must be consented to by both parents.
This is simple to answer. Unless it starts with "I want" or "My therapist and I think", the answer is probably no.
until you found your own country what YOU believe does not magically become law, so you don't give or take rights to anyone. She has the right to be mad if she wants. 
I am an undergrad in college and I tried dating sites because I don't get out much. I met my current boyfriend on Datemyschoool. In some areas there are more people than others so you might want to try this one. I also used Tinder but I think it is becoming more of a hook up sight rather than a dating site but you can give it a try. 
It is so compared by people who have suffered both. I'm not just making this up, I went through this experience myself and spent the better part of 2 years in support groups and therapy for it. I also spoke with people who said it was harder to get through than their miscarriage. It is just awful, in a way that is impossible to imagine for those who haven't been there.   Part of it is that it often isn't a single tragic, scarring event. It is a repeated act that happens over and over again over a period time, with intention and foresight. Lots of people continue their affairs even after discovery... the betrayed partner gets to have their pain renewed daily over the course of weeks or months.   There's no absolute way to measure emotional pain on this scale. But I can tell you that in personal experience I have known people who have compared the pain of marital infidelity to the pain of losing their own child. So I don't mind going there.
Try to find a church that is more open minded. I know a friend who goes to a very progressive church. The one I was raised in was terrible and fit many of the negative Catholic stereotypes. It all depends on the individual community within your church.
I'm a very religious person, and what you describe is the exact reason why I hate these articles. They imply, if not state explicitly, that guys who like the way you look are pigs who don't love you. Last time I checked, those feelings are really important to building a strong bond with your spouse. My husband is a great person, and religious like me, and he finds me very attractive and sexy. That doesn't make him gross. 
A business letter.
But this is exactly the issue. First, it's incredibly rare for an ultrasound to happen during labor. In fact I've never heard of it. Second, cords wrapping around babies happens all the time. It's incredibly common for babies to be born all tied up in their cords, and even during a vaginal delivery, the cords can be moved or snipped in time to prevent any real damage.   C-sections are not a guarantee, and it is absurd to think that we would force women to undergo SERIOUS, and I mean SERIOUS, abdominal surgery without their consent. 
Politics are a lot like reddit. When you express an idea, there is always a chance that someone will take a firm, entrenched dug-in "FUCK THIS IDEA IN PARTICULAR!" stance for no apparent reason at all.  Without giving too much away, I was heavily involved with Howard Dean's campaign. We worked on the online infrastructure behind the campaign to push the message. I doubt it was anything close to what Obama would eventually use, but Howard Dean's 50 states strategy wouldn't be enough to save him. It would go on to carry others into the White House though.  The key here is why. I won't go too far back in political history as it I don't need to. We're only discussing 2000 onwards.  In the 2000 election, the vote vacuum obtained just enough votes from those unhappy with Al Gore to make sure George W. Bush won. Sure, we can be unhappy with our Al Gore, why vote for him? With that in mind, we got the Bush administration. I don't lay that the feet of any one source, but from a high level it was simply apathy, dissatisfaction with the candidate, and "I'd rather have somebody else." syndrome.  In 2004, Howard Dean lost his chance with the Dean Yell. John Kerry was not prepared for the lack of enthusiasm for him from the very blue, the vicious attacks from the right, and the way his support came to him. "I'm not Bush" just isn't enough to win against all that.  So, I've learned. I learned that it is better to have an Al Gore than a George W. Bush. I learned that no matter how enthusiastic you might be or how hard you might work, the candidate is a product for sale. You're only one Dean Yell away from falling flat on your face. Finally, I learned how important it is to not focus on one issue.  In 2004, John Kerry was swift boated despite documentation against the idea. The message just escaped his control and took on a life of its own. Hillary Clinton's vote would haunt her. She had to own it or be owned by it. Its no excuse for what she said, but I like focusing on the action being taken on the ground by the current administration than fighting about a decision made the better part of a decade ago that only authorized the action.  Finally, it isn't that I don't care about the Iraq war. There are many challenges facing us from the VA to future military spending that need to be addressed. I am just sick and tired of the Iraq war dictating policy when we have so much else we have to worry about. If we just take 50% of the "IRAQ WAR!!!" talk and commit that to higher education, we'll tackle a 1.2+ trillion dollar problem impacting generations of people.  TL;DR The problems we have are too important to try to unseat our Cantor over the Iraq War. The positive she could do far, far outweighs the negatives. Even with that said, you, and people like you, will do everything you can to stop her for that one reason. The rest of it be damned.
Good enough for me. Sorry if you felt personally attacked or if you felt I was rude, you're clearly trying very hard to not be any of those things, which I respect, and I'm sure you're a lovely person. 
Baby Shower Sushi plate!  I made this for a friend for her shower and it was a huge success!  A lot of the things I got for the plate came from the dollar store or clearance section at Walmart and Target!  http://creative1dollar.blogspot.com/2011/08/sushi-baby-shower-gift.html?m=1
Because it does. You can ignore social conventions for being silly all you want, but that doesn't make them stop existing. 
Good for you and your husband for being so kind :-)
except she says "tickets" TICKETS, as in SHE paid for HIS prom as well. As well, if women arent entitled to money than neither are men (i agree with this statement 100% mind you) But that means HE should have paid for his meal, she shouldnt have had to drop a single penny on it, only hers.   On top of that people have a right to visit who ever they please, sorry, im not going to visit only my boyfriend just because he wants me to visit him more. your basically saying with that she needs to ignore and neglect her friends or him, when all he does is make her feel like shit.   And i dont see how any of this is complaining about stupid stuff. if he is trying to manipluate her so that she doesnt see her best friend anymore then thats not  a "stupid" thing to complain about. complaining about him threatening to assualt people isnt "stupid". Complaining about his [gunnysacking](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Gunnysacking) (linked to a definition incase people dont know it) isnt stupid either Thats a big sign of abuse actually. He even specifically states he LIKES having control over her, and is obviously trying to manipulate her so that he has more control over her. He IS blatantly trying to control her and who she talks to. Those are EXTREMELY abusive actions. 
I was out to lunch with her when he mom told her she was toxic, and the whole way home she cried about how everyone is out to get her, and it's not fair because she always goes out of her way for everyone.   Bit my tongue so hard it was almost bleeding. I feel bad for her, but I can't deal with it anymore. 
hahahaha we've all been there!
[here is an article](http://www.nytimes.com/1990/12/08/opinion/the-fruit-of-angela-carder-s-agony.html) about Angela Carder.   &gt;But the hospital, saying that it feared potential legal liability if it made no effort to save the fetus, sought a judicial ruling.  this was the same reason that the Texas hospital chose to keep a brain dead lady, [Marlise Munoz](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Death_of_Marlise_Mu%C3%B1oz), on life support. She was pregnant. But she had been declared dead. Experts assume she went without oxygen for +-7 minutes. So there was reason to believe that there was serious harm to the fetus. Still, the hospital didn't want any legal actions taken against them for not trying to force the brain dead women to carry the fetus to full term. Her husband had to fight really hard to get them to finally pull the plug.  You are naive to think that they are acting in the best care of the fetus. Its usually whatever is in the best care of the doctors and hospital.  edited to add sauce.
[deleted]
The bad thing about consolidation is that the majority of the time the interest gets capitalized. So all of that interest that your loan has accrued is now part of your principle that is now accruing more interest. 
I've never really done this on my own, but my mum always gets things the parents will need too, like hand cream because you're constantly washing hands to clean up after baby. Or chocolates for parents to enjoy.   And in the card, she'll put vouchers for Superdrug or Boots to help buy nappies/ointments and stuff. Or for a massage/pedicure for the mother and let them feel beautiful again.  If you're a crafty person you could try and put together a baby blanket or hat. Patterns abound on pinterest.
Okay. That is sick.
I disagree, specially if she's in Judo.
A lot of it depends on the way you look at the situation. The truth is, H is not a serious health issue in any sense other than that it's more or less everywhere. It has no long-term consequences for your health unless you're already in poor health. It won't prevent you from having a family or giving birth naturally. It doesn't stop you from having a fulfilling sex life.  If you present a potential partner with the facts and allow him time to examine it for himself you may be pleasantly surprised. The key to relationships for you now is actually building an emotional bond before a physical one. Any guy that wants to be with you will respect your wishes and take the time to really get to know you and get comfortable with you. There are tens of millions of people in the U.S. and around the world in happy, healthy, discordant relationships in which one partner has it and the other doesn't. You can go an entire lifetime fluid bonded with a partner and never give him the virus. It happens frequently.  Also, there are several promising vaccines in clinical testing right now, and several more in preclinical, so there is always the potential for that. I've spoken to several of the top research scientists working on these vaccines and the consensus is that there will be an effective vaccine in the next 3-7 years and an actual cure in approx. 10 years, but don't wait that long to live. Get out and try to get back to normal activities as soon as you can. It's important to live every other part of your life as if nothing changed (because nothing has) until you feel comfortable dating and meeting men.  I don't know what your proclivities are in terms of what kind of guys you like, but if you don't find a guy wherever you are who sees you for you, I would recommend going to South America or Scandinavia. This is something that is really only viewed with contempt and scorn in the U.S., and even then that's generally among the uneducated segment of the population.  Keep your chin up, kiddo. You'll be okay.
Yeah men aren't primal animals. What a misinformed and insulting comment.
Same here.
If you are larger, skinny jeans and a long top are surprisingly flattering! (Not saying you are larger, just tends to be the humans that say they're doing everyone else a favour by not wearing things)  Girl you are damn fine and you wear whatever you will. Fuck the publisher delicate sensibilities.  
[deleted]
I would NOT expect a man to handle a stranger accosting him a foreign language, and then being assaulted on his own.  We're all fucking human, treat each other with respect, and help others because you *can* not because you have to, and because you are *also* a human being.  Sheesh.
Google, Microsoft, and Apple all completely disagree with you.   I doubt anyone disrespected Steve Jobs or thought he wasn't "serious" about his job just because he wore jeans and t-shirts and running shoes every day.  Each workplace dictates their own dress standards. "Serious clothes" is a completely meaningless term in this context.
[deleted]
Sorry to hear that - hope you are feeling a bit better? Parisians are usually completely indifferent to whatever is happening around them, and in stressful situations like a train strike (not that they don't happen often, mind you), they get properly obnoxious. I'm not at all surprised that nobody stepped in to help, unfortunately. The fact that you are not French probably didn't play into the whole situation, I was once pushed almost right in front of a train and nobody blinked.  You can try to report the incident to the police (I honestly doubt this will get to anything), but you can also try to complain directly to the RATP or SNCF (the local Paris trains or the national train company, depending where the incident happened) - they have a complaint system and the station has a CCTV system. They are the ones supposed to provide a safe environment, and if there were employees there, they are the ones that should have helped. I'd also say your complaint has a much better chance of being read. (If you need help, I'm French). Everyone hates the Parisians.
Because your comment was so ridiculous that it couldn't be dealt with with logic. I thought you were being sarcastic as well until I read your equally ridiculous follow up comment.
Oh you just put this &gt; at the beginning of the line  &gt;like so  I hadn't even noticed all those problems but thank you. Only further proves my point. This isn't a discussion. It's people wanting to tell someone they're wrong just for the sake of being right
Can I suggest a slight diet change, washing cotton undies on hot water settings, and using a gentle soap to cleanse your vulva.  Seriously, it is necessary to wash yourself down there, and I mean *with* soap.  Otherwise you're going to increase the spread of germs from your rectum to your vagina and urethra (I'm talking about infections).  In terms of diet, sugar increases the level of candida (yeast) in the body, especially the digestive tract, and will affect the vagina.  Lay off all processed sugars big time; fruits, honey and naturally sweet things are fine.  Despite your doctor telling you there's no sign of infection, there is *always* yeast in the body.  You might try a simple vinegar water douche - plenty of recipes online.  Some women use plain yogurt topically applied to their vulvas to help deal with infections - good bacteria fights bad bacteria.  Try taking better notice of your diet around the time the smell gets worse.  Are you eating things that you don't normally?  More sweets?    And typically, cotton underwear is the best type to wear.  Synthetic fabrics hold smells, and bacteria more than natural fabrics.  Plus cotton can be washed on hot settings with strong detergents, which is what you want to be doing with your underwear.  Also, underwear lifespan is around 6mos. Maybe buy new?  Just some suggestions.  Hope it gets better for you.
This is true. But that punnet would have taken all of 5 mins.  I just remember going to a strawberry farm with my mum and grandma once, and we picked 2 buckets full. Strawberry topping on every cake for the next month!
[deleted]
Then don't. She's making her bed, she can lie in it. 
aww your not dumb, your very sweet
&gt;So is 6. But at some point that stops being true. It's better to err on the side of more time, all else being equal.  But all else is not equal. Birth happens at 9 months. A little before that is a lot different from a little after that. If 6-8 months is enough time, then we don't need to give the extra time and endanger the baby.  &gt;Yes, that's true. But this decision has little reason to carry the weight of murder.  If she holds some responsibility for her decisions, and she was informed that choosing vaginal birth would likely kill the baby but did it anyways, then she knew what she was doing and thought about it beforehand. Those are the legal requirements for murder.  &gt;...if a computer were better at evaluating the aggregate of human morality, then it would be more valuable than any individual human for sure. It would be very good at finding compromises and optimizing human social and individual goals.  hhmmm this just rubs me the wrong way. I'm thinking that once a machine reaches a point where it has more value than a human, it must necessarily have all the qualifications to be called artificial life (which is basically life, just man-made).
Sounds like language barrier and culture.  I'm pretty sure that guy wasn't trying to be an asshole.
It concerns me you run when it is dark, how safe is this ???
You're right! I misread what you said. Sorry! I'm a little buzzed.  I'm still of the opinion that the mother should never have to take on more risk to her life than she feels comfortable taking on, even if she is pregnant. Once the baby is born, unless she puts the baby up for adoption, she is legally required to take care of him/her. Before that point in time she should be able to maintain her autonomy.
As someone else who works in a ***N***atural ***S***cience environment, please don't use our mutual field as a humble-brag excuse for your own personal failings.  If you want another "database entry", you should be aware that coming into a discussion with the intention of forcing everyone else to adhere to your own preferred style of engagement (I'm just trying to learn, gosh, why is everyone so hostile!?) is extremely self centered and annoying.  If you actually want to improve yourself, you should try working these types of problems out on your own rather than framing the discussion as an adversarial debate while simultaneously forcing everyone else to spoon feed the relevant context and social cues.
Well if you are really wanting to wait to have children, have you thought of adoption? theres always going to be a baby that needs a family, while i understand why you want to have your own child, its still an option if you truely want to wait to have children.   Personally i never want kids, but i would rather regret no having a child of my own then regretting having them way before i was ready to. So it really depends on your feelings and on iff things like surrogacy and adoption are available.
Funny you say that. In most accepted value systems we endeavor to protect the lives of humans, particularly those who cannot fend for themselves. Clearly any good (respecting a woman's autonomy to make a dumb decision) must be weighed against the outcome. If you take your convoluted and jargon-filled response to its logical conclusion, parents should be able to kill an infant that they find burdensome. Under any acceptable moral system this is morally repugnant. Regardless, any newborn child must have more value than a pseudo-intellectual arrogant sociopath. 
abuse interrupted is pretty great. 
it boggles my mind how guys think cat calling from a car is attractive (or cat calling in general). Many of my female friends have reported the same thing and no matter how I try I cannot wrap my brain around it. Where is this behavior learned from?   I think the girl that tried to hug you was probably drunk and or high (not to excuse what she did) but you get hazy with personal space sometimes :P their whole argument sounds redonkulous....sorry you had to go through that.  does the restaurant you went to not do deliveries at all or just not to you O_O 
I think you're right on that one, but I think that goes for a lot of people when it comes to their own country. I'm from the Netherlands, cold wet grey Netherlands, yuck. You can't even imagine how truly happy I was being somewhere where palm trees are normal everyday things. Such a simple joy. And the night sky! Holy shit. I think I've seen more stars in my year there than I have in the rest of my life here. Stupid bloody light pollution. 
Not looking at /r/all, just my general feed. I unsubscribed to this shortly after it became a default sub. I've no idea why I still get posts from this sub all the time.
If you can't talk to your parents about your depression then talk to a counselor at school or ask your parents to take you to the doctor so that you can get some help.   You can't deal with your depression alone.   
I apologize if I seem like the kind of person that would go off on you for being polite, but I assure you that I am not. The negative reaction has been explained over and over again here, so I'll not waste my time retyping everything, but if you don't see why someone would find being wolf whistled at at 4:30 in the morning while they're out running by themselves at least a little creepy, then perhaps you should rethink how you interact with the world.
I'm not obfuscating, I'm just not in the mood to write on the exact details of the subject. I came into my study of ethics with tools from a wide array of uncommon disciplines. It's really a start-from-scratch subject to teach.  &gt;How do we determine that a baby has met the "human moral requirement for demonstrable value" to be allowed to live or be killed?  First, which baby? I can't tell you how to make decisions for specific babies, since that requires specific information about the circumstances. I can only talk about *generic babies* (just as the law can only do.)  Here's the first thing I would suggest to do: ask the mother. She knows more about her baby than you do. Consider her opinion very carefully.   Don't ask me. Don't ask a lawyer.
Too complicated in comparison to chucking a tampon or pad in the trash.
How did W and her husband respond when P and the other women disagreed with her? Iunno about you, but I do get a vibe that maybe W's marriage isn't the healthiest if she's parroting beliefs like this. Her husband sounds like he might be very controlling-he can talk politics with a group of women, but she's too emotional to do so? 
Wow. O.O Isn't it uncomfortable though?
Does your boyfriend date other girls too?
you can lose 10 lbs
Dude before you enter someone's house, you ask for permission first. Even if your visit was planned. You don't just get into their house while they're sleeping and grab a beer and sit next to them. That's creepy and disrespectful. He could have just phoned her prior.
If you're in a relationship with someone, you already follow a different code of social rules with them. It's okay to kiss your girlfriend without directly asking permission, because within the context of (most) relationships it's already established that this is okay behavior. It isn't acceptable to walk up to a random person on the street and stick your tongue in their mouth. See the difference?
I totally agree. Why can't I go barking at other people and sniffing everyone's butt like dogs do? This is speciesist!!! Discrimination against humans! We want the same rights as dogs!
Eeek!  I'm sorry to hear about your stalker experience :(  That sucks so bad.    Thank you for the suggestion, though.  I'll have to see what I can do to make that work, acknowledge, but move on.  Acknowledge, but move on.  Conceal, don't feel.  LOL, thank you!  :D
[Woah....](http://gifs-to-wear-pants-to.tumblr.com/post/56231453420)
I sat in my bedroom and watched two of those little bastards absolutely shred the fly screen. For no other reason then it appeared to be fun!
I just retired from a career in IT.  I've been married for 34 years and have two adult children.  I tried very hard to balance work/life. Many, many employers claim they offer work/life balance, but most don't really.  I worked long hours, was on call 24/7, traveled for work, etc.  My husband was an artist and when we decided to have children, we knew I would continue working and he would take care of the kids.  I worked until 2 weeks before I delivered and I went back to work 6 weeks after each of my children were born.  My kids are 2 years apart and when they reached school age, my paycheck stopped being enough and my husband found a new, better paying career.  We were lucky to have a really wonderful daycare near our kids school that would actually pick our kids up from school and take them to the daycare facility.  We were also lucky that my husband found a job 10 minutes from our home because my commute was 45 minutes to an hour on good days.  Looking back, I know I gave up a lot for my career, but since I made a lot more money than my husband, it seemed like the logical choice at the time.  On the plus side, I enjoyed my work and I did my best to arrange my home life so that my kids came first.  I didn't miss school functions, we took great, family-oriented vacations and the time I had at home was mostly spent with my husband and kids.  The house wasn't as clean as it could have been.  I didn't have "hobbies".  I often didn't have any personal time at all if you don't count the train ride into work.  If I could do it over again, I would probably try for a job where I earned a little less money and had a little more time for myself and my family.  I would have tried to stay home longer after my kids were born.  I would have put less importance on furthering my career and more importance on furthering my life.  That being said, my kids turned out great.  They are in their mid 20s now and we are good friends as well as close family.  I'm proud of both of them and we enjoy spending as much time as possible with them.  We've taught both of them that it's not important what your job is, but it is very important that you live the lifestyle you want.  Are vacations to Europe and a big house important enough that you are willing to work 80 hours a week to afford them?  Or would you rather go camping, live in a modest house and have time?  I think many of us put importance on status, money and even what you'd call "security" to the extent that we forget to have a LIFE.  While I would do things a little differently if I had a "do over", I'm not filled with regret.  Both my husband and I did what we felt was right at the time.
Not sure if this applies here, but I used to date a girl who had uterus cancer. That said despite growing up with 2 older sisters I'm in no way an expert in any of this. All I can say is this - She had very strong menstrual pain. Painkillers did nothing for her. Two things that did kind of work. Workout. She went to a gym or did a light one wherever and sex, apparently. 
[deleted]
There's no rules to this.  Everyone's going to react differently because everyone is encountering you from a different life experience.  I once was walking down the street when a couple older gentlemen stopped me to tell me how beautiful I am, and that was it and I was able to just continue on.  It was a pleasant experience.  However, the number of times I've had extremely lewd or aggressive things yelled at me (or people pulling up next to me in their car or following me) out numbers those kind of experiences.  There's a difference between the casual compliment and something more aggressive, when I'm given a feeling of someone looking at me like prey.  
Hahahh who the fuck talks like that? In regards to the bottom half. Even if I am thinking it, I would never just say "Hey babe yo tits look great in that tube top there toots" Hah, what year is it? 
Yeah, but I ended up having fun with it. The dude was hammered when he did it, and apparently felt terrible and embarrassed afterward. He came in with his wife a couple times after and I would go out of my way to say "Hey man! how the hell are ya? Ahh is this the wife?" You could see in his face it made him very uncomfortable hah.  
I read it and I chose not to link directly to it deliberately. This is not a forum where hate speech is posted. 
Maybe she already thinks your the crazy ex, maybe she'll see you as a sister-in-arms or something. If he made her unfriend you, maybe he's already told her about you and her opinion is formed. Unless you've talked to her before and have a feel for her personality and reactions, there's no way to predict how she'll be. Be prepared for both reactions, expect the worst. If she knows you're suing for child support, that might bias her against you immediately. If she tells you to get lost, just go.  I think the best way to approach it is to be neutral, just explain to her what your experience was. Not "he's crazy and you need to get out ASAP," not "maybe he's changed since I knew him," but something straight forward, expressing that you only have her interests at heart. Something like, "I don't want to overstep my bounds here, but I was with (your ex) for a year in the same situation as you are now, and it didn't go as well as I had hoped. I'm concerned he may be promising you things he can't deliver, and I don't want to see you go through what I did. He said he would step up and help/be responsible, but in reality it was all talk. He did not help support myself or our child, and since our relationship ended he still has not put forth any effort to bond with his daughter." Something like that. Maybe make a point that you don't want him back in your life, just that your bringing up your daughter because he wasn't ready to be a father.  If you decide to talk to her, just think about what you would have wanted to know when you were in her shoes. Be honest, be gentle, and if she doesn't want to hear what you have to say about him, just walk away. This is all you can do. You can't force anyone to listen to you. And if she doesn't want to hear it, you have absolutely no more business in their relationship.  Just one more thought, before you do this, think about any negative repercussions. If they don't like you butting in, will they lash out at you in some way? Your first priority should be the well being of your daughter and yourself. You know them better than I do, and are better able to judge what their reactions might be. The safest option for you will be to stay out of it, but if you decide to talk to her, weigh any potential risks before you do.  Do what you think is right. 
If you make have the option to make a risky decision, and aware of that risk do it anyways... many would consider you a fool for embarking on the risky decision, especially if you come back afterwards like "THAT WAS UNEXPECTED!?" It's like "What did you expect? The world to immediately understand your situation without no prior explanation?"
I'm just an anecdotal data point, but I'm pretty sure it was my love of Dr. Pepper and mini-pizzas for lunch everyday that made me fat.
[deleted]
[deleted]
I'm not offended by any of the images, but neither am I amused. I think it's kind of sad 'humour', really. Not to mention that these jokes have been around for.. what.. fifteen years, or so? The first time it was worth a snicker, maaaaaaybe, but it's 2014 now and I'm just kind of past the whole "women are soooooooo complicated - us poor menz really can't figure them out". It also paints a rather sad picture of men that I also don't think is particularly funny. Not because it's heinous or evil, but just because it's simplistic and overdone and not in any way clever or new. Doesn't tickle me.  All in all, it's just not.. funny. Today I saw a tshirt with this image on: http://www.fodrizzle.com/2012/03/06/t-rex-hates-pushups/ Now that was mildly funny. It took something I knew about T-rexes (short front legs) and applied it in a way I had not seen before. Definitely worth a giggle. Pointing out how women cost time and money and &lt;math intensifies&gt; therefore women are evil is just so old and sad and jaded in comparison. All it gets is a &lt;sad trombone&gt;, as far as I'm concerned.   Also, unless you know your colleagues really well, sending jokes over e-mail is just not all that professional. For a manager to send this to all his underlings is definitely not great workplace behaviour.  As to your point that: &gt; I think women get offended by stuff like this because they know they fall into this kind of categorization... And they don't like that being pointed out to them.  If you think that the things on that Hazardous Materials Data Sheet are true (and that people don't like the joke because 'the truth hurts'  then you don't know a lot about other women. They're rather varied and many of them don't meet those criteria at all.
My husband is an outgoing person and will strike up a conversation with almost anyone. I think a lot of times when he talks to women they think he has an angle, but he's really just super friendly and likes to chat with people.
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
&gt; If he had a daughter studying in India and an attractive young man came in, would he have done the same thing?  From my experience with my roommate (super traditional Indian family), yes, absolutely. Parents are all up in their business all the time. My roommates sister was in a long term, 3 year relationship with a white guy (scandal!) and her parents were *still* finding "nice Indian boys just in case".  Not saying this isn't weird as fuck, because it is, and incredibly awkward and kinda unsanitary (making your food while touching a headset and a phone?? I'm not usually worried about germs but ew).
About the false accusations about there being a shit storm. hahaha. 
[deleted]
Congrats! I started Zoloft about a month ago, and it really shot my sex drive. The other night I was feeling it, and broke out the vibrator. Finally I had an orgasm for the first time in weeks. Just knowing I can still orgasm made my night. 
Maybe there is a way to spin it so that she'll see this as an opportunity to have a Vegas vacation without the kids. You're entitled to you're wedding the way you want it, but I understand the dilemma. Try and focus on how much less stressful it will be for her too to leave the kids at home. Good luck! 
Would your migraine meds make the bc not work, or is it vice versa? If it's the former, why don't you try them anyway? If you don't use them for contraception now, it would be fine if they didn't work as contraceptives due to your medicine, and they might still provide relief. Have you talked to your doctor about other options such as a hormonal IUD? There might be less interference with your other medicine because the hormones are localized to your uterus, and they can significantly reduce or eliminate periods all together.   Do you have endometriosis or another diagnosed condition that is causing the pain? You're clearly suffering an abnormal amount, and that could be due to any number of medical conditions for which treatments exist. I hope you've talked with your doctor about the amount of medication you're taking as well. It would be super shitty to end up with liver or kidney damage from taking too high of a dose too frequently.  Lastly, when do you start taking meds for your menstrual cramps? If your period is regular enough that you can reliably predict when it will start, begin taking your meds 24 hours early. They recommend it for endometriosis sufferers because the pain relieving mechanism of NSAIDs works better if you use it slightly earlier.
Lol how egocentric. A post about cockatoos is clearly about MEN.
Ok. Being whistled at by a human usually means un-asked-for sexually-suggestive attention.  Being whistled at by a bird means nothing. It's a bird.
Maybe RES is blocking it for you, but I definitely see some controversial stuff down there....
I get an over abundance of "hey, girl, sexy feet" whenever I walk around downtown. Nope, no thanks.  It's the same guy all. the. time.
[deleted]
I keep seeing people making comments like this in these harassment threads.... Do you REALLY think its hard for a woman to differentiate a driver and a passenger communicating to themselves innocently enough, and them trying to get a woman's attention for something inappropriate like a catcall or creephshot or this?
Life is full of difficult choices.
Did you make the post? If your post gets deleted, it still shows up for you. I'm referring to the parent of this post  http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/comments/284g3b/just_because_im_talking_and_joking_with_a_guy/ci7hbz1  
but if detached it would survive and it is only her decision which is preventing that detachment.  The woman is actively preventing it from detaching.   I never implied the woman would receive a refund. I pointed out the absurdness of your "being out $100" by saying, and killing a baby.  
[deleted]
[deleted]
I usually come here, shut up, and try to learn something. However I would like to ask for clarification here. Everywhere I've lived in the US strangers ignore each other. Random public encounters are almost non-existant from my experience. We tend to live in solitude trading nods and meaningless good mornings. For there to be an interaction with a stranger requires sufficient impetus. Attraction is the most logical of these driving forces. I'm confused as to wether the problem is that attraction is a driving factor behind social interactions or that the issue lies with those who reduce women to a two part question: "is she attractive? and will she have sex with me". If I find you attractive the likelyhood that I will speak to you is much higher.  I'm ignorant of many things but I try to improve, however I don't believe that this is intrinsicly wrong. The decision to interact was driven by my attraction, something about the way you look resonated with me and I would like to take the chance to strike up a conversation. My attraction does not obligate you in the least to even acknowledge me. I'm just confused as to how I am supposed to meet anyone. Is it wrong to want to speak to someone because your attracted to them? (seeing as we're strangers there are very few good reasons to speak to each other, and random conversations are often seen as weird) I had thought up until this point that it is the manner in which you go about the interaction that defines whether or not you're a creep.
[deleted]
Yeah, but if we fight against them, then we can get them to stop. Thats how this works.
I've always gotta be careful when trying to figure out people's opinions based on Reddit's responses. Usually all the negative responses bum me out, I get sad, and I have to get off reddit for a while. You do you man, and make a girl's day by telling her she's gorgeous in passing. *(Supportive back pat)*
[deleted]
Thank you for your kindness. In no way did I mean to offend anyone. I took the subject too seriously, and being a mom of 30 years kicked in. I am the most un-creepy grandmother you can imagine. Lol Thank you again ( I was feeling awful about it )
You apologized to her?? This woman sent promiscuous pictures of herself to your FIANCÉ! She should be apologizing to you and she also needs to learn how to establish boundaries, as well as your fiancé. Good luck with this in the future. I hope.that whatever you decide makes you happy, but I'm not optimistic about your situation. I believe you'd be much happier without them. Find a real friend and a real man. You have to know that you're worth it.
I'm about the same age as you and specifically don't want kids right now, but I think my parents' constant statement makes more sense for you - there's no right time to have kids.  The likelihood of there being a really drastic change in 3 years is low. If you really want kids, have them. It'll be hard and you'll have to cut back a lot, but when is that not the case?   My parents travelled the world with me in tow, and insist on telling me about how having me didn't slow them down or hamper their dreams at all, they just added one person to the team.
Sounds like ge just 'masturbated' into you.   Observe whether this will turn into a common occurance in the future.
So don't if you have any choice in it. You don't have to go to every event your parents are at, do you?
Incorrect. 
PS: Due to the many applicants applying at this time, we here at "OP and OP's SO's partnership" are unable to consider any applications to "come crawling back" in the future.
That's... peculiar. 
They aren't really, most people just don't train them properly to socialize or know how to handle an aggressive bird, not to mention yellow napes are a bit more aggressive then most.I grew up with a yellow nape and currently have two conures who are a bit *too* social and always want to bother guests 
Have him wear these  http://www.shoelift.com/
Hahaha, man I meant like, talking to them as in getting to know them and letting em know that you find them attractive and stuff. Make moves like I'm sure you do and if they make moves back, you know it's gon be sexualized night. If not, then respect it and move on.  Women want sex just as much men, it's a human thing to do. Just not when you're screaming out about their body in public. Be casual dude.
I downvoted because you fixated on 'choice' and ignored all the complex emotional and physical reasons that tie into a woman's decision whether to carry a fetus to term or have an abortion. Minimising the choice just weakens your argument and doesn't add anything to this discussion. 'Believing abortion is murder is a *choice*! Stupid women, just turn off your beliefs!' I'm pro-choice and I still find that argument offensive. I believe the right thing to do is to try and reason with people who believe abortion is murder, not dismiss them as having a 'choice' as though it's that simple.  Also, it's been pointed out over and over in various places in this thread just *why* it is messy and the steps that would need to be taken to correct that. If you honestly think it's like flipping a switch you're being naive and ignoring the complex social interactions that surround sex, pregnancy, abortion, parental rights and human rights. 
[deleted]
yes, what are you implying
Excuse me a moment while I come off as paranoid:  As someone else said, this is stalker-like bullshit. You say they had a brief relationship, but he can't get over it? He keeps contacting her? Sends inappropriate messages? Tries to make her responsible for his happiness?  OP, be very aware this could escalate. The ex may have been in contact with your gf before, but she discounted it because she's not interested and "it's harmless." It isn't necessarily. Stalking can lead to killing and I had a friend who was murdered by her ex. None of us even realized she was being stalked, but in hindsight it was obvious. This may not be going on with your gf and in all probability isn't, but for my friend's memory, I have to say something.
You're lucky. My conure sometimes like to very loudly and incessantly let me know when he'd like to come out (aka 7 a.m.) even though I never do and ignore him until I feel like getting up around 9 a.m.
It's rare to read something like your post in XX.  Thank you, for your thoughtful comment, and for going public with your enlightened attitude, and for standing up for and watching out for your sisters.    Maybe you'll influence just one man to look at things like you do.  
I think begging the question might work if you're the direct type: "And how long have you been beating your husband?"  Them, flustered: I, what? No, I never...  You: Neither have I, and I'd appreciate if you don't make those claims again.
because they're too busy clinging to someone
Well then, you're not the men I'm referring to, now are you? Mods may have gotten rid of them by now, but if not, go downthread.  
That is... Awesome. Demands to be plopped in a television show, almost. Beleaguered shopkeeper and all.
http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/comments/285ydm/got_whistled_at_while_running_the_source_was_not/ci7uyec
There is no justice in this situation, someone is getting fucked in any case. The court's main interest is in making sure it isn't the child and society at large. Unless you have a means of preventing that, your argument of "but it's not fair!!!" Is not going to get you anywhere.              Also in your situation, all the responsibility is on the woman. A man can have sex competently free of consequences  and a woman must deal with all the fallout, either having an abortion, which are expensive and difficult to obtain in much of the country, or having a child for whom she has 100% responsibility. What is fair about that?                                                
[deleted]
Ain't no sin in enjoying the fruits of our land
I'm actually really glad you clarified that there was a consensual BDSM element to your interactions. Otherwise it does read to the non kinky like "OMG Man owns her after one time sex!".
It's still rude even if you personally like it.
[deleted]
I would not say that at all. I mean there have definitely been times where I know life would be easier if I were single, but then I have to step back and realize it is given certain circumstances that will change. 
His arm fell off because he got bitten by a radioactive squirrel, Not quite spiderman.  Or, he had an accident. You pick.
&gt; It actually does. What germ was saying is misquoting scriptures that paint the picture that Christian women should be submissive, learn in quietness and it is disgraceful for women to have authority over men.  And your quote doesn't dispute that, it just goes on to talk about how husbands should act too.   &gt; Women are described as noble as they can be merchants, traders of things, owners of fields, as well as taking care of servants, taking care of their homes. This is a position of authority.  It's a demonstration of some level of autonomy, sure, but it's not authority. Women are not permitted to have authority over men.   If you're selectively grabbing just the verses that you care about, you can justify almost any opinion you want using the bible. 
I LOVE doing that cartoony whistle when I see a male friend (I`m not gay) out in public, and they turn around to give me grief, and I yell at them for being so full of themselves thing that the whistle was for them... I loved your story!!!  Fuck all of the haters giving you grief, it was funny as fuck!
That's great to know!
[deleted]
But then the friend will ask for a different shirt. Unfortunately, I think OP may have to stop lending to her friends altogether, especially if she cares about this girl and her feelings. 
*delicious. But it's funny, and I'm lazy, so I'll keep it.
I'll try. Sometimes she can be extremely persistent though, even bringing up a topic for a few days without end. Fingers crossed!
I have a bipolar friend, and he did this sort of shit too. It's pretty terrible--he didn't have control over his own actions, like the filter between fantasy and reality broke down. He did things he regretted deeply, and he lost an entire social hub because of things he could barely remember doing, and things he would never consider now that he's medicated.
Welcome to the dark side...  But seriously, it's really nice to hear that something is changing, even when it's only one person at a time.   Your ex probably wasn't harassed when you were with her *because* you were with her. I've found if I'm with my boyfriend I get harassed a lot less than when I'm alone. I guess it's easier to pick a more vulnerable target. 
[deleted]
I think that you met a rude person.  She doesn't necessarily represent 'women.'    I'm a lesbian.  At our wedding, I wore a suit and tie, and she wore a dress.  And then I took my wife's name.  I wanted to, because having the same last name feels like 'family' to me.  I changed my name, because I was the one who wanted to have the same name.    It was funny how some people seemed to expect that she would take mine, just based on our outfits.  People.  We're lesbians.  We don't have to conform to your gender expectations.  Gender expectations are tedious, and no one but the two of you needs to be part of the name conversation.
Fellow sufferer. Went through the same thing.  Thank science for medication 
[deleted]
He's not on any medications because of no insurance (this gets fixed soon, yay!). He does have a bad back though, so it does affect sex.  We usually do it reverse missionary (which I am COMPLETELY OK with :3 ).    This has resulted in me asking, "On a scale of 1 to sex, how bad is your back today?" (This is not how I started asking this, but he eventually knew why I was asking all the time, so now it's a joke.). I have since figured out this is a big turn off and have STOPPED joking about it.
Honestly, if it were me, I would just stop going to that convenience store.  I've done that myself, even though going to another one was slightly less... convenient.  I didn't even think about talking to a manager, because I didn't think it would help, but maybe I should have.  If you honestly feel unsafe going there, you shouldn't have to put up with it.  Don't be caught up in societies image that you (as a man) have to put up with stuff like that if you are really feeling unsafe.  You don't have to take it, and why should you?
Ticks need to breathe, so if it was still alive then that's not where it came from.
[deleted]
I experienced something similar when I was about her age (at a private girls school).    I struggled through it initially because certainly for a while they were still my friends, and then I came to the realisation that ya know what, the mean isn't worth it. Maybe we just don't mesh well anymore.   There will be girls there who could be nice friends to her, she has no need to stick with these bitchy ones.    My advice would be (and what I myself ended up doing) for her to ignore the mean-ness and stand up for herself if any of them are directly mean. But otherwise, forget about them and make an effort to get to know other girls. She will no doubt be able to find a nice group and make other friends.   The "cool ones" may very well not be worth it.    Other girls will be 'cool' but in an interesting and individual way. Certainly at my school, the popular kids were not in that "cool group" but were the girls who had friends in lots of different circles and were by and large very well liked by everybody.   P.s. May be worth mentioning to her that the girl who rang to tell her what happened - isn't necessarily "on her side", its not exactly a kind thing to do and can be coming from an ulterior motive.
the tick on my boyfriend was small. I'm not sure if its was 1mm, however, he was able to identify it as a tick because his dog has had ticks on her and he has had ticks on him in the past. I never had a tick on me before so I'm not sure what their size usually is, but it looked small to me. Nervous :x
No. He is a dick but "abusive" isn't a word you should use lightly. 
While I understand "white man's burden" has a very sordid history of racism and imperialism, and that the US itself has a very recent history of acting like the world police...I have to disagree. The idea that women are being mutilated for being women and I just have to tolerate that or else be considered ethnocentric and imperialist...doesn't sit well with me. I would easily support both though I agree that it's better to focus on smaller problems one at a time than everything all at once. Focusing on the United States presents a much more realistic goal. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
Ok, so she's not being aggressive, then?  I somehow misread more into what you were saying then what was there.    From my point of view, there are some situations that would set of red flags of being unsafe, even if the person was someone I could potentially find attractive in a different context.  Anything involving yelling or doing anything loudly from across a room/street would be in that category.  Also, continuously staring is in that category, for me.  I misread your situation as that one--where you might have been interested in her but for how extreme she was.  (e.g. wow, I would have liked her, but she's bothering me when I'm just trying to get some goddam toilet paper.  wtf?)  I might be weird though, because there aren't many people who I could have *become* attracted to if they acted nicely and considerately.  It's hard for me to internalize that not everyone is like that, and that you just aren't attracted to her for reasons other than her *actions*.  There's a difference between hiding all emotion and being considerate with *how* you display that emotion.  If someone is being inconsiderate in how they display their emotions, they possibly should learn not to do that, and then later feel embarrassed about times they didn't.  I think that being considerate of others while showing your emotions is quite loving, not anti-love.
You know, I don't normally post, comment or any of that, let alone this subreddit. BUT- I saw the thread title and thought, "Well I'm a guy, MAYBE providing my look on things would help out." Well, I have to say, you really are trying your best, from the sounds of it. The only thing I could think of is that, maybe his testosterone levels or something may be off. For example, is he always so passive, or hardly ever aggressive or competitive? He honestly might just need to start exercising or seek medical attention. The reason I suggest exercising is because I notice with myself and other male friends, going on a 'binge' so to speak just puts sexual aggression through the roof. I'm not saying I'm an expert, just trying to help. Hopefully this will help, and good luck on your efforts.
I suffer. In silence. With my flipper flapper frog feet. In reality, I wear Merrells which usually run wide, men's shoes for running and vibram fivefingers for hiking. In summer I try to wear the vibrams as much as possible since the flexibility of the sole is so much more comfortable than anything else. FWIW i'm a 4E width with super high arches and splay toes. But I can swim like a damn champ....
I agree with /u/eiilaa , do what makes you happy. I don't know if you're in a MD that includes research, but a lot of us over at /r/LadiesofScience use "publishing names". Typically whatever you publish with first is what you continue to publish with, regardless of your married name. 
You just have to find the right size and fit. Some skinny jeans are just tight-fitting in the leg itself, not the ass/hip/stomach fit. This is coming from someone who wears her weight in the middle. I have found some good contenders at Target and American Eagle.
Ah, good to know.  First step will technically be finding a doctor (still working up the nerve.. took me years to get my last one and then I moved, whoops). Would be interesting to find out if there's anything more permanent that wouldn't be bad for my hormonal issues, though. My husband said he would probably get a vasectomy but he hasn't yet, so I need to look into finding something.
Why?   nevermind, i get it. you're a redpill troll. 
&gt; Hahahh who the fuck talks like that?  You'd be surprised.
I have 40" hips/butt, and I wear skinny jeans pretty often. The key is to find something that's cut right for your shape. For me, with my relatively small waist, large butt and hips, and thick thighs, Levi's mid rise skinny or bold curve jeans are perfect. If you have a different shape, you might find that a different brand fits and flatters you better.
[deleted]
The jobs I worked it wouldn't have been feasible to have a part time job on the side, but if that's something you needed to do I don't see how they could enforce it. Like say you worked 9-5 for americorps you could easily bartend for example at night. The jobs I did involved camping for long stretches so I couldn't have worked or gone to school at the same time.   Safety wasn't really an issue for me since my jobs were more in the wilderness. My home base was often in the city but on my days off I wasn't interacting with the locals really, more just hanging out with my coworkers. If you were doing a VISTA program or somethig where you work in the city that could be a lot different from my experience though. Sorry, don't have too much insight on that one.  I don't think the jobs were super competitive especially if you have a degree and show a lot if interest in the position you're applying for. Some people I worked with it boggled my mind how try got hired, but who knows. I think a big thing they look for is maturity. If you can stand out from the other 18-24 y/o's and show that you wouldn't be taking a job just to meet other young adults and party (like, continue the college lifestyle) then try to mention how responsible you are in your interview.
Empathy is a wonderful skill and it takes time to learn. You're doing great!
Nobody here is talking about 'all men', so your ranting is ridiculous. This post is about a guy saying 'hey, I'm realising that my ex's stories were accurate, thanks for opening my eyes'. 
Holy shit that's scary. I'm glad you and your dogs are okay!
&gt; This subreddit is...not for discussing difficult issues.  Well, you're definitely correct on that point.  Nor is it supposed to be.  
You go girl
"Tending to pick favorites" is not the same as attacking someone. I find it strange how people think if a dog bites a couple times he gets put down, but if a bird decides to bite constantly it's just a personality quirk. Birds can be trained to not bite people, though it is more difficult than a dog.   I will concede that some mishandled adult birds will have problems you can't train out, just like it's hard to train a wild animal, but there is absolutely zero reason a bird who has been brought up since it was young would attack half the population on sight.   My dad has taken a few birds from difficult homes and trained them before rehoming them, along with keeping a pair of yellow napes (one was stolen sadly) and my own experience raising my conures who come out to the store with me and will step up for anyone that asks so that's where my viewpoint comes from, but I have seen it reinforced in other instances as well. There's a pet store in town that keeps all their birds on a display in the middle of the store where anyone walk up and handle them. There's also plenty of vendors at bird shows that keep their birds out on a perch where hundreds of people can pick them up. The fact that only **one** of your birds didn't attack pretty large percentages of the people they met doesn't really reinforce your argument, it just makes me think maybe it wasn't a good idea to have 37 birds in one household and they weren't trained that great. 
"Let me get this straight-- you guys had a sleepover and spent your time talking about me?  Y'all need a hobby."      I shut up most of my school bullies by pointing out that they were actually spending time thinking about me in order to bully me, and wondering out loud in front of them (and in public) why on earth they would spend time thinking about me if they actually disliked me.  The few straggler bullies that tried to pull subtle shit in the hallways (like hiding a slur in a cough) got me full stop, 12 inches from their face saying, "seriously?  That's the best you can come up with?"      Bullies don't like it when you point out that they're losers.  It takes away their power.
Welcome to reality. Now think how it is for men who are really abuse. The ones that are beaten, and cannot call the cops cause they are the ones that will get arrested. 
As a guy, It sounds to me like he might be depressed or anxious, it's not to do with you from the sounds of things, and going psycho on him as you called it probably makes it so much worse. It doesn't mean he doesn't find you attractive, but if something in his life is upsetting him, it can be very hard to maintain a libido.  Working constantly can seriously effect your mental health, and can also really ruin your sex drive.
You're welcome!
Ask the mods perhaps if the post concerns you?  I'm mostly an apathetic lurker who doesn’t care to get overly involved.  They can probably give you the clarification that you want. 
He may be cringing just as hard as you are at all this, yeah! I agree with giving the generic email, Hillel's website where he can see the calendar of events and can choose to go or not go, and maybe just a polite recommendation like "I'm not a member of the group but I know a few people who are and they're really great, I'm sure New Student will make some nice friends there if he joins".
I'd love to see it. 
[deleted]
I feel like that would encourage people; that they'll actually laugh rather than be horrified. You're right that others will label me but those others generally aren't the sort of people I want to be around anyway. Most people will just disregard my point and that's okay - it's normal to hear a conflicting opinion once and just disregard it. However, you start to hear it a lot and you will eventually think about it. Whether they accept it after that or not is entirely up to them.  I think I should emphasize that my normal response is just to not respond at all. I tend to save the explicit reaction for those really horrible people that aren't actually joking or those that make the same 'joke' over and over again.
I can't wait for this to be out long enough that I can illegally download it! Having been a person that's gone through this before, there's not much in the media portraying this being a real life situation. Typically, it's all like unexpected pregnancy, bam! gonna have the kid. This will be refreshingly relatable to a VAST percentage of women.
Paying for a date has nothing to do with being a gentleman. If you want to make an impression, pay for the date? Get out of here with your ridiculousness. 
People are not toys for your amusement. Harassing someone, making them feel uncomfortable and getting a kick out of it is fucked up. 
I can further vouch for them holding way more - I don't have a super heavy flow, but when I first wore one it was basically like I wasn't having a period. I sometimes forget that it's in. I never get that with pads/tampons.
No worries. You're not wrong, it's just not for you personally. And I'm sorry you've had bad experiences in the past with people commenting on your background. I guess just be aware that this is pretty common in the Jewish community and no one means any offense. If you're not interested, it shouldn't be a problem.
Yeah I feel like they're right across the boobs. Sleeves and general cut was good.   Overall I really like their shirts, and the cut is flattering, I just order a large now. 
Nice one on the PSA.  Oestrogen-containing contraceptive methods do increase the risk of ischemic stroke in women who suffer from migranes with aura (or silent migranes, which just consists of the aura without the pain). Those of you who suffer from migranes or have suffered in the past and currently take oestrogen based contraceptives (pill, patch or ring) should consult your doctor about your current contraceptive method and see about switching.  That said, do not panic. The risk of stroke, though significantly higher in those who have had migranes with aura before, is still really quite low. Nobody needs to lose any sleep over this, but I would recommend making an appointment with your current healthcare provider to talk about switching when you can. No use taking the risk when there are other, safer options for you guys out there.  There's a couple of review papers here that go into a bit more detail below: http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pmc/articles/PMC2938905/  http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pmc/articles/PMC3735427/  http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pubmed/24300795  
a tick usually needs a few hours to find the perfect spot to bite down, so he probably got it elsewhere. you don't have to be worried that ticks hatch on you/inside your vagina. They have a entirely different life circle!   You wrote that your bf has a dog, he could have very well got it from his dog (transferred while petting it etc)  ticks sit in low grass and let themselves fall on you (shoes, feet, legs etc) when you walk by (they have very fine sensors). because there is a risk of getting meningitis (there is a vaccination available) or lyme disease you should be careful when you find a tick on you and get it out ASAP. theres usually a small timeframe until something is transmitted but I wouldn't count on that. If you feel horrible a few weeks after a tick bite you should def. see a doctor and mention that you had a tick! If your bf develops a rash within the next fee days he has to go and see a doctor too, because then it's lyme disease. typical rashes look like this: http://www.google.de/search?q=wanderr%C3%B6te&amp;nord=1&amp;source=lnms&amp;tbm=isch&amp;sa=X&amp;ei=lvWdU_XqGK6P4gT0qoGYBw&amp;ved=0CAYQ_AUoAQ&amp;biw=1525&amp;bih=649&amp;dpr=0.9#nord=1&amp;q=wanderr%C3%B6te+borreliose&amp;tbm=isch
The most important thing to remember is to read body language and back off if she seems uncomfortable.  If she's not making good eye contact and responding with one word answers, then leave her be.  If she's listening to music or reading a book, it's probably a good idea to just not bother her at all.   A lot of women don't outright say "can you please leave me alone?" Because we've all had some asshole entitled guy with a bruised ego respond with "Bitch, I just want to talk to you; why are you acting this way?"  So we'll be cautious and try to avoid confrontation.  That's why things like the "rejects hotline" was invented.  We could give out a fake number that said all the things we want to say when he called it later.  Giving the fake number also can get a guy to leave us alone.  Passive aggressive?  Of course it is!  But being outwardly aggressive can make us feel unsafe.  So yeah, talk away, but back off at the first sign of discomfort.  This can also actually leave a good first impression.  I once went out on a few dates with a guy who I initially met several times while eating lunch.  We were both regulars at the restaurant, and he would briefly strike up conversations, but then disengage quickly because he could tell I was eager to get engrossed in my book.  Seeing him respect my boundaries so quickly left a good impression, and I eventually struck up a much longer conversation on a day when I didn't have a book to read.  We ultimately didn't have much in common, but I never would have considered going out with him if he had pursued it the first day. Backing off quickly gives a good "I'm not a creeper" green flag that she may remember if you bump into her again.
My mom used to work with one of the medical consultants for House and they are very very loose with medical stories and terms. (In fact most of my mom's colleagues wouldn't watch because of some of the silliness they saw) so a TV show is not a good reference for medical advice. :)
That's a great plan, thank you x
Is it possible he could be suffering from low testosterone?  You imply he's tired in addition to the lack of libido, and fatigue/lack of energy was the symptom that led my doctor to have my t-level checked. If he's depressed or anxious, antidepressants often have sexual side effects. In the end, it really isn't your dault, and hopefully he'll feel better with time.
Go for a run, have fun.   I'm not going to address this extreme bullshit anymore.  I'm not a troll or an MRA, but your post has single handedly made me decide to stop learning anymore about your bullshit movement.   
[deleted]
I didn't delete a damn thing.  It was deleted by the masses that apparently thought I was suggesting women are frail little porcelain dolls that require protection,, rather than a standard safety tip that "night time crime happens a lot, daytime is safer".   That will go down as the single most misconstrued thing I've ever said on the internet.  Y'all can have all this.  Good luck with everything.    Edit: Sensationalist?  You mean sensationalist like the " I fear for my life over guys whistling at me." that I see in every other 2x post about catcalling?  THAT'S legit but "crime happens at night a lot" is sensationalist?  
&gt; He challenged everyone (but especially the dads) in our church to defend girls and women, and to raise sons who do the same... How men need to stop silently accepting the culture of rape and harassment towards women.  I hope he didn't challenge the men to adhere to later in Genesis 34 where Simon and Levi slaughtered all of the men and pillaged the rapists town in retribution as an example.
Hey, please let me know when this gets posted. I'd love to hear it, or read the transcripts :)
August: Osage County is a wonderful recent film (and play).   
She is not a doctor though. So her opinion can not and should not be trusted. Is it a talking point for the doctors appointment but OP is claiming facts based on the opinion of one doctor that treated ***her***. This should be flagged in some way as there is literally zero evidence to her claims.
Yep. My mum's hair went from straight to curly when she was pregnant with me. My hair has been sloooooowly developing a bit of a curl for years now, after previously being so straight classmates asked me for advice on straightening tools/products
I am a huge Tarantino fan (he writes amazing female characters and Kill Bill is possibly one of my favourite films) but I've never heard of Deathproof! I'll have to check it out! Thanks!!
Oh, I know I had some major self-esteem issues at the time. Going thru my divore was super hard, so I just wanted someone to actually want me, unlike my exhusband - luckily, the whole thing with C only lasted about two months from the time we met until he moved away. I learned a lot from the experience and am now with a great guy :)  Edit: Oh dear, I didn't even notice that "divorce" had autocorrected to "rubrics". That was awesome.
[deleted]
because the UK surgeons are not great. My friend nearly died from loss of blood after having surgery with one UK surgeon, so I decided to go where I knew was safe and had pleasing results.
No there isnt zero evidence. This contraindication is very well documented. Both the OP and myself have posted evidence in this thread. Even the NHS website says so, if you actually bother to use google.
It's incredibly rare for an ultrasound to happen during labor?  At many hospitals literally every woman that comes to the hospital in labor gets an ultrasound.     As far as cords wrapping around fetuses all the time, sure thats true.  But mces97 is clearly talking about a situation where the cord is wrapped around the fetus AND fetal monitoring shows that the fetus is being deprived of oxygen and needs to be removed immediately.  The statement was "the cord is wrapped around the babies neck, and without immediate medical intervention the baby will die."   I'm not arguing with your opinion on a mother's right to decline a c-section; in fact, I'm not entirely sure myself how I feel about this and have to do some more thinking on the matter.  But you should at least address mces97's point if you are going to argue with it.   Edit: sorry, just re-read this and it comes off as pretty damn rude... don't know how to change it without losing my point, so please just accept my apologies?
I'm curious and would like to gain some perspective, do you think they would possibly set you two up because it's simply a match of heritage, or is it only practicing faithful Jewish people that tend to care about matching their kids like this?
Winter's Bone - Jennifer Lawrence stars as the protagonist. Really tense and very well made. 
I think I understand the source of the miscommunication. It's when certain guys see this as "instead of" rather than "in addition to".  I'm not saying those guys are always in the right if they get resentful, but time is limited resource, amongst other things. You want to spend it in a way that will make you truly happy.
I am a man, you  been trying to bash me. I hope you live a sub-par life, my friend. 
just remember, "cool" and "popular" are relivant.  quick note about my high school days. No one really liked the "popular" kids, and no one trusted them, and no one said anything good about them when they weren't looking. For most of them, it was merely an illusion on top of their insecurities.  Various other outsider groups just held their own parties, with their own friends, invite only, and had some pretty good times.
When I walked around by myself in downtown Minneapolis it would happen daily, yes. Quite often several times a day even. 
'Bred very quickly'  Me too!
Why? It's a whimsical tale about how OP thought the patriarchy was attacking her, only to find that her fear of the incoming patriarchal rape and oppression was really just coming from a bird.  Sums up modern western "feminism" perfectly, imo.
Take the opportunity to educate the "jokesters" that spousal abuse is not a laughing matter.
[deleted]
Did you read my comment fully? I'm really confused...
Those questions used to bother me a lot because I belabored under the mistaken idea that I owed these people actual answers. Now I lie and choose a nationality at random then BS my way through any other questions.
How is that a solution, more than a shitty attempt at an excuse for that guy's sleazy behavior?
shit, someone's cutting onions again
[deleted]
&gt;Yes because I said they weren't allowed to disagree right? No, I said that they can't get bitchy about different interpretations of a book that is complete interpretation.  Wow, so OP is 'getting bitchy' now?   &gt;You can disagree and say they aren't "proper xyz" but in the end it doesn't matter because they interpreted it differently than you.  Just because two people can interpret a piece of information differently doesn't mean they are both right or that both interpretations are as sound. If you are right in your understanding and others are wrong, why wouldn't you try to convince them? Especially if their misinterpretation is causing them to value themselves and their fellow women less.   Your entire argument is basically that we should just let sexist people be sexist because they interpret things differently and views cannot be changed. 
It sucks, but sometimes there's no polite option. Not if the guy in guy in question has decided to be deaf to any statement that's not in accordance with *his* wishes.   I'd probably glare at him and hiss: "Why do you make me repeat myself?! I'm no into you. Leave. Me. Alone."  Then walk away. Or something like that.
[deleted]
I'm bracing myself, trust me.   I'm not going to play the victim, either. If that's what you meant? I'm aware that it'll come back on me. And there's always his perspective on things.   I just don't often get the opportunity to speak on my behalf. It's incredibly hard. The end result is twisted words, and the blame being piled on me, and being told to change.   That's a hard battle. 
Oh my god, I am so sorry that happened to you! How terrible... I'm so glad that your migraines have reduced in frequency and severity. The first few I got, I thought I was dying... but even still, mine were nowhere near as bad as yours sounded.  I'm always afraid that, with the symptoms of classic migraines being so similar to that of a stroke, I'll one day have a stroke and not do anything about it because I'll assume it's a migraine. :\
[deleted]
Had this initial thought.  I saw a lot of misogyny disguised as valor growing up in evangeland.  Giving this guy the benefit of the doubt; hopefully he was imploring *everyone* to take a stand.
No.  You're not the only one and I suggest you watch a documentary called Miss Representation.  The documentary is out there in the torrent world, and everybody should watch it.
Easier to give, harder to take. Since it's only the first week the mother might be looking to assert her authority (because mother). It's always easier to start strict and relax later on than it is to do the opposite.  If you're not the first person to move in to try and teach the children English then maybe it really as bad as you fear it is, but there's always the option to talk to her before you 'waste'(don't mean it in a bad way, just lacking thinking skills right now) anymore time there.   
I cannot recommend the Gracie Bully Proof program enough.  It is an amazing activity that you can do with your sister and get your parents involved.  If money is an issue, please contact them, they will work with you.  The self confidence this program teaches is unbelievable.  Many of the comments here are about not doing anything or avoiding the issue.  This has a larger and longer impact then just taking the time to learn how to deal with the issue at hand.  If this program is out of reach for you, let me know and I will do what I can to get it to you.  It works.  Watch some of the videos, they are truly inspirational.  https://www.graciekids.com/ 
[deleted]
Not just her, pretty much all the women and the archaic views on marriage. Though yeah Misa started out pretty clever and then just devolved into "the girlfriend" for the most part.   The worst was really Naomi Misora, who was a brilliant FBI agent but her fiance tells her to stop giving advise on his case cause she's going to be his wife now and is leaving all that behind her. It's time to make babies and stop thinking brilliant investigative thoughts, honey! And you'd think the author maybe was condemning that because it gets him fucking killed, but no, the author then decides to just kill her off after she's tricked by Light who had a *phenomenal* number of coincidences on his side (had he not delivered his dad's clothes instead of his sister, which he did on a whim, he never would have run into her) and her just dumbly giving into his pestering after being so cautious.   Man speaking of which, is Light even that smart? He had an invisible supernatural entity no one could possibly know about and a supernatural power on his side for the first half of the series. 
He's great right? Fuck what other people think. If he makes you happy, treats you right and is good in bed you better hold on to what you got. 
Agreed, he's affected by other stress from somewhere.  Or it's a physical health issue, but most likely there's stress at work and it's unresolved or maybe even unknown to him (the mind can contain issues apart from full awareness, self-awareness can be a very tall order in general).  No easy solution.  As others have said, 3-4 times per hangout is unusually frequent and unsustainable.  But the sudden change speaks to a stressor elsewhere affecting him in these mysterious ways.
It's not. 
Stoker. Brilliant film...
He's not someone I look up to or want to emulate as a parent.  These days I mostly feel sorry for him -- the ratio of anger to pity has been changing over the years, which I guess is good, but is also really sad.   He's germophobic and controlling, so when I was a kid he would yell at me for lying on the floor -- for Christ's sake, all kids do when they're kids is lie on the floor -- or dropping a washcloth on the ground when I was putting away laundry, that kind of thing.  Outside the family he's mostly just shy and socially awkward.  When he wasn't being a jackass you could tell he cared about me, and took me to softball practice and made dad jokes and bought me stuff at the record store and all of that, but the bad stuff makes it really hard to acknowledge the good, and if anyone out there is laboring under a similar excuse of "But he's a good dad when he's not doing X, Y, Z," fucking don't kid yourself.  Erratic parenting is damaging as hell.    From him I learned that one of the worst things you can do to your family is to have mental or interpersonal problems and never seek help for them.  All you do is teach your family that they don't deserve a healthy loving parent.     I'm looking forward to when my husband and I have kids so that Mother's Day and Father's Day can stop being quite as much about how conflicted I feel about my own parents.
It's often massively more difficult if there's a door between you and the nearest sink. Especially if leaving the stall is considered an admission that you're done with it, and that other people can use it. You often face a choice between arguing with someone about why you still need to use that stall, or standing in line with a wet cup and rapidly ruining your underwear.    Since this question was phrased as a question of why *some* women don't use cups, I hope you don't misinterpret this as me trying to invalidate your experiences. But I hope you can understand why in many common circumstances, they're pretty impractical. 
Thanks for the info!  I will google later, but off the top of your head, where is this kind of thing really popular?  Like I said, I'll google it eventually if you don't wanna answer.  Thanks again!  :)
Couldn't just ask "know any good movies with female leads?" 
Hm. I love X-men, but I wouldn't especially recommend it for its women characters. I mean, sure, the women in it - Storm, Jean, Mystique, Kitty - are okay, but not exactly the focus, which remains (of course) largely with Wolverine/Magneto/Xavier. I was actually a bit disappointed with Days of Future Past for that reason (WARNING! SPOILERS AHEAD) - Mystique is THE character central to the plot, on her decision hinges EVERYTHING - but the camera stays largely with Wolverine, Xavier and Magneto for the entire movie. She gets like two or three small scenes alone, and then she doesn't even have any internal dialogue. If this had been about Logan, Eric or Charles having to make a monumental decision, you can bet they and their internal conflicts would have gotten SO. MUCH. MORE. focus during the movie. Mystique barely discusses anything, remains largely opaque and spends most of her time in action scenes. So, yeah. The X-men franchise is crazy fun, but I wouldn't say it has female *leads*, like OP asked. The female roles are something more than side roles, but definitely not the main stars, if you ask me. Or would you argue differently? 
sexism against men isn't a thing
I am a big fan or states setting up written guidelines from which the judge cannot deviate except in exceptional cases.  In California, for example, you can use the support calculator (which by the way has spouse 1 and spouse 2, and is not gendered), and figure out exactly what you owe.  Judges extremely rarely deviate from it.  I think all courts should adopt a similar system.  The idea of having an ad hoc amount set by a judge who maybe doesn't like one of the parties, is fucked up.
It's completely normal. Usually when you take your monthly break from your BC pills (or take placebos), you don't have a real period as such. Instead, you have a bleed caused by withdrawing the BC hormones from your body. When you've suddenly stopped taking your pills, you've had your withdrawal bleed early. It's nothing to worry about.
I didn't know it was a documentary! My sister follows Miss Representation on facebook.
Banana.
No, that's not how I read it.  I was offering an explanation of the downvotes, not my personal opinion.
I love Ghost World.
[deleted]
Ooh that reminds me, I still haven't got around to watching A Lion in Winter yet. Eleanor of Aquitaine sounds fascinating.
[deleted]
If I said that 2% of women totally fabricate the alleged suffering they deal with just to get some attention, that would be enough for you and your troops to lay into me. So tell me that TwoX generally considers only 2% of men to be bad. I don't think so.
We're allowed to criticize movies we don't like. Hell, we're allowed to criticize movies we DO like!
 I reported your post for stereotyping that men accepting rape silently. Thats a sexist view that grudges thr whole sex and I take offense.
In a month, it will be 15 years since my father died. I remember his face, only based off of photographs. I remember his personality, only based off of the stories told to me. I forgot his voice sometime in the past couple years.  My father is an ever fading memory.
[deleted]
No kidding. Misa is a terribly written sexist stereotype of a character, and her voice makes me want to commit murder. Great show otherwise, mostly. (About halfway through some plot developments happen that scream unnecessary plot extension.)
LOL fair enough
Two things about Devil's Advocate:   First, while the movie doesn't portray women in a strong light, it doesn't do the same for the men either. Kevin is dancing on the devil's strings, Eddie Barzoon is a fat, clueless idiot, and every other man is degenerate or manipulative. Granted, they're not sexualized like the women are, just saying it's hardly painting them as pillars of masculinity.   Second, you're missing out on an AMAZING movie. In the final 30 minutes, Al Pachino chews the scenery like a starving man. 
Red hair is actually a Middle Eastern/Mediterranean trait. The former Shaw of Iran had fair skin and red hair - clearly not "white".   There are more red heads in Scotland than Ireland.  Red hair is not exclusive to one country or another. It can be found all over. There are even people in Jamaica with red hair... Presumably from the 150,000 Irish catholic child slaves transported by Cromwell to The Colonies and the Caribbean. But that's another story, a sad one.  
I have said we don't have a perfect system. We have one run by humans and therefore subject to human error.   Make sure you stretch before those big illogical jumps. You'll pull somthing.
Haha Gay-Z
&gt;Allowing a woman to kill her own children is a problem if any of the following are true: Killing the child poses a risk to society or the community. She is forced to do so (and by the generality of social structure, all children would be killed.) Society has invested a significant amount of resources into the child's welfare.  Are any of these true after the baby is born? Not really. Why then are these the only criterion for determining is the death was immoral, given that killing a baby after birth is immoral?  &gt;I don't disagree with that. I don't know why it causes pause for you. You are already man-made life, and you operate on some pretty complex chemical machinery. If your consciousness were transplanted into a machine, you would still want all the rights you have.  The pause came from my association of "machine" with "non-life", that's all.
[deleted]
Well, to be fair, we excuse people for "poor social skills" all the time (especially when they're on the autistic spectrum and confide that to us).  So, in some contexts, having poor social skills gains sympathy.  How far we stretch that rubric, though, is a personal consideration.  There was someone posting here the other day about liking catcalls, for example.  I knew girls in high school who liked it and encouraged it.  In fact, I really disliked this one girl who lived half a block away because she really did encourage it (and said she liked it).  I was cringing when it happened to me (and my biggest fear for the first two years of high school was having to walk the halls where guys ogled, whistled and rated girls according to attractiveness).  I am pretty immune to inane comments in the workplace (which is often a classroom for me; I can't exactly lodge a complaint against students for being idiots and saying things I find hurtful or offensive, though so far, no one has ever whistled at a young woman or anyone else in my classroom).  I do feel badly for the well-intentioned, inane comment-makers (they are ignorant, I'm a teacher, I respond to ignorance by trying to educate).  But men in cars harassing a lone woman out on the streets is unacceptable and there's no opportunity to educate.  
&gt; If you do your part then you have no need to put yourself beneath an umbrella that you're not a part of. If the minister had said 'many men' would you feel better and find this acceptable?  Yeah, absolutely.  If I said, "blacks need to stop committing so many crimes" you'd be livid and I'd be a racist, but it's totally fine to say, as a blanket statement, "men need to stop accepting the rape culture".  Seriously, can you not see why this is fucked?  And what exactly is "my part"? I'm fucking responsible for a bunch of brainless rapists...? Fuck that. "My part" is jack shit because I've never pinned a woman down and forcibly inserted my penis. "My part" is sucking up the fact that women move to the other side of the street when they see me (I'm 6'3"), hearing blanket statements about "men" (in generality), and trying to ignore the fact that less qualified women get into the same school as me just because I wanted to be an engineer and there were too many penises in the classroom. "My part" is being suspected of wanting nothing but sex and being called creepy if women aren't into my advances and being called a pussy if I'm not into theirs.   Lastly, "my part" is being lectured on this shit like I don't have a fucking stake in it, like I don't have a sister and like I don't have to suffer the stereotypes I deal with because of the actions of men I've never met.  So fuck that, I don't have "a part" and I don't owe anybody jack shit. I'm not more responsible for rape culture than you are, and you'd better believe it. But I don't think you do, and that's why I posted. Maybe I'm wrong, don't really care. I know a few of the people reading this fit the bill. 
&gt; This is plenty dangerous. Putting requirements or required duties on someone based on their genitals is ridiculous and oppressive.  You're right, I should have been more careful with my words here. My point is that *one of the things* that makes gender roles dangerous is giving one gender requirements AT THE EXCLUSION of the other. I'm not sure how to make this clearer, but telling men to step up DOES NOT EQUAL telling women not to.   I'm done. I do not align with the view that singling out men is necessarily sexist. They are the ones with the power, and women have far more at stake. We are not equal in practice, as much as I would like it to be so. I'm not going to sit and pretend that many, many more men don't need a wake-up call. If you've read a single thing about the concept of patriarchy and all you got was "gender roles, ew!" you missed the larger point.
I already told my close girlfriends, and they know exactly who he is. I'm not running around town publicly shaming, him, but I'm not interested in preserving his privacy either. In my opinion, it's become a part of my experience. If, say, a friend asked me what happened on Saturday night, why should I leave that part out? He gave me this nasty little gift, and now it's mine.  However, I do realize that this isn't a perfect world, and often guys don't call their friends out for shitty behavior, but instead write the victim off as a lying bitch (or something equally insidious). If I were to be in a situation where mutual friends, whom I don't know too well, were to ask about our distance. I'd probably take your advice. Thanks for the suggestion.
I can tell a migraine is coming because my vision feels blurry and all lights have bright radials/halos around them, I should probably talk to my doctor. Mine almost always are right around when I would be ovulating, and right at the end of my period.
If I were flamewarring I would cuss a lot more and not actually make a well thought out post. I try not to shitpost, just discuss things I find interesting.   Even if you can't read Hebrew it helps to have some knowledge of the culture events that were going on around the time of the writings. If you do know Hebrew, or at least look up a few words, things get even more interesting and you start to read closer to where the writers were originally coming from instead of solely through your own culture/language.   As for the rest, those are excellent examples of passages in the Bible that refer to old Jewish law that aren't as relevant today. I can understand why it might be important for someone to follow them as part of their culture, tradition, or symbolically, but knowing why they were important back then allows us to realize that they originated from a practical instead of a divine purpose and allows us to chose what we want to keep and what is no longer relevant. It also shows us that they weren't laws for the sake of having arbitrary rules but actually existed to guide people to make healthier and safer decisions. Similarly we may come up with some new rules in the same spirit to apply to modern contexts (i.e. don't eat too much processed cheese) that we may pass on to others. You end up having a much more enriching read when you consider context. 
Sincere apologies.
https://warosu.org/data/fa/img/0074/48/1387509452625.gif
I'm just going to jump in and second Madoka Magica. Don't read anything about it online first though.  Happy Watching :)
I'm sorry you're so sick of hearing about rape.   I'm personally more sick of people being raped. 
[deleted]
For the most part, I'm with you.  &gt; I think the Mother's Day sermon should center around male circumcision and how women judge men for things like height and baldness [...]  ^ not that though; that's just biology, yo. I can't help who I'm attracted to either. e.g., I wish I could say I'm attracted to overweight people but... I'm just *not*, and I refuse to fake it.  Now, if there's ladiez out there who are ignoring their romantic feelings for balding/short guys because of social stigma, then fuck that. Lecture lecture lecture.    
If you're into subtitles, I recommend watching "Raise the Red Lantern"
It's not good advice to listen to people? 
[deleted]
I could never put my finger on it properly. As an Asian lady, I've never actually had anyone tell me they liked me because they had a fetish for Asians. I think it's likely to be anime-linked or linked to the idea that we're just foreign. I'm not sure. I do know, on the other hand, that the thing with Asians liking white people is because white skin is seen as a sign of being rich and well-off in their culture, or it used to be.
I don't know. Maybe it has something to do with general fascination of the sort of West vs. East, orientalism, mysterious other thing. 
[deleted]
It's sad that a pastor has to drive home the point that rape, misogyny and violence against women are wrong. I was raised to abhor these things and that's how I raised my son. I mean WTF?
It should have been part of the same sermon. Try your damnedest to accept and respect everyone. I mean you don't have to be a saint but don't be an asshole.
No, it is definitely not just you. Women are extremely poorly represented in movies. It probably has something to do with most major screenwriters being male, audiences being used to the leads or important characters being male, etc. It's extremely annoying because it ruins the variety of characters that can be used, and is obviously sexist.  If you would like to see alternatives with good females characters I recommend Studio Ghibli movies. In particular Nausicaa of the Valley of the Wind, Spirited Away, Kiki's Delivery Service and Princess Mononoke.
sounds like he could have an opiate addiction that getting bigger, could be oxycontin. Opiates do a great job at surpressing your sex drive, its the only real reason i could see this happening.
Well, maybe we should both sleep on our thoughts and try again some other day if the inspiration hits?
[deleted]
Male here.  1) Personal stress.  Work or otherwise.  He may just have something on his mind (subconscious or otherwise that he is thinking about).  2) Diet.  He may have changed his eating habits which is affecting things.  If he was eating at Salad Creations 3x/wk and now he's eating at Taco Bell 3x/wk, it can affect him.  3) Weight.  Ties in to the two above.  Being 20 lbs different in weight can massively affect your libido.  Wanting &amp; able to perform become different.  You get winded so much easier.  4) Medications.  Even things like allergy pills.  I take migraine meds and they jack up my sex drive sometimes.  
[deleted]
He's a hero.  He has decided his treatments are not worth the toll on the ones he loves. Believe me, he has you and your mom uppermost in his mind. You're pretty blessed to have such a great and giving guy. 
I can't really enjoy most Hollywood movies either. I find that many of the characters, regardless of gender, to be flat and cliche.
[deleted]
Oh God, I know what you mean. With Breaking Bad, everybody bitched about the female characters. Almost everybody in that show had major character flaws, yet the female characters got picked on the hardest. Skyler responded in the only way she knew how, while also kind of losing her mind (who wouldn't?) and yet the actress herself (Anna Gunn, great actress) was getting death threats and shit.  It's just a joke how misogynistic our cultures can be. I agree with how annoying it is when that blatantly comes through the writing of a show.
&gt; What is this quote aimed at? It was the most damning one for me. A woman should be completely submissive to her man because he is her husband? Do you support this?  Firstly, it's good to note that the passage you're citing starts with:  &gt;Submit to one another out of reverence for Christ.  Anyways, as to your question -- who was this quote aimed at? It's aimed at wives with husbands who "love their wives, just as Christ loved the church and gave himself up for her." In other words, husbands so self-sacrifical that they love like Christ did, who was willing to endure even a criminal's death on a cross for his belived. No outlandish statements? How about actually, in all truth and honesty, being willing to *die* for your wife?   To tack on to that, if we were to look at all the texts concerning wives in the bible, we'd find a different defintion of "submitting" than being completely submissive. We'd find wives who give their husbands wise consul, are indepandant businesswomen, with no need for a husband for their ultimate reward, who are able to hold independant opinions and who are persuasive in their deed and word to bring their husbands around.   Biblical submissivness, and gender roles broadly are pretty nuanced issues -- it's not just the wife always does what the husband says end of story.
But the hospital is making a lot of money with a c section and the extra recovery time in the hospital. A LOT of c sections are for the convenience of the doctor. And let's face it, the more of them he does the more he's making. A c section is not the best option for the average delivery. There is a risk with the anesthesia which also affects the baby, the risk of infection, pain, slower recovery and then of course, repeat c sections. 
[deleted]
Oh I know how you feel! At least I think I do. I don't know what to say. I never know what to say. I usually just don't say anything. I don't know WHAT the boys are thinking or why they say what they say. Sometimes it's really vulgar things, and sometimes they say things that I just KNOW thay wouldn't say to other boys, only to girls. It makes me so mad. I'm trying to be a more bold person and to be able to say something back to them. I don't know what i could say though that would not make them say something else back to me. I feel very weak and stupid because of that sometimes. mostly I try to ignore it. what do you do?  
[deleted]
Part of what seems to have contributed to the high infection rate was that the bandages would be put on wet... and then left sometimes for a week or two...     so not just compression damage, but moisture and the lack of fresh/clean dressings (and probably not all that sterile to start with...)    What's surprising, based on the little I know, is that so many of the girls survived!  
I don't think she was blind to our issues, I think she thought things were better than they were. We were both very emotionally naive but for different reasons.  I thought romantic gestures and fortitude could fix issues.  And she thought romantic gestures meant things were okay.  If your partner is puking from stress but still claiming everything is ship shape, don't believe them.  If you are puking because you are afraid to talk to your partner, get help.  "If your headed into hell, at least stop running" 
You and me both.   Super annoyed, as I've been on Nuvaring for 7+ years and had a migraine history for over 15 years.......  Grumble.
[This](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=q3rLof2cnzg), too.
You're still a teenager and your body is still working things out. It might not always be consistent.  It's probably just stress.  If it still hasn't come in a week, then take the test.  I know it's really scary but remind yourself there could be another explanation.  Keep us updated!
[deleted]
You're absolutely right, that could be argued. But the Bible literally says woman was created for mans sake. Unless I'm interpreting this terribly, in which case please correct me.  "For man does not originate from woman, but woman from man; for indeed man was not created for the woman's sake, but woman for the man's sake."  Corinthians 11:9
You speak of misogyny, but how many romantic movies were made with men in mind?
This. It's not about being covered or even not looking attractive if the character wants to look attractive- it's about the acrobatic character who can't be cosplayed without 6 feet of double sided tape to hold her shirt on. It's about the sword fighter who is fighting with other sword fighting types who somehow never takes a horrific gut wound despite leaving her bare belly open to stabbing. It's about the hand to hand combat master who wears her long flowing hair in such a way that someone could grab her by it and rip it out, and it probably gets in her eyes when she's trying to do stuff. It's about the undercover female cop trying to run down a perp in 4 inch heels. 
First, I apologize that you feel objectified, and I hope that what I have to say does not offend because it is not intended to. I feel that this is a potentially touchy subject, and I don't mean to throw fuel on the fire.  I would consider myself to have an Asian fetish. I haven't yet seen my reasons mentioned here, so I wanted to provide my point of view.  I can't speak for everyone with my preference, but for me it has nothing to do with a view that Asians are more subservient. Nor does my preference stem from any media that I've consumed (that I am aware of). I feel like either explanation is a little dismissive.  There is just...something about the eyes, various skin tones, and body types that I associate with "Asian" women. I find it exceptionally attractive and believe me, I could not tell you why with certainty.  I was unable to find an article that I was searching for with a few minutes of Googling, but evolutionary psychology could potentially explain the attraction. By finding a partner who is obviously genetically "different" it encourages merging of widely branched genes, which could create beneficial traits in offspring.  I am not certain how valid that is, but it makes a certain kind of sense.  If there are any questions regarding what I've said or my preference, please let me know. I would rather discuss it than create conflict.
Pick yourself up and move on, you will respect yourself later for it.
It's actually wonderful. Haha there are days where I want to run away but I just slip into a bottle of wine and watch some netflix instant when the kids go to bed. And it's all better by morning LOL
It is undeniable that there were men involved in it, but the objective was still the advancement of women.  I must admit that I am not very familiar with the Marxist Feminism, though.  My main point was that it seems unfair to now ask of feminism to directly embrace other causes because that would take away resources to be allocated for these causes when cause number one hasn't been achieved.  I said in another post that by fighting for the for the extinction of strict gender roles in society, which alone, would solve a lot of men's problems, such as being the sole provider for the family, not being discouraged to report rape, being more often the primary care giver to children, which as a result would make possible for more fathers to obtain custody of children, etc, feminism is indirectly addressing the advancing of men in society.
It doesn't matter if you don't understand it, you just have to accept and respect it.  I wear it on my body for me, myself, and I. I'm worth a bit of effort. I am nice to me. Why is that so strange to you?
&gt; Unfortunately (apart from the mirena coil) they all tend to give you heavy/irregular bleeds  Actually, no. Since they work in part by thinning out your endometrial lining, bleeding is generally reduced, so periods wind up lighter and can often be shorter. The non hormonal Paragard IUD does tend to make periods heavier and longer and more painful. But I'm talking mainly about progestin methods.  There is some risk of irregularity but the horror stories online don't always tell the real picture. All of these methods have the potential to stop your period Spotting can definitely happen but many people are very regular on these methods. I know I am. Progestin pills also got rid of most of my period/PMS symptoms.  Like any other form of birth control, it takes trial and error to see how it will work with your body.
[deleted]
Well, not really movies, but yeah. Fairy Tail, Ouran Highschool HostClub, Kill la Kill, Black Rock Shooter, MekakuCity Actors, Death Note, and many more, have very interesting female leads or characters. They are all badass in their own ways, and they have gone through character development, some mre than the actual main character. Lucy, Takada, Haruhi, Black Rock Shooter, Kido, Azami, Shion, these are all great females in animes. But let me cry in a corner now *Azami plz*
[deleted]
&gt; it ignores if male side characters fall into the same thing  Can you explain what you mean by this?
at some point In my life I realised the way women are shown in media and it certainly killed a lot if it for me 
I looooove that documentary!  It's amazing.
[Here is the relevant FAQ.](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/wiki/faq#wiki_xy_here.3B_am_i_allowed_to_post.3F)
I know you haven't mentioned any bra issues but a 36D is made for women with approx 36" underbust and 40" bust measurements, so it's likely that there's a better size for you if you check /r/abrathatfits! Of course, if you're happy with your bras then ignore this, heh.
&gt; So it's semantics.  Right.  I edited my last comment a bit for clarity.  I was just attempting to explain what I meant in any case.  I made up the term "sleaze-apologism" to mean someone actively trying to defend other sleazy behavior.  All I care about is that you know what I'm trying to say, and I'll try to learn to use better rhetoric in the future, but that's a life-long learning process for me.  &gt; but they're apologists for appalling behavior  But also there are people who haven't matured in their understanding of gender issues, newbies taking the first steps into grappling with new information about a world that is worse than they ever knew.  And they should be criticized.  &gt; excusers trying to invalidate the reality  The people I'm talking about aren't actively "*trying to*", they don't have an agenda I mean.  They're just reacting impulsively.  I'm not saying you can forgive them, but I am saying they are different people from those who are, at root, prejudiced.  We're talking about 2x being a default sub and seeing a lot of gen pop males *be themselves*.  So, you know, there's going to be a lot of ignorance.  I think there's a significant difference between people who are actively hating on women and those who haven't yet "grown up" - one we need to GTFO, the other we need offer teachable perspective to.  Either that or 2x shouldn't be a default sub.
YES. IT'S SO ANNOYING. I love some of his female characters (Brienne, Arya, Sansa) but good god, man, lay off this shit.
The worst one I saw was Sorority Boys. While I don't always mind watching movies about guys trying to score (because usually they don't), the casual way everyone treated what looked like a date rape scene was horrifying.
[deleted]
[deleted]
It's called the Bechdel test! 
Lock the bathroom door?
If you're going to get the right one checked, I'd just get both checked. Better to be safe. Your doctors should also be made aware of your familial history of breast cancer.
They offered prayer in addition to other forms of support.   At this point, I think you just like being cruel. 
Yeah because surgery that requires a general anaesthetic is something one gets done on a whim.  There is cost, and there is recovery and with any surgery there is risk.  I treat a few people who have a decent chest on them, and I want to hug them with the muscular damage I can feel, and what they must go through are horrendous. 
I haven't heard of quite so much input from the kids, but I've known Indians and Pakistani people who have arranged marriages.  Most of them seem okay with it.  One woman is really not okay with it and is just waiting for her sisters to get married so she can leave her husband.  It has always struck me as supremely weird given my cultural background.  I wouldn't let my parents pick out a piece of furniture I had to live with for any amount of time, much less a life partner.
Maybe you can try and think up some nice reactions. Like to the shorts guy, "Yeah, well, I wear those tight shorts normally, but with the diarrhea lately, I need room for the diaper - someone your age probably knows how it is...". As with the starer, give him a (fake?) business card and tell him to make an appointment with the equal opportunities colleague if he wants a staring contest. 
I saw a similar one with stealing bikes. They had a white guy try to steal a bike, a black guy, and a white women.   People stared at the white guy and a few asked what he was doing, but no one really tried to stop him.   The black guy had a mini mob form and the cops called within a few minutes.    The women had a dude make his wife wait while he helped her steal it.   It's surprising to me that less men confronted the women than the man, it seems like confronting a dude would more likely result in a fight. 
Jeez, what a brat. I'm glad everyone else recognized how inappropriate it was, at least.  I think my biggest peeve with not looking mixed is having people try to dictate my heritage to me. If I say I'm half black, a lot of people will say "no, you're not" or "but you're really just white." Funnily enough, I've never really had a problem with black people telling me I can't identify this way, only white people.
[deleted]
No, I'm from the UK as well and "Asian" means people from Asia; China and Japan included. A quick PSA as well to say that some people consider "oriental" to be a slur.
It's one thing to have a fantasy; it's another thing entirely to expect a certain subset of women to fit that fantasy based on their ethnicity.
Yeah, someone made the old "men are sexualized too because muscles" argument, but they'd never have a man show off his butt like that in marketing. Because the audience is generally presumed to be straight men, and straight men would find it vulnerable and not empowering. But of course it's alright for women to constantly be depicted this way.
Hence, rottentomatoes and imdb. Keeping us from wasting our time since.. whenever they started...
Just fill a couple of plastic bags with dirt. A few kilos each worth. Maybe even loan them a bra to put the plastic bags into and put on around themselves. Halter necks preferred.
The threat I was describing was more of a chronic one rather than an acute one.  The entire idea about the gun registry is that the gun is tracked from sale to sale.  By being tracked, it cannot go to someone who isn't supposed to have it (like flowing into the violence in Mexico where random ethicless Americans straw purchase these guns for the gangs and organized crime in Mexico.  The same thing happens between states with less strict gun laws to ones with stricter ones.  Criminals often acquire these weapons from people who straw purchase these from states with laxer gun laws).  The only flaw to this idea is that guns last forever (if they're taken care of).  But the idea is that even these will have to be registered, and if you don't then you're possessing the gun illegally.  But it would make the trafficking of these unregistered guns illegal, and so movement of these unregistered,illegal weapons will be a harder thing to do.  Why I would prefer a cop isn't for how much training a cop has with a gun or how good a shot he/she is necessarily.  It's more about being trained to handle situations and civilians. It's also for being part of a team.
I don't think what I said is actually all that complex. It's pretty simple.  Imperialism = white supremacy = white ownership.  Also, there is no "traditionally white." Whiteness itself is constructed based on imperialism and colonialism.  You might wanna brush up on your race scholarship.  And there is no reason whatsoever to assume smaller and thinner women produce better offspring. In fact, you might assume larger/stronger women to produce larger/stronger offspring...  Edit: Here is a good place to start. http://scholarlycommons.law.wlu.edu/cgi/viewcontent.cgi?article=1243&amp;context=crsj
[deleted]
[deleted]
Oh!  Okay, it's available in America...!
Yee-haw, Sister!
&gt;And it doesn't cancel out the whole plot and characters. '  No, but it sure would be nice not to have to like things *in spite of* these things. I'd be awesome to be able to just say 'this series has great female characters' without the caveats.  
[deleted]
Have you seen "Edge of Tomorrow" yet? I absolutely loved Emily Blunt's character. Best female action hero since Ripley, in my opinion. But with sci-fi and action movies being what they are, I feel like I might have missed some sexism because I was too enthralled by Ms. Blunt to notice it. (I may or may not have an enormous lady crush on her...)
Women I love are different from women I solely want to have sex with?  It's fucked.  And dumb.  
This bugs mit a lot, even as a male reader. I noticed it in the (older?) books of Stephen King. I even stopped reading 1Q84 by Murakami after finishing the first part, just because it was too much reading about bouncing boobs, or people talking about boobs.
I always got interrupted before and after my transition.
At its core feminism IS about bringing rights to women, which is good.   How ever, I feel the radicals are too prevalent, toxic, and unpoliced for me to feel comfortable with feminism anymore. Most feminists I've come into contact with have been hateful and vindictive. Some even out right saying they wanted men to have LESS rights than women as pay back for thousands of years of marginalization. The feminism that I've been exposed to is hateful toxic shell of what it should be being used as a cover for hateful women to be sexists with no consequence. I've out right seen feminists say that women are practically scared little field mice when it comes to men and that because of that no man has a right to even speak to us. I've seen claims that all heterosexual sex is rape and that sexuality is a choice that we are brainwashed by men to believe it isn't.   From my experiences with feminists, and the facts that I disagree with many if its theories like rape culture and patriarchy. No I would not consider myself a feminist and try to stay as far away from the label as I can, I prefer the terms egalitarian or equalist. 
I can't speak for Marryme, but Donna's awesomeness can't make up for the rest of the show's flaws. I still watch with friends and family, but Doctor Who could be SO MUCH BETTER.
I'm a server and don't feel like I need to "outdo" other prettier waitresses.  It's not like we're serving the same tables.  That doesn't make sense.  As for saying that women go at each other's throats because of attention from male coworkers...really? That's not been my experience and sounds like a stereotype more than reality.  I think it might be more of a back-end/front-end thing.  I know that definitely exists at the restaurant where I work, no matter how silly it is.  And besides, as a server one of the best things you can do is be on the cook's good side.  So many benefits to making friends with the kitchen.
I'm a male and I agree. They're either screaming cock bait or massive hard style dominatrix lesbians. There is apparently no middle ground.   The most disgusting use of a female role I've ever seen was in a riddick film. Where there was a pretty cool lesbian character in it, she wasn't too over the top, just really chill. And the she gets fucked straight by the main guy. Like, really. It's 2014. The mentality that gay chicks need dick is so out dated it's unreal. 
[deleted]
Are you saying, you don't feel like conforming to gender roles prevents you from believing in gender equality?
:) Yay! Can I recommend a light but fun way to read about Italian culture? Detective series staring Inspector Montalbano, by Andrea Camilleri. Hugely popular. You can find most of his books in English on Kindle. 
[deleted]
Make-up is pretty clearly gendered (although not entirely, of course). Cars are not. Cars are pretty damned ubiquitous, in fact. 
Hopefully not TOO off-topic, but I can't stand most mainstream female singers for this reason. Male singers (more often than not) have musical talent and are unique and sing songs with deep, meaningful lyrics. Female mainstream singers seem to make their primary objective to be sexy. Then when you listen to their lyrics they are either plain stupid, or just whiney and stereotypes of the "dumb female".
[deleted]
Self perpetuating bias...  it seems you and the other person fit into the "double-standards" category.   As for muslims. Where are you from? Wait... it's irrelevant. You already made up your mind. If I brought some of the Muslims I worked with to say something similar you'd accuse them of being self-hating racists or something similar...  and *this* mindset is what turns people off 
I just did the google search you spoke of and I was surprised. What a shame.
The problem is, suggesting seeing a doctor may be seen as saying "you're broken, we need to fix you" rather than "we have an issue that we need to sort out between us". If his libido HAS changed, then approaching it from a medical perspective as a concerned wife is more likely to work than if he's always been like this, and she's realised she has trouble dealing with it.
Oh, I was on that campaign too, and I think I know very well the reasons why it succeeded far far beyond all initial expectations, as well as the reasons why it came up short and Kerry won.  &gt; In 2004, Howard Dean lost his chance with the Dean Yell.  ... but that, I am quite confident, was not one of them.  I think your understanding of that campaign is very flawed if you think the yell was as important as it's popularly portrayed to be.  If the yell hadn't happened, I doubt anything would've turned out much differently.   However, your minimizing the Iraq war as an argument for favoring Hillary Clinton for the *Democratic primaries* is both illogical and inexcusable.  That has nothing to do with an analysis of what worked and didn't work in the Dean campaign.  Totally separate issues.  &gt; I learned that it is better to have an Al Gore than a George W. Bush.  .  &gt; I learned how important it is to not focus on one issue.   However, it does seem like you're committed to continuing with strawmen, so it seems that your personal commitment to wanting Hillary Clinton, rather than any of what you say about issues, is really in control, and it's useless to point out the contradictions in your arguments.  It's sad that people are so in love with Hillary that they'll betray what they're supposedly working for, and push her over the possibility of much much better options, under the delusion that she's the best option.  Minimizing something as monstrous as a war of choice against millions of people, and the fact that nominating her will promote yet more such wars in the future, is the price of that blindness.  &gt; Finally, it isn't that I don't care about the Iraq war.  You pretend to care, but your need to support Hillary Clinton makes you think it's much much less important than it really is.  You've learned nothing.  We can have much better candidates than Hillary Clinton.  You are working to prevent that.  Shame on you, for real.
I can't get a reduction because they are not heavy enough. That's what a doctor said. I couldn't believe it when I heard that. Why am I doing this? Well when I need to sit down and try to crack my back they just laugh and don't help. It's me trying to get them to understand and possibly get them to do some lifting as well. I didn't know about that subreddit. All my bras suck so I Will check it out. Thanks!
There's a new sci-fi/action/horror movie currently in production, "Z for Zachariah" which has a young female lead (the story was written from her PoV). Anyone here like the book?
&gt;Have you ever had to worry about having someone beat your ass 'cause some mouthy drunk bitch wouldn't shut up?   Nope.  &gt;Have you ever had to worry about being accused of rape because some girl had a couple drinks, was pissed at her boyfriend and decided to teach him a lesson by having sex with you, the regreted it in the morning?  No again.  &gt;Have you ever had to worry that being friendly and complimenting a coworker's appearance would be perceived as a sexual advance, or worse, harassment?  Again, no.   None of those situations have ever arisen, and I've never had to adjust my partying habits or work attitude to keep them from happening. You're right, it wasn't an example of a "daily hardship", just an example of an adjustment the majority of women have made just to enjoy themselves. I have a wife and daughter as well, and my wife never leaves her drink unattended unless I am with her, and I will teach my daughter the same. 
I do feel for OP though but unfortunately there's no clear cut solution to this.
I totally agree - I can't watch any Tom Cruise movies because the girls keep getting progressively younger and they seem to be caricatures of "strong women" who always just happen to sleep with this arrogant jerk of a character.  I was so disappointed that Emily Blunt did Edge of Tomorrow, I have really loved her other movies and felt like she brought dimension to a lot of characters that could have been so stereotypical.
No, you really didn't.  Your point could have stood on its own without your gender being an unnecessary crutch.
Ugh I wish Americans would remember that a lot of us aren't from there. I wouldn't even spell in American English though or use pounds, especially because I like people to remember this isn't an American-specific website.
I answered your question by explaining that rape culture doesn't mean that rape is acceptable and legal, which DID answer your question, because your question was irrelevant and you needed the proper definition.   Go and read up on Steubenville and Torrington Highschool - both examples of how our children view rape as acceptable and normal.   Rape culture is the way CNN paid more attention to the lives of the boys involved in Steubenville than to the girl they assaulted. ([Link.)](http://news.yahoo.com/blogs/lookout/cnn-steubenville-rape-poppy-harlow-144458279.html)  The way that rape victims are questioned on what they wore, what they said, what they did, where they went, often *immediately*, rather than be met with sympathy and support? Rape culture.  Rape culture is the way we focus on how women can avoid being raped instead of how to teach people not to rape (and this goes for both genders). With every single other crime, there's a focus on how to stop people from committing that crime, but rape is different.   Rape culture is the way we assume that men can't be raped.  Rape culture is the cases of Audrie Pott and Rehtaeh Parsons who were assaulted and had pictures of said assaults posted on line. Both girls committed suicide.   Rape culture is the fact that in 31 states, rapists can *sue for custody*.  Rape culture is the evident in the judge who sentenced a 50 year old man to only *thirty* days in jail because he thought the 14 year old girl the suspect had raped was 'older than her chronological age. ([Link.)](http://www.cnn.com/2013/11/30/justice/montana-rape-30-day-sentence/)  Rape culture is images like this: http://everydayfeminism.com/wp-content/uploads/2014/03/Untitled1.png  Rape culture is crap like this [picture](http://www.huffingtonpost.com/2013/09/06/texas-truck-decal-woman_n_3881700.html) and the fact that a company thought they could make money off of it.   Rape culture is *not* about whether or not the average person thinks rape is bad. Rape culture is a society that is overly sympathetic to the perpetrators and normalises the idea of sexual violence.  
It's a movement for women by women. It was a good movement when it was demanding real equality. Now it's a bullshit movement, that only claims equality. 
I think it's interesting that your gender transition influenced people's perception of your race.  Kinda neat, and a sign of how subjective all of of these impressions are.
[deleted]
21, Mexican-American, pretty pasty.
IMO, it's unfortunate that people choose to judge the whole of a movement by those on the extremities. People pay attention to those who talk the loudest instead of taking in the variety of views that are present beneath the umbrella term of 'feminism'. 
Oh god.. yeah the number of men who treat Asian women like one big homogenous bucket of females that they can pick and choose from (because obviously all Asian women want a big strong white man to take care of them) makes me cringe.
Yeah, and that was at *college*. I knew the area and had access to every bathroom there. If I'm in a new area? It's not often really convenient for me to look for restrooms that are a) public, or in stores big enough that I don't have to be a paying customer to use them and b) are single-person restrooms or have a handicapped stall with a sink in them. Honestly, I've found that just finding a restroom I am allowed to use can be a bit of a trek, without having requirements beyond "waste basket in or near the stall".   And if your work doesn't have the right kind of bathrooms, it's pretty much always very inconvenient to change your cup. 
&gt; I recently told him I don't want him to have any contact with her what so ever   You really think tell him who he can and cannot talk to is going to make him want to be with you?
[deleted]
You're not overstepping anything at all. I think you could go a lot further if you wanted. Invite her out to lunch or something, and open a discussion about menstruation and human biology. Tell her she can ask you any questions she has, either now or in the future, and you will answer. Tell her that anything you two talk about will be kept strictly confidential, that you will not be sharing it with your family (this will make her feel comfortable and encourage her to ask the questions without fear). 
Well, I'm not sure she deserves THAT much credit - her predecessor removed the coverage, and she just reinstated it.  Which was good, but it was still her party that fucked it up on the first place. 
It's an obvious alternative explanation that would have to be discredited to make an alternative assertion.
Mean girls.
Another football / World Cup lover signing in.    No problems with me liking it though; I was born and raised in Brazil, so it is kind of expected!  :)
&gt; However, a birth certificate is just that, it documents your birth. And your sex at the time of birth.   Few people update their weight / height information on that form =)
&gt;I dunno, lick it? What do you think?  HAHA! I think that would never, ever happen. That's just not a feature people fetishize.   &gt;Yeah, you could consider the epicanthic fold to be sexual. I don't see why you consider that impossible...  Not impossible. Just **extremely** uncommon. Sure, if you could get off just from licking the fold, or you spent a whole bunch of time staring and fapping to pictures of it...yeah, that would be a fetish. But if you just thought it was an attractive feature? Not a fetish. 
Actually, it's not too strange now that I think about it more.  I don't think it's unusual to kiss your partner while having face-to-face sex, and the eyes are right there...
If we were gonna name the movement today, I would agree that "feminism" is not the best name for it. However, the movement has been going on since the late 1800's (even earlier, if you consider writers like Mary Wollstonecraft). At this point, we're arguing changing the name of a historical movement, which was aptly named at the time that it began.
Aren't you stigmatizing people with fetishes?  It's as if you are saying that sexism is inherent to having a fetish and the only difference between having a preference and a fetish is the sexism.
Look at movies and the other stuff that the media aggrandizes. Am I far off? Look at that recent Marky Mark movie with the rock where they are meat heads. Very similar, right?  Sorry! Yes there are certain things that we can get away with because it is a female subreddit and its for us to express out views without the usual "tits or GTO" that we are met with. Needless to say, the internet can be hostile to women just as real life is.   I think that we need to create our own slogan... hmm...
&gt; Thank you for proving my point for me. You can do whatever you want - until it starts affecting other people.   1. You can't *do whatever you want* you absolute nutter.  2. How on earth does what I said *"prove your point"*??   **Everything** you have said is predicated upon what *you think* or what *you believe*. Great. **YOU** don't like rape jokes. Too bad that people don't have to take your feelings into account when they live their lives or do their job.  &gt; Some things are not funny.    Humour is probably the most subjective thing I know. Your statement has down syndrome.  &gt; Just don't bitch about the consequences if you are ever in a room with another survivor and you send them over the edge because you were careless and you didn't give a shit about how your actions could impact someone else.   I won't. And I won't *"bitch"* if I inadvertently upset someone when make a joke about someone's dog being hit by a car. You do comprehend that **there are other people who could be upset by jokes than just rape victims?**.   You seem to be under the impression I've never met a "survivor". I've known many.  &gt; And maybe it's my personal pet peeve. I doubt it though   It is.  &gt; 'Oh I was just joking...geez.' No you weren't, you little bastard.     **Jesus Christ, get over it.**  &gt; Did I mention this was a pet peeve? ____^   See, I was right.  &gt; It's like a smoker. I don't care that you smoke. But don't blow it in my face and expect me to kiss your ass.   Nobody expects you to "kiss their ass" you dolt. They just expect to behave like an adult, and not a petulant child. 
Some people, not just men, will avoid confrontation at all costs.  That's just how some people are.  If you didn't have biases then where did the assumptions come from? Unless there's more information to the story that you didn't include?  Also I don't deny that certain people act the way you are describing, as in only respecting the boyfriend / husband. I just am pointing out that there's no way for you to make that assumption in the situation as described.   &gt;you are also making a guess that this catcalling jerk would have responded apologetically to anyone who called him out  The apology is hardly part of it, it's just appeasing the person you see as the threat. 
[deleted]
Haha exactly! On a positive note, I'm glad to see people discussing transgender issues, even if they're uninformed. It's a big step for sure. 
Oh, poor Precious Little Treasure! ;-;
The tall scenario is vaguely biographical. I'm a 6' tall woman, but when I wear 6" heels, it's like I'm at my "real" height. But even that is me appreciating an actual measurable difference.   But you are probably right, there's probably a brain difference of some sort. I wonder how early that can be caught? Would it be good if all babies were tested, and raised as their "real" gender, if we had the technology? But I don't even know what that would mean. I assume such an advanced society would have abandoned gendered pronouns anyway. 
another person on here, cokecanmalachy, posted the article which explains why this is a problem:  http://www.thebolditalic.com/articles/3180-why-yellow-fever-is-different-than-having-a-type-
[deleted]
Yeah, this.   I once had a slight crush on a very sweet man. However, he confessed to me he was gay (we were friends and we both come from a pretty conservative background), in confidence.  He didn't know I liked him at the time, and he soon came out much later to all our other friends, but when I found out I was like !!!! and my vagina  dried up as quickly as a drop of water under a blowtorch.   I mean, finding out someone doesn't like your gender should be an automatic "out of your mind" sort of thing, IMO. 
I love that it's a default  If they're going out of their way to cause trouble it means we hit a nerve with them.    It's a shame individual users are getting threats via private nessage.  Reddit here a better system to ban trouble makers
Hang out with and talk with women more, maybe take up a traditionally 'female' hobby like knitting and join a knitting circle or something similar and see what makes you still feel 'male' despite being actively engaged in something traditionally 'female' and surrounded by ladies. Self-identity may be easier to experience than describe.
[deleted]
The red flag for me was that he's making excuses, using his parents not to move forward in life with you, his wife.  He may be okay living with his parents, but if you're not I feel like he should want to find a solution.  I feel like their may be some genuine-ness about his parents, but mostly it seems like he probably enjoys no bills and less responsibility.  If you guys moved out then he'd be dealing with real life stuff, taking care of his family.    It's only natural you'd want your own space for your family.  I hope it works out for you.  
I'm feminine and petite, not because I'm of Asian descent but because that's what I like.  The rest of it- soft spoken, fashionable, and traditional - those are personality and cultural traits.   You're more likely to find fashionable ladies in bigger, metropolitan areas, and you're more likely to find traditional in religious areas... race be damned. 
I agree with this answer. I also like the idea of bringing it up with your counselor privately first if possible. That may give you the right amount of support to help make explaining how you feel easier.
in the same way that *you* identify as a boy or girl, that guy identifies as a boy. He has a vagina, but he identifies as a boy. 
that user has a valid point regardless of whatever else he or she has said in the past. your depression and bodily issues would improve with a bit of exercise. trust me, i've been there too, and i'm also taking welbutrin right now.
&gt; Humans are idiots. Humans are total idiots. The vastness of our stupidity boggles the goddamn mind.  Remember, a person is smart, but people are stupid.   
[deleted]
... Wat.   I'm saying you can't gain an understanding of trans issues if you don't accept trans people as fellow people.    You're saying you can't gain an acceptance of trans people unless you understand.    Whatever. Calling me a troll is pretty damn low of you. At no point was I illogical or inflammatory. 
Until you're being charged and cuffed. Or beat down by a white knight. You mentioned bars... You fear your safety when surrounded by people?  Ask the poor bastard I watched get choked out in the mall the other day how much he liked his shoes. All for *daring* to try and stop a shoplifting woman from taking a purse.  He grabbed the purse, and started yelling for security, and telling her to stay out. She began yelling "leave me alone! Let me go! Help me!"... So a big bruiser no-neck son of a bitch came up behind him, and choked him out so hard his face turned purple. I had to intervene, as the shoplifter ran way, purse in hand.
[deleted]
&gt; mirrad   really?
I've heard the casual mention of a boyfriend plenty, whether its just conversation or an attempt to get someone to stop pestering them. I'd say it works more often, because in addition to some people respecting the relationship, some of the less savory people are afraid of possible confrontations with that boyfriend.   Then again, there are also the guys who don't care what you say. A guy threatened to jump me at a bar (had four other guys with him); I'd mocked him for harassing my friend. That incident made me realize how annoying that guy has to be for a woman. Would be nice if we could live in a world where no one had to be disingenuous to avoid that guy.  
Interesting points. I would suggest it's not meant to make the men seem humiliating. It's just an attempt to make people realise that the females in those poses are over the top and overtly sexual in a way men are rarely portrayed. It certainly did the trick for me. I'm so used to women being that way in comics that I never thought about the boobs and butt emphasis. Seeing Hawkeye et al arrayed that way made me think about how silly the women's poses can be. Sometimes, it's obvious. Emma Frost and Koriand'r are purposely over-sexed. Othertimes, you should stop and think "yeah, I guess it's unlikely that Ororo would contort herself so her b &amp; b are your main areas of focus". It's one of those 'once you see it, it can't be unseen' sort of things. It doesn't ruin comics for me but I wouldn't miss it if it were gone either.   When they rule 34 things, not many changes have to be made to make the female heroes look like Playboy spreads. I wouldn't mind focusing on their powers rather than their physiques. Or, as you say, evening the score with Playgirl-styled male heroes in the same book.
Wow, this is great, thank you! If you don't mind me asking, are you on any medications for your depression/anxiety? And also, you say that you're not as happy on BC, could you please elaborate on that if it's not too much trouble?
You were right for wanting to get over there and help the girl, and your BF was right in stopping you from physically intervening, and in calling 911 and making sure the police got there. You had no way to know if your presence would be enough to keep the guy from beating her further, or from escalating and hurting/killing her or you! He was right to point out that someone willing to behave that way in broad daylight is not someone operating in their right mind. (Except for the creeptastic thank-you wave for letting him cross the street. "Excuse me, pardon me, gotta go beat the shit out of this girl here." What the actual fuck.)    So I applaud you both for your instincts in wanting to help and in your management of the situation. I think you made the best choice you could under the circumstances. 
That is actually what my new derm suggested. Yes, you do have to go on two methods of BC (usually BC pills and condoms) and some doctors are very strict when it comes to that. However, my Derm and his assistant told me that I can also just choose abstinence and condoms as the two methods of choice. However, accutane won't be given to those with history of depression or anything like that :( hence this post.
Soft-spoken, my ass.
[deleted]
Oh my, can I actually take you up on that offer and pm you with some questions? 
Practice makes perfect! I'm 31 and have been painting my nails for a long time and still have a hard time painting my right hand. The more you practice the easier it gets. 
didn't say you should watch the movies
Yes. I have. All the time. Movies, Television, IRL. Co-workers. Overheard at bars. All the time.   If you're upset becasue it's "dehumanizing"... then what does "yummy" mean when talking about a guy? Human beings aren't "yummy", are they? Are we saying men are food?     
But if it's a habit of treating people one way, that's obviously more important than what they believe their inner beliefs about women and men are. Like it becomes self denial when a habit of treating people differently exists while simultaneously believing that they are treated alright. It's a contributing process that all assholes are collectively a part of.
Could that be because they don't respect (as they may put it) "non-traditional" relationships and therefore not see a same-sex relationship as capable of having the same commitments and capacity as a real relationship?   I feel you could be misinterpreting why it is disrespected.
University-bubble activists *at some schools* and internet echo-chamber activists can be fairly similar sometimes.
I'm actually pleasantly surprised with the strides Alberta has been making the past couple months with this and with the garbage-energy converter in Edmonton. I love Alberta but it's no secret that our province *loves* making money, and oil haha
Remember to buy her a heating pad and panty liners! Plus explain what PMDD is in case she develops it. My mother was a nurse, yet didn't realize I needed help when I started getting PMDD. I wish my aunts stepped in like you plan on doing so.
&gt; My boss had a talk with me, now he'll be running background checks on everyone who applies there now.  Good. He really should have done that from the beginning on seeing that most people working in a yoghurt shop are probably young women.  But, hehe, I'm glad my gif made you smile a little. That's literally what I thought when I read the update. Shit just got real. 
With all respect, this isn't what the person I replied to said. They said eliminate gender roles from society.
Not really. For security reasons the location of the shelter and identities of the women are confidential.
[deleted]
Come on... That is a huuuuuge step and you know it.
That's drastically simplifying things and ignores the involvement of the medical community who are much more able than anyone on Reddit to determine whether there's 'no question about it'. 
I wish it were that simple. I've told her countless times. I think she just feels that seeing that she's forgiven him will make me want to do the same. For that she is very, very wrong.
it's the fact that it's not malicious that's kind of annoying -- the fact that it's normal and we're not supposed to make a fuss about it because it's just how it is. 
If they follow along behind Ontario, then they will require medical documentation to back up the request. I imagine that there will be something in place to prevent situations such as you suggest. 
In America you'de need 6 months of therapy, then roughly a year or 2 of hormone replacement therapy along with what's called the RLE (real life experience) which is when you switch full time before getting surgery. And this all needs to be documented by a psychologist/therapist. After a year of HRT there's no coming back and about 60% of trans people already pass at that point so there's no real awkardness. It's the beginning of transition that most people are weirded about.
[deleted]
It's not the fetish that dehumanizes without consent, though. It is the person who holds it. It is up to them whether they approach others in a mature and honest way.  Unless the fetish requires non-consent to be satisfied as a requirement, but then I would argue that is not a fetish or paraphilia but potentially signs of a deeper psychological issue.
You are your own person, and you can dress however you like.   Ask them why they care so much. Ask them why they feel the need to make you feel bad about how you look, naturally. If you feel good about how you look, that's all that matters.
I live in a very large city in the midwest, moved here about 8 years ago.  What my best friend and I have learned to do it to wear head phones when you are on the bus and trains.  I rarely will make eye contact with people and/or smile at them.  When I'm with my dog it's different but mostly it's other dog owners stopping me or younger kids/teens wanting to pet my dog.    For running, try finding a running group in the city to join or make friends with people in your neighborhood and find a running buddy.  But in my city there are always people running on the sides of the streets, on the sidewalks and the lakefront trail.  If your new city is like that then there shouldn't be any issue of you taking a morning run with hundreds of other people every morning.    Mostly I do a lot of ignoring of others.  It might seem mean and it might be hard for you at first but it really does work.
I really don't understand. I'm not subscribed to the OneY sub because I don't consider whatever goes on there interesting enough for me. The logical thing to do if you think this sub is such a pile of crap is to unsubscribe and free yourself from its BS. Seriously.  Commenting about how crappy TwoX is in TwoX and having another hater give you gold doesn't make you look smarter or anything.
&gt;at some schools  Considering the University of Toronto is one of (if not *the*) largest schools in Canada, I'd imagine the problem might be worse than you think.  Never mind CUPE getting involved - the largest public employee union in the country supporting the people trying to make it impossible for men's issues to even be discussed makes me wonder why feminists tend to think they have no power and are actually "oppressed".  
In that respect I agree, the world is unfortunately an uneven place for so many people not just women. I just wish there wasn't a need for movements at all. 
Excuse me if I'm wrong here...  but are you haphazardly condemning random men to a fate that no one deserves?
[deleted]
&gt; I'm a butch woman. &gt; According to mainstream North American gender roles, I fit on the side associated with men. I dress in a masculine style, drink beer, play video games, etc. I am sexually attracted to women (and men.) &gt; None of these things invalidate my womanhood. That doesn't change because I also happen to be trans and assigned male at birth. I'm still a woman.   Everything you've said is exactly how I am. It's nice for someone to be on the same page. Nice to know you're not alone, I guess?  It's just this deep ingrained... sensation that I'm not right. How people see me, act towards me, think about me, It's not right for who I am. Not to mention the physical disconnect.
Yes, you're being irrational.  And to "overcome this fear" you need to stop reading hysterical and exaggerated radical feminist garbage.  The vast majority of men are decent...and are certainly not potential rapists.  Furthermore, if the mere possibility of being whistled or winked at periodically upsets your delicate psyche, then I suggest life has some horrors in store for you - because, comparatively speaking, dealing with the odd creep is just a drop in the ocean.  
You handled that really well, good on you.  I'm sorry it's made you feel this way. It's understandable. Perhaps turn to your friends for support and to talk this through. I hope this makes you feel better about the situation, with time. I'm sorry you had to experience that.
I'm exactly the same. I get absolutely starving and then i feel really sick. Even if I don't give in to cravings. I figure it cancels out.
Trust that gut instinct!
Great headline to sneak this nice pro-feminist piece through the anti-feminist-2X-down-vote-wall! Automated or not, those silly drones should wake up and switch on the lights. -.-
It seems rather rude to ask in general. It's a highly personal question and not really anyone's business unless they want to share it. There's also a lot of presumption and history of bigotry about it as a question.  As for sexism and homophobia in general, just because you have not seen it personally, doesn't mean that it doesn't happen or exist.  And lots of people are working on fixing it. But it's a long battle.
Maybe this would be a bit intimate for you to share with her, but perhaps you could explain to her how a tampon works and how to insert it. I remember how much I struggled so much at first to use them, but they're so much better than pads in my opinion.
[deleted]
Sucker Punch may not be a masterpiece but certainly it is not outright terrible. Most likely you are just blinded by the flashy fantasy, 'eyecandy' scenes. One could argue these scenes were power fantasies giving at least some sense of control to the main characters in their completely powerless situation (male here - no, i didn't care for the eyecandy, i largely skipped these scenes once i understood their meaning).  Once you strip the superficial bling, the movie was an utterly depressing story about girls with no way out from hell.
How does this make sense? It's a birth certificate... It is what you are at Birth. What if I want to change where I was born. Nope sorry, I don't want to be from Cleveland anymore, now I was born in Ne York City. I understand the want for it, and I'm not against these people at all, I just don't think changing birth certificates is the correct fix. Wouldn't creating a new form be more prudent?
Thank you :)
Baby fat was the exact term my mom used, looking back I WAS overweight. If she is asking there is a reason, dig into that more to get a direction to go in. Take it as an opportunity to teach healthy eating and exercise habits. A lot of people are pushing the "Every size is beautiful" sentiment. At 14 I was 240 lbs. Life would have been immeasurably easier socially and mentally had my eating habits been addressed earlier.   I'd say dig for the reason, and decide the best course of action from there. Baby fat is not a valid answer after a certain age. And teaching a healthy lifestyle can never begin too soon. Just do not present it in a way that she conceives the advice as an argument against how she looks. Maybe another Redditer can help you there. 
"Why wouldn't my husband let me take our car?"  Total confusion.
&gt; Honestly, I would be super flattered if some guy **that I found attractive** stopped me in the street to call me beautiful.  FTFY :)   
[deleted]
Hey - I don't mean this in an accusatory way, or that you "shouldn't be hanging out with him", but honestly it sounds like your mutual friends are actually *his* friends. I think maybe you should cut ties with all of them. I'm still friendly with all of ex's friends, when I happen to see them, but I certainly don't hang out with them, you know?
Oh that's so gross. I know how you feel. I'm 16 too. It's mostly boys my age who say vulgar things to me though. Or even if it's not vulgar things, they say things that I KNOW they wouldn't say to other boys, only to girls. I never know what to say. I usually just try to ignore them. it would be different if it was an older man though. I think you did the right thing. It's not your fault. 
Which is totally fair. I don't want to be the jerk who nitpicks. :)
I'm not sure what's more scarring, what your mom did to you, or what I experienced. I got my first period at the tender age of 10 (accompanied by giant breasts that seemingly appeared overnight, but I digress...). My parents were hosting a party at the time I made the bloody discovery. I crammed a wad of toilet paper into my panties and bow-legged it out of the bathroom to find my mom. I discreetly whispered in her ear that I needed her help and why, then shuffled back to the bathroom.   I then heard my mother loudly exclaim to her guests, "Everybody, can I have your attention please? My daughter just let me know that she's now a woman! Isn't that great?" There was an uncomfortable silence followed by some scattered applause.   It's not an exaggeration to say that I thought I was going to die of embarrassment and humiliation on the spot. I flew into the bathroom and locked the door, and when she came to help me, I wouldn't let her in. I wish I could say she was drunk when it happened, but she wasn't. She honestly felt it was something to be proud of. To this day--and she's 75 now--she still doesn't understand why I was so upset. 
Don't say "I've got a girlfriend". Say "I'm in a relationship".  Edit: I agree you shouldn't have to. I just mean if you don't want to hear shitty stuff from shitty people this is a way of being honest while maybe not having to deal with crap. Nothing wrong with making it clear you're gay though.
Edge of Tomorrow isn't too bad in that regard - Emily Blunt is pretty fleshed out, though the nature of the story doesn't have too much character development. 
[deleted]
I just think if your house is equal, then feminism has done it's job.  Feminism is the path to equality, not the goal.  So if the destination is reached, the path is the past.  You don't call your destination the road you traveled to get there.
Oh gosh, that's really sweet.
our bodies are like "hey HEY HEY WHY YOU NOT PREGNANT?? I'll show her!" Mine were the worst about 24-31. Its starting to get easier. the last six months they clustered into every 21 days instead of every 28 days. 
What an asshole, please tell me she kicked him out and banned his ass from the school or something.
The way you look can have a really huge impact on your mental well-being though.
Your boss is probably being overprotective because the typical 18-24 year old GED student is a HS dropout who has spent time in jail. 
My initial take on it was that she works in a professional environment.  Generally speaking, male or female, you don't point your butt at anybody.  I don't give the older boss a free pass for his old-school sexism, but I also doubt the OP's narrative accuracy based on the tone of the rest of the post.  In the end, it doesn't matter - she teaches male felons.  The actual warning was "do not bend over in front of the male felons."  That doesn't make for an exciting story, though.
&gt; SGKF does merit some amount of animosity given how commercialized the entire foundation is, and I agree with the point made in the linked article that pink washing seems to be more about the participants than the disease.  My point is that this is how you reach the most people, this is how you maximize revenue, this **benefits** cancer research.  17% of 30,000,000 is greater than 100% of 1,000,000.  People are self-consumed, they will never not be self-consumed, and there are countless issues, diseases and tragedies in this world that need to continuously be addressed.  &gt; Maybe I'm splitting hairs, but as someone who's family has been effected by breast cancer I think it's understandable to be upset with a foundation which collects and squanders millions of dollars that ideally should go directly to research and preventative medicine.  As someone who has been effected by breast cancer as well, I am glad that they exist since without them there would be significantly less money in cancer research and breast cancer support and awareness today.  I don't deal with unrealistic ideals, human beings are what they are, and the reality is that all those millions of dollars would have gone to other things without SGKF.  You see all these people giving money to Komen, they aren't people that would have been giving to cancer research without Komen, they are people that would be buying other things for themselves.  For example when a loved one is doing something like a Komen walk and is raising money, people are far more likely to give to that than they would be to find a direct way to give to that issue.  It is what it is, that's who we are, maybe not everyone, but in sum total.  &gt; TLDR it's good that the 17% goes to research and it's ok to be upset that the percentage is so low.  Unless you run and operate a non-profit, you should not be upset that someone else does just because they do not meet some arbitrary percentage number you have decided must be met.  You can sit there doing less and be upset that they don't do more if you want but the fact of the matter is, their hard work has done tremendous good for cancer research.  Their motives are irrelevant to me, I don't care if they are in this game entirely for their high salaries, the fact of the matter to me, what matters to me is that they take money from the economy and put it directly into cancer research at a rate that is higher than it would be without them.  And that to me means it is good that they exist.  If another non-profit wants to do better than that, all the more power to them.
[deleted]
PERIOD UNDERWEAR. Tell her about the period underwear.
I wasn't asked any questions when I bought it and I'm also from ON. 
I am a woman, and I am also biologically and emotionally female (sorry I don't know a way to word this and still be inclusive to the trans community here). There is ZERO problem with me referring to myself as such. I will call myself what I like, thank you very much.  What your post boils down to, in essence, is the OP will be considered a second-class citizen unless she finds herself a boyfriend. She should overcome her anxiety about the way she dresses by attaching herself to a man.  Let me reiterate: this. is. stupid. advice. You, as a female, are attaching her ability to protect herself and her value to a male. Being aggressive/rude isn't going to solve her problem. Not allowing fear to dictate her behaviors is. Your solution to this fear? "Get a boyfriend, then you're some guys property and 'dudes' (who are 'dudes' by the way?) will respect his claim over you."
So the current "system" in place actively does this?   &gt;It's called patriarchy because the "select few" who get power under it are men.  How does this actively happen? Also what about people like Margaret Thatcher?
Remember you only feel that way because society trains you to feel that way. There are hardly ever positive depictions of feminists in media, and many times there's an effort to separate strong, active female characters *from* feminism. 
[deleted]
Huh, I see. I wear tights under my pants if it's less than 50 degrees out so I may have try out an upgrade to yoga pants haha. 
And reddit's gotten a reputation for being a safe haven for misogynistic assholes and pedophiles.  Yet here we are, not being either  Pointing at the outliers and demanding a movement be held accountable for them is called a straw man argument and is not conducive to constructive discourse.  Studies show that feminists are less hostile toward men overall than non feminists, on average. Trying to silence the majority of a movement based on the statements of a few in the movement is just another way oppressors try to shove the oppressed under the rug
Snickers and Hershey kisses ;)
I was curious about the movies so I watched the first three with Rifftrax as a safety net. Definitely a great experience.  Even with the mocking commentary in my ear I could still critically analyze the movies... it's hilarious to be how *even the movies* aren't really on Bella's side and make her look petulant and crazy. Maybe that's just my interpretation though.  And knowing that Robert Pattinson hates the books, hates the fans, and says he played Edward as a "manic depressive who hates himself" gave it a more entertaining level. 
Men are the majority victims. Why is it so bad to point out that men are disposable, while women are not?
source please
My mom marked my flow days on the family calendar. In red.
I felt that way about The Walking Dead. It would be one thing if it was just the Southern men within the story being sexist, but the worldview and objective reality of the work itself is pretty sexist, and the original comic author has made pretty fucking sexist comments. I couldn't make it past season 2 where all the men were enthusiastic about giving a 10 year old boy a gun but none of the women, and then when one of the women *is* allowed to keep guard she immediately fucks up. That blurs the line between character actions and the decisions of the author for me.   The *Telltale* games on the other hand, damn skippy. If you want some not boring Walking Dead stories with good female characters that will wreck you emotionally download Steam and install those games. They're accessible to *anyone*, the majority if gameplay is dialog decisions and button prompts to avoid danger. And even though the story doesn't really change much in the end, they *will* make you feel responsible for your decisions. 
Is a bisexual man who chooses to get gender reassignment surgery without body dysphoria considered not a "true" transgendered person? What if I want to be genderless?
Maybe you should just keep being as nice as you can. Maybe the man sitting with her will realize his GF doesn't trust him AND is treating another human like a bitch and he will dump her and ask you out. LOL
Try the little stick on heaters that stick to the outside of your underwear, they are the best!
Well it's not always about genitals for trans people, that's just what most cis people find easiest to relate to since it's clear, obvious, and most people have a set. But to ease it over to hormones, I can say this much: if I'm not on estrogen and an AA, I feel atrocious all the fucking time. Depressed, anxious, blah blah blah. Lots of pain. If I AM on E, I'm vastly more stable, less depressed and anxious, not nearly as surly and mean, and can actually feel happy. I don't really have to wonder about if 'the grass is greener', I've got a lot of data now on how hormones affect me to know which one I should have pumping through me. 
Go auntie Tess!   My sister got her first period when we were on family vacation staying the night over at a cousin's house. I was woken up in the morning by my cousin Courtney, who was about 11 at the time (my sister was about 13, I was about 18) explaining how "uhh... your sister needs to ... go be with your parents. She's like... uh, not feeling good." I groggily responded uh okay... but not fighting it, just like okay whatever. Sister was hiding in Courtneys room. So I got to the bathroom to piss and pop in my contacts so I can drive my sister to where my parents were staying (a different aunt and uncle's house a couple miles) and notice bloody tissues in the toilet.  "Oh."  Suddenly things made sense as I clicked out of groggy-just-woke-up mode.  I drove her to my parents and kept the conversation friendly but I could tell she was confused and in pain (my parents probably should have given her the Talk once she turned 12... oops)   To this day, our relationship is tight, and I think it all started from how I responded in that situation. I'm glad you are going to rescue her from her brothers :) My wife grew up with brothers like you described, I hope my boys, if I have some, will act dignified if in similar situations and not jerks
When you find a way to cure any form of cancer without needing huge amounts of research funding tell me I would love to know how you pulled it off.
[Sure](http://www.latimes.com/nation/nationnow/la-na-nn-florida-murder-video-game-20140418-story.html). Of [course not](http://au.ibtimes.com/articles/537919/20140209/chicago-teen-kills-brother-over-flappy-bird.htm#.U594zfmSx8E). Never [ever](http://www.dailytelegraph.com.au/boy-11-kills-brother-over-video-game/story-e6frewqi-1225732291818).  I'm not, mind, saying that gaming makes people kill (and it's worth noting that gaming was ruled out as a causative factor in the Manhunt case), but you might want to do some research before you make claims.
Ewwwwww. Ew ew ew ew ew.  Is he your boss? If he's not, and you're really annoyed by it, you can just tell him to "please stop commenting on my appearance, it's very unprofessional."  Otherwise, you can do what I'm more likely to do. When he makes those remarks, look at him. Don't smile. Just stop what you're doing, look straight at him for a few seconds, and then resume whatever it is you are doing. I think that's a pretty effective way to let him know you heard him and you don't care.  On a personal note, what do you wear to work? I'm really curious because I'm always looking for ways to dress at work. I have a lot of pencil skirts, blouses, and blazers. 
I'm guessing you are in the US. In any other country, the women are just as fanatical as the boys and proud of it. 
Just because you're transgendered doesn't give you a "more valuable" viewpoint, unless of course you're comparing them to the armchair scientists.  
"My appearance isn't any of your business."   And if he tries the lame-ass "I'm just trying to help" comeback, say "No one asked for your help, so stop."   And if he complains that you have a shitty attitude, tell him you can talk about it with his supervisor.   Seriously, just because you're young doesn't mean that he has some sort of dominion over your personal appearance.
Haha yes, I love turning it back on them. When my English is way better than whoever's interrogating me, I let them know it. 
 'I certainly don't like it.' Weird, it implies you should be putting effort in pleasing him somehow, doesn't it?? That's what I'd think. Would annoy me. In fact it has annoyed me, sometimes, depends on context, when male friends say they prefer this to that.. friends though. Some vague work-mate. Bloody cheek! 
&gt; MRA's would be feminists under the definition, their goal too is gender equality.  lol  
&gt; They may choose to identify with those born genetically female, but they will always be genetically male. Period.  So what? Chromosomes are 100% irrelevant to how you live your life and others treat you, unless there's been an uptick in that fad of karotyping everyone you meet I missed. Being 'genetically male' is meaningless in terms of social interactions and identity.  
Oh please don't be ashamed of the things you like. There is nobody else in the world who is you, and you just happen to like what you like. You're right it was an awful comment. It's not your fault at all. You sound very interesting! And thanks to Halloysite, I now know what "PUA tactic" means (I had to google it).
So who is your favorite doctor?
&gt;Midwest.  yep.
Holy hell, that's funny. But I'm positive it wasn't funny to you back then. 
Guy here. Yep, we are. I'll admit, I'm guilty.  I think a better phrase would be a more explicit no, or "not into dudes, sorry".
I did not take what you wrote out of context. I used your own sources to disprove your argument.   Your primary argument was that, since there are so few LGBT people, we should not be as accommodating as we are and that it is the media that is inflating the number. I countered that with more up-to-date facts than you presented.   Your next argument was that tolerance cannot be legislated, to which I replied "It does and it can".  You continued your argument by saying acceptance can, in fact, be legislated in cases of housing, employment, and government services. Obtaining a driver's license, a passport, a SSN (or in my case, SIN) are all government services for which a birth certificate is required. Hence the importance and relevance of the posted article. 
Thanks - going to CVS now. 
You may want to explain that for a lot of women their period symptoms get stronger/worse/actually start occurring as they get older. I never had a cramp when I started mine when I was 12, but now that I'm 20 I have them the day before my period starts and I do experience the random emotional side effects. I had no idea why this was happening.
This is literally a description of the rest of the defaults. Low quality content, dump of news from the internet, attention whoring rants - welcome to reddit. The only difference is that TwoX is from a female perspective, that's what bothers you, and that's why I'm glad it's a default.
Single father to three girls here - I really wish their mother would have been around for this. I can't believe her mother just threw pads at her. I'd say go for it. Little girls grow up with enough stigmas being shoved on to them by other people - this does not need to be part of that.
Not the 1960s; the internet. Screenshots of messages dismissing lesbians with stuff like that crop up all the time on /r/creepypms. From OkCupid, Kik, Omegle, etc.
for example the outrage when Angelina Jolie had hers removed preemptively and "ruined it" for so many men.
I got my first period when my mom was out of town, so my dad got to deal with it. He was great, but you could also tell he was totally not prepared for this to happen when my mom wasn't there. I remember him digging around the bathroom tripping to find where my mom kept her pads... Lol. 
Actually not that bad beforehand for me (I don't get any crankiness/more emotional, except that for an odd reason sometimes the day before I feel like I do not like any of my clothes :) ). Though, my breasts get bigger and sore. And, the day before I do feel it coming, like my uterus is gently reminding me (and I do mean really gently, like it feels slightly different/not comfortable but nothing hard core). And during-well, with age (well, age... I'm only 21) it got better. In high school, it happened around twice/three times a year that I'd get unbelievably horrible cramps, pain in the back, would get dizzy and not feel my legs (my dad had to carry me once) the first day/day of/ and second day. But pop one mild pain killer and thankfully all of that would go away. Nowadays it's not that drastic, and I usually get a painkiller if I feel it starts hurting a bit (like usually only second day). I count myself lucky really, especially now that those horrible hard core crampy ones from high-school have stopped. And since the first time I got it I've had one of the by far most reliable monthly cycles of anyone I've ever met (it happens that I get it a day early sometimes, but that's all, since the beginning). Edit1: shortened the comment, and also-lack of craving might come from the fact that in general I crave food non stop so.... I just might not recognize it :D
It is of consequence.  Whatever sex is marked on the birth certificate is then carried over to all the pieces of ID a person will get. That is then their assumed gender. When any one else looks at that ID, and sees a letter that doesn't correspond to what they'd expect, that can create a lot of problems.  It forcibly outs people to employers which can make things very uncomfortable, they are denied service at bars or when buying alcohol, they're assigned to the wrong dorms, constantly misgendered in all their communication from their banks/insurance/etc; especially in this deeply transphobic society it's a sword that's perpetually hung over their heads. A lot of people are getting hurt by this.  Given the way it's used, being able to change that letter to reflect the person's gender is life saving.
Okay, so the whole T-word thing stems from the fact that it has been used as something of a half-heartedly insulting term of endearment and self identification in the drag community (and yes, there are some trans people who also use the term, though RuPaul is a cis male drag queen, he's not a transsexual woman or even a trans woman, he's a guy).  However, that community is very small and fairly insular. And in the early 90s, the usage of the T word in the media started coming mostly from exploitative porn industry producers, sex trafficking, TV shows and movies casting trans women in highly stigmatized and negative lights, etc.  Some people in the trans community objected to RuPaul's usage of the T and S words on air, especially in ways that could reproduce more harmful views of trans women who are already victimized by those words, and especially when a large chunk of the show's audience likely know the terms more from media sources than the drag community, and will think those words are fine to use around trans people by default.  There's barely anyone wanting the T or S words to be extinct, it's just the wish that people be mindful of their language in social arenas, and to be aware of one's context. Referring to oneself by those terms? Cool. Saying those words during a drag show? Probably alright, considering the situation. Having a place of business called that? That's a bit more debatable. Saying those words on a TV show where the audience is mostly heterosexual cis folk who know next to nothing but harmful media stereotypes about trans people? Not really helpful or cool, IMO. It's all out of a wish to reduce harm, and while I can see why some may think otherwise, that's the general consensus I've gotten from speaking with a lot of people with more outspoken voices on the issue.
How is she misleading? I don't think she ever implies that it's only for women, she's just stating things that happen in the game. That they've created a one dimensional sexual object and then gamified their murder. It doesn't matter that it happens for cops or no matter what your crime is. She was pointing out how the existence of these sexual objects often goes hand in hand with a call to violence against them.   Developers make choices in what NPCs get what dialogue, where those NPCs are and how often you need to interact with them. It's not about every NPC being a fully fleshed out human being, it's about the creation of a whole subset of women NPCs that exist only as disposable sexual objects that are their distinct sub-group of NPCs. Deciding to make them a big part of your game is deciding that the mass objectification of women doesn't matter to you.   The rest of the game can be amazing, but that aspect can still be critiqued. And since when is 'it's a joke' a strong defence for any kind of bad behavior?
From the gist I've gotten. PUA entails; pretend to be much cooler than you actually are while simultaneously beating down the woman's self esteem until she sleeps with you.
[deleted]
[deleted]
There have only been a few shows that I can say I don't have a favorite character in. All of them are because of bad writing and unrelatable characters. OITB is the opposite. Every character has something about them that I like. My favorite character is different with every scene. I'm a writer myself and I hope to one day create characters that are half as relatable.
&gt;form and function  that simply isnt true 
This video is getting crazy downvoted in subs that aren't specifically female friendly. I can't help but think it's getting downvoted for the wrong reasons.
Can you explain why that makes her boss's comment okay?
Umm.. no. I know a guy name Vijay. He wouldn't appreciate you saying this.
But the problem is that it all is a matter of perspective. Each and every one of the examples you listed, if viewed from the man's perspective, can also legitimately be considered men's issues. One fundamental reason why this debate will continue to go on deals with the fact that both feminism and the "men's rights movement" often look at the exact same issues from different sides, and both legitimately have claims to them. To elucidate this further, there's no way to accurately quantify the way in which women are seen as "helpless" related to divorce, thus all we can say is that men are financially worse off and bear the greater burden in the matter. I agree with you that feminism can/should fight these problems, but why can't men fight the problems too from their own perspective? What is wrong with another gender-related movement working alongside feminism?
This post made me so happy. I'm so glad your niece has you in her life! :)
[deleted]
&gt;He also seems to think that having a direct discussion about who will do which chores is some kind of indication that we're acting like roommates instead of partners.  So, technically, you two *are* roommates now (who also happen to love each other and have sex). I would tell him that it bothers you that he's not willing to have a conversation with you about chores that he would be fine having with a roommate. The fact that he's dictating to you what you "should" be doing (based on outdated gender roles) means that you don't feel like you are equal partners in the relationship and that's definitely not okay. 
His opinion matters, but remember that YOU cast the final vote (worth two of his).
[deleted]
So this entire ad hominem attack is hilarious. "She's not a REAL gamer! How can she have ANY opinion on video games!"  Saying "I'm not a fan of video games" doesn't mean everything you say is immediately discredited. It is textbook ad hominem. It doesn't mean her arguments are *wrong*, just that you don't view her as a "real gamer". Not to mention this video is 2 years before she began the Tropes vs Women (in video games) Kickstarter, since she had already been doing pieces related to movies / television / etc. So saying "I'm not a fan of video games" at some point in your history doesn't instantly mean you will *never* become a fan. Or even that "being a fan" is required to look at story elements in video games.  It feels *incredibly* like gasping at straws. Since the inception of the project, it's been nothing but childish and often times violent / misogynistic attacks against her for having the *audacity* to say anything about video games. Working incredibly hard to not even focus on the content of the video to say "not a real gamer! IGNORE THIS!" is an incredibly weak tactic.  I'd love to yell "POINTS!" in an @midnight / Chris Hardwick manner for linking to this horrible anti-feminist vlogger, but it's just so hilariously *bad*. No points.  
I am talking about less than 5 minutes of game play that is entirely insignificant and does not condemn the game to sexual objectification of women. It's an achievement that throws back to other creative things made before the game, in the genre of Westerns, and I don't understand how an apple has anything to do with it. 
[deleted]
I think I get your point, but my perspective was that maybe they're not trying to do anything on purpose, like you said, they don't have an agenda, but they're also being willfully ignorant and not trying to understand either. They're judging a situation as if they understand better.
Always listen to your gut! Good for you!
not cis.....  edit: oh fuck, you're being sarcastic, aren't you. Shit. Its really sad that it took me this long to tell. Really awful what kind of opinions are leaking into this subreddit these days
If it is anything like where I live, if there isn't a gun involved, the police aren't going to show up. 
That's so stupid. Ugh.  I've admittedly always felt the "sorry I have a -insert partner here-" line works well, as it shifts the focus on an individual's faults to a situation out of their control, a white lie of sorts. Silly me, I thought that no matter the gender of the partner, people should back off. I'm certainly reconsidering my stance.  As a dude who's been in the situation of [pursuing a girl I didn't know was lesbian](http://youtu.be/IgEXny_5pAk), it's bizarre to me that others find that to be a worthwhile "challenge" for their, as you so eloquently put, magical Latvian converter dicks. When I found out, I was disappointed admittedly, but continuing to pursue her never crossed my mind. What would the point be? I'm led to believe, as many comments have indicated, these guys are either under the impression that anything but male heterosexuality is a choice or that their perceptions of lesbians is strictly based on American Pie movies or porn.  Seriously, that sucks you have to go through that. I'm sorry.
phew :)
I don't identify as a feminist, but as an egalitarian. Now some people have claimed that I am a sexist for being an egalitarian; that feminism and egalitarianism are the same thing and that I'm just trying to take power away from women in the movement, and muddy the issues.  My problem with feminism isn't that feminism is bad, but that it is too narrow. Egalitarianism covers a broader range of issues including gender, race, class/caste, and religion. Many of these things are interlinked, and their importance varies from place to place. You can't solve one of these problems while leaving the others in place. It's fine to be an egalitarian who focuses on on feminist/gender issues, but you should fight injustice wherever you find it.  "Injustice anywhere is a threat to justice everywhere."  -Martin Luther King, Jr.  
Remarkably unlikely to happen, unless they decide to be irreparably infertile through over a year's worth of steady HRT, and have basically no testosterone running through their bodies, growing breasts, potentially being disowned by family and friends and their communities, their (potential) churches or religious groups, etc. Not exactly an awesome tradeoff
I grew up surrounded by women who thought and said, "Big women are beautiful." I felt like they were saying, "I have fat, and that makes me a) beautiful and b) womanly." I didn't have fat. So what did that make me? Barely human? There was also the constant pinching and poking from women who had clearly made the cut for "Big and Beautiful". They would tell me I needed to "start eating" or "eat more" or "gain weight", and I tried till it made me sick. I tried to be just like them at every meal until I thought I would throw up, and I did that until I was about 17.   Then I decided that if I wasn't like them already I would never be like them. I started working out, started eating healthy, started dressing in a way that made me feel confident, and most importantly I said "Fuck what those people think. Walk like you're the baddest bitch in this joint!" I said in my head, I spoke it aloud to myself in mirrors, I said it quietly to myself when I was self-conscious in crowds. It was weird, but it made me feel better. The more I said it the better I got at saying and I also started believing it. Now I love me even when I don't love me. My acne looks terrible, but I'm still an awesome person. My hair is flat, but I'm still an awesome person. This outfit would look better if my boobs were bigger, but I'm still an awesome person.  Hope that helps.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Happy 21st Birthday!  Go buy lube and tampons.
[deleted]
[deleted]
All of you ladies might enjoy this video about what [utter nonsense the "fake geek girl" thing is](http://www.geeksaresexy.net/2014/06/06/fake-geek-girls-fiction-or-reality-video/).
If I was teaching potentially dangerous persons, I would not want to give them reasons to obsess over me. If your boss was genuinely concerned for your safety then there are more professional ways of expressing it. What if, on a rare occasion, you're teaching a creep that takes your bending over in front of him as a signal of interest and an invitation to stalk you, because psycho people exist. Then you have to mace him and kick him in the nuts.
Thank you.  :)
[deleted]
Welcome to the masturbation club! It gets you no perks. It's not exclusive. Membership is free. Your card is in the mail.
[deleted]
Why do people always assume I am a damn man?  
I understand that it seems like a matter of opinion to you, but I think that if you want to have an enriching conversation with people you should try to understand their language and use words correctly since that's the lexicon held by the majority. If you go in with your opinion and don't try to translate, then there's a lot of pointlessness all around trying to bridge the gap.
I now get along with my  mother quite well but this post sounds like it could have written by me 8 years ago. Like someone else said you can't take their money and expect them to let you do whatever you want. That said, if you know your parents aren't going to approve of something don't tell them about it. I know its hard when you want to be able to have an open relationship with your parents but if you are fundamentally different people with different beliefs you likely won't get that kind of relationship.  My mom has somewhat realized that I'm not going to be the good Catholic girl she wants me to be and I understand she is unlikely to change anytime soon as well. That means there are a lot of topics we don't discuss and some parts of my life I can't share with her. It also helps to try and understand where your parents arecoming from. Accepting who your parents are is part of getting along with them.  Someone pointed out that jetting of to a different state likely isn't the safest thing you could do, so you should definitely let someone you trust know what you'll be up to. Just not your parents as it would cause conflict. You live and learn I guess!
I don't see women demanding men do it for them. I see women calling out being treated as less than people and demanding to be let in. They don't have the same ability to make the media on a large scale- and that's the scale at which you start impacting. When it's on store shelves and an esport and on advertisements and part of popular culture. These companies don't belong to men, even now, they're not 100% men, so it's not women taking anything away from anybody. If you want the strong, empowered women go check out the indie scene and actually look, they're there.
[deleted]
[deleted]
12 years, 6 months, 8 days.  I remember the exact date (only because I told a teacher I felt sick, and he wrote me a note to go to the office and call my parents which he signed and dated).
Have you used your vibrator without your husband being there? Please try if not, it can help clear your head. Orgasm for us ladies is all about being in the right state of mind, everything has to be just right. A hard part of orgasm is learning what you like and don't like, then teaching our partners what we like. It can take time but it is really worth it! Also, you might need a stronger vibrator. Hope this helps, good luck!
&gt;It's a crazy bold statement to say it's impossible to communicate "seedy underworld" without showing or inviting participation in the objectification of women.  True, but it's used for a good reason: **it works**  &gt; Even if that were true, there's few seedy underworld's that don't also involve the crippling effects of drug addiction.. why isn't that a necessary component of these settings?  They are. Many characters in those games are substance abusers. In Fallout 3, your character can be one too.  &gt; I think it's more likely that the cheapest, easiest way to try and make a game "adult" is to throw in some boobs or prostitution.  Have you even played the games you talk about? they usually discuss the things like what led them down that path. They are usually gritty, violent games to begin with, they are already 'adult' games simply by the fact you're supposed to kill people or deal with life and death situations. GTA didnt come about by slapping hoes into a Mario game, what makes you think it's a non-adult title without them?  &gt; It doesn't even work - it ends up feeling like a 13 year old's idea of what is gritty and adult.  except that the objectification is almost always a small part of a much larger story and game (and the game is always heavily criticised when this is not the case)
They probably weren't jumping from horse back in stilettos though. I could see shoes with an inch heel (after all, riding boots today still have them), but much more than that is a great way to get tangled up in the harness when you're trying to get on/off.
I'm glad to hear that this was such a positive experience for you! Hopefully there will be many more happy years ahead of you, hahaha. A good rule of thumb is: if it feels good and doesn't hurt, in this case, then don't sweat it! "Normal" varies a lot, but good feeling is good feeling. 
That is! I'd had my period for a year or so but it wasn't regular, my uncle took us to a water park and pulled me aside after one water slide and said, "Do you know what a period is?" I said, "Yeah, why?" And he said, "sit down (in a nearby chair) I'm going to get you a towel to wrap around your waist, I think we have to go back."  I am forever grateful he wasn't visably freaked out, just dealt with the situation as best he knew how.
I definitely remember this thread. I'm very happy and relieved that you acted on the way he way was behaving. I was definitely concerned for your safety. It's good to hear a happy update. 
What's up, uterine casts? Put your hands up for one of the weirdest things to ever come out of a vagina (aside from a tiny person).
It used to be a big deal years ago because tampons had more toxic shit in them than now. They've toned it down, even though they still have some questionable ones because of cotton processing, but TSS is quite rare nowadays. Just stay away from scented ones. You don't want to put scented ANYTHING near or in your vagina. It just adds extra chemicals you don't need. I know we don't smell the freshest during our periods, but that doesn't mean we gotta risk our health because of that. Just clean yourself with moist towelettes if necessary, use your shower at home, and that should take care of it.  I sleep with extra absorbent tampons all the time, because they're the only ones that allow me to sleep through the night without having to wake up in a puddle of my own blood. My flow is quite heavy the first two nights. But as soon as my flow gets lighter, I switch to just pads at night. After all, tampons do take away moisture from your vagina and that's not very good. Let that lady rest and restore the juices.
According to the doctors, postpartum depression is caused by a hormonal imbalance and of course out side sources too like stress. I'm just going off what the my doctor told me :/ 
Thanks so much! This made me feel so much better!!!! We sound very similar in some respects and that is really helpful. My husband read this comment and he agrees too! We will try it! Thanks again for being so sweet! It's hard to feel so alone on such a sensitive subject. I will definitely message you once I have some time to digest this a little :)
Wipes are handy!
Your list was really good :-) One day they'll figure out why women stop buying mags after 25.
I'm 17, I shouldn't have to worry about all this nonsense :C
On what ground should he tossed out the house? Getting divorced should not be about making the partner bleed. What a bitter thing to say. 
[deleted]
First and foremost, you need to take care of you.  Something is missing, and you need to find out what it is.  Please get some counseling so you can find out why you broke off with this guy.  It may be a fear of intimacy stemming from a long-ago hurt, something about your parents' relationship that you're afraid to model, a whole bunch of things that have nothing to do with this guy and everything to do with you.    If you have a primary doctor, speak with him/her about possible depression.  That needs to be ruled out or addressed.  Also ask about counseling, preferable with an LCSW or psychologist who will help you find out the reasons you feel you bailed on this relationship and what all is underneath that.  There is something there, and it needs uncovered, and in more than just one visit.  If you don't have a regular doctor, look up your county mental health center, where you can get free or reduced counseling based on your income.  It can be a lifesaver.  I took advantage of such a service in my county, and it saved my life (another story!).  You don't need a strategy other than working on you.  Once you feel you are a whole person, you will be better equipped to be in a relationship.   Good luck to you.  You deserve to be happy and whole.
9pm. I don't always wake up at the same time but I'm usually home before 9 and I'm never asleep before then unless I'm sick. Plus my gyno said if I take it at night I'd be less likely to feel sick. I have an alarm on my phone though and I'm not gonna lie, 9pm is a bad time to have an alarm set when you're seeing a 7 or 8pm movie.  Oops.
my mom was super against black underwear and sheets -- not because of moral panic, but because at some point in her life, there was a big scare of black dyes containing chemicals that would mess with people's fertility. And women in our family tend to bleach out crotches fairly quickly.
Ugh. Gatekeepers. Delete his message and block him. You know who you are and you do not have to prove yourself to anyone, much less to a bitter troll still living in his mom's basement.
Its okay, thanks for the help.
I know they are linked, that doesn't mean that race, and class are feminist issues. Even feminists dealing with those issues doesn't make them feminist issues.
Or just go "WHAT?! DID YOU SEE HIM?!" and start crying and walk across the bar to the ladies room pulling your phone out. Hang out and play mobile games for a bit.
OP please contact the National Domestic Violence Hotline at 1-800-799-7233 to explore your options for safely leaving the relationship. Pack a small bag with copies/originals of your birth certificates, social security cards, extra cash, several changes of clothing, and leave them with a trusted friend until you are ready to leave. Please consider going into confidential domestic violence shelter if there are any in your area. Nobody deserves to be treated this way.
Eccleston played the war survivor side of the character pretty well. He also gave the character a more traditional action hero image, which helped to get some new fans in before Tennant returned it to the Doctor as played by Tom Baker, etc.
You aren't responding to any of my questions and appear to be cherry picking the comments you pay attention to. If you're only interested in pushing your point of view without paying attention to mine then this is not a discussion. 
Drop the pill. Get some other kind of contraception, if necessary, but don't flood your body with "I'm comfortably pregnant"-hormones any more. After I stopped taking the pill, I had my first orgasm a year later, when all that stuff was out of my system.   Second advise, stop trying. Start with baby steps: what feels good? What do you fantasize about? What would you  be interested in trying out? Don't look at the finish line, look at where you are now.   Try out on your own. Alone. With a vibrator. Call it "training session" and let lose your imagination. Don't be ashamed of it. It's not a betrayal of your husband, but you doing something to improve your marriage (like getting a new hairdo. Or working out. It is no big deal!).   There's nothing wrong with you. When I did my research into the topic, I came across numbers like "up to 33% of all women never climax". Don't believe magazines and websites. Relax. 
Wow, that's pretty cool! I'd heard of people who'd been full-time for years move to a new area and have their new physician require therapy before prescribing hormones, I figured it was just standard, but that's awesome! Was it a doc supportive of informed consent, or just someone who was pretty damn cool and reasonable?
Is it the week for gym creepers?
It's a tricky one. You were concerned about the girls safety, but your boyfriend was concerned about your and his safety. Who is more right? Probably no one. Your thought process was very brave and altruistic, but his was more sensible.  
Thanks, I love Emily :)
Thanks for all the suggestions, I've already seen Thelma and Louise multiple times, I adore that film.
Don't be silly. It would have taken at least *two* of them.    
There are different tiers of sex offenders. Some don't have any such restrictions. 
&gt; So he gets home and asks what's wrong and I ask to be left alone, three times. But he won't let up. I start with him being late with no call, that's sagar (as far?) as I got before he exploded.  OP knew she was in a  bad mood and therefore it was not the best time to calmly and rationally approach the issues she had so she tried to do exactly what you sugest and save it till she'd cooled down. Husband demanded to know, and when she (perfectly reasonably) stated that she wanted him to call her when he's late home, he flew off the handle and shouted a barrage of insults at her that culminated in her cowereing in a closet.   Now I think everybody here agrees that communication is broken in their relationship. Where the other posters disagree is that they are concerned that OP trying to fix this with a  'honey I think we should see a therapist' conversation may put her in danger. If you are familiar with TwoX then you'll know that 'go and see a therapist' is the standard reply to pretty much any relationship problem, except where there is abuse. Surely it is better for OP to er on the side of caution and seek help. Marriages are important, but safety is more important and her husband has been shown to be extremely unstable. 
I'd say no. I'd say they aren't *less* objectified for being player characters, but that's not what I was saying about male player characters. I was saying they are *more* objectified for being playable, because then they are a tool for the player (i.e. the instrumentality thing).   However, that seems pretty weak to me. Every character in the game is a tool for the player in a similar way, because the game itself is a kind of tool, so I think the "they are a tool because you play with them" doesn't hold water.  However, I'd also question the idea that Bayonetta and Rayne are objectified at all, at least in the narrative of their own games. In the narrative of their games, they aren't tools, lacking in agency, owned by others, interchangeable, violable or denied subjectivity. However, Rayne at least was designed to titillate, so perhaps that falls under instrumentality? Denial of subjectivity?  I'm not familiar with Juliet and Ivy, but the girls in DOA are denied subjectivity and agency.  Really, though, I'm not very familiar with these concepts. When I asked which ones apply to male characters who are objectified as power fantasies, that was a genuine question.
&gt;  The Little Red Book  contains quotations from Mao Tse-tung.  You almost certainly mean My Little Red Book.
It doesn't help either of you if you don't enjoy the interaction. It's not so much a rejection as an impossibility too, since you're technically "taken" in a sense until your dates with that guy if he's the one you want to focus on. Saying no doesn't mean they're not worth anyone's attention, it means you don't personally believe there's compatibility between you. It's not insulting to deny someone automatically because you can't control your feelings. It can't be helped.  You can still call that guy and let him know that you've made a mistake, felt it'd be insulting to say no, but you already have your sights set on someone and shouldn't waste his time. You could just tell guys that ask that you've already got your sights on someone.
[deleted]
Can't give any advice that is as good as the advice on here.  Just sympathy.   But even though your family live far away, *seriously* consider calling them for help.  That's what family is for.    This is abuse. The things he said to you are *not normal* and *not acceptable.*    One of the things that the modern world often forgets is that men absolutely have a responsibility to be kind and reasonable with their wives.   They are physically stronger and physically more intimidating.   This intimidation is to be used during conflict with other men, not with women.    They have a responsibility to manage this physical advantage, not exploit it or use it to try and get their way all the time.   He has a responsibility to be respectful to you *because* he has more than you in terms of resources and physical strength.    This is not a fair fight, and he knows it.    You're not the only person who has experienced this and you *can* recover.   I'm sorry you've had to experience this, but there are lots of people who are rooting for you wish you all the best.    Just put one foot in front of the other and get out.  Trust me.  What you're describing is absolutely *not* okay. And don't let anyone try and tell you it is.   -----Take care of your physical safety first, and then the legal stuff can come later.----   And don't. Go. Back.   
I was 12 and a half. I felt like I waited my whole life for it! My best friend (who is only 1 month younger than me) got hers before me, and I was devastated (I had boobs/pubes and she didn't, I thought I was so ready!).   I really wanted my period for some reason. I have an older sister and my mum had the sex talk chat with me when I was younger so I was definitely prepared (knew what and where pads were kept etc).   I luckily had a day off when I was in year 7, mum was home with me, so that was helpful. 
[deleted]
Depends on your definition of skinny. Back in my military days, I remember seeing girls at our annual fitness test wearing tiny shorts with a lot of cellulite hanging off the backs of the ones who clearly never exercise. They were the ones who just took diet pills all the time.
you've missed the comments on other threads... squatting is a no-no as well
Yeah, don't have that were I'm from. Hurrah! That's one small victory I guess.
Funny. er, OK.
Yep.  Everyone always brings it up, no one ever has a source.      
[deleted]
Thanks for your very kind words and taking the time to write me. 
I always end up having my "emotional day" either on or the day before the last day of my period. This month it included telling my boyfriend he was better off without me and that I took up too much of his time. Then I watched PS I Love You, bawled my eyes out, had some beer and then promptly went to sleep. I woke up in a great mood the next day. 
I think you're sending the wrong type of message to your niece. If your comfortable in your skin, that is great and you shouldn't have to change for anyone else. But you said you don't like the way you look, and you seem to be using a "fear" of men and the type of attention you might receive as your excuse to remain unhealthly overweight- is that the kind of message you want to send to her?  Also, just because you are skinny doesn't make you attractive and being overweight doesn't suddenly make you ugly. Sounds like a really bad view to project to your niece also.
I don't mind being asked questions, I was just confused why only one pharmacist thought to talk to me first.        I work at at a drug store and the pharmacists are amazing. I honestly don't know how you manage to deal with so much crap on a regular basis. I can't count the number of times I've had to recommend customers to you guy when they try to ask *me* about what medicine they should use...like I would know!         Seriously, thanks for doing what you do! Stores like us wouldn't be able to survive without you. =] 
I wasn't saying that. I was pointing out that this part of Highest_Koality's explanation of what "patriarchy" is didn't make sense:  &gt;It's called patriarchy because the "select few" who get power under it are men. 
[deleted]
Just try to be honest and confident in your decision. There is nothing wrong with saying something like "I think you are a nice person, but I'm not interested in being more than friends with you, but I really appreciate the offer."   You can still hang out as just friends, if you want, but the real point is to be completely honest about your intentions. Like some other people are saying, its the dishonesty of accepting an offer that you know you don't want to that makes it worse. Rejection AFTER you do that is the hard rejection, rejection right at the get go is easier the more you do it.   I've been dating on and off from online dating sites for about a year, and I've come to realize that being honest is actually so much easier. I've kept an open mind and gone on dates with guys, but if I'm not feeling a romantic connection, I make sure to let them know right away. If you nip it in the bud before they have really invested much thought in possibly being in a relationship with you, etc., then its easier for everyone.   So just get yourself a script that you are comfortable with. The real issue is the surprise of it, and you don't know what to say, so saying yes is easier than just outright saying "no," and I get that. You can always say too that you are interested in someone else, but you are flattered at the invitation. Its all in what you say and how you say it. Just practice your little script so when it happens, you have it in your mind already and don't feel taken by surprise.   So maybe "Thank you so much for the offer, I am flattered, but I'm interested in someone else right now I don't want to give you the wrong impression." Or something like that. It gets easier once you see how much people appreciate your honesty, they get over it really fast, generally.   Good luck!
Great job! It's good to know somewhere a girl with a less-than-supportive family has someone like you so share life with! 
My fiancé told me a week into dating that he didn't want to have sex before marriage.  It was a little awkward how he brought it up, but who cares, because we're engaged now.  I wouldn't worry too much about what you say or how you say it. If the person is good for you, they're not going to care that you're inexperienced, and they're not going to reject you for it.  
I am a feminist who addresses men's issues just as much as women's issues. And I've met many feminists who do. Unfortunately, all I can do is be the change I want to see, and encourage folks to do the same. (You could do it, too, if you wanted to.)
OK, so cramps are your body's way of pushing out the "period material" (to use an official term ;) ) right? Well, it's really your entire abdomen cramping and preparing to expel material. I've heard it compared to "birth practice," in that it's your body naturally working to push what's in your uterus out of you on a monthly basis, it's just not a baby.   As when you have a baby, there's more in your abdomen region than just your uterus - you've got your intestines and colons too - so often, the cramping will affect more than just your uterus and result in a HUUUUGE, sometimes uncomfortable, poop on the first or second day of your period (when the "real" bleeding starts - sometimes the first day is very light for certain women). 
she could use the car to get another job and maintain it, a home and a lifestyle. things would change, but your realism is awfully skewed.
Lelo makes the world's best vibrators.  Life-changing!
&gt; I didn't say anything about gender roles.  I am keenly aware of that, because frankly you haven't a clue what it means and how it's different from gender identity.  Perhaps you need to brush up on your psych 101 before commenting on a subject which you clearly do not understand aside from an anecdotal personal experience.
You're representing your own personal views as "basic respect". You present a subjective opinion as common sense, but you have no basis for that claim. When I demonstrate examples which prove that it's not as common as you like to pretend it is, you dismiss them using your original (circular) logic.  &gt; Argument from (personal) incredulity (divine fallacy, appeal to common sense) – I cannot imagine how this could be true, therefore it must be false.  And a little  &gt; Argument from ignorance (appeal to ignorance, argumentum ad ignorantiam) – assuming that a claim is true because it has not been or cannot be proven false, or vice versa.  -----  &gt; and just because some women have internalized sexism  This is a tautology. Your argument is circular. Your only basis for this "internalized sexism" is your representation of your own subjective opinion as universal. The only basis for your representation of your own subjective opinion as universal is based on the assumption that the exceptions which prove you wrong must just not know themselves, and that you must know these people better than they do.  You've presented nothing **but** logical fallacy here. I'm certainly open to reasonable debate, despite your ludicrous generalizations, so if you've got some actual foundation for your claims feel free to back them up.  &gt; The behavior is universally bad,  Many people disagree with you, and by the very definition of "bad", that proves that this is false. You can claim that _you_ find it bad, but you cannot make claims for other people, it's not your place to do so. Perhaps you can come down off your throne and enjoy life with the rest of us sometime?
No, my parents never fought or yelled at each other. They talked it out, they valued each other. If my dad had ever hit my mother, split her lip, yelled at her like OPs did, I would have wanted her to leave him.
Thanks for the advice! You gave me the words I need :)
What did you expect from News Corp?
Maybe, but she had that account for over a year, and she deleted it only a few hours after that post. There are alot of really creepy comments even in the posting that are thankfully downvoted below zero, and a lot of deleted comments that were really creepy too. I've got creepy PMs from posts that didn't have anything to do with anything suggestive at all.
"But for 30-somethings, the fall has been material, at about 4 percentage points.  Surely some of these young adults were homeowners who lost their homes, and were thrown into renting by circumstance, rather than by choice."    I think this is his conclusion, so to speak, which has nothing to do with the weird blamey-sounding 'if you'd just get married, you could buy a home!' headline. Kind of a bizarre piece.    My husband and I bought our house in our late 20s because we were able to get such a good interest rate after the crash and we both have masters degrees and excellent jobs. Sadly, not all people - regardless of marital status - are in the same kind of position following the recession.    I'd imagine that has a LOT more to do with home owner rates than marital status... people are coming out of school with loans and shitty career prospects at best, and Republicans are doing every damned thing they can to destroy the middle class. Yet you expect people to buy houses? 
10, and 3 months before my 11 th birthday. My mother's menarche occurred when she was the exact same age as well.   I was well prepared. My mom gave me this hippy-dippy book called Period that explains everything and added things like how wonderful it is to be a woman, how everyone is different but still beautiful, and how the media only presents a few body types. It also had cutouts for a uterus, ovaries, and Fallopian tubes to hold up to your body.
You're not abusive, you just hit people when they disagree with you? *Okay.*
Wow really?  Forget all the factors leading up to the argument, if you feel like you have to hide in a closet from your spouse during an argument, that they mock your inability to leave, and demean you as a person that's just fucked up and abusive.  I've been in some bad arguments with my wife and I've said some unkind things that I am not proud of, but none of them ever intimidated my wife into hiding in a closet, and I would never mock her dependence on me as a bread winner or demean her contributions to our lively hood by being a stay at home wife.  Just because you work hard or have a rough go at it doesn't mean it's ok for you to demean others when the are clearly reaching out for help.
I don't know of any guys like that or girls, but I wanted to ask this community so related the question to women. 
Yet it's so commonly misinterpreted and misrepresented. The name needs to be changed I think, because feminism itself has changed quite a bit. 
[deleted]
I hit the 'report' button and it went away. Is there a way to still retrieve the message?   Apologies for the post. I wasn't posting so much because it bothered me as much to see how many other women have had the same experience. But, I totally see what you're saying so no issue. I look forward to continue being part of this community! 
We can talk about objectification at length, but saying that 'they're just doing their job as NPCs' doesn't really counter anything in the video. Yes, this is what their job is, and we can critique what their job is. Game makers get to decide which parts of the world their players get to interact with, and for how long and for what purpose. They decide to feature the strip clubs and brothels, it's not an accident. I also find the argument that 'it's not even sexy' interesting considering one of the most common other arguments I hear is 'sex sells, give the market what it wants'. Either way,it doesn't matter if it is actually sexy or not, what matters is that these women are sexually objectified and disposable and that changes and shapes our perception of women negatively.
If this one big fight &amp; abuse is one occurance (it seems to surprise you), well maybe working on it &amp; suggesting councelling. maybe he feels guilty.   Summon the courage to have a talk with him, &amp; try to save your family  Don't jump on a divorce - unless that's what you really want
Because STEM fields are considered masculine by our society. There was a time when it wasn't. Programming used to be considered "women's work," and that is certainly not the case now. If you tell girls that they won't do good in a STEM field, they're not going to pursue it. If you ridicule girls for going into a STEM field, they're not going to do it. It's the same logic you see in traditionally feminine fields, such as nursing. Nursing covers a wide variety of medical care, but it is seen as a bit strange for a man to pursue a career in it. Because it is considered to be a feminine field. 
What she is describing is abuse. Would you hide in a closet if you were just having a disagreement? 
I am on birth control, but that is it. I will give it a whirl and try to relax.
Research is only one part of the fight against breast cancer btw but please link me to a source that shows expenditures dipping.
[deleted]
[deleted]
i got my first period in November '04 then didn't have another one for several years.
&gt; comments section of a celebrity news website  Avoiding those areas is best for your personal sanity. 
I agree that we have been conditioned to see being alone as a bad thing in society, when it truely is not.   As someone also learning the friends lesson, people are not judging you as much you you think they are. It has taken me a solid two years to grasp this. People are self-centered, so chances are they don't notice the majority of what you think they do.   In other words, I encourage you to join the groups, as it may help you create a feeling of selfworth. If it doesn't you can atleast say you tried, groups aren't for us all. 
Take your kids with you. Mine was the same way, almost like you were describing him in your op, he didn't take anything financial, he didn't take any cars or all of his clothes when I told him to leave. He took my son to Michigan, the best advice I can give you is call a lawyer and take your children. The lawyer can help you recover papers, it's by far harder to recover your kids. 
[deleted]
nope nope nope.   OP your chief responsibility at present is to ensure the safety of yourself and your kids. educate yourself, get legal advice, make plans for financial stability if your current situation changes quickly, keep and copy all records you can find, and maintain civility if possible for the sake of your kids and any potential divorce proceedings. so, so sorry for everything.
[deleted]
Your period is probably late because of how stressed you are. Also, if you're this scared of getting pregnant you should really be on birth control. If you don't want the hassle of taking a pill or visiting the doctor once a month, get an IUD. They last for several years and are the most effective form of birth control available. 
Pads are really important for sleep. Always buy unscented. Also accidents happen. Hydrogen peroxide takes blood out of cotton when washing sheets and underwear. Good idea to purchase black underwear and dark pants for school. Also ibuprofen. Some girls use pads and tampons at the same time. I suggest buying ultra thin unscented pads with wings (these are like a sticker you place in your underwear and the wings wrap around the back), and Tampax pearl regular unscented.  Side note: caffeine may make cramps worse for some women. 
Great initiative - your daughter is a lucky girl. 
&gt; That I am uncomfortable being around people who are very self assured and totally comfortable being who they are. Because, you know, I think they're judging me (or something).  I am one of those people.  If you saw me walk down the street, you wouldn't look at me twice.  I'm not beautiful.  I'm not the smartest person in the room.  I'm literally nothing special.  But I'm really comfortable in my skin and who I am and just...confident.    And I'll tell you honestly, I'm not judging people like you.  But to be fair, I often wonder.  I wonder why your insecurities are so prevalent.  I wonder what made them that way.  I have a friend who has a few people in her life that treat her really bad.  But she can't let go.  Its due to crippling insecurity.  She doesn't seem to believe she is remotely worth more.  Its very sad, but I'm not in a position to help (except to listen) because my personality is "that person is rude and not nice to me, so we are no longer friends."  Its really that simple for me.  I think life is too short to be around people who make you feel bad.    I love your attitude.  I think that is the first step I made (long ago).  I would rather have no friends than shitty friends.  You teach people how to treat you.  If you allow others to treat you with disrespect and you keep hanging around, they will keep treating you that way.  If you don't allow it, they will either shape up, or you move on.  And good news?  You WILL find friends who accept you for who you are using this mindset.  You will find that there are people out there just like you who crave real social interactions with kindness and laughter and trust.  
Please speak with your doctor. We are not set up to offer specific medical advice here.
[deleted]
You probability need to put them in higher. If it's too low it hurts. The applicator should be all the way in before you push out the tampon.
[deleted]
Argue with the logic if you have an issue with it.   
[deleted]
Yep, /u/brianb5050 is here to support the abuser (who isn't here seeking support).  
I just want to say you're a great dad. My mom died when I was 10 and I started my period shortly after... At school. So embarrassing. My dad took me to the store and let me wait in the car while he bought me pads and Midol. At home he showed me how to use the pad, then gave me an oatmeal cookie and said to take a bath, as that helped my mom when she was having cramps.   It wasn't awkward with him, he just didn't make a big deal out of it. It makes me happy to see dads like you and him who don't make a girl feel weird and gross about something that happens to every woman and is totally normal. Keep up the good work:)
I still think there are communication issues happening on both sides, and that while it's a problem, it's not a relationship beyond repair.  While I see your point, I think we may have to agree to disagree. As always, thanks for responding. Have another upvote :)
I want to see more posts like this. Thank you, sir, for being a decent human being.
I agree, and your approach is with merit. My own abusive behaviour is linked to mental illness. I go to counseling. I take pills. I meditate.   And when shit get's real bad. I mean really really bad. When the sickness starts to spill out of my head and into the real world, I get as far away from my wife as I can.  While your approach is with merit, it doesn't help the ongoing abusive situation, or the fact that she is in obvious danger. There are many many red flags in his behaviour. Addressing any underlying causes will be appropriate when OP and her children are safe somewhere outside of the control of the husband.
[deleted]
Go have another pap smear. If it's normal you don't have it and he probably doesn't have it either. Men can't be tested for HPV so it's best for you to just go get tested yourself. First confirm whether or not you have it, then wonder about how he might've gotten it. What your describing does not sound like HPV in the slightest bit.
It's pretty easy to be using a back mas sager laying down and then flip over for some reason. 
You sound like an amazing dad. I wish most girls could be so lucky. Not assuming you would, but please don't make period jokes to lighten the mood unless she starts it. Having a period can seem mortifying. Keep up the awesome parenting!
&gt;Like I said in the other post, it's not mandatory that OP correct the bagger, but she loses the right to complain about it when she's not willing to try to fix it.  That's complete bullshit.  We get to complain about people being assholes, even if we don't spend every second of our lives risking our sanity and physical safety trying to teach them NOT to be assholes. It is each individual's responsibility to learn how to be a decent human being, and their parents' and teachers' responsibility to help them.   In the moment, it is EXTREMELY difficult to get past the shock, dismay, and shame of this kind of assholery and respond appropriately. Saying that people don't have a right to complain because they didn't have a snappy comeback ready is apologism in its most insidious form.
[deleted]
There's simple math in play here though : you're making the assumption that Komen generates dollars that would otherwise not go to charity.  We can't say for sure if that's true or not, but we can say that if BCRF was given 400 million, 360 million would go to research.  That same amount given to SGK generates far less research.  My point is they're more interested in raising money to raise more money to pay more overhead.
See, I think the people telling you to smile more is somewhat rude though.  The others are more like general observations, so less personal. Although, I wouldn't be surprised if "You look tired" rubbed people the wrong way either.  As for the title, yea, after submitting it I thought perhaps reddit would be more literal with the title than I intended.  Am pretty new on here; I will attempt to change it... 
So...he was in an open relatioship and didn't disclose until you were around his friends, who probably know about his girlfriend, which is why he didn't respond to flirtation. You ignored him, knowing now that he had a girlfriend, instead of asking him to demonstrate that his relationship was open, and then for some reason you cuddled with him? You're confused? Go find some dude who doesn't have a girlfriend, or at least ask him to demonstrate that he's actually in an open relationship and that he's not lying to get some ass on the side. 
[deleted]
My view might not be the norm. But when I had my first period, I was frustrated that my dad never helped me figure it out or let alone talk about it. It was always my mom, and while that was obviously helpful, I thought my dad was being immature by getting squeamish and uncomfortable if I ever brought it up. I just remember thinking, you're a grown man dad! So I know it's awkward and uncomfortable but I really encourage you to be as supportive and understanding and cool with it as you can. I think it will make your daughter feel a lot better if she knows her dad is comfortable, or at least, willing to have an adult conversation about it. Kudos to you for asking for advice as well! There's my two cents.  Edit: Spelling. 
They're much more common in Canada and the US, from what I understand from other people. I use OB or my Diva Cup, personally - I can't stand pads, even cloth ones! 
"women should be written as women"   No.  People should be written as people.... Men and women aren't so different that have to be written in different ways.  (obvious exceptions are period pieces and such.) 
A kid twirled his pencil and some serious shit went down, he also had to. go through mental evaluations or his dad would have lost custody
Yeah, not really. Especially not if you're unwilling to try hormones, since hormones are directly responsible for libido.
&gt;What would qualify as proof that he's in an open relationship rather than lying to get some ass on the side?  Ask his girlfriend to confirm. It's possible that he'll say OH, WELL I DON'T WANT TO ASK HER TO CONFIRM THAT BECAUSE WHILE WE ARE OPEN SHE DOESN'T WANT TO HAVE HER FACE RUBBED IN IT. In that case there is no proof that he's in an open relationship and you have to go with your gut, that is, if you actually care about whether or not you're messing around with a dude who might be in a monogamous relationship, which you don't seem to.
The title of the post,   &gt; giggled that I can't survive in the real world without him  and  &gt; at one point told me to get the fuck out of his house  and  &gt; took the keys to my car and said I had to use my feet   were the flags for me. We get stories like that all the time. A man I council has an ex wife who did something similar, actually kicked him out of the car and made him walk. Attempting to make a person feel helpless and dependent on the abuser is classic abusive behavior.  
Yeah, he's just a run-of-the-mill, average everyday cheater. If you're interested in learning about nonmonogamy there's a pretty good book called the Ethical Slut that is worth a read, and also a nonmonagamy subreddit here: http://www.reddit.com/r/polyamory/. But really, he's just cheating.
I completely disagree with some of your advice and think that we all need to remember that periods happen in a way unique to each girl/woman. Anecdotally, I hated pads when I first got my period and would have been extremely frustrated not using tampons - I have never found them scary. I also experienced the worst cramping of my life in the first year of my period (11-12, am now nearly 23) and am not sure what I would have done without ibuprofen then, although I very rarely need it now. I also devoured any information I could find about periods, because I don't consider them either scary or a curse - *personally* I consider it a disservice to think of them in such negative terms, although I know many do.   It is absolutely okay if what you're advising is true for you and/or your daughter and/or anyone else. But it's not advice that would have worked for me because it's simply not a one-size-fits-all situation. I think op should be prepared for whatever experience his daughter has. Most importantly, he should mould his reaction based on what he knows about her.   (ps I hope you don't feel I'm attacking you, I tried really hard to not make this sound confrontational. I'm sure you're a great parent to your daughter!) 
[deleted]
I feel like I'm coping with the same thing. You're welcome to message me anytime you need someone to talk to.
Please explain how not having enough evidence to prove without a doubt guilt is rape culture?
If you don't have one already, invest in *covered* trashcan in the bathroom for disposal, especially if you have a dog! 
Gotcha! Thanks for the tip :) 
For the Nth time, does NOT have to be physical.  A woman with a recording of her husband calling her a name will get full support from police in most jurisdictions.  I live some place where calling a woman a cunt or a bitch (if she gets it on her phone) will be enough for the police to counsel both people (and usually they get the man to leave the home).  THat gives her time to reflect on what she wants to do next.  So there's no right to be an asshole in front of kids, regardless of whether they're yours or not.  
Thank you for saying this. There are so many trolls ITT slagging off motherhood, I swear I'm going to light myself on fiyah &gt;.&lt;  I went from full time employment to full time motherhood. Motherhood is the single hardest fucking job I've ever had, and I'd had people throw beer bottles at me in the work place. This gig is no fucking JOKE, holy shit I'm fucking tired. I haven't had a day off in almost 17 years lol.
Ah, yes. Another 2X thread where people come in screaming "not all men!" and "he was probably unjustly accused/was a teen who slept with his teen girlfriend!" And let's not forget "some girl probably flirted with him and then HE got charged".  THAT IS NOT THE POINT OF THIS THREAD. I can't wade through ANY thread here these days, without seeing it deluged in accusations of false rape claims and shit.  I use the downvote button, but this is just really depressing.  OP, I'm glad you're okay, and it was poor form for your boss not to run a background check. Poor form also for this guy to lie by omission. He should have known better, applying to a place near a children's daycare.
A variety of hygiene products is very important.  As a mom to a 13 year old, I don't really recommend tampons first off - it's hard enough dealing with a period, let alone putting it 'there.'  
Tell him ASAP. If he and his wife are having unprotected sex she's at risk of getting it. No guarantee that he'll tell her, but the right thin to do is tell him ASAP. 
Oh, well it doesn't really matter to me if she is or not. I come to TwoX to give support, not question the validity of stories. What would be the point of that? If that's a real problem for someone, they should definitely stay away from reddit in general. I mod rape counseling subreddits. If I wasted my time being concerned about whether or not stories were true, I wouldn't be helping the actual victims. If someone makes up a story in my sub, and people give them support, what's the worst thing that happens? Someone received information and resources they don't really need? If the alternative is they don't get the resources, and the person actually needed them, then I see a problem. Not the other way around. 
What about your replacement? Help out a person who's at least hypothetically super nice?
So, I'm a cis-woman, but between growing up pretty poor and spending most of my teens giving myself diy haircuts, I've made it into my twenties without a working knowledge of how to go about the salon process. This thread is exactly the kind of walk-through that I've been too shy or embarrassed to ask my friends for. Thanks, all of you! 
Towel up.
Most people don't shave bald. The idea that all or most women do it is definitely skewed. I mean, women are expected to shave all the hair on their bodies. It's not surprising you would think pubes were no different.
This is great advise. Atthe dollar store by my house this have really cute, tiny makeup bags that would be perfect. I might buy one myself come to think of it.
I always have to take off my glasses, so I can't see shit when I'm in the chair.
Probably too late but here's my 2 cent: tampons are not the easiest to use nor the most comfortable. I personally never found them comfortable. Look for pads that aren't too plastic-y (Always is one of the worst brands... my midwife even said they recommend staying away from it because their pads don't breathe well and can cause all kinds of problems). Stayfree is the brand I prefer. It feels more like fabric that plastic.  If you're willing to go the extra mile, I strongly recommend you take a look at cloth pads. Might sound crazy but they are actually the best health-wise. Some women even say their period is shorter/lighter and they have less cramping with them. If you should choose that avenue, you'll have to teach her how to care for them and buy the right kind of soap (it's not really that difficult or gross but she should be comfortable doing that herself because I doubt she'll want to ask your help). Many online stores for cloth pads offer 'first period kits' with different pads, for day and night, a carrying case for soiled pads, etc.   I think that the fact you're thinking about preparing for your daughter's first period is great. :)
[deleted]
I never had an issue with them either and never understood why on earth you'd pay that much more
How about exploring porn/erotica/etc.? Find a time when the husband is out or busy and get busy with yourself. Explore some things that you haven't done before.
I don't think this is normal.
Wow, surely that's got to be illegal. Don't they need like parental consent or something at least?
I'm glad I wasn't the only one! After the first day of just-brown, I thought that that was just what my period would be, and that I wouldn't have to deal with the actual blood that most women did. I was so disappointed the next day :/
[deleted]
I also wonder if changing the desirable stat from "win/loss %" to "average sentence" would help by encouraging prosecutors to take cases involving more serious crimes.  A 50% chance of getting a 10-year sentence would be more appealing by that stat than a 100% chance of getting a 1-year sentence.
Was 12, two months before my 13th birthday.  I vividly remember the event because it was at my grandmother's big 75th birthday bash. Went to the bathroom, and surprise! there's my period. Luckily, my mom had briefed me on the event (in addition to sex-ed in 5th and 6th grade), so I wadded up some toilet paper for my undies and went to find my mom. Only unfortunate thing was that she only uses tampons, so I had to use a a restroom dispensed pad (*shudder*, they're HUGE!). Didn't even leak on my khaki pants!
[deleted]
Ok why did you pick this sub to ask? Seems like a random choice...
Would people **stop** with the bullshit of "if you get a divorce its going to traumatize the kids" Its going to traumatize the kids if they constantly watch fights so bad that the mother feels the need to fucking **hide** Its going to teach them that treating people like that is *okay* Theres also a high fucking chance the father could start being physical. Are you SERIOUSLY saying "wait until he beats the living shit out of you before you leave" are you SERIOUSLY fucking saying that? really now listen to what your saying, its not abuse because he isnt hitting her? look up waht abuse IS because you obviously do not know. theres many types of abuse and all are severe. This is mental and emotional abuse and it is NOT okay, stop acting like its a crime to want to feel emotionally safe. shes even said in comments she specifically didnt want to talk to him because she [KNEW he would blow up like this, ITS HAPPENED BEFORE](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/comments/28cfga/my_husbands_actions_tonight_make_it_clear_i_have/ci9t5x8?context=3) Its absoluely sickening that you all think its okay for him to do this becuase its "justifiable" because he might be "stressed". No his actions are abusive and **never** justifiable with they are to this extreme. And lastly, No one fucking hides in a closet unless they are seriously fucking scared, its obvious to me you have no idea how mental and emotional abuse works if you think otherwise. 
Tell me more! 
[deleted]
[deleted]
LOL. We'll I'd use a six-inch ruler rather than a yardstick, but whatever works. :-)
Like the previous posters, I've never had any side effects. If you got the pill from Planned Parenthood I would call them and ask about it
I understand the realities of the situation, my mom was called to Jury duty once and as a small business owner wasn't really in a position to take the time away from work to do it. Fortunately for her the case was delayed and the jury was dismissed.
Lol
Make sure the bag/container isnt see through. A pencil pouch or makeup bag is the perfect size. Would definitely recommend some chocolate and ibuprofen or something.
TIL: o.b. stands for "ohne Binde", meaning "without sanitary napkin". Apparently they're German! 
You mean reinforced.  The film is fucking old. 
Not getting involved was the smartest thing, I'd say.  Let's say one of you intervenes and the guy starts punching you - you're going to have to defend yourself, which could be construed as assault (especially if his lawyer is better than your lawyer).  The woman being assaulted could have a change of heart, like another poster said, and defend her abusive bf and get you in trouble.  I know your instinct was to help, but something like this is really dangerous and can be twisted once it goes through the legal system.
[deleted]
Touche, thanks for context instead of just down-voting me.
&gt;I would expect a criminal prosecutor to be more familiar with acquaintance rape than the average juror.  What makes you think otherwise?  I'm not the previous poster, but... it's amazing what people are unfamiliar with. I don't know what all the training is for criminal prosecutors, but from what I do know of law school, it's mostly about learning how to understand law and formulate arguments, and particular areas of law are a matter of specialization. As an analogy, I got my Master's in Urban Planning, and so I learned a bit about environmentally-friendly development, but I mostly focused in Transportation. The folks who were concentrating on Built Environment know a lot about environmentally-friendly development, but less about transportation.  So a criminal prosecutor probably focused primarily on grand theft, simple and aggravated assault, and so forth... the most common crimes they'd be likely to prosecute. It's only fairly recently that acquaintance rape really even was on the radar of the legal system :-/. It's probably only mentioned briefly in much of the curriculum. So, unless they know someone personally who has been through it, they probably have little info about what it consists of.
by the way, if you're a woman, and i'm going to assume you are ;), HPV can be a huge deal for you. I'm not sure how long it would take for hpv to show up, but most obgyns can run this text without issue. 
Books about puberty would be a good thing to put in the kit, I think. My mom talked to me about stuff and still gave me books as well. A good one is The Care and Keeping of You. There's a part in the book that shows you how to put in a tampon.  Tampons and pads as well. There are variety packs of tampons that carry various sizes. Those are good to have on hand. When I was still getting a period (I'm on the pill now so I don't get them often anymore), I'd have the larger tamping for earlier in my period when I had a heavier flow, then I'd use the regular size for the end of my period when I wasn't bleeding as much. I didn't use pads by themselves cuz they made me feel like is wet myself, but they were good for catching any extra blood from my tampon.  Snacks! Chocolate, chips, ice cream--whatever her favorites are. The chocolate thing can be true for some women so it's good to have it on hand.  Painkillers like ibuprofen, pamprin, and midol. Also a heating pad to ease the cramps. If you don't have a heating pad, fill a sock with dry rice and heat it for a minute or 2 in the microwave. My mom did that for me once when I had bad cramps. Also, something to settle her stomach in case the cramps make her nauseous.  If she has a favorite stuffed friend, keep that on hand. Early on her period may wear her out so it may be nice for her to have something to snuggle with.  These are just some ideas. Hope this helps. You're a good dad :)
Well, I paid a lot of money so that they use medical grade materials. I also plan on cleaning it... sort of how you wouldn't eat off any old plate, but if you clean it, then you're good to go.  Anyway, I have the Siri, which isn't intended to go inside of you, only clitoral. 
And a lot of the time they seem to bank on an employee not suing even when their complaint is easily something lawsuit worthy if not taken care of. I had to deal with some serious sexual harassment at a previous job (we're taking to the point of stalking and threats). HR did nothing. I got the police involved and the matter was taken care of very efficiently. HR is often a liability to its own company. 
Prepare for the worst: http://i1.ytimg.com/vi/VBT_1OrTYUM/maxresdefault.jpg 
all about figuring out what size you wear in men's pants - 32 checking in here, and my pockets go halfway down my thighs. I swear I can fit my iPhone, HUGE wallet (because let's face it, it's hard to minimize that shit) full set of keys, whatever change and cash and random crap I accumulate during the day and I still have room for my "balls" to hang free. Even in my skinny jeans - shout out to Vans - the pockets can fit almost everything you have in your purse **and your ass looks great**, guaranteed. 
it's the size it is so that it expands enough to catch the blood, but remember that it's a soft silicone. You fold it up a certain way to put it in, and it only expands/opens as much as it needs too, and honestly you don't really feel it once it's in there, assuming you put it in right.
Is it really all that "drama-inducing?"
Remove for violating rule #3 in the sidebar. Have questions about the removal? Please [message the moderators](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FTwoXChromosomes).
My wife has done it twice already and will be doing it a third time next month.  We did it for two reasons: 1.A couple of ours had always wanted children, we're talking 7-10 kids. The potential mother always dreamed of having a large family and being a mother. She had two miscarriages due to some issues I'm not well informed of and finally had a daughter. My wife saw the pain and hurt this caused her friend and started looking into a way to help people with this. So she decided to donate eggs. 2. We got $5,000 for donating each time.    We obviously have no regrets since we're doing it a third time.    There are no lasting side effects. You may be soar in that area for a time after, also obviously no sex whatsoever. In any form, at all. The doctors repeatedly infirmed us that you are very very fertile at this stage and any P TO V contact (not even insertion) can result with you having 8 kids.You take two self administered shots a day in the space between your naval and vaginal area. My wifes body began to hurt because it has to be one of only two areas that get the shot so you are shooting the same space twice a day. It greatly increases your egg count and adds pressure to your ovaries and that general area making you less active. You also have to go to the doctors office to have the eggs physically removed and for checkups to make sure all is developing well.   Each state has different laws regarding children finding you years later.  From our personal conversations with the counselors and doctors and what not the system is moving in favor of allowing the children access to information about you and in many states they already can. So yes it is very possible in 18 years to have a child come try to find you. 
holy shit - I have NO idea as I seriously haven't worn women's anything really in years
Thanks for the correction, I think I had fibroids mixed up as being basically the same as cysts.
[deleted]
:) I suppose.  But I've never heard someone say, "That bearded lumberjack dude is having a bad day.  Let's get him some Godiva."    It's probably just a stereotype thing.
Boys pants just can't begin accommodate this booty. I've tried. 
It's not that hard to buy a manual, I bought a six-speed Mazda 3 brand new less than a month ago for just over $16000 (before tags and taxes). Automatic would have been at least $1000 more. I love it. You don't need a sports car to drive a nice manual.
Mothers have convinced their daughters to lie to put fathers away. You honestly don't believe that girls have lied before? Did you never hear of Brian Banks?  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Brian_Banks_(American_football)
My family wasn't outwardly religious at all, but my mom was a bit bipolar with her views. She was raised catholic, and one day she'd be telling me I'm a woman with the right to my own body, and the next telling me I can't have sex before marriage and I'm a whore if I wear x. I was frequently body shamed in various, random ways too. So not quite the same, but I suppose still a bit damaging.  How do I go about finding a sex therapist? My health insurance has a website for all that they provide. I've looked under mental health before for other reasons and it was sort of lacking. Mostly a bunch of articles about how to destress in your life by doing yoga or something, and then links to stress therapists, which seems too general for any of my issues. 
My sister actually just did surgery on her third round of egg donations. she does make a lot of money doing it. She also has a lot of the same traits you mentioned and seems to fit the bill of what some couples are looking for. She has never regretted it. Apparently it is a sore and tiring process, and the hormones kinda fuck with you, and you have to give yourself shots every day for a while. You aren't really given the option of meeting the family (at least through her donor program) and she doesn't want to. But it is weird knowing that there is a three year old out there and a 1 year old, out there that have my sisters genes. strange to think about.   Hope that helps.
Who only buys cars or furniture from women?   What. Are. You. Talking about. 
Yeah, I can wear latex gloves and regularly use latex for theater special effects so I didn't think it could be that but maybe. 
Don't make the assumption that just because she's 9 (or 11, 13, 16...) that she's going to be able to get by with regular and light products. I started at 9, and I bled through the light or regular tampons in less than 2 hours. Until I was old enough and ready for a menstrual cup, I had to use super and super-plus tampons if I wanted reasonable protection.   
[deleted]
Ooh! My nurse had ones that were also about an inch thick, with wings, and enormous. And my school uniform involved skirts. Sigh...
This would have been typical for the time period, though. Post-war, most women did return to staying at home to care for children, husbands, and households. Most teens were probably anticipating a life of being a housewife. Light housework and the other kinds of exercise recommended in the textbook (walking, for example) is a completely valid part of being active, and exercise can improve both emotional and physical well-being all month long, not just during menstruation. 
Hi OP, what a thoughtful daddy your little girl has!  Growing up in Australia, there was this fabulous book all the pre-teen/tween girls would practically fight over in the library called 'The Rough Guide to Girl Stuff' by Kaz Cooke, writer/cartoonist. [Here's a preview of the contents if you're interested](http://www.penguin.com.au/extras/70/9780670028870/lookinside/1.jpg).   [Maybe pick up a copy here](http://www.bookdepository.com/Rough-Guide-Girl-Stuff-Kaz-Cooke/9781848360181?redirected=true&amp;gclid=CjkKEQjwzv-cBRD_oY2PouKVvMIBEiQAKuGNC_1PXxtVLVuImW0Xf6uxG-BAEl-pv8n-RfNjjhQFwrfw_wcB)? That's probably best suited to her changes in a few more years but I thought was a fun, interesting way to learn about, well, girl stuff.   A teen friendly puberty/biology book of some sort wouldn't hurt, even something that covers sexuality and anatomy of the vagina a little better. There's nothing worse than not knowing how to insert a tampon or being afraid to.   As others here have mentioned, checking in with the school nurse/a trusted female sounds like a great idea, and keeping a small lined and lidded bin (trashcan?) somewhere easily accessible but private is a must. Period tracking apps are good, though obviously for the first few months to a year, a girls period can be pretty irregular.   It seems like you already have the right attitude to deal with these changes sensitively. Normalizing the experience helps a lot, even if she doesn't exactly want to tell you about her periods every month.
I wouldn't just leave it in her room with a note.  I would give it to her, and also include a note or letter.  I think it would feel like the Dad was trying to avoid an awkward situation rather than making it easier on her by not having to tell him when she started.  Besides, it might be good information for a father to know that she has started.  I would also include some Midol or Advil with the package.
This is an excellent clarification on my point.
I love my V6, six-speed, manual transmission Honda. But it took some looking to find it.
This is only based on personal observation and may therefore  be incorrect, but even though there are successful DADT relationships, the ones I've seen tend to become that way only after a lengthy period of being closed. And  by lengthy, I mean years more than months. Relationships that start out open tend to be really open meaning no secrets or turning a blind eye or anything. Maybe the encounters are not dissected or discussed in detail but everyone knows what is going on and has access to information about other partners.   Again,  only in my personal experience. 
Obviously, you start by watching/reading Carrie together. Whatever happens later will be cake.
have you considered switching to O.B./other applicator-less tampons? They fit wonderfully in that tiny little thumb-sized niche of a jean pocket that's between the actual pocket and the zipper.
I haven't read all the replies so I'm unsure if anyone (or how many) people have suggested this but make sure you don't make it an embarrassing subject. She should know it's normal and shouldn't feel embarrassed about buying feminine products at the store.   Another suggestion is to make a rice heating pad. They're cheap to make and reusable. Take an old tube sock and fill it with plain rice then tie a knot at the end. Heat in the microwave for roughly 30 seconds. My rice sock has been a lifesaver for me for years (replace the rice regularly cause it can catch on fire if you use the same rice for a long time or overheat it).
hahah =]
And remember, it's not just no sex, even masturbation is out. A good friend of mine donated years before I met her, and she still winces with pain when she remembers the one time she violated that rule... She  ended up in the ER because she didn't realize how much strain her body was under.
There's a very good book out there called "It's Perfectly Normal." It's one big book about puberty and human reproduction (it has chapters for both boys and girls). I believe there are male-only and female-only versions of it, but I'd recommend getting the one aimed at both genders.  Go through it with her. It'll be a little awkward, so don't do it all in one sitting. Go through it chapter by chapter, let her ask questions (and if she asks something you don't know the answer to or that the book doesn't cover - i.e., they don't say much about homosexuality except that it exists - help her look up the answer, either online or at a library).   I think the most important thing would be to let her know that, even though you're a man, you want her to come to you with questions and that no topic is off-limits or too embarrassing. Acknowledge that you don't know everything, but stress that you'll do your best to help her out (whether it's by educating yourself so that you can talk to her or some other way).  My parents bought the aforementioned book for me when I hit puberty, but we never discussed it. I wish that my mom or dad had sat down with me and talked about puberty and sex and all that; I learned everything via health class. I turned out ok, but it would have been much less awkward if my parents had talked to me instead of just handing me a book and saying, "here ya go!"  If you have any close female relatives (aunt, grandma, cousins, etc) enlist their help. Ask them if they'd be comfortable talking to your daughter about "girl stuff" and establish boundaries if they agree to this (I read the Ask Prudie column and there was a recent letter from a single dad who had asked his sister to give the sex talk to his daughter...and the sister went off the rails and started talking about BDSM and anal and other inappropriate stuff; now, I believe that most of Ask Prudie's letters are fake, but having if you don't want certain things discussed with your daughter, let the "cool aunt" know beforehand).   Best of luck to you both. 
[deleted]
I've taken it once and had no side effects. My next period seemed heavier though. 
I'm in favor of providing mammograms, especially to those who can't get them otherwise - I guess I'm just skeptical about where the grants actually end up and what percentage are used to help.  I've read about cases where multiple PPs, when funding was cut by their state [they didn't lose all of their funding, but some], cut out breast cancer screenings while retaining other services, despite the MAIN message of the protests being "don't take away my breast cancer screenings." In those cases, PP were the ones who took away the screenings, not their funders, because it's what they claimed to value the highest but it was the first thing to go. This leads me to believe breast cancer isn't actually their top priority, I just wish they were honest about it. :/
Your Dad took you out for steak dinner and excused you from chores for *every.freaking.period*? :D        That...that's like a birthday celebration for each disposed and unused egg. Holy shit, I'm not even mad...
I'm a cuddly sized woman, most of the work pants I buy have hip pockets, I find that I can easily fit an iPhone in the pocket without ruining the line as it fits in the curve of the let to pelvis easily.
My understanding is that prosecutors don't have much influence on the sentence, just whether the charge sticks.  If sentences are too long, that's a problem for judges and legislators to fix.  And I don't see how "the jury can just acquit if the prosecutor oversteps his bounds" is better than "the jury can acquit, or the judge can give a lighter sentence, or the legislature can set lower sentences for the particular offense".
[deleted]
&gt;What you can do is make it impossible for somebody like him to get a gun, and that would have been sufficient to stop him from doing what he did.  The Isla Vista killer used a knife to kill three men, and injured several others with an automobile, in addition to the three murders and several attempted murders with a handgun.  The single most deadly attack on a school in the United States was committed with a (then-widely available) explosive, and even as we've restricted access to that material, there are common and similarly dangerous alternatives still around.
I used cardboard applicators when I first started my period and they were fine, no problems. I liked that they could be flushed (the applicator) and I didn't feel like I was wasting a TON of material. It takes a little more then a second to put a tampon in so it's not like I was spending quality time with my applicator.  *That being said*, a few years later I got into the plastic applicators; it was true love. I went from the Tampax Pearl to the U brand stuff much later on. Then the feels of OH MY GOD I'M WASTING SO MUCH PLASTIC kicked in.   Now I only use the OB brand stuff, no applicator; pop that shit in and get on with my life. I'm not sure if they would be good for a beginner, but they're fantastic for me.
&gt; Hydrogen peroxide takes blood out of cotton  Castile soap is also a godsend for this. 
Thank you both. That's exactly the information I was looking for. I want to try to use my nervous energy to research now, before my appointment, so hopefully during the appointment tomorrow I'll have like a base line understanding of what the doctor is saying and I'm not completely overwhelmed by information, if that makes sense. 
[deleted]
You were expecting maybe sand?
Of course you are not the only one. Idk, my mother told me since I was young that marriage in and of it self does not matter that much, a dedicated partnership full of understanding and support can happen in a marriage, or out of it. The two are not equivalents. Societal norms can be very much annoying though. I never got to that point (21-almost 22 :) and no relationship I felt like it's forever yet). BUT! I had a 2 year one where random older people were asking me would we be getting married etc. Old habits and views die hard. And are incredibly annoying all around :D
[deleted]
There's a ton of advice here, but I wanted add that I was uncomfortable with tampons at first, so I just used pads. Kotex is fucking awesome for pads.
So many people don't know that! It's why excedrin works so well!!
Um, what?    - The Black Widow  - Xena  - Alias  - Nikita  - The Hunger Games  - Fa Mulan  - Ellen Ripley  - Sarah Connor  I think these are all believable - and they're popular with both men and women. Women can be incredibly agile and fast on their feet, imo they just need to be written right to make them 'believable'.
Just an FYI, some people are recommending Midol, which might be fine with her, but I have an extreme reaction to Midol.  It's like I've downed 10 espresso shots.  So, make sure she's not feeling worse after taking it.  She might think its normal since it's supposed to be for periods.  But it's terrible.  
But your make up doesn't just consist of mascara, and there is a severe quality difference between 1 dollar mascara, and a 10 dollar mascara?  hell, in australia, even 10 dollar stuff is really crap, but even if I go with the crappy stuff:  10 dollars on mascara, 10 dollars on eye liner, ten dollars on eye shadow, ten dollars on brow liner. and that's 40 dollars on your eyes alone, and that doesn't account for having multiple colours of things, nor does that take into account blush, pressed powder, concealer, lipstick, lip liner,  bronzer, highlighter, primer, etc etc etc  if you take into account those things, you have 120 dollars, and once again, that's only having one colour of things.  120 dollars every three months is a rather large sum of money.
I know in theory that you're right but can't really help how I feel atm. Mostly just confused and betrayed.
Word.  Dear baseball: What I'd really like is a vintage-style cap from my team, a replica of the kind they used to wear back in the 1910s.    What I DON'T need is a baseball cap that's pink, and has the logo of my team in sequins.  My team's color is not pink.
Go away! Seriously. A vacation would be great, but even just a hotel room in your same town, maybe a place with a pool or a room jacuzzi. We've been married 21 years and struggle with the same issues, especially around work or other obligations. Sometimes a change of venue really helps. Make a date of it. Plan it and make sure it's all you guys. Nice dinner out, hotel room, shave above the knee (Ha!)  Edit to add: 43 here. Married forever.
&gt;  the message isn't getting across to **the men** all that well.  And it gets across to women? Any time men try to talk about female-on-male abuse, there are plenty of women (many of them feminists) who will respond that, since a woman can't kill a man with her bare hands, [male victims of abuse aren't really victims](http://www.nomas.org/node/220). I mean, it wasn't exactly men who came up with the [Duluth Wheel](http://www.uic.edu/depts/owa/power_control-wheel_clip_image001.jpg). Maybe this was just men treating you the same way that most women have always viewed male victims of abuse. Stop trying to blame men for everything, because if anything women are far worse when it comes to recognizing abuse.
[deleted]
Yes. I still think it's a good idea to let her try different brands. The expensive ones have a plastic applicator, she might find those easier. But a lot seems to be going on down there when she starts her period.
&gt;The problem is including female objectified prostitutes that serve only the purpose to titillate or get murdered in the context of a larger society that objectifies women and where real sex workers have pretty awful working conditions.  So then would there also be a problem including male laborers who are objectified (for the labor instead of sex value) and are otherwise discarded by society?  &gt;Who is the butt of the train joke? The hogtied woman.  No it isn't.  The butt of the joke is the films who use to do that.
Are you looking for a wedding dress (white/ivory, special occasion fabrics like satin, tulle, organza) or just a nice dress?  Are you set on the idea of a dress, or would you consider a ladies' suit or tuxedo? 
He received "tens of thousands" through the paypal account in the arrest warrant. I can't find a copy of the California indictment online. He plead guilty in December 2013 to a federal charge of falsifying his address when he purchased a gun (15 days in federal prison and 3 years probation).   The claim of $10k was to gain additional sentencing enhancements upon conviction. 
My boyfriend does this all the time. He likes to make it "dance" when we're in bed in the morning. Of course, that'll get my attention and lead to sexytimes more often than not. Does that mean I'm subliminally turned on by the dick disco? 
I think youre brave for going to court. House arrest doesnt seem like enough to me but you probably saved other girls by making him think twice before being an asshole.   Idk if I am strong enough to go through the court process, but I know I dont want him to think this is ok. I wonder if he thinks its ok or if he knows it was wrong. He acted like it was ok. I knew in my heart it was wrong but ive never done sexual things before which is why I needed confirmation from twox.  I called a hotline and they said it was definitely rape and I can get a rape kit done bc they swab your mouth and can get dna that way. 
The original point was a numbers point it was not a moral expansion of the various weight of the value of the death.   It was literally: more women experience violence in games than men.  Which is a complete fallacy.   To your expansion   honestly five to one is a bit disingenuous it more like thousands to one.   And really the cannon fodder npcs don't have any more real chance of surviving the player character than a non violent npc and in many games many of them are killed with out even getting a shot off.   The distinction is largely meaningless.
The worse the punishment, the more sure people are before sentencing it out.  Had his punishment only been 12 months of therapy with no prison time, do you think the jury would have been more likely to return guilty? 
Doesn't midol also have Imodium to chill out the bowel issues?
I should get a beard trimmer. I got one for the bikini line but always wished it would shave closer.
Definitely sure. Somehow I ended up with Catholic like guilt though! I don't know where I got it from! 
[deleted]
What a spoiled little child. It's normal to have an interest in your SO's needs, not to be like, "You should do things for me because I like them, but I should never have to do things for you because that's too much work." DTMFA and he can have the relationship of his dreams with his own two hands. 
Make sure to tell her to change her tampon often. 8+ hrs use is very very bad. Also there's a soap that's made specifically for lady parts, its called summer's eve and comes in a really pretty bottle, you can find it at just about any grocery store. I wish someone had given it to me when i was going through my teen years.
The American Girls book [The Care and Keeping of You](http://www.amazon.com/The-Care-Keeping-You-Younger/dp/1609580834) is a great resource.  It explains all the changes her body will undergo, basic personal hygeine, all about periods and how to use the basic supplies.  It goes into graphic cartoony detail about most areas.  I'd buy her a copy and let her bring the questions to you or a female she is close to.  Hell, ask her teacher, she may be willing to talk to the girl.  I've had to have the talk with several of my little ones (I teach elementary school) because they only lived with a dad. 
Like what?
I cried when I told my mom too. Then she gave me a special "Becoming a Woman" card and made it 100 times more awkward. 
Re: tampons.   They aren't intuitive. I had a lot of trouble putting them in when I first got my period. I know some women's mother's helped, that wasn't something I was comfortable with. When I was having trouble (and doing pool-sports) my mom brought me to my pediatrician and she explained the mechanics of it to me. It felt less uncomfortable coming from a doctor. My dad brought up tampons once when I skipped practice because of fear/inability. I almost died of embarrassment.
[deleted]
Well if we're not going to discuss definitions,  how are we going to have a constructive conversation? 
My friend and I have a line when we see someone at work we would fall all over ourselves to make beautiful babies with:  "My genes really want to have sex with his genes."
You heard it here, everyone. Women are the primary cause of misogyny. /s
Haha don't feel dumb! Easy enough to get confused :)
[deleted]
Midol has never worked for me, ever. Usually it was ibuprofein and laying in bed crying. Untill I hopped on birth control. Best decision everrrrr.
The funny thing is, I'm actually white. Like, blonde hair blue eyes WHITE white.  I maintain this only reinforces my point, that there should be a thread for an interracial group of women to explicitly talk about race. The issue of race is a major stumbling point in feminist theory, one which I'm actually interested in dealing with. Rather than arguing about "overgeneralizations."   Btw, challenge you to name ONE woman of color who does not mention race when discussing gender. Gender cannot be experienced except through a racial lens. Only white women remain blissfully unaware of this... although WE do experience race as well. We're just unaware of it because we don't experience our race as culturally specific. We don't think about our race in our day-to-day lives because to us, whiteness is default and therefore invisible.  The conceit of whiteness is that it does not exist, and thus paradoxically it believes itself to exist everywhere. Whereas non-white "otherness" is seen as particular and specific. This is inherently racist logic. I'm interesting in naming white femininity and talking about it as it exists in a racial hierarchy.  Analysis: Black Bloc, White Riot, some Fanon too, The Wretched of the Earth, and the blog I suspect I already sent you. Also this. http://www.gradientlair.com/post/52316045024/examining-race-oppression-gender-intersectionality
I had to start putting mine on the top of the toilet tank when my roommate got a puppy 
and I always thought they have perfect control over it! but seems like men and women arent *that* different actually.
God, I am 27 and I still cannot use tampons.
Seriously? Plastic applicators? They may be slightly more comfortable for the 3 seconds you're using it but then the earth is left with a souvenir of your period for the next bajillion years.  Fine for a teen but adults should do better.
[deleted]
"I plan to be too busy studying to find a husband."
Going to a boys house shouldn't be a "highly dangerous" activity, unless you are saying that boys are highly dangerous. Even if OP did not use drugs (which were provided to her by someone who might quite possibly be an adult) this could have happened. OP is not responsible for her rape. The rapist is. 
That was not very nice of the coach :( Yes, telling you in private would have been a better way to handle it.
This book was amazing! When i got my first period, I actually knew what was going on, and didn't think 'ohmygod I'm dying'
I'm somebody who exists in the intersection of lesbian and engineer, so I'm sure you can imagine my feelings about #2. I prefer giving people a blank stare and then change the subject. The more thought-provoking response could be (in a peppy voice, of course), "Oh REALLY?! I had no idea! Can you show me your data on that?" And either leave it at that or, if you really want it to stop, drag it out until they clearly become uncomfortable ("What's the rate of engineers marrying other engineers? What level of marital happiness do engineer couples self-report? Who collected your data? Was it restricted to one school or engineering discipline?" and so forth).  Ultimately--you can't fix the kind of biases people have that result in ridiculous comments like that. You can make them uncomfortable enough about it that they probably won't ask more than once, though.
[deleted]
I, personally, hate wings. Get both and let her choose
And another note to OP- we're all different. Personally, naproxen sodium works for me (a.k.a. Aleve). Vicodin too. Each of us is different. If she feels pain from it, you may have to try many different medications before she finds the one that works for her. 
Gravity Contact (one of my absolute favorites) Lost in Translation (shows a fairly accurate picture of a woman discovering what she wants from her marriage) Any and all Miyazaki movies- they all have seriously strong protagonists The Help  Documentary wise, I would suggest looking up famous or inspirational women, and seeing if there are any films on them. 
Nope, I got them when I was about 11 and i was actually convinced I had cancer. Thank you :)
1) If I'm keeping myself well hydrated and its a light day, I have to pee more frequently than change the tampon. I just tuck the string in the crease between my leg and body - it stays dry there.  2) No, I don't. Its not much of a hassle to not flush them, and I'd rather be safe than sorry.  3) It's uncomfortable to pull out a too-dry tampon. The risk of TSS increases slightly with tampon size, I believe, but it's not a big risk, provided you're changing them often enough.  4) I started out with applicators, because they were easier for me as a teen. Now I go applicator-free. If your friends have zero experience with tampons, they may find applicators easier, particularly if they're shy about sticking their fingers up their vaginas.  5) Yes I do. You're supposed to leave tampons in for &lt; 8 hours, and I sleep for &lt; 8 hours. I only do on heavy nights, since leaks are more common with pads. (Some other 2Xer suggested wedging the pad in between your cheeks, but that sounds less pleasant to me than a tampon.) 
You will want to use an anti-inflammatory like ibuprofen or naprosyn because it blocks the prostaglandin hormone that causes cramping. Tylenol is a pain reliever but not this specific effect
Uniforms are meant to create uniformity. I use to ramble so much about this. Now I am more for the uniform than against it. I think it teaches you how to flock with the birds or roam with the herd once you are done with school. 
[deleted]
Not that I'm in anyway saying it's okay. But when males go into nursing one of the top comments is also, "it's a good way to meet girls".   I'm not sure they even mean it to be offensive. It's just the gender stereotype. It sucks to deal with now but I've met so many female engineers that I don't think it'll be a thing for the next gen. At least that's my hope.
Yup, didn't take long for this to be removed...lol   All right, all right...
Thats better than I would have done as an explanation.   My only disagreement is in the use of the term crazy, its not. Its a different POV, not one I share but its morally consistent within his framework  
If what you want in a relationship is a human cat, please go one step further and get a cat.
Emotional abuse can be almost as bad in its own way!
[deleted]
You said something like, "just like women can't physically abuse men."  That's not true. Women can physically abuse men. I'm not claiming to know anything about what anyone else said - I'm telling you what I know to be true.   It's either the case that your online sarcasm sucks, or you're trollin' hard. So - you know - stay cool and everything.
You can get really cute small lined cloth [bags like this](http://www.target.com/c/bags-organizers-makeup-beauty/-/N-5xu1d#navigation=true&amp;category=5xu1d&amp;searchTerm=&amp;view_type=medium&amp;sort_by=PriceLow&amp;faceted_value=&amp;offset=0&amp;response_group=Items&amp;isLeaf=true&amp;parent_category_id=5xu1e&amp;custom_price=false&amp;min_price=from&amp;max_price=to) at places like Target that are intended for makeup, but also make a discreet (and cute!!!) bag to keep tampons/pads.    (Also, please make sure that when you buy any feminine hygiene products they are unscented, as perfumes can either cause allergies or are likely to cause infection due to pH imbalances)
[deleted]
Sorry some men have opinions that you find distasteful.  For what it's worth, most men know very, very well about emotional abuse, and know that it hurts people deeply.
[deleted]
[deleted]
I'm so sorry. The hardest thing for me to come to terms with as an adult was that my mother would never be the mother I wanted her to be. The more you try with her, the more you may be setting yourself up for disappointment.   I think you may benefit from this book called "Toxic Parents" by Susan Forward. Google that with "pdf" and I believe you can read it online.
While I agree that these people are scum, the hard truth is that in a lot of states they are not breaking the law. If a person (man or woman) takes a picture of themself and then willingly sends it to another person, the person receiving the photo may be considered (depending upon the jurisdiction) to have ownership of the photo under copyright laws. In this case, the person would be able to use the photo any way they see fit. If that's putting it on a website, then that is their business despite the effect that it may have on the person in the photo's life.  To be clear, in no way am I defending revenge porn websites or the people who submit content to them. I'm simply stating that in at least a few jurisdictions I'm aware of there isn't any real legal recourse for a person who has a picture they have sent posted online. You'll note that Hunter Moore was arrested for conduct related to hacking, not for having revenge porn content posted on a website. Extortion, invasion of privacy, and other acts of that nature are still against the law, but these acts are not always present in these types of situations. The moral of the story is that you shouldnt take a picture of yourself that you're uncomfortable being posted online. If you want to take a naked photo and share it with someone, you need to be prepared for the possibility that it may end up online. Either don't take the photo at all, or make sure it's someone that you truly trust (but even that isn't foolproof; see american divorce rates).  I think it's a great thing that some jurisdictions are stepping up and taking leadership to head-off some of these legal dilemmas. American laws regarding the internet, and intellectual property in general, are woefully outdated. These issues need to be revisited so that things like revenge porn are outlawed in totality.  TL;DR- Glad these people are getting screwed over, but sometimes they aren't actually breaking the law. Everyone- keep it in your pants and especially don't send pictures of it to someone you don't absolutely trust!  Source: 3L Law Student Edit: Grammar and clarity   EDIT: Clarified my point in a post below.
Thought this was going to be an Onion article.How are these guys still in office? I know this was 95' but Damn! 
I'm easily annoyed and irritable two days before mine starts. The first day I have the worst cramps of ever. My birth control makes it so it lasts anywhere from 3 to 5 days. It's easy after the first day. Even though it's easy, I still want to stay home and do nothing and eat chips and chocolate. Sadly, my job won't even allow me a sick day without doctor approval for quarters.. 
Not to mention he forcefully pushed her head down.  It's disgusting how there always seems to be somebody blaming the victim in these threads about rape and sexual assault.
[deleted]
Ha, I didn't even know I was in an open relationship until I visited said boyfriend, who enthusiastically told me how he had his first kiss with a girl he was also seeing a few days before. Needless to say, after I took his virginity and that week of visiting ended, I moved on. He was so heart broken I felt bad about how much it made me laugh. He never showed such attachment until after I ended it on him, which was after about a month of him not talking to me for no reason.  I think you should just move on. I know a lot of long distance relationships work (not mine, haha) but you aren't even in one with him. And if you can't handle being "the other girl" then it should be best to get out and save yourself the emotional feels and drama.
[deleted]
[deleted]
This is REAL? Sighhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhh.
Or that you're almost guaranteed to get urinal splash back on the day you wear light coloured trousers!
I used to track my symptoms until I got on the pill. I never bothered with a calendar because I couldn't be bothered with counting. It was always wrong when my mum did it for me. Symptoms were much more accurate. Extreme inability to sleep followed by a few days of not being able to do anything, my craving for anything and everything high in sugar and salt. My depressive mood swings would occur a couple of days before, and the hot flashes.. Oh my gods the hot flashes. I knew I was in for it when those cropped up. The boobs never bothered me. The cramps occurred during, not really before hand but I get them the worst in my back, which is pretty debilitating and induces a lot of panic.
Wow, thank you - this honestly just made me feel so much better.    ps. Your ex sounds like such an ass. Glad he's an ex to you - you deserve so much more than that BS.  &lt;3
[deleted]
Jumping in with a small comment.  The DMV workers have no idea if that is how you look day to day. They just need your picture for facial recognition. Lets say in 2 years he finally sides with the male gender and gets pulled over. The cops will be confused as hell now as well.
1. I like how you throw in "light" at the very end. That word is super subjective in this circumstance. Is the left photo really light make-up? Not to me. Maybe yes to you. I would not expect a DMV worker to be skilled in the art of make-up.  2. As you can see all through this post and probably next time you go to the DMV, they WILL have a woman remove her makeup if it could in any way mess with facial recognition.
Why don't you leave then?
Well, it wouldn't have been a picture of a woman. It would have been a picture of a man with foundation and lipgloss. It didn't change his appearance that much.  
How about 'woman'? It is the correct term after all.   (I'm usually not bothered very much by the use of 'girl', but when I see sentences like "What are men supposed to do to get in contact with girls?", I'm squicked the hell out. XD )
I also use an app to track. My Days, it's called. Helped me figure out my cycle length and a few other details that I wasn't aware of before. TTC websites are great for learning intricate details about your cycle, too. It'll help you assess when you'll be PMS'ing so you'll be a little more in control of the madness. Don't feel bad about the crying over silly things. It happens to the best of us. I've cried over not getting Dr Pepper, running out of detergent, not being able to find anything to watch on TV. The list is endless. LoL. But knowing has also helped me with giving the hubby a "head's up". Has spared us many arguments. :)
[deleted]
Not to me he doesn't. This topic being pretty subjective I don't see it too far fetched to think a cop, another person who doesn't know this guy, to be thrown off. I personally just don't see a problem with a state issued ID requiring a natural look. He can leave the dmv and continue life as normal.
For the second, guys taking Chem Eng (Fem Eng) at my school were told that. As for the first one, I see no issue in that they are trying to be compliment your choice and it is a well paying career and you'll be taking jobs that pay the most, no ?
A man this batshit insane would never be able to hold a political position in Canada ... he would be laughed out the doors!  Oh wait, Steve Harper.
What the fuck, which spastic jurisdiction are you in that says that giving someone a copy of something you made without further explicit agreement gives them the copyright?
Sitting in my car in the parking lot at work waiting on coworker. Family walks by with kids as I read this headline and shout "WHAT THE ACTUAL FUCK" with the window down. Oops. 
Um, you have it the wrong way.  He is arguing that just as rape is wrong, so is abortion.  I'm not saying he has a strong argument, but you should at least recognize what it is.
[deleted]
So perhaps things on mental health? If you've got more suggestions on health literacy I'd love the hear them! We are very focused on building a reliable and helpful health and fitness section so this sort of thing would be an amazing addition!
Seriously. I need feminism because this guy hold an ELECTED OFFICE. 
&gt;  Its like they turn rock hard and grow half a size over night.  Seriously right, wtf is up with that? It's like thanks body for giving me ultra perky big boobs for one week but make them hurt so that I can't enjoy them. /sigh
Hot water bottle it's used to help with cramps. As for tampons some people still feel if you use them you're not a virgin. 
It rustles my jimmies when someone refers to me as girl, lady, miss, or ma'am. Just use regular sentences without addressing me by my sex! It isn't complicated.
Then take the time to read the manga, you'll get hooked.
BTW - This guy is Maine Rep Larry Lockman. [Here is his web page](http://www.maine.gov/legis/house_gop/_reps/rep.php?rep=lockman&amp;story_title=Maine%20House%20GOP:%20Meet%20Rep.%20Larry%20Lockman) which has a link to his email and phone. Why don't you ping him and let him know what you think of his amazing philosophy?
Finding good (or any) shows or movies to watch has become so much harder since I got fed up with bullshit sexism and objectification. So I definitely understand how you feel, although I personally very much enjoy OITNB.  My bf is just like your friend. Like, "it's wrong but it also doesn't bother me/it's not a huge problem", sort of. I think it's just the easy and lazy way of handling a problem that doesn't really "concern" you. I also get the feeling that your friend doesn't really understand that general media isn't disconnected from reality and therefore harmless, but in fact the *exact* opposite. I find it very hard to discuss these issues with people like that, because there's just too many steps to explain and in the end they probably don't see your point anyway.   Personally, I think the constant portrayal of female stereotypes and the blatant sexual objectification of women is like poison in our society. Girls still grow up in a world where male sexuality is the *only* sexuality that counts, being taught things like "men like to watch, women like to be watched", "men have a stronger sex drive than women", etc etc basically telling us our sexuality is passive and about being sexy. I would so much prefer a world where girls are taught that they can be active and that their sexuality is strong too - and this constant objectification and stereotyping is just one small step at a time away from that.
I don't think you follow what I'm saying.    The quoted section is a paraphrasing of KTRex_'s reasoning, not that of anti-abortionists.  
My friends mum through her a 'becoming a woman party', I was invited plus a selection of her mums friends and they giggled and talked about womanly things. Horrifying. Don't do this. 
Holy strawman, Batman!
I don't wear makeup and don't think it's a positive thing, but:  &gt; I feel she wears too much make-up  None of your business  &gt; I hate it smearing all over my my face, clothes, pillow and worse I hate smelling that stale chemical smell  Tell her you don't like it. This is not the same as deciding how much makeup is appropriate for her to wear and is perfectly reasonable. 
Logic checks out. I did the math
&gt; If this doesn't work, try to talk to her mom.  Not sure how that would help. I'm 32 and if I was in that situation talking to my mom wouldn't do anything.
&gt; Prosecutors will often bring other cases based solely on witness testimony, or sometimes even less than that. I suspect this is actually a case prosecutors being unfamiliar with how acquaintance rape happens (or that it happens), and projecting their own uncertainties onto the jury. &gt;   Hardly projection.  Prosecutors lose rape cases more often than any other kind -- which indicates they're more willing to bring rape cases than juries are  to convict in rape cases.  &gt;That said, I don't think people should ever be put behind bars based solely on witness testimony (which is notoriously unreliable). It just seems unfair to me that law enforcement only uses this standard when judging rape cases.  I'm confused. Do you think prosecutors should bring acquaintance rape cases based solely on the testimony of the victim or not?  It's a bit sanctimonious to criticize prosecutors for not doing something you don't want them to do. 
&gt; I personally disagree with everything he said  Of course you do. You are an actual women and he is thinking in terms of caricatures that he and people like him imagine women to be. Sounds like you don't know, but it's a thing now known as Red Pill/PUA/PUAHate. He feels that he has a right to sex and obedience from women and when they don't co-operate he feels frustrated.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Best of luck! You're an amazing woman for doing this!
No is no. No matter what.
'Girl' is another way to infantilize adult women, which basically discredits their maturity and contribution in our society.  EDIT: That's cool if you disagree with this statement, but OP created this thread for the purpose of hearing our opinions and discussion of the topic. Feel free to downvote if you disagree, this is how I feel. Calling me "dumb" /u/GlassHalFullKindaGuy is totally fucking inappropriate.
[deleted]
You don't need to justify what you're asking for to me. I was just pointing out that it's disappointing that in this sub a lot of the time an OP is given very fuzzy, feel good answers that seem designed to make them feel better rather than be completely honest. This more applies to the person I was responding to rather than to your post, so don't take that as an attack on you.
SPOTS! Always get spots (on my face) a couple days before. Reminds me to start wearing pantyliners, but damn spots are annoying. 
Yeah I thought this was an Onion article, it really should be. I don't think you should look for people generalizing human behavior in these fields of academia specifically looking for nuances to ancient peoples lives. If archaeologists misinterpret something its probably an error not an underlining rigid world view of female inferiority. Admittedly Nature does use ridiculously hyped article names something the person writing the article steers clear of. I took freshman level archaeology courses where we talked about the importance of fertility symbols and I took a lot more science classes. The person who wrote this has not, or is purposefully making the readership wary of the horrible sex fiends hanging out in the archaeology department. This person also could be the greatest human being writing the most cringe-worthy dribble at length, or just someone talking out of their ass to get other people talking out of their ass in a large ass to ass network.
I work in a clothing boutique and have helped dress ladies who have put on weight for various reasons (medical condition, new motherhood, stress etc.). You can look amazing at any size! The most important things to look for are fit, proportion (so it doesn't make you look too short) and colour/pattern. Sizes and numbers on labels are just suggestions, try not to get hung up on what the label says. Get pieces that fit well, suit your height and are in colours and patterns that suit your complexion and physique. There are lots of articles online about dressing for your shape, but I'd be more than happy to work with you personally. PM me if you're interested :)
Then I don't understand how the phrase is a 'good reply' to the 'find a husband' thing?  Could you explain the reasoning?
If we're talking about deviations from population norms, then yes, those are very 'odd' traits.
Maybe I was wrong about it being one sided. Either way I don't think it should be the first response of anyone to a major choice. 
[deleted]
So what are your feelings on abortions after 24 weeks? They are not exactly routine but they do happen.
Why would it be degradation? Would it be degradation if a man did it?
Exactly.  Much like "I'm going out with the boys", "How are the boys?" and "We're having a boys night out" are commonly used to infantilize adult men, discrediting their maturity and contribution to society.  Or... Maybe... It's just an informal way to refer to a group of people of one gender?  Don't get me wrong, I appreciate it is a patriarchal society and there absolutely are components of the language used to discredit women and reinforce.  I just don't believe this is one of them. 
You must care or you wouldn't be asking for our opinions on the subject. How other people dress at music festivals is none of our business.
Upvoted for my new favorite euphemism.
&gt;The context in society doesn't overtly sexualize men or focus on the "female gaze". So it wouldn't really be the same.  Oh, okay. I was operating on the outlook that women should be able to do whatever men do, and that it should be no more looked down upon.
No, he looks like himself + makeup.  I've certainly seen gender-conforming females be asked to remove their makeup for less. I don't think this is really a case of harassment based on gender confusion, but standard practice for DMV behavior.
I can't remember.  I've been on my period for almost 3 months now. The cramps, fatigue and general blah-ness have become my everyday life. And not a day goes by that I don't want to slap the shit out of someone. Throw in nausea, vomiting, headaches and bloating just for fun. 
Now that add in the information about having boys, tell your husband.  He will understand and want to make sure your boys never, ever grow into being someone who might do this or let it happen to someone they know.  Make sure you two are alone, have plenty of time, no distractions, and make sure the conversation is outside the bedroom.  While I am sure your husband will be upset, he will be very proud of you and will see how you have not let this one incident, a very traumatic one at that, define you.  Please keep us updated on how it goes if you decide to tell him.  Encourage him to reddit too.
Yep, body autonomy. One of the strongest points in the pro-choice movement.
In my provincial dialect, the most common ways to refer to men are a shorthand for "boy" and "son". The most common way to refer to women is probably "missus", pronounced like "Mrs.". The two ways of referring to men "infantilize" in the same way that "girl" does, but the way of referring to women borrows from a word which implies some sense of age.  However, my culture is definitely quite sexist. I think that the use of "girl" is very likely a quirk of the language, and not an indicator of sexism.  One reasons Americans may not use "boy" as often as they use "girl" is that "boy" took on a racist connotation at some point in American history.
I was in the hospital for seven days total. Four days of holding in an emergency room cell, then three days in an actual psychiatric hospital where they adjusted medication and observed me.   I have been dealing with these issues for about a decade, but things have recently worsened greatly due to me having recently given birth and suffering PPD, as well as me being laid off from work.  
I would say its more of a play for attention than anything.  Man or woman, when you dress like that you are more than likely doing it for attention.
FRATMOSPHERE. I will be using that moving forward.
[deleted]
Yup. I have a hair appointment for tomorrow. I haven't had my hair cut since July...that's almost a year. And my hair isn't that long. It was shoulder-ish length when I got it cut, and now it's about boob length.
(HUGE disclaimer: I'm a dude.  Begging forgiveness if this comes across as mansplaining.)  &gt; I suppose I can't fully embrace the idea that having an abortion is the same as any other minor surgical procedure.  And that's perfectly alright, because legally it isn't and IMHO for a late-third-trimester-totally-healthy-fetus morally it isn't either.  I prefer to think of it similarly to a kidney donor: it would be _nice_ if everyone who needed a kidney got one, but _terrible_ if we legally mandated kidney donation.  It's fine to think of a fetus as an unborn baby, but the baby still needs to be "plugged into" a woman's kidneys, liver, and everything else in order to survive, and the woman may have compelling reasons not to undergo the pregnancy.  Even most anti-choice people agree on some of those reasons (rape, incest), where I differ from them is by saying that the woman herself is the best person available to make the determination whether or not to allow use of her body for a pregnancy.  For the same analogous reasons that kidney donation is opt-in, not opt-out.  What's sad about the abortion debate is that a strong social safety net -- basic income guarantees, zero-cost prenatal care, zero-cost child care, both maternity and paternity leave, etc. -- combined with access to contraception and good sexual education would dramatically reduce the number of abortions sought.  Put that safety net in and you could make the most militant pro-lifers AND pro-choicers happy.  But it turns out there just aren't all that many pro-lifers out there, they are really anti-choice: they don't care about the fetuses as babies, they care about the consequences of sex. 
I recommend getting a second (or third) opinion from a different doctor if that is an option for you. Clearly something is wrong, regardless of what the blood tests are saying. 
That's what's really bothered me about the whole thing... the idea that other people have to somehow 'approve' of your relationship before it is legitimate. I'm straight, but I'm a huge advocate for gay rights. It's honestly been really eye-opening to see how threatened people are by a relationship that is outside their norms. At this point, I'm almost stubbornly avoiding marriage because I want people to question why that makes them so uncomfortable (and it doesn't affect my relationship in the slightest anyway).
&gt;making decisions here and now based on a hypothetical world where things are equal can lead to bad decisions. Eg, your walking down the street example.  Okay, here's where we get to an interesting demarcation point. I don't think it's a good idea for women to get totally blackout drunk, right? Because I think that leaves them open to being taken advantage of by men. However, I've been routinely criticized for that point...for saying that women should operate as though they live in reality, not in some hypothetical world where they shouldn't have to be afraid of assault. What do you think of that?  &gt;It definitely should be completely okay and safe for men and women to talk down the street at night. But acting or making decisions as if it is now can be problematic.  Agreed.  &gt;For the switching of the men/women in revealing clothing? Well, with the context of society/male gaze in media, a woman doing this will most likely be met with objectification in viewers minds since it's common. It doesn't seem strange. Subverting that commonality on the flipside would feel out of place. It would most likely be met less with objectification in viewers minds but instead with confusion / uncomfortableness.  I dunno, man. If some dude is on the same level of attractiveness as the girl in the picture in OP's article and he goes to a rave with a sock on his cock, he's going to be both sexualized, and thought of as a fucking weirdo. The question remains though, should any aspect of what he's doing be considered degrading? Similarly, the girl is going to be WAAAY more sexualized and objectified than the dude, and women are going to look at her and think WOW WHAT A SLUT. Why should this invite more accusations of her degrading herself? Just because of the increased sexual component? 
[deleted]
&gt; "even if a a fetus is a "baby" from day one (personally, I don't really feel this way, but that's neither here nor there) it does not have the right to use your resources for its own without your permission.  I think you've cross over into absurdity. It's permission was granted when a woman engages in an act scientifically verified to produce it. 
I think it has to do more with the fact that "men are fixers" and try to fix everything if they think it's broken. When a spouse is sick and it is something they cannot fix, maybe they get scared, or frustrated, or down right angry because it's not something they can understand.  Also, throw in the fact that most men adhere to gender roles (some more rigidly than others) they may not be ok with taking over the household responsibilities that were once the wife's domain.  Being a caregiver for a spouse is hard work, and it's very testing and frustrating at times.  
That is super, duper cool of them. 10/10 would definitely become a regular there.
You're saying a lot of things that are being motivated by your feelings instead of logic.  If you explicitly define much of what you are talking about and then look at those definitions objectively, I think you might find that you are not being fair.   I am not saying it would be right for men to force women to have babies, I'm just saying that it is no more right for women to have explicit control over terminating a child.  By the way, the fetus is not a part of the women's body, seeing as half the genetic information contained in the fetus is indeed the mans. It would seem you could also frame your own argument in such a way to say that the women would be killing part of the man by killing the fetus. (Seeing as you say it's okay to terminate the fetus, because it is part of  the women's body.)
This case supports my opposition to election of judges.
Pro choice = pro abortion is something that a lot of people tend to subscribe to, especially on the pro life side of things.  Pro choice means just that- for choice. I myself am pro choice but that doesn't mean I run around advocating abortions. It just means I support that it is an option for those who may need it. I mean, I don't necessarily think abortions are awesome or anything but I do appreciate the fact that they're available.  Most of my reasoning for being pro choice has zero to do with abortions.  It just has to do with me supporting the side that says that I, and everyone else, should have the right to make my own decisions regarding my own body.  On the other side, you have pro life. I've read a lot of different things, talked to many people who are pro life and have come away with this conclusion (although it may not apply to everyone who is pro life, it seems to be the most popular opinion)- pro lifers are not anti choice, just anti abortion.  They truly believe that abortion is murder, hence the "pro life" label.   When you stop and think about both sides and their reasoning behind supporting what they do, it starts to look like we aren't against each other at all. We don't even have the same basic focus for our choices. For me, being pro choice goes far beyond the single issue of abortion. It is all about choices and being able to make those choices for yourself. I definitely support people's decisions to get an abortion and will do all I can to support them emotionally and mentally. I don't think any less of someone who has had one, because I know that's not usually an easy decision to make. But I feel it's extremely important to support the fact that the decision is theirs to make in the first place. 
Crazy is a mental health judgment not a political one.   Failure to keep the two separate is  great for whoever is in charge  politically, my opponents need to be locked away etc etc  and is a mainstay of Soviet regimes but its disastrous for the mental health profession . Its why despite the emotive quality of the words they should not be used outside context and I don't think here is any evidence that Lockman has any diagnosed mental illness.   Now occasionally  persons with actual diagnosed  mental issues do run for and even hold office, feel free in those cases much the same as its appropriate.  
[deleted]
Care to back up your assert with reason or logic?
[deleted]
The quickest way to escalate a discussion to an argument is to tell a person to "relax" when they aren't being unreasonable.
[deleted]
&gt; Tell us how a woman having sex means that she's consenting to become pregnant.   I believe that for most people this is obvious but I'll explain the birds and the bees to you. When a man and a woman love each other very much... Long story short, a fetus doesn't miracle itself into existence.  **Proposition A**: A fetus is the product of biological material that originates from both a woman and a man. The biological material from both parties are required in producing a fetus. There is no third party.   **Proposition B**: Let's also assume that both parties to this endeavor are cognizant of the fact that pregnancy (and therefore babies) are the product of sexual congress (in most cases this also a given)   **Proposition C**: The sexual congress was consented to by both parties  Prop B in concert with Prop C imply that one possible result of the sexual episode is pregnancy and both parties are willing participants. Of course there are means of mitigating this outcome, however as we all know there is not really an effective means of reducing this probability to zero other than sterilization. Prop A, working with props B and C imply that there is no third party (fetus) to whom permission must be granted. Props B and C show that participants were willing and cognizant parties to such an outcome.   Takeaway:  * When a woman consents to sex with a man and that woman is aware that pregnancy is a possible outcome of sexual relations she is consenting to the possibility of becoming pregnant.  * If you have engaged in non-consensual sex please feel free to get an abortion with no caveats  * If you did not know that pregnancy results from sex please feel free to get an abortion with no caveats  * If you got somehow pregnant while one or both parties are sterile please feel free to get an abortion with no caveats
That's very true and is probably a huge contributing factor in the OP's issue. 
I think we can all agree that violence of any kind is wrong. The reason that people are glossing over this is because the subject at hand is a much more extreme form of violence than punching someone in the chest. Ask yourself this: why, when reading someones account of being raped, did you feel that the most urgent subject of discussion was the flaw in her character that you didn't feel was getting enough attention?   Imagine if your kid came running up to you and said "Daddy! I threw a stone at someones window and a man came out and raped me!" and when people were consoling him you got mad and started saying "this is BULLSHIT! he THREW STONES! That's disgusting and unacceptable!". Fucking grow up. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
Well, you're very much entitled to your way of thinking, but I don't agree with you.   If I consent to sex with my SO, I'm not consenting to becoming pregnant. I'm consenting to naked fits of pleasure and intimacy that is experienced between us, and us alone. Having sex with my man isn't scientific.    I'm consenting to multiple orgasms, not a fetus. You can consent to whatever you like when you engage in coital activities, that's your prerogative.   
Wow. Your opinion completely cancels out actual research. I'm super impressed.
In my state (Hawaii), all judges are appointed to their positions.  1. When a judicial vacancy opens, the [state Judicial Selection Commission](http://www.courts.state.hi.us/courts/judicial_selection_commission.html) meets to review applicants and create a list of nominees.  (Five separate authorities appoint JSC members: the Hawaii State Bar Association, the Governor, the Chief Justice of the Hawaii Supreme Court, the President of the Hawaii State Senate, and the Speaker of the Hawaii State House of Representatives.  Of the nine JSC members, no more than four may be licensed attorneys.)  2. The Governor appoints an individual from the JSC list for most courts.  Appointments to District Court (the lowest level of the state's judicial hierarchy) are instead made by the Chief Justice of the Hawaii Supreme Court, who will also choose from a list generated by the JSC.  3. All appointees are subject to [advise and consent](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Advise_and_consent) by the [Hawaii State Senate](http://www.capitol.hawaii.gov/senate.aspx), which will convene a special session if the timing of the appointment does not allow for consideration during the annual regular session of the [State Legislature](http://www.capitol.hawaii.gov/) (mid-January through early May.)  The State Senate will hold at least one public hearing to receive testimony from the public about the appointee regarding their character and ability to serve.  4. If the appointment is confirmed by the State Senate, the process is complete and the appointee takes their seat on the bench.  If the appointment is rejected, the Governor (or the Chief Justice) must select another appointee from the same JSC list.  5. Most judges in Hawaii serve for a ten-year term, except for full-time District Court judges, who serve six-year terms.  If a sitting judge wishes to remain on the bench when their term expires, they must apply to the JSC and go through the appointment process from step 1.  Unlike the federal courts, no judge in Hawaii serves a life term.
i'm hesitant to say sugar babies are automatically sex workers, because sex is not always part of the equation. plus, some sugar babies aren't just doing it for the money; it's a genuine relationship even though it does involve the sugar daddy/mommy contributing financially.  anyway, even if they do consider themselves sex workers, what's wrong with that? there are tons of seminars out there on how to be a better salesman or psychologist or manager. why take issue with a seminar on how to be a better sex worker? 
Yeah. I think a lot of it stems from her relationship with her mother, and my relationship with her mother. My grandmother practically raised me, and she and I were very close (closer than my mother and I and closer than my mother and my grandmother) up until she developed a dementia-like illness and died.   Let's see. When discussing dental health, her response is always "I never had cavities until I was 25!" When I gain weight, it's a huge scandal and of course "I was X size when I was your age!" and something that absolutely needs to be talked about. And when I lose weight, I'm too skinny. When I got my first credit union account, they offered me overdraft protection and somehow my mother felt offended by that since she didn't get overdraft protection. I got a credit card with a decent limit, and of course that was ridiculous because she can't get a credit card from the same company at all.   I'm under her roof right now while dealing with home buying, and it's really getting under my skin. I don't think she's capable of being happy for me at all. And she still thinks I should put her above my relationship with my boyfriend. She needs to get over that, I'm going to be spending the rest of my life with him. I'll be making dinner, and make his plate first and she's said a few times shit like "oh I can wait for ____ to eat first." He has dietary restrictions, and any time I make something special for him it's like she's devastated that I'm taking care of him.   Fortunately, we just got news that all of the short sale bullshit has been approved and now we're moving on to the inspection stage so I won't be trapped in this hellhole much longer.  Where should I send my check for this therapy session? lol.
I bet that does feel incredible! And as I said before, I'm glad we live in a country where we have the freedom to decide what we wear.
I'm not pro anything.  It's not fair to men and I'm calling you out on it. You stated valid reasons as to why it is that way, but it remains unfair. That's all.  Although, if women can pick to get an abortion at anytime, you do bring up a good point as to when a man gets a choice on that matter either.  So men also can't make a women get the abortion? Or not get one... So men have no power to plan their family?
It's all trolls here, now, honey.
I loop them onto shower curtain rings (Dollar Tree!) attatched to a hanger in my closet. [Like dis.](http://3.bp.blogspot.com/-HC79G0kLtgQ/UE_jzjaxohI/AAAAAAAAFF4/dV9ie4QfEqA/s1600/hanger+scarf.jpeg)
A common reaction to a traumatic event is denial.  You were drugged and have murky memories that may not have a lot of emotional memory behind them.  From your description it almost seems like a bad dream.  In someone who was awake and fully sensing/feeling what was happening, it may be easier to get triggered later and show obvious signs of being traumatized.  How these types of events affect a person's nervous system and psyche later are variable.  Also, trauma symptoms can manifest right away, a few weeks later or many years later.  You've said a trigger for you was the Steubenville case in the news.  The fact that some sadness and anxiety are happening to you now is very understandable, based on what we know about traumatic events (like being raped/being violated/being mugged/etc.).    Your husband may not understand right away or respond in a helpful way, but you are entitled to open a dialog about what happened to you.  All of your feelings are valid.  It's very common to have repressed emotions around these types of events like shame or sadness or guilt.    The best way to get those emotions out is to face them and allow yourself to fully feel them.  It's not the only way, but one way to do this is to talk to someone else you trust and to whom you feel connected.  If your husband seems too risky, maybe you have a close friend or other relative.  And if your feelings are overwhelming you, then a good therapist may be very helpful.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Why would you expect him to actually review the relevant information before criticizing? That would be silly.
&gt;The letter also explains that Judge Moreland called Chief Anderson regarding the matter. In reference to their conversation, Chief Anderson stated he resents Judge Moreland’s “implication, during this conversation, that this is just good ole boys doing what good ole boys do” and that he should understand.  &gt;Anderson notes, “For the record, I don’t understand.”  &gt;The chief also stated that the police department is working to pull court records for all charges that call for a 12-hour hold in order to determine how many cases in which suspects have been allowed to be released early.   If helping a guy out when he beats his domestic partner is what the judge views as something the "good ole boys" do, it means he thinks hitting your wife or girlfriend is something normal. I'm not saying the judge hits his wife, but he clearly doesn't think it's a bad think or a risk to women to have their obviously violent domestic partner back out early. And there are certain kinds of world views (and behaviours) that go along with not seeing the reason to punish a domestic abuser, and putting a woman's life at risk for the abuser's convenience. 
My boyfriend is also not a gift giver. Our first Christmas together made that clear, and helped me learn that if you're disappointed multiple times, your expectations are the problem. Unfortunately. So since then I've been sure to set expectations for gifts (with room for creativity-for my birthday, I want a picnic etc.) This also means that Valentine's Day is "let's make cards for each other" day, since he just feels a ton of pressure with gifty holidays.  I love to think of interesting gifts and put them together. Some people hate it.  However, he is way way closer to his family than I am with mine. He talks on the phone with his mom and dad once a week at least and they come to visit every few months. I might email my mom that often, and when I see her again it will have been over a year and that's fine for both of us.
Unfortunately a large part of the issue isn't discrimination at the employer level so much as a lack of women going into higher education for engineering and computer programming. Enrollment in school for those career paths is disproportionately male. So maybe we need to start encouraging women into these fields more, especially since they are higher paying.
I think the question is more-so, do you want the marriage or do you want the commitment? I wanted the commitment but not the marriage. Which worked out fine. I got my proposal to spend the rest of my life with him, and I agreed. 
That sounds like a good strategy. I tried being very careful and it didn't work, still ended up with polish all around.
Killing the man's baby is what he was refering to.
This is wonderful. My bar gets pretty busy, especially on the weekends it gets *packed*, with bartenders pretty much manning the exits/entrances, and the bartenders taking care of a hundred people an hour. I'm sure this works wonderfully at a small or medium sized bar, or a bar where they're solidly staffed, but unfortunately would not work at my local haunt. :(
That's good to know. I did 2 coats, on some I tried doing a first coat of black then shiny green. It didn't exactly work as intended because the solvent dissolved the first coat and mixed the colors, but the effect wasn't too bad - it did work to make a darker green. Maybe I didn't wait long enough.  I didn't intend to keep the polish on super long because I'm not all that comfortable wearing polish as a guy so I didnt bother with a top coat.
[deleted]
Please don't cross post links to other threads here. 
Real talk really quick?  I absolutely HATE the term "anti-choice". All you're doing is mindlessly vilifying the opposition without giving them any of the respect you ask for. How would you like to be called "anti-life"? They're not anti-choice, they're pro-life. All you're doing is calling names and slinging mud without trying to have a real conversation.  I'm pro-choice (or anti-life, since that's the vocabulary we're apparently using) for many reasons, but I can respect why someone would be pro-life. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
You should consider working for a larger organization before you delve into a smaller org (such as a non-profit in a small town) . Larger orgs have the benefit of a large base of expertise as well as a diversity of project types and technology that you can be exposed to. This will only make you better at your job when you decide to eventually pursue a career in the non-profit sector.  Alternately you can contribute to open-source projects. They can potentially give you exposure similar to large orgs (depending on the project), you're working in the non-profit sector and gaining experience that will pad your resume nicely. 
I just fail to see the point with religion when it's like that... It seems like not anyone actually believe the stuff that pastors/leaders etc say. It's like I'm saying I'm vegetarian but still eat meat because why not, I changed my views over time, but I'm still a vegan!
Pretty well no cross-posts. 
Your boyfriend seems like a really good guy, looking out for her. In my case, it's not the same. I don't think he cares too much how she's doing. I think he tells me about her to elicit a response from me. 
How delightful another shitty blog being submitted.
Holy ad hominem fallacy, Batman!
Oh my god...that mother daughter dynamic...it's like reliving my preadolescence all over again.  EDIT: Watched again!  Praying while working the Thigh Master!  Freakin' priceless!
[deleted]
Oh, jeez. I was dating a wonderful guy, having a wonderful time. And one night after some stellar sex we were drifting off toward sleep. And I was drowsy and feeling good and really feeling all-around glad to have him, and before I knew what I was doing I whispered "I love you."  Fuck. Full panic response. There is a place and a time and a manner in which to say those words and I'd just flubbed all three. Quickly FAKE SLEEP AND HOPE HE DIDN'T NOTICE  This went on for what felt like forever. I was convinced he'd heard it and was now just pretending to be asleep to avoid having to give the "um, I don't feel that way" talk. We were *naked*, for God's sake, it wasn't like he or I could make a graceful exit from the situation if we started talking about it. My world was crumbling around me. I just ruined everything because I was too tired to keep my idiot mouth shut.  This continued for about a million years. Then all of a sudden he murmured "I love you, too." And the remainder of my emotional range was left to form a puddle.
Most times I've said "no" to a guy who's trying to pursue me, I get harrassed even more! Everything from the fucking creep who nearly stalked me in high school to the time I was casually approached by a guy twice my age who asked me if I had a man to warm my bed, and then went on to make lewd comments about how I must never have met the right man when I told him I had a girlfriend. I really try to not get angry or confrontational about it, even the thought of standing my ground terrifies me, but when they come back and just don't stop trying, even after I said no, I just. I don't know. I feel helpless. Usually I just end up going out of my way to avoid them. Not very helpful advice, I'm sure, but we know what you're going through. 
One time, a guy called me a bitch for saying no. My response was "Well, at least I am not ugly" and I walked away while he stood there stunned.  Usually when people treat me like crap, I just give them the "well, you're dumb" look and try my best to ignore them. If it's a situation where I can't avoid them for good, I start identifying them as 'human/hooman' instead of by their name. (when I call people human/hooman, it's my passive way of calling them a complete idiot). My friends get a good laugh about it, because while the human has no idea why I am calling him/her human, my friends know what I really mean by it. I try to do it in my best Ferengi voice for added dramatic effect.
[deleted]
Hey, fellow ~~ex~~CT redditor here, hun, I am so so sorry. That's terrifying and super shitty, and you should absolutely NOT have had to go through that. It's not normal, he's a shithead, and you should absolutely follow the well written advice on here and report him. And remember, you're absolutely not alone. Whatever you decide to do from here, we support you. If you ever need an ear, please feel free to PM me. 
I guess a positive about this is that at least he finally said out loud what I'm sure a ton of people really do agree with, and now we can point to it instead of as usual being dismissed as "crazy!!"... that's something, right?   what scares me most about the epidemic of misogyny that allows such thoughts like this to be even considered is how rooted it seems to be in a sort of, *sociopathy*... like, it's difficult for them to consider or think of women as human beings with their own worldview and experience. Sure, you can tell somebody that, and force them to abide by rules about that, but I can't really understand why someone would come to this conclusion without having a major disconnect there. It's very frightening
Ah, I live in Madrid. My scarves are all decorative. :) You could try finding larger rings though. [Ikea does these.](http://www.ikea.com/us/en/catalog/products/70108912/)
They actually squeezed me in today! Aaaaand it turns out I had another misdiagnosis (I don't have lichen sclerosis and shouldn't be using steroids, evidently) even AFTER going to a vulvovaginal specialist. It's all a giant muscle spasm that will be treated with physical therapy and, I kid you not, Valium suppositories...cause my pussy needs to calm the fuck down. Also they're taking me off the pill, apparently hormones are no good if you have vag problems. It's pretty easy to diagnose if your pelvic floor is in spasm -- this doctor just reached in and touched part of it (wouldn't normally get touched during sex) and I nearly screamed from the pain. Wasn't fun, but good to get answers. Hope this helps -- and isn't too discouraging. There are answers out there...it just takes some time to find them. Most importantly, remember that this isn't some small issue: I felt like everyone would think I was a drama queen or something or not take it seriously because it doesn't seem that bad to have painful sex, I mean, it's not life-threatening and I could just choose to not have sex. Which is a really messed up way to think, and I don't know if you feel that way too, but if you do, remember that a healthy sex life is part of a healthy life in general, and if you're not feeling healthy, then you deserve something better. Don't accept complacent doctors!!! Good luck!
I've been in similar situations more than a few times. I still don't know how to handle it. This is why a lot of women are seen as "stringing" men along. Because if we reject them, even politely, they freak the fuck out and retaliate because of their shitty bruised egos. 
I don't know how you can keep composure. I would get fed up and give him shit right back. I guess killing him with kindness and making him look like an idiot works, too. 
Is this not common sense? 
My perspective on this never seems to be mentioned during this debate:  I believe that bringing a child into this world is a REAL responsibility that should be taken seriously, and you should do it when you're ready; when you're financially stable, in a healthy relationship, prepared to commit the time, etc.  Women should be free to make this choice without guilt or shame.  The pro-life side completely negates this perspective, and says a girl in high school that gets knocked up HAS to have this kid, even if doesn't have a healthy support system or the resources needed to giving her kid the childhood the child deserves.  Just for fun: pro-life people say that if this girl has abortion she might be killing the next Einstein or Ronald Reagan.  I say that if she waits to have her child until she's ready and pursues her ambitions (education or w/e they might be) SHE could be the next Einstein or Reagan.
[deleted]
And both my sisters who have had (non-essential) abortions have never stopped feeling guilty over the procedures they had done. A few examples doesn't prove much (mine nor yours).  I admit there have been sadly few studies done on post-abortion *feelings* (there have been several on post-abortion mental disorders and such) that I can point to to say "yes, women do feel guilty about abortions" but the idea that women don't feel guilty about them seems disingenuous. I sometimes feel bad about smashing bugs or catching rats in traps; I can't imagine that a significant number of women don't feel guilty over terminating their pregnancies early.
Yeah, thats NOT the question you responded to. Nor is what you've just posted the response to the original question. Heres a refresher:  &gt;Do I have the right to use your body to sustain mine without your permission?   That was the question. YOU answered it thusly:  &gt;No, but I did not put you in a situation where this is your only means of survival. If I did, maybe you do. Then again, if putting you in this situation is simultaneously the only reason you exist at all, maybe you don't. It's not black and white.   The fetus exists because of the actions of TWO people, plus involuntary/non-sentient biological action ON THE PART OF THE FETUS. Yet your attempts to discuss this focus ONLY on one of those three. The body in question, the body to be used, is a woman's body. The putting you in a situation justifying that, as you suggested was possible in your response, was predicated on the actions of the woman. You make no mention of anybody else. You're holding the female solely to blame for a thing SHE CANT DO ALONE. This logic is broken beyond repair.  If putting a fetus in a position of needing your organs means its got an inherent right to use those organs, you boys best get them kidneys ready, because science could easily make this an everybody has skin in the game kinda deal. Sound fair?  So lets try this one more time:  &gt;The fact is that the dependent state resulted from her decisions and actions. That is a fact. If you want to explain how it's not a fact, I'm all ears. What I'm asking is if it matters, and if so, how.  Please open your ears, then: I have repeatedly said this is inaccurate because its only accounting for one set of actions and that set is not what causes pregnancy. MEN do. MEN HAVE SPERM. NO SPERM NO BABY. I CAN GO HAVE ALL THE NICE SAFE LEZBO SEX I WANNA*. NO BABIES.  How can you be so obtuse as to not see how you're putting all the responsibility for reproduction on the woman when you phrase yourself like you did above? Pregnancy results from the actions of more than one party. If you're not willing to consider using tech to make MENS BODIES support a fetus they created via consensual sex, I am confused as to why you would suggest MAYBE doing it to a woman. And you did suggest that, with the word MAYBE. Its right there in the quote.  I don't really care what side of the issue you are on, but you should be aware that your desire to treat women one way and men a different way makes no sense to me. You keep insisting that women having sex means they're somehow solely responsible for the creation and care of a fetus and that is really NOT how human reproduction works.  *Now accepting applications. Must like men, I'm married to one.
Let's look at the title of the article.    "Republican: If a Woman Has Right to an Abortion, a Man Should Have Right to Force Himself on a Woman"  Now,  based on just that headline what do you know about the contents of the story?   Still don't have a problem with it?   Let's replace republican with any other group we want to make look bad.    
Yes, a thoughtful debate would include examination of both sex's rights and responsibilities regarding reproduction.  Not just women's rights and men's responsibilities.
I think it's just called period tracker? The logo is a pink 28. 
Oh wow, this comments section could get really fun.
I know right? :P 
Maybe your newest guy is just super happy to be spending time with you, and in the euphoric butterflies-in-the-tummy beginning of your relationship, he really is seeing everything about you through rose-colored glasses.  You could complain to him, sure, or you could just chalk it up to him being sweet.  You sure don't want to turn him into someone who negs...
Hmm. I take it you haven't tried a hair removal cream like Nair? I want to get the folds too. I have sensitive skin and I'm afraid of irritation.
I don't see anything wrong with eating carrots in an elevator. What do you see rude in that. If she had pulled out a take out box of something strong smelling and started eating that would be different. 
I do, both in the standard sense and in the retarded feminism sense where they distance themselves from everything and men somehow have mindcontrolled everyone into slaves (yes im being hyperbolic)
The problem with trigger warnings is that literally any and every thing can be a trigger. From the description of a character, to the location in a story, to the actual events themselves.  Even perfectly normal, healthy depictions of sex in literature could be triggers for some people. People cannot live so far under rocks as to not know that literature contains all of this stuff and that if they have a personal problem with it, they need to police themselves. They can't expect the world to do that for them.
If it makes you feel better I have an MSc. in Biology. Still have anxiety. Still wanted drugs.  If you can't have drugs, ask if somebody can come in with you during the procedure. Adults sometimes need their Mommy -- nothing wrong with that.
I would think at least one visit to the gyno once you start your period would be prudent just to be sure everything is where it's supposed to be and operating correctly. After that I would ask what they recommend as far as scheduling goes.  It doesn't have to be your mom's doctor. You can choose any doctor that's covered by your insurance. Unfortunately, depending on where you live and your insurance, your mom's doctor may be your only choice. To be perfectly honest, I'd be more concerned about the quality and the expertise of the doctor than their gender. Trust me, it doesn't matter if it's a guy or a girl poking around down there, it's never exactly a fun time.
Wow you sure dodged a bullet.  I know I wouldn't want to date an immature brat like him.
I don't see how that is related to what I said.  So your friend got mind games played with them and rejected by the object of their desire?  Call the fucking police.  It happens all the time.  If she really did almost commit suicide because a guy didn't like her I would say that she needs professional help, cuz that ain't normal.
You're welcome! And yeah, youtube has a few different types of links so sometimes the duplicates don't get caught by search.
oh well in that case I have nothing constructive to add it looks like you've discovered already that many men love pretty much any kind of boob at all.  You'll age gracefully for sure though
I agree! By the time I read a post, almost, if not all, the negative and downvoted posts have been removed! :)   Keep up the good work!  Edit: Idk if I did my commas right. Whatevs. 
Well...not to shit on your dreams, but to gain experience, for-profit places tend to invest more in their systems. Non profits often get the people who are too dumb and lazy to cut it in the for-profit arena. (I know this because I've worked for both.)  Just because a company is a non profit doesn't mean it does tons of good, and just because a company is for profit doesn't mean it doesn't devote some of its mission to better mankind and it's community. Keep that in mind.
Holy fuck. Saving in the hopes that your comment is some insane attempt at getting the most downvotes in /fashion history. 
Interesting.  Do you have a source?
Does it bother any of the lads that they're lads?
OP, have you been raped or sexually assaulted in the past? I had this same problem. 
So horrid. People are so judgmental and think they are always entitled enough to "help others". I woulda not-spoken-like-a-lady her ass out!
[deleted]
Exactly. There is a huge story right now about a very young woman (she's 18) who was gang raped and they are victim blaming her for "asking for it". The DA chose not to go ahead with the case because she slept with them multiple times, so MUST HAVE BEEN CONSENSUAL AMIRITE?! It's fucked up beyond all measures of fucked up. I wish she was 17 so the public response and DA would've been different. She is still a child in my eyes, an 18 year old should never go through something like that. The legal and public response to the case infuriates me so much because it devalues her story to other victims who may want to come forward.
[deleted]
[deleted]
I agree, the fact of the matter is though that people tend to bicker too much on petty issues, because they were disgruntled in some way or another (both men and women, feminists and MRAs). The solution? A a joint group of reasonable, levelheaded people from both movements, who will address both groups' issues.
If you go through /r/kkkimchii's posting history, you'll see that most of what he's done as of late has been to nobly defend the poor persecuted men in here and other feminist subs, served with a side dish of telling us to shut up and start behaving in a way that he approves of. It's why I never bothered telling him what you told him.
&gt;  I know lately people think roofied drinks are an "Urban Myth Hysteria" topic but it does happen.   It's *sort of* a myth. AFAIK, the idea most people have about roofies (how often it happens, what the effects are, etc.) leads to the misjudging actual danger when they're out drinking. A lot of the "roofie" symptoms people experience are often just, well, alcohol... they're busy guarding their drinks from tampering, but they're not paying attention to the effects of the other drug they're consuming (alcohol).   On the other hand, they underestimate the actual effects of roofies - assuming they're just like blacking out from alcohol, when in fact the effects can be far more dangerous. 
Sorry, had to delete my comments as someone decided to follow my comment history and continue /r/TwoXChromosomes conversations in unreleated subs.  /u/LadyoftheDam quoted the CDC definition (which is also used by a few other agencies)  [House Bill 5267](http://www.legislature.mi.gov/(S(0eozeo55ekxk3y45pj5egtfg\)\)/mileg.aspx?page=getobject&amp;objectname=2005-hb-5267) (Thanks 2X mod for showing me how do that) is the legislation that MichiganNOW created an "Acton Bulletin" for.    
I think most guys might get a little offended and take it like the bartender didn't think they could 'handle themselves'. Some may find it quite emasculating. Maybe.
This submission was removed:   /r/relationships or /r/askwomenadvice are much better suited to this sort of post.    [2X FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/wiki/faq) | [2X Rules](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/wiki/rules) | [reddiquette](/wiki/reddiquette) | [reddit's rules](/wiki/rules)
I don't have any tattoos, mostly because I am a baby about pain and I hate spending money on non-tangible items. My sister-in-law, however, is covered in them. She has full sleeves, a chestpiece, and a tattoo inside her lip. The reasoning I've heard from her is that it is an artistic expression, it makes her happy and feels like she is expressing herself by using her body as a canvass. Also, she is particularly interested in the history of tattoos as both a practical idea (identifying sailor's bodies) and a spiritual experience. Also, it is probably more socially acceptable for women now to get tattoos than any other point in history, so that may be why you notice it more. Either way, everyone has the right to do what they want to their body.
Actually, women are nearly as likely to rape men as the other way around.   Source:National Intimate Partner and Sexual Violence Survey (NISVS 2010)  Educate yourself so you don't sound like a bigot.
[deleted]
I started going once a year when I turned 17 to the same gynecologist/obstetrician my mom delivered me with--it seems kind of weird but I see an advantage in that he knows my family history REALLY well and I find it kind of funny to think he might deliver my kids one day, too.  I'm not sexually active but I go because it's good to to make sure everything's hunky-dory, he does a comprehensive breast exam, and I get to ask any questions about my birth control prescription, etc.   If you're not comfortable it being with your mom's doctor I totally understand--she could ask him for a recommendation for a female gynecologist if that'd make you more comfortable. I do really recommend seeing one though since you'll be able to make sure everything's in good working order and you can ask any questions about your birth control, sex, etc. It seems really awkward going for the first time but after my first visit I was so much more at ease about it and felt good that I had. 
Cool. Thanks for your input. 
Getting a boner, and being in a make out session are two different things. Getting a boner can actually happen with little to no actual arousal if the right set of circumstances align. A make out session however is a very sexual activity that will result in high levels of arousal. High levels of arousal without a release outlet is a bad thing for most people regardless of gender.   You are absolutely right that the occasional make out session without ending in sex is perfectly fine, but if you do this a lot it will be taken as you toying with him and not enjoying an activity with him. 
Its a running theme on purpose. You should see my house...and all my things. It extends to my job. 
&gt;Vagicians   I'm so glad I watched this video.
You are amazingly brave! I can't thank you enough for having the courage to move through the court process.  The self-blame and doubt you're feeling are totally normal, but as others said in the first post and I'll re-iterate: You are absolutely not at fault for what happened. It's 100% fine that you didn't fight back more physically, and you are seriously doing other women (and maybe even him) a favor.   The weed thing is also totally irrelevant to what he did. His defense will probably harp on it, but you knew what you did and didn't want, and you expressed it very clearly. He ignored your wishes and assaulted you, it's pretty simple.   You've got a long road ahead of you, but you also seem to have a great head on your shoulders. Keep your chin up! I'll be thinking of you!  
UGH that sounds like a nightmare. 
I have a source.  Number of women raped by an intimate partner in 2010: 2.2 million.  Number of men forced to penetrate (raped) that same year: 2.1 million.  Dept of justice survey of victims of inter partner violence 2010
I had something similar happen to me. I was in pain for months and had to have a camera shoved down my throat before the doctors realized that my stomach over produces acid and that I have a hiatal hernia. Made it seem like all my pain was just bad heartburn.
You made the claim. The onus is on you to prove it
sorry :( deleted! 
This guy sounds like a professional creep.  He uses his position of power and the pretense that he cares for you, into luring you into trusting him.   Every day there's billions of women rejecting billions of advances by men. What makes this bartender think that you can't handle yourself? Did the bartender witness any body language from you that would suggest you were uncomfortable? Or did he witness some unruly behaviour from the guys?  Not according to your description, which was that the guys were 'friendly and not at all threatening'. Sounds to me like this bartender was just trying to put himself in your good books and it looks like it worked.   I wouldn't be surprised if this was his 'move', to meet women.   How dare he use his position of power and imply those 2 guys are creeps. That just offends me as a man. Imagine if it was a random dude in the bar who said that to you instead of the bartender. Would you think "awww you're so sweet and friendly" or would you think "You are being creepy right now"  
&gt; One could also argue it's not particularly mature to take a comment that was meant to be ironic and interpret it literally in order to further discredit my argument. Nice try, by the way  And one could loosen up a bit....It was just a little teasin'.  &gt;give me an example of a female protagonist who is objectified  Well, this may be a good time to bring up the idea of the "male gaze" an idea mostly found in film theory that states it essentially "occurs when the camera puts the audience into the perspective of a heterosexual man. It may linger over the curves of a woman's body."  I instantly think of the recent *Tomb Raider* game/reboot, let alone the series. In this situation, it's not 100% the fault of the developers, but more so how gamers have and can sexualize her with the camera, hell people were trying to mod her nude if you recall. But, could you say the same for say, Leon from *Resident Evil 4*. That's another aspect of how objectification can seep into media and mediums.   I think you're very focused on the idea of people being *used* but objectification is as much about seeing and thinking. If I see Laura as tits and ass, who needs me as the player to protector, then that's objectification. If I see a little more depth, that she's strong, smart, clever, talented and a fighter, well that's definitely a start in the right direction.   Also, I think you're assuming that my idea about objectification hinges on  the passivity of what we are looking at. You really shouldn't assume because when you do, you're making an ASS out of U and ME. I brought that Roomba example up to hopefully show a clearer reason why a Roomba is an object and how that's connected with the general idea of objectification.  (Boy, I'm having a lot of fun, it's like flexing my mind muscles.)  Objectification, the way I defines it is how we view people as people or as an object to be acted on. That can be a protagonist or someone else. Lollipop Chainsaw might have a really interesting life and story outside of survival in a zombie world, but if people are more interested in her breast and can zoom in on that, then it doesn't matter if she's the protagonist.   &gt;I'm not sure how many more times I need to say that until you believe I'm not trying to make them "truly comparable or weigh them equally."  I think that might start when you use the definitions a little differently or really acknowledge *how* they are different. 
This submission was removed:   /r/relationships or /r/askwomenadvice are much better suited to this sort of post.    [2X FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/wiki/faq) | [2X Rules](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/wiki/rules) | [reddiquette](/wiki/reddiquette) | [reddit's rules](/wiki/rules)
[deleted]
As a big boobed lady who is incredibly envious of my smaller breasted sisters, I can relate to envying other people's bodies.      I know one thing I'm incredibly jealous of are the adorable, lacy, girly triangle bras some of my friends wear.  I know it's a small thing, but maybe some cute feminine bras to dress 'em up would help with the "feeling unfeminine" part?      I mean, I don't think you can get any more feminine than [this](https://www.etsy.com/listing/193085756/lace-bralette-womens-triangle-bra-soft?ref=sr_gallery_15&amp;ga_search_query=Triangle+bra&amp;ga_search_type=all&amp;ga_view_type=gallery) (or cheaper/practical versions [here](http://www.ae.com/bras-bralettes-view-all/aerie/s-cat/4850006)), and I don't think anyone over a B cup can really pull those off.      See also:      [here](http://www.freepeople.com/essential-lace-bandeau/)  
depends on what stage of life they are in.
I'm so happy that your mom is being super supportive! I want to high-five her right now. I get so disappointed when I hear about young people doing the right thing by telling an authority figure only to be shot down. I am so glad this was not the case for you!
[deleted]
Thanks, sometimes I just need reassurance that I'm not being incredibly ridiculous and a total baby over something minor. My mommy is amazing, but in this case she just doesn't get it, so the only person I have to bring is my boyfriend. If he could take a half a day off from work, that might be a solution.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Here's another article.  I'm disgusted.  She is Catholic of course, so this is her pet project, but she thinks it's "conflating" to equate full reproductive freedom with "women's health."  http://www.breitbart.com/Big-Government/2014/06/12/Bill-and-Melinda-Gates-Foundation-Says-It-Will-No-Longer-Fund-Abortion  I call bullshit.  
I'm pretty uncomfortable with "adult female" term you used there
The best way to keep it up, in my experience, is to find the motivation to look good for yourself.   I know that when I look good, I feel a lot better. Just putting on a little bit of makeup can be very soothing to me. So that is my motivation.   
I don't understand why you assume the fate for the next year? If it bothers you, work at it and improve it. It's completely in your control.
[deleted]
I don't like this video. The woman is trying to break her daughter. So what if she lied about her period. 
That's pretty awful that it wasn't explained to you when it happened.  It's not uncommon for partners of bipolars to be told to do this, but it's usually enough just to monitor the use of the card (don't let them keep it if they're clearly manic!)  He didn't "close your half of the account," he stopped your card.  You can still go to the bank and get cash, just like always.  BTW, some inpatient units absolutely insist on the cards being cancelled (because patients order all this mail order stuff while in hosiptal - sometimes *to* the hospital, when I worked at an inpatient unit, we had a woman who had a high limit and ordered an entire airplane, which fortunately was never delivered, but she also ordered an entire coke machine to the hospital).  So, they have their reasons - but you should have been told and now you need to go to the bank and order a new one (report yours missing) - but you also need to tell your spouse and think about whether there are any special handling instructions should you try to harm yourself by fleeing to another country while in the midst of a nervous breakdown.  
Aww punch line in the title. Faux pas. 
I really do hope that the male patrons would be afforded the same opportunity too. I may have misspoke when I said that the bar had a "code" for girls to use - that was my understanding, although the bartender never explicitly said that only girls were told of it. I truly hope that if you were to voice your concerns, you would be taken in an equally serious nature. From my experiences at this particular bar I am lead to believe that this would be the case, although I can only remark upon this particular initiative (gesture/code to indicate discomfort) in relation to my personal experience, which is that of a woman.  quick edit: I do not mean to paint the male gender in a poor light, and I apologize if it came off this way - this was intended to be a comment about community building and people looking out for each other, although as experienced as a woman - thus why I posted in /r/TwoXChromosones. I never felt "threatened" in any way, but appreciate the acknowledgement that people can end up in circumstances where they do - I myself have been in those as well, and would have appreciated this bar's efforts in negating them then, as I do now. I do sincerely hope that such efforts would extend to all genders, but am only here posting about my own experience, which is as a cis woman.  
I never had a thigh gap and, oh man, I remember feeling gross and horrible about it.   This is one of those things where I can tell you that it gets better and it does, to an extent. But that's probably not going to mean anything to your immediate pain right now.   I will say, though, there is so much more to life than being pretty. And there are so many different kinds of pretty in the world. I'm not going to front like I haven't felt super dumpy around glamorous women, but some of those glamorous women have admitted they feel intimidated by my wit.   And that's really the trick of it. You don't have to be a model to be worthy of love. You just have to be you. You have to find what makes you feel good, what makes you you. That's really what being 15 kind of is--feeling kind of uncomfortable and figuring out what makes you happy.
Kissing Jessica Stein... I 'borrowed' the VHS from my parent's drawer when I was 12 and watched the sexy scenes about a hundred times (before I discovered the internet). 
Ok. There have been months where I've celebrated this. So in this circumstance, I'm in agreement. 
If you'd like I can put together a fat burning exercise regim. Don't stop eating, it will force your body into survival mode and you'll gain more or make it impossible to shake the weight! Exercise releases endorphins, which make you feel good, which makes you confident. My high school gf used to eat chocolate ad peanut butter sandwiches for lunch and never gained a pound because of her exercising. It's not the food, unless it's really bad food constantly. Get a home work out with lots of aerobics. Like I said if you want I can put together a exercise regime for you. Don't lose your head or your confidence! Keep up the fight and win it hands down!
"Not all feminists" 
Lol yes exactly! And the awkward part? My dad took me to see the movie... After the movie he was asking how I liked it, and I was all "uh, yeah, umm it was... Real good..." 
Sounds like you have the right attitude! That's a great start. Just don't lose sight of the struggle by becoming complacent. Maybe set a goal for yourself and see it through. Hopefully you love the job and become very successful in that path. And if at the end of that 6 months you've worked your butt off and it still hasn't worked out, at least you'll be able to say that it just wasn't a good fit. 
[deleted]
That's a really good point. My dream is to work for a non-profit that has a cause that I believe in, and acts out in ways that I believe are beneficial to the cause. Just because a company fills out the appropriate paperwork to be a non-profit, doesn't mean that I want to work for them :)
That is just flat out rude. It shouldn't even matter if you look good in or not, life isn't a beauty contest. I'm wearing a much shorter skirt than that (bout mid thigh) at work today and heaps of the girls go shorter than I do. I can't imagine anyone ever commenting negatively.  That sounds like it may be workplace discrimination, does anyone else there wear skirts? Can you ask if others get the same reaction?
gtfo of this relationship. now. 
What an idiot and an asshole. He's already in trouble for how he treated you ... so he came over to your department to continue that treatment? I hope he gets what he deserves from HR. Especially after you did him the favour of keeping it informal, he decided to try and upset you? Very unprofessional and assholish. Congrats on being able to talk to supervisors about it, and I hope your filing gets people to take this and previous complaints seriously.
That's a bit presumptous, don't you think? You (and the other person who wants to send her to therapy over this, jeez) seem to assume that she'll burst into tears every other week, when this could be the first time something like this happened. Sleep deprivation is a bitch, and a new person crawling into your privates isn't exactly any other doctor's appointment. Also, (forgive me for stalking your profile for a minute) you are a business owner in your 30s, she was a teenager last year. Cut her some slack. :)
My partner is 11 years older than me. We're both immature.
Absolutely, I'm sorry, I should have added that. It sounds like he has a problem, and he probably needs help. 
I think she is overreacting, you painted a picture stressful enough to freak out one time. I also wrote a comment to sphinxs_revelation below this one, I don't think that went to your inbox.
[deleted]
Internet hugs and high fives. Stay strong and keep us updated! 
[deleted]
I lived in ruralish Texas when I was in middle school and they had a pretty good sex-ed program. We got those little packs and watched a few videos on the woman's reproductive system and one on HIV and AIDS. Then there was the whole "don't have sex" thing, of course. It may not have been the best, but it definitely helped.   Plus my mom has always been very open to me about bodies. She has a Body Book and would always answer any questions I had, buy me any supplies I wanted. I love my mom, she's great.
Go get your own shit
Sickening is definitely the word. Makes me so angry that it was even allowed in the first place.
[deleted]
UGHHHHHHHHHHHHHH.   Sorry, but that happens at my gay bar as well. Guys will come in and sexually harass every female in sight, it is disgusting.  The only person I have ever punched is a 40 year old man who fingered a girl next to me without her permission. 
&gt; Guys in a group often tend to ignore the girl. I've had it happen numerous times. It's annoying.  That's not the norm. Polite people will always listen no matter who is talking. These guys were just jerks. They either were being sexist and didn't think a girl had anything worth to say about those movies, or maybe they were just a more tight-knit group of people and didn't want anyone "from outside" to barge in. Either way, totally ignoring her was shitty rude, but I'd say the OP went a bit overboard with the almost-yelling. Just want to say that it's usually ineffective. People who want to listen to you will listen even if you're whispering. That happens to me sometimes, everyone tells me I speak very loudly but I'm not always paid attention to in group conversations. I think it has a lot to do with our body language and things like that. Some people naturally draw attention to themselves, others don't.  Thought if they did the same to another girl, maybe they were just being sexist after all. Jus saying that *not all guys* automatically ignore a girl, that's definitely not the norm.
I can't believe that *anyone* would tell a 15 year old girl that she should just get over *rape*.  You are an incredible person for standing up to yourself.  Know that, and remember it when you face monsters in the future who try to make you think that it was your fault.  I know I can't speak for all people of the male gender, but I have had a few SO's who were the victims of various kinds of rape and I would  never think to hold it against them.  If any boy does then they aren't worth it, you are better to accept that.
Hmm. Still helpful because I do weigh more than that. 
There is a huge variance in the wage gaps between men, too. 
Sounds silly but buy an airsoft gun and set up cardboard targets in entry ways or other places and do "drills"!
I was waiting for the punchline, but it never came.
&gt;I want to be in a happy relationship with someone, I do want to have sex, but I'm afraid that I'd need to eventually have sex with them and they could leave me  Everyone has their own pace and it sounds like your mother wants to set yours for you. Not fair.  You said you want to be in a happy relationship, every happy relationship absolutely requires communication and compromise. This means if you are the one with the issues, you need to get really good at the communication part. Then you and your partner will be able to find a compromise you both are happy with.   Go at your own pace. Don't let anybody make you do otherwise, even if it is your mom. 
Thank you for the advice! I think I might use your example, this makes me feel a bit calmer and gives me some control in the situation.
[deleted]
Hey everyone,i'm 22 and my boyfriend is 30,we've been together for a year and a half now and it's been really great.I dont know what to say about the daddy issues i clearly have issues with my parents but i dont think this thing has to do with the fact that i have an older boyfriend.i think it depends on the kind of person you are though,my boyfriend is ...lets say more childish than i am so i think that makes the 8 years between us seem like 5.it is weird sometimes i have to admit,when he meets an old friend and they talk about the times they were 15-17 years old and i have noth to say because i was 7-9 years old at that time and i was playing with dolls when they discovered weed,but that's just in my head my bf says and i worry too much.all i can say is that depends on the person you are i would never be dating a guy that is only 2 or 3 years older  probably,i never succeeded at that :D
[deleted]
Very cool, thank you!
Listen. Drop the Nazi thing. I've already admitted it was a hyperbole, but exaggeration =/= false. I've also already explained exactly why I cannot escape TwoX, I am not always in a position to log into my Reddit account in order to take advantage of the unsubscribe feature.  Well, if that's what it seems you lack any understanding of my mentality or ethos. I have no problem with people, women or otherwise, having a Politiclaly correct and self indulgent place to hang out. That's fine. My issue is that it's being thrust upon the masses and remains stalwartly biased in the face of diversity.  I've already listed the three best ways to solve the problem from best to worst: Don't shove it in other peoples' face. Don't censor others for dissenting if you are going to shove it in their face. Balance it out at least by shoving the opposite in peoples' face as well (two wrongs don't make a right, but they're better than one wrong).  Okay, stop. I'm not going any further down this path of reasoning. it was an a.n.o.l.o.g.y. If you don't know what that is, or how to apply it, look it up. I've already explained, and your continued ignorance is becoming grating.  If you're trying to say that not going to a forum filled with self -indulgence and out of hand moderation fixes the problem, you don't understand the problem to begin with...  Finally, I'm going to outright say you're incorrect. Perhaps you've had different experience with the mods (likely the case given your sex and disposition of quelling outside perspectives), that's one thing. However, you have no knowledge of my own experiences with the mods, nor do you have perfect knowledge of the mods activities, so you are in no place to state who is/is not being moderated nor to what degree.  (Just a small aside: how would one go about invalidating someone else's experiences and opinions short of personally gaslighting them? I'm trying to conceive of it and I'm drawing a blank. I'm truly curious as to how you believe this could be done.)  Edit: Once again, stop pretending to have any knowledge or understanding of myself, you've already evidenced that you do not. You're making this entirely too personal and sarcastic to be polite about the issue...  I'm not trying to change any one of you. I'm agitating for change within the system. None of my proposed solutions involve a single person here changing in the slightest, merely fixing an institutional mistake in one fashion or another.  You don't have to like me calling out the system for its glaring shortcomings, you may try to paint me as a misogynist for doing so on a predominantly female forum, but this is the only sub I have ever come across where I faced issues due to moderation and I believe that in and of itself is small proof as to where the fault lies.
I'm so sorry you got threats. I can't even imagine what is wrong with people...  Anyway, I'm glad it worked out as well as it could, and you got to enjoy the wedding without him there. And I hope you'll never have to use your gun training for anything real.   Best of wishes!
It's called primary amenorrhoea, it has [lots of causes](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Amenorrhoea). 
That's amazing. and horrifying. 
It's people like you that have helped me come to terms with realizing I was raped.   Thank you.
Actually I throw them to my daughter when she comes round. I agree they are too expensive to throw in the bin!
[deleted]
[deleted]
Good advice.  You know your husband best.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Sometimes it's the most "normal" of things that can be the most thoughtful and make us feel better. What a man! 
I'd hate to say it but you might want to listen to your Mom. A lot of fertility problems related to age are genetic and even if you don't have any specific problem causing it to be harder to conceive if your family has that issue it's common to have it run in families. A lot of people in this thread are talking about "women in general" in a statistical sense but you have a much better idea of your fertility by looking at the women in your family. To give the opposite example we've had multiple natural or even accidental conceptions in my family post age 35 amongst multiple women and the ones where people were trying were conceived in less then 6 months. However my cousins wifes family both sisters are struggling to get pregnant and both are in their early-mid 30's after about a year of trying.   I would say at this point your best bet is to you talk to your doctor and find out if you might have a condition that causes you to be less fertile. 
You are going to be fine. Literally everyone feels like this with their first full time job. They wouldn't have hired you if you were under qualified so accept you are good at this and you'll be fine. 
Make sure to tip your fedora.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Me too, growing your own food is so easy and cheap!
I get mad easy and do shit like this...my bad.
Honestly I've made it a personal boundary to not befriend anyone who has anything bad to say about people's legitimate, safe and consensual professions. Gonna make fun of the janitor? Or the kid at the cash in McDonalds? Well, you are no friend of mine.   Going to bash McDonalds for how they pay their workers and other such examples of issues with profession? That's fine, but to demonize the people working these professions is what bothers me.  Once she revealed that side of her, she ceased to become a friend of mine. Right now I'm tolerating everyone else because they just want shit back to normal, but honestly I dislike their involvement at all. If you want to be involved, then get fully involved, otherwise make no commentary.  
Thanks!
That's great! :DD
Well he would have deserve it and it would be a good defense if all guys would be too hurt to retaliate hehe
Wtf, why should *you* need to apologise or explain yourself? You're not her damn life coach, and the fact she flies hysterically off the handle about things that are none of her business doesn't make her opinions more valid than yours.
But I do get what I want when we're together. I'm just not used to not seeing or talking to someone for a few days or up to a week at a time. 
shit, vomit, piss all freak me out, but blood is fine. I dunno, to each their own i guess!
Define "porn" in a way that covers all paraphilias and does not include that image.
Not that I think OP's daughter is doing that, but it's definitely something teenagers do. And by teenagers, I don't just mean girls. This was a problem at my high school.
That's the same logic behind associating colors with genders.
Yes, I was a freshman in high school. This guy in my sophomore English class asked me out, I said no. He went around telling everyone I'm racist (he is African american). He continued to harass me about going out with him, I told him no and that I had a boyfriend.   He continued so I went to the teacher, who didn't do anything (this is the same teacher who called me stupid because I had already read the book we were on).   It continued, I told my friend, who told me that the sophomores had a bet going as to how many freshman girls they could sleep with. My friend went with me to the principal, who stopped all harassment (best principal EVER in general for all the shit he has helped me and my siblings through in the last 10 years).   The teacher was pissed that I went over her head. Excuse me?? I went to you first and you didn't do anything about it!!   Ugh. At least he finally stopped. He switched schools the next year, thank goodness. 
It is gloating but for a good reason.  Just think of what else you can accomplish now that you've done this.    I would repost this as, "How to get plants headed for the dump to school gardens."  
Aw, I see that you already made a decision to tell him but I wanted to contribute to the discussion anyway.   In a more long-term, serious relationship hell to the yes. If you live together it's totally unavoidable. My boyfriend regularly runs out to buy me tampons and chocolate and has absolutely no problem with it.   Two months in I would probably still want my new boyfriend to think I'm a magical sparkly unicorn who never farts or bleeds. But honestly a mature man will have no problem hearing about anything period-related. It's a huge part of life for half the human population, so why should we cringe when we hear about it? Silly boys.    
[deleted]
This is such great advice, thank you so much! I definitely will be looking back at this comment for awhile 
http://www.independent.co.uk/news/uk/domestic-violence-increases-25-during-england-world-cup-games-9548658.html
And yet, they are all wife and girlfriend characters. It almost seems like they need that justification to add women to the show.
I'm using a hyphen. I want to keep my last name and take his. But will go by my last name. 
Yeah that's what usually happens. But that girl convo, I guarantee you I wanted to keep it
You don't have to apologise, you don't have to give the evidence of what happen to you friends, you can just calmly state: "X came to me after that day via fb to complain how I handled the situation. I believe that relationships are based on trust and she proceeded to bash sex workers. I can't apologise because I think it is important to take a stand against discrimination. I understand she was cheated on and it is probably is still  hurting because of it, but that's no excuse to be hateful towards others. I already tried to call her and set things straight face-to-face, she won't, so I won't pander."  You give them your logic explanation, they know she won't be the grown-up, so they won't ask you again. After that, bite your tongue, don't make comments about her, do not complain about her. People tend to notice the difference and they will most likely believe you because you were the most dignified person during your "break-up".
I don't want to change my name because:   1) It is *my* name, and I cannot have another.  2) Name-changing is based on historical practices with which I take issue. Dowries, the idea that women are the property of their husbands or that the husband is the 'head' of the woman, etc.  3) It's a tradition that bears no significance to me. I'm not a Christian or in the Church, and this is a favourite practice amongst my more 'traditional' friends.  4) Why should one partner have to change and the other not? Based solely on gender?   With regards to 'pressuring' my future husband to change his name, with that being 'degrading...' how is it any less degrading to me as a woman to face pressure to change my name? He agreed that I shouldn't change it, and suggested that he might change his name with me in the past. The outward pressure from people like you makes me want to resist even more.   Thanks for fuelling my fears, though. I doubt that your friends got divorced as a result of the name-changing issue alone. 
That's not at all how you play devil's advocate.
I'm editing, cellphone died and I wasn't finished  It's a bit of vent too
It's a stupid choice of words because Dr. Oz is not actually a victim of anything -- not in the sense that something unjust has been done to him.  He has been *justly* attacked and criticized.  &gt; Blaming the victim comes in all shapes and sizes  No no no. That's not at all what happened here. "Blaming the victim" is a phrase that means blaming a person who has been unjustly harmed for the harm that has come to them, instead of the perpetrators of that harm when they acted wrongfully.
Depends the person: if there is something I want to buy then I would have gotten it with my own money already.  That is why hand-made gifts always hold a special place: I know the person has put forth time, thoughts, and efforts into making the gift, and it is something I can never buy with money.  A "perfect" hand-made gift "loses" some of its appeal... sometimes, perfection isn't everything.
Agreed
[deleted]
That's not an unreasonable point. But this is so tangentially related to the victim-blaming discussions that are relevant to TwoX that I just don't see why it's appropriate to discuss this here. 
I'm still not sure of whether I will change my name or not when my dude and I marry. My SO's last name is really unique, and you can bet if someone else has his last name they're related. On the other hand, my last name is simple, and I am technically the last person in my line with my last name(and the youngest in my family), as my dad has one brother that didn't have children, and I am an only child. I wouldn't want hyphenate either, because that would just be way too long.    It's a very personal decision and for some reason it's been ingrained in our society that it's disrespectful to not take the man's name. 
Please stop jogging alone immediately. You are putting yourself in real danger by making yourself available to this man. If complete strangers on Reddit are concerned for your safety, then your friends and family will be too, and so will the police. You have done nothing wrong, and have nothing to be ashamed of. You are a victim and you need protection. I hope you will reach out to your family and to the police, but if you feel you can't, then I encourage you to call a women's rape help line. The national rape helpline is (866) 363-7273. In the meantime, please do not be alone in a place where he can find you.
"This is supposed to be a safe place for women"  it is, that doesn't mean we have to agree with everything a woman posts here
[deleted]
[deleted]
We should all call our gynos vagicians now.
[deleted]
They do whatever they want with their names just like their parents did?
Fair enough :)
This is in regards to this video, this is the thing, not everyone, and especially not everyone in our society is comfortable with sex. I really don't care if people give me sexual attention because sex doesn't bother me. But some people find sexual attention uncomfortable and they feel like its an attack on them. If someone vocalizes their discomfort, you, as a polite person, should stop. Unfortunately more people in our society are offended by sex, so we see more and more people finding sexual attention uncomfortable and therefore they feel like victims in an attack. The best way to stop? I think if we destigmatize sex in media and the way we teach our children about it we will all embrace sex as natural instead of evil. And if someone voices their discomfort, you have been warned that your actions don't have any consent, so you SHOULD stop. We can't generalize a gender, male or female, because everyone has different levels of sexual comfort. Unfortunately for men we see a clear separation here, men are expected not to say anything about sexual attention, because men are supposed to like it? Right? Nope. If you are a man who is uncomfortable in the position you were put in, you should say something. Say "I'm not comfortable with you looking at me like that" and one day hopefully it will be fully acceptable for men to say that and not be called out as less man. There is nothing wrong with being uncomfortable or voicing that, theres nothing wrong with sex and being human. So when does natural sexual attention become an attack? 
Your local sexual assault agency (find them at rainn.org) might have advice and it's very likely they would send someone along with you to talk to the police.  (I'm saying this based on what my own local agency does, so YMMV, but we are advocates for every victim, no matter how long ago the assualt took place. A lot of our services are provided for people needing help with long-term issues in addition to "immediate" services. Many of our clients were assaulted years or even decades ago, and no report was made.)
That's like blaming the kid working the register at McDonald's for the obesity epidemic.  
I met my wife when I was 22 and she was 32.  She's 10.5 years older than me.  We got married when I was 24 and she was 35  I'm now 34 and she will be turning 45 in a couple of months (jesus its our 10 year anniversary in October and I haven't even thought about any plans yet).  There haven't really been any age related issues between us.  It does help that we look the same age (I even look quite young for my age and for awhile she looked even younger than me - when we met people carded her constantly and everyone thought she was 20 or maybe 21, and she was 32, but now we both look like we're in our low 30s or maybe high 20s).  Anyway, we've absolutely never faced any weird discrimination about it or anything, our families don't seem to care, etc.  We have 1 child and won't be having a second since my wife is already at the age where there can be a high rate of birth defects.
I am so incredibly sorry that this happened. Twox should be a safe place. I just wish we could protect you better from the rest of reddit.
That's great! I hate migraines so much - so happy for you! :)
Thanks katniss!!
Man here, but a jeweler. I deal with engaged and married couples on a daily basis.  To be honest, if you want to keep your name, go for it! I still like the convention of one person taking the name of another, but it's modern times and I really wouldn't mind too much taking the name of a future spouse (But I get to pick the first dog in the relationship!) We really don't have the same feelings of marriage is an ownership. In fact, we've changed it so much that marriage is one of the only ways to prove you love someone (which I abhor and vehemently disagree with.)   The only thing I have to warn you about is this: If you continue to have separate names, you will encounter speedbumps. You'll be more likely to be moved around on flights, and anything financial will have slightly greater difficulty. For example, in my business, if the spouse comes to pick up something, and the last name is different, then I have to (by policy) call the person on the tag. And there's always the issue of babies. Other than those slight nuances, there really won't be any problems.  One thing I have to say: Do not be offended or become combative when people mistakenly refer you to Mrs. Brown rather than Mrs. Smith. You can correct them, but remember: It's an honor for the both of you to be a part of each others' families and each others' lives. That's not to say you can't report harassment over the subject. If a coworker harasses you about it, tell your boss.  Otherwise, do what you want. There will probably be a social stigma about women taking men's last names for another generation, but I really hope that it changes soon.
[Don't worry about these haters](http://media.giphy.com/media/61DWu0CdPah8c/giphy.gif)
there is a lot of hassles that can be created by having to prove the kids are yours if they don't have your name, much more so for men than for women.
[deleted]
Lighten up not every post has to be about personal trauma, cheating, oppression, or feminism.  She is posting about a persona achievement she had and how it helped her community.  I swear there are so many killjoys around here.  
I think it's normal to go through an aggressive period whenever you discover an ideology that becomes an important part of your identity. I know I've personally experienced this with different things.. it usually manifests as crippling guilt and an eagerness to make up for lost time. But yeah basically every atheist, vegetarian, feminist, marxist, or libertarian that I've known has gone through a short, intense period of proselytism. I think it's a sign of maturity/awareness that you recognize this.
I've been weirdly manic and super happy the past month or so. Not conducive to sleep. More like painting and violin and reading and writing and talking and making fires
[deleted]
I took it once, and my next period was awful. Heavy and crampy and unusual.   I think that is what is happening to you. I have heard that it's not an uncommon reaction. 
Man here.  I'd be ok with either way.  But my mother would lose respect for anyone I married if she changed her name.  So she's prolly gonna have to keep her name if she wants to have a nice Christmas.
&gt;"James Madison University takes very seriously any allegation of sexual assault and is committed to providing a safe and inclusive environment for every member of the JMU community," university spokesman Bill Wyatt said.  what the fuck. isn't this the exact opposite of what they are actually doing? I wish the westboro baptist church would do something like picket these motherfuckers. 
It shouldn't delete the conversation since it's past, but maybe it does. I've never tried it. Oh. Someone said if you get blocked their convo straight up disappears now, instead of replies being disabled.
[deleted]
Oh gods. I may as well run around with a transfusion bag if periods get heavier then pretty commonly.
[deleted]
https://helloflo.com/shop/care-packages  this is the best one I found plus the advert is ridiculously funny
I don't have a hyphenated name, but I have 2 middle names, with the 2nd being my mom's maiden name. (first middle momsmaiden dadslast). So its like a hyphened name, but not quite.   I feel like I don't have the same luxury as my mom unless I get rid of my first middle name, which I really like, or if I have 5 names, which I really don't want. So, I am forced to pick between dropping my mom's maiden name (which is technically a middle name, which most people keep), or drop my dad's family name, which is the last name that everyone knows me by and I grew up with.   So, I will likely just drop both and go down to three names.   
Sounds like they're doing you a favor by avoiding you.
I think it's pretty "unmanly" to care what some other pricks think about your choices. I am totally going to snigger about this.  
Snopes says that's untrue. And also it would hurt.  http://www.snopes.com/risque/kinky/vodka.asp
I'd be concerned about her inserting them properly and knowing how to use them. I didn't use one til I was 19 and was in a lot of pain because I had done it wrong. Probably best to have a talk about it. 
[deleted]
Send your chatlog to your mutual friends. That should solve the issue of who needs to apologize to whom.
Because his article isn't horrible. His article is challenging the status quo, that's all.   No articles I've read, no one in this comment section, not even you seem to be willing to actually take him on. Everybody just tries to find a convenient excuse to not move out of their comfort zone, to not actually give counter-arguments.   How then can you be so certain that he's wrong if no one seems able to actually point at where he went wrong?
[deleted]
[deleted]
 I just wanted to say I feel ya. I'm 26 and have never orgasmed with a sexual partner -- not even close. However, I can orgasm if I'm alone, watching porn and using a vibrator. I feel the most free and unjudged this way. Maybe you should give this a try and it'll help you reach orgasm finally? 
Where is the line between gloating and sharing somethjng you are proud of?  What is the point in raining on her excitement?
No, you're being a great mom. It sounds like you've raised a healthy little girl and unfortunately schools are used to dealing with parents of obese children.
THANK YOU for the link to Of Lambs and Lace! I'm 34A &amp; have never come across a blog like that. Am thrilled to have found it! Will be trawling through &amp; making a bra wishlist. (Also, it's impossible to deny that she's smokin' hot, &amp; it's kinda great to see a smokin' hot woman with tiny boobs like mine..!)
Alternatively, you could color your hair a dark brown-black and then proceed to only re-color your roots for the next five months because you are lazy and have way too much hair. Eventually the bottom will fade into a reddish brown, and then voila!   This isn't what my hair currently looks like or anything.   Your guide -- especially the sectioning examples -- was awesome though and I think I am going to use it to try to get a cleaner look!
Plant some mums! Rabbits (and deer!) hate the smell and taste so they'll leave the areas with planted mums alone. 
You see, I think there's a definite disconnect between our methods of thinking here. I fully agree with everything you said in the first three paragraphs. However, I don't believe that changes the facts about someones sex.  One can no more control their gender than their sexuality, and all genders/sexualities should be accepted and treated as equally as possible. That being said, I see no inherent inequality in referring to people by there sex as has been done for the entirety of human history.  Sex is (in the extreme majority of cases) a factual and binary biological phenomena that is easily evidenced and allows one to make judgments and assumptions about a person using the heuristics that people follow every day. Gender is not nearly so useful in this respect, but it does have a place within one's heuristics.  As for being called by a female name, it leads to quite a bit of consternation on my part. Mainly for the facts that it's not my name and I am evidently male. My male sex is not ambiguous or debatable. That being said, if I were to be transgendered, I would still not see a problem with someone referring to me by male pronouns since my sex is male.  I prefer to be as precise and factual as possible. I value candor as one of the highest virtues, and to lie about someone's sex seems an injustice. Especially given that I would seek no such distortion given a change of positions.  Furthermore, being called transphobic for my open and welcoming view of all genders, sexes, and sexualities is offensive in the highest degree. I am a very socially liberal man and to have some self righteous and deluded woman call me out for being transphobic is absolutely preposterous.  As a recap: I fully believe that gender is not a choice. Transgender individuals should be able to seek whatever path of correction they best see fit for their disorder (even using health insurance to pay the costs). People are referred to by sex, not gender in the modern day outside of extremely leftist communities who are pushing political correctness upon the rest of the western world. Being called a girl is simply strange because it's evidently not true, it's not offensive.  Does that better explain my position?
[deleted]
How is using her own experience any different from you harping about some mormon high school in Utah?
That is no reason not to post! I'll show you one of my cramps drawing if you post one of your paintings.  What do you say? 
I've actually seen men on here comment as well. I don't really assume everyone's a girl even though majority are seemingly. And homosexuality isn't brought up often enough in my experiences for me to think of it immediately. 
I hope your friend ends up happy and that she doesn't see you supporting her to end it as being 'against' her. I am currently going through a similar thing with a friend and her cheating bf. I can't help but look out for her and tell her he's bad news and she deserves better. But she's so in love w him that me telling her to leave him = me not supporting her. She wants me to just let her be in the relationship but as a friend, how can I do that? She's already cut off a few friends for not 'supporting' her.  Hang in there! Wishing you all the best :)
Forgot to mention, he actually died suddenly five years later (not suicide). I was relieved to not have to ever run into him again, that is how traumatic vampire relationships can be. Please cut him off. 
Hmm.  I normally get a lot of calcium in my diet, plus I take Tums for occasional heartburn.
After what actually happened last night, I'd like to think this is actually what he meant, lol. Thanks for the dude input! 
Nothing good come from listening to that crap.  People always bitch and moan about the boss, no one more so than young men. Ignore it until you know who it is and are making up a layoff or promotion list.
[deleted]
Do you live with this guy?  If so, find an apartment, hire a moving truck, and tell him that you're moving out *when* the moving people show up. Then move.  If he threatens suicide, calmly tell him that you're not responsible for his choices, but that if you feel he's an immediate danger to himself, you'll have no choice but to call the cops and have them commit him for 72 hours. If he doesn't back down, do exactly that. 3 days in the cooler should teach him that he doesn't get to manipulate people that way, and if he really needs the professional help, he'll be in just the right place. (Then move out while he's being held.)  If you *don't* live with him, just tell him the following:  "This relationship is not working for me and I'm ending it. I'll stop by tomorrow with the stuff you have over here. I wish you success in your future." Give the box to a friend to leave on the step, delete all his contact info, and enjoy your freedom.  
Thank you, liberal school administrators who think you need to police how good parents are raising their children!  Don't worry -- Michelle Obama has a nice set of school lunch guidelines for you to follow.  Conform. 
Oh yeah. My husband pretty much fucking rescued me. I'm safe now.  Edit: The downvotes are cool. And confusing.
[deleted]
Why are you upset about a woman posting about something she did on 2X? That's the point of the sub.
Other than me, they either spend time with their dad, who has a history of physically assaulting and raping her in front of them. We're pretty sure he's a lot of the problem. When her and I watch movies we do it after they go to bed. She's let them watch a lot of movies with adult content though. They're favorite movies are The Watchmen and Queen of the Damned.  Other than the kids around the neighborhood, they really don't hang out with anyone.
The only advice I have is experience from a friend of mine, make sure you can identify poison ivy. Wash your hands BEFORE touching ANYTHING that is going near your vagina.   I've always sucked it up and just used tampons.
81% of people disagree with you. Go cry about it.
I have taken my daughter in, and my son, my daughter is doing so much better with everything, she was having huge temper tantrums, which I learned not to respond to, now she knows when shes upset and says "I'm going to my room for alone time, Mommy," or she'll take a deep breath and "start over,"   But therapy for a helicopter mom seems frivolous. 
[deleted]
I had these as a kid! Soooo helpful. I kept them to pass on to my daughters on day.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Let me just preface by saying this was incredibly refreshing to read, and is exactly the type of dialogue I wish to see thrive not only on TwoX, but wherever one should deign to post.  It's true that the historical vantage point is not always the most correct, but I do feel it is appropriate in this respect at least. In my experience , I can make a great deal more accurate assumptions about a person by knowing their body is male, rather than knowing their consciousness is female. That being said, then knowing that they identify as transgendered allows for an even broader application of these mental shortcuts.  The majority of the consternation arises from the fact that my name is something other than what you said. It is similar to how if a boy named Ashley (a once masculine name) were to be called Elizabeth. It simply does not make sense for his name is not Elizabeth. the gender associations of the names are ancillary.  Edit: A birth name is nto something one has control over, and so its connections are largely lost upon the individual. Just as a boy with a female gendered name usually accepts it as normal since it is waht they have been raised knowing, so to is the gendered name of a transgendered individual correct until they have it changed. Consider ["Loser Lane"](http://www.sahio.com/the-story-of-two-brothers-named-winner-and-loser/), he accepts his name as his own despite the societal attachments it bears, and lives a happy successful life with little regard for what others may attach to his name.  Should someone change their name, it is their right to be addressed as such. Everyone has the right to self determination, and when they have changed their determination, I will respect that. It follows along this vein that until one changes one's sex, I shall continue to refer to that person by their born sex.  This divergence is a fundamental one, though it would seem I have not fully explained my own position. People are referred to by their sex in modern day outside of extremely politically correct and leftist circles. That being said, when I refer to the consciousness, mind, etc. of a person I will use the pronouns best suited to their gender. In much the same way as I use physical markers to describe the physical body, I use mental determinants to refer to the mind. "He is male, but her brain is female." is the best way I can explain my stance.  I dare not continue too far upon this line of conversation for the mods have made it expressly clear that such heretical views will be quelled with extreme prejudice. Suffice it to say that is my standpoint, and unless I am referring specifically to the mind/consciousness of a person, at which point I would be talking about their gender, I would call it a great disrespect to lie about their sex.  As for the bathroom quandary, we're operating under different premises. I deem it fair and logical that people be sorted based upon their sex which is clear and nearly impossible to lie about in such a place as a bathroom. A transgendered woman who enters a male bathroom is violating each and every other individual in the facility. Her sex does not match the designated sex of the bathroom, and so it is socially unacceptable. While he may feel he is a man, she lacks the "hardware" for the circumstance.  That all being said, a friend once posed to me the question of why bathrooms are separated at all. If we changed to unisex bathrooms, the problem would be solved quite readily, and I had no real answer to that...  I disagree that the future will be focused on gender over sex, though who can say. I don't feel that eliminating sex from our the social consciousness would be beneficial to society, especially from the perspective of sex ed in the youth. It's true that utilitarianism is not perfect, but it does give one a good starting point for making moral decisions, and muddying the already murky task of getting the youth to understand and treat sex and sexual encounters appropriately is not a desirable outcome for myself.  This is the point I was making earlier. I do make allowances for mental disparity from one's sex. I would think it a disservice to label one's mind as other than one would label one's own mind. Self determination is paramount. However, in the same way, it would be a disservice to label one's body as other than it demonstrably is. Should an individual take the steps to alter their sex, I would respect that determination just as I would an altering of name.  My perspective is that people are sorted (and rightly so) by sex, and so I refer to people by sex. Should it happen that I am specifically talking about one's mind, I will be certain to use the appropriate gender, for sex is purely physical, and gender is purely mental.  For your last point, I agree that society is evolving, though I think it would be a misstep to place gender above sex in how we classify individuals. Should society as a whole change, I may have to reevaluate my position, but as it stands mine is still the default position. It is true that the "politically correct" minority have changed their own culture, but if I have not made it clear already, I have a certain measure of disdain for the idea of political correctness.  Creating an intricate and extremely counter intuitive system for conversing in a polite manner is simply laying a trap to be used against those who do not conform to your system. Respect is not about treating everyone as you're told to treat them, it is about being fair and forthright in your dealings without becoming petty or prejudiced.  Once again, thank you for being so open and polite in your response. It's extremely pleasant to be able to have a legitimate discussion, without the posturing and judgment I have met from the other posters on this sub.
Don't get me wrong, discussion is perfectly fine and needed. I'm sure there are even some jokes that are well thought out and work well, it just seems like so many women now think it's edgy to just say anything about it and act like it's the funniest joke in the world.   That ad really didn't have any jokes in it, it was "periods have blood!" "they're red!" "look at all these other people doing things that kind of look like one!" "that man has a bottle of sauce! That's red too and not coming out, LIKE HER PERIOD!". It could have accomplished that in 10 seconds, but instead dragged it out.  It's just not very well written and relies on the whole "nudge nudge girls, eh? eh? you know what we're talking about" and I feel like it gives already struggling-for-recognition female comedians a harder time because they're automatically associated with that type of humour.  Sorry if it seemed condescending, that wasn't my intention.
I agree about the default thing. People shouldn't assume that their partners will change their name to suit them and people should not assume that their kids will automatically get the name of the father.   There are so many other factors. 
Maybe I missed something, but how underweight she actually is?  Is she is 10 % for weight? Or below, maybe 5%? Or less? How about height?  Also what was her growth history? My pedi said if a child growing steadily along a growth curve ( ANY growth curve 5,10 25 Or whatever percentile) that is good. Some children are big and some are small, which is fine. It is more of a worry if a child dropping between growth curves. For example if a child was 50% and drops to 25%  and drops again to 10% etc.  Also, do you think she is not eating enough? If she is a picky eater and skinny as a result that is fine. However if she is eating enough, but not growing or dropping weight that might be a sign of some problems like anemia, celiac disase etc.   If she is just not eating enough, I would focus on protein and fat. Milk is good, avocado, any meat and eggs are excellent.   Also if YOU track her calorie intake, that is fine. However do not let her know of this. She is 5 , she should not be self conscious about her eating.  
People have no tact.   Maybe next time, if someone says something similar, you and your SO can stop what you're doing and begin examining your arms and exclaim "I'm black!" or "I'm white!" and act all shocked about it.   The black/white was an example on my part (wasn't assuming what skin color you or your SO has). 
I was at first, but the user doesn't have a history of blatant trolling. He also posted about his fiancee 23 days ago, so at least the details are consistent.
Nobody can kill mint. My mint has been sitting in four inches of rainwater. Under a bicycle, for three months.  It's flourishing.
Missed this, probably for the best
[deleted]
Yeah,  it's hard to ignore him when he always comes over to my department, somehow will always take his lunch when I take mine, and tanks to everyone I talk to. I'm so glad I never gave him my phone number, my fantastic boyfriend decided to come to my work to pick me up half an hour early... That guy came over to talk to me,  my boyfriend walked up and introduced himself. I didn't see the coworker the rest of the night lol
You mean as far as what numbers to follow? I know this is going to sound RIDICULOUS. But the bodybuilding community (specifically this guy Dr. Layne Norton, whose literature/studies are all over the internet) has it right: There is a certain ratio, which, with slight variation, can lead to the healthiest growth without building up a lot of fat. Currently my total calories are a variation on this ratio:  Total daily caloric goal: 2722  Calories from protein: 800 (29%)  Calories from carbohydrate: 1480 (54% - For growing people, their carbohydrate percentages should be slightly higher, and then reduced when growth stops, or when they want weight gain to stop)  Calories from fat: 442 (16%)   Everything i've read, and nutrition and feminism are basically all i read about, says that, for optimal healthy growth, coupled with a slightly-more-active lifestyle and exercise, calories should be as follows: Approximately 1 gram of protein per pound of bodyweight (you can make this .75 grams for someone not working out), approximately 1.5 grams of carbohydrates per bodyweight, and approximately 15-25% of your calories should come from healthy, naturally occurring fats (meats, dairy, nuts, legumes, etc.).  That's a very cursory overview, and i know this is the WORST website to cite on this sub, but the non-4chan pinup from 4chan's /fit/ board was a very helpful guideline for me and [can be found here](http://liamrosen.com/fitness.html).  It provides an overview of the most cursory, agreed upon science behind healthy weight gain (and exercise, and nutrition)
[deleted]
So? What does that have to do with what makes you happy? Trust me, they ain't happy. Have you seen the divorce rate for the military?
This is GREAT advice. I've threatened with a lawsuit already and he brushes it off. If it came from a lawyer, he'd probably stop. Thank you, I'm going to do this. 
When my partner and I had that conversation, we quickly realised that him changing his name makes everyone happy. I get to keep my name, which is important to me, and we both have the same name, which is important to him. On top of that, there's no discussion about what to do if/when it comes to kids. His parents probably won't be too keen, but it's not their marriage. 
Convincing him to leave the military is a major fail, he just got promoted? Nope. He might find your efforts condescending. Either accept this is his career choice or end the relationship, how would you like it if he tried to convince you to abandon a career you felt satisfying?
First we take away these women's rights to safe, affordable abortion and then we punish and humiliate them for having children.  It makes me so angry I could spit.
Not to speak for her, but when your group of friends stops being single and starts doing couple things it's hard to hang out.  And if you're not doing standard singles stuff, life gets boring.
Yep. Girls have to wear bras to cover their shameful breasts, then must keep the straps, which, you know, move around and are hard to constantly cover unless you're wearing at least cap sleeves and a high collar, covered, too.  Unless boys also must keep their shameful nipples from ever creating a shameful nipple-silhouette under their shirts, the fuss over bra-straps is entirely sexist and demeaning to everyone, but the burden of conforming--and the public shaming that follows non-conforming--is on the girls.
I don't think it needs to be any more complicated than that she is a woman, and she did a thing. Anything a woman does is one woman's experience. It doesn't have to be typical or even particularly meaningful. It's just a woman's experience and a nice story.
You're right, it's very weird. I think there may be some nasty tomfoolery involved. Say, someone who doesn't like this sub going through and immediately downvoting every new post. Hopefully the downvotes will get swallowed pretty fast.
[deleted]
[deleted]
It's been happening since we became a default. Tells you a lot about the general user base on Reddit.
This just made my day. I'm taking my mcats in a couple months. Thats a great super power too, no one ever thinks of that as a kid when everyone's imagining all the crap that'll never be possible
Additionally, there are some moments where if you're not even looking to bring up race, it gets brought up. I'm mixed race (Black and White) and happen to be attracted to Latino and White men, yet oddly race will come up out of nowhere when talking to some White guys. Like, I'll be dancing at a bar/club and a guy will say something like, "I can't dance because I'm White." I'll try to counter with, "You just haven't found your song yet. Being White isn't going to hinder you from dancing." Their usual response is, "Well, that's easier for you to say, you're Black so you're automatically good at dancing."   Me: I'm actually biracial, half-White actually.  Them: You don't look half.  Me: Do you want me to wear a panda costume?  Or:  "I actually prefer Rock music over rap"  "But...you're Black."  These conversations perplex me since I live in one of the most diverse cities in California and I'm in my 20's. 
Always try to be on a car with people around. Yes, you should carry mace with you. I've dealt with nutjobs like those before, and best is to ignore them and alert someone if possible. 
[deleted]
I have to beat him to it, then, obviously. Thanks for the heads up. Now I will conquer. 
I got a nexplanon implant in October of last year and my bleeding pattern was meeeeesssed up until a month or two ago.  I was basically spotting continuously plus full periods every 3 weeks.    I am also a pharmacist, so I knew this was a very common side effect.  I went back to the doc and asked for a low dose oral birth control pill - only had to take one month before my cycle fixed itself.    At the risk of sounding too medical advice-y, the theory behind unusual bleeding patterns associated with Nexplanon is the unopposed progesterone.  The recommended treatment is to give an estrogen containing pill (eg. Combo oral contraceptives or Premarin).  I don't think that giving additional progesterone is going to help.  Google 'management of unscheduled bleeding in hormonal contraception.'
She didn't lie. She used the word 'but' to infer that her comment would probably be taken as gloating, *but* she wasn't intending it to sound that way. The devil is in the details, especially when it comes to language.
What are you contributing? I missed that part.
Not always good for your health to rustle too many jimmies.
I would love to read this!
[deleted]
Maybe not even Mr. Meh, maybe just Mr. Not-Right-For-Me. Or who knows, maybe some of those women didn't truly want marriage. Not really sure what to infer from this poll of 1000 people..
I've had Nexplanon almost 3 years now (due to be replaced soon!) and I get very, very bad for at least a fortnight before I bleed, and then my bleeding is very irregular. Usually a few days light, then 2-3 days nothing, then 7-14 days of heavy then lessening bleeding, but it's usually less than monthly. I'm not on provera but I get all the symptoms you just mentioned. My doc prescribed mefenamic acid for the bleeding instead of anything else, although I've never taken it out of fear of the side effects. I hope that it helps you though!! 
Relevant: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=q5rzPmMenP0#t=87
I like the collective "we" there. "All of us. As a group. We wanted that. Thanks babe. You're our favourite."
fuck colposcopies. I hate them and I fucking hate HPV. I even got the damn vaccine but I must have had it prior or the vaccine didn't work.  My doc told me that I'll have HPV for the rest of my life and that whenever my immune system is lowered for some reason, I'll have a positive Pap. Which then means colpo. This has happened twice now. And I hate the stress of thinking about cancer, and I hate the pain of a colpo and I really hate that I can't have sex with my boyfriend for a week afterward. And the medical bill sucks too.
Why does it matter what the women look like? Skinny or not, full figured or otherwise, women are still women and the message never said anything about body size or image. Just that women should stop apologizing needlessly and stand up for themselves/project a more powerful image because they aren't less than men. This is about oppression of women/men having all the power/authority, not woman versus woman on who's pant size is smaller. Equal representation should be had, but by focusing on these women's bodies you are not hearing the message, only increasing the girl on girl body shaming. You shouldn't feel like because you may not look like the women portrayed you are less than them and should not follow the message they are sending. It doesn't make you less of a woman, which is what the ad was about. Being a strong woman. Not a thin one. 
do you have a link? That is really really interesting, albeit sad... and yet, not surprising. I'd love to read it just to get more info and to share with others
I have a hunch that a lot of those downvotes are not from the active twox userbase. It's not normal for a brand-new self post to have 10 or so downvotes within the first hour of posting, even in larger more active subs. Not even adviceanimals gets that kind of hate,
I won't deny the hedonism, that's for sure. 
Okay but I don't know how to angle this so that I can successfully pee on him. If anything it'll be his foot. 
Getting your period while camping is a highly political issue, discussed constantly in the senate, duh   /s
[deleted]
If it doesn't matter, then why are they all model/actress level attractive?  If you went out and randomly picked different women, then they wouldn't all be so attractive. It's obvious they intentionally did that.  They are the one who produced this. I am just observing it.
This is a general comment and not directed at you or your daughter in any way. But what happened to letting kids eat "kid foods" and letting them burn the extra calories off by playing outdoors or at a friends house? I grew up eating Mac and Cheese with tuna and up until high school my parents had to shop in the boys section to buy me clothes that fit? When did our culture become so obsessed with looks rather than values that we pay more attention to what we eat than what we do? Please I implore you enjoy your 5 year old while she's 5 and let her eat what she wants within reason. I'd rather you have to teach her these things at 14-15 than you look back and wish you'd enjoyed her while growing up. Best of luck with everything.  
Been telling people I was gonna become an engineer since year 2. 1 year till uni and it looks bright
[deleted]
Understandably you're pissed off about this but you seem like you want to work through it and I think you can. If you feel safe, you should bring it up with him. Cheers.
It wasn't violent at all, but it just made me feel really weird after and pretty uncomfortable. I have explained to him why it wasn't okay and that everyone has the right to say no to have sex no matter what. He has apologized profusely and blames himself completely for everything. He told me I have nothing to apologize for and that it was all his fault completely. He is taking full responsibility for it which is a good thing, but I am still by no means defending what he did.  Thank you for your answer, it was informative and helped me a lot.
Hanes makes some all cotton sports bras that got me through a trip where the temp got as low as 80 F one night. 
Ughhhhh. Great article on a very sad topic.   I get the knee jerk reaction most people have to this. It's frustrating to see people having kids KNOWING they can't afford them. But they can't afford them BECAUSE we are still providing millions of kids (mostly of color) with a shitty education, shitty/nonexistent sex education, and a lifetime of institutionalized racism... then throwing our hands in the air when they emerge as poorly educated, impoverished adults. It's so frustrating.  
Honestly I wish these programs had existed when I was a kid. Even though I became an electrical engineer on my own, I feel like the decision to be an engineer was made in a phase when I was "trying to be one of the guys", and actively trying to get into things that guys typically liked. I probably would have gone into pre-med like all of my other girl friends if I hadn't tried to make it a point that I was "different".  I like that the message these kinds of programs send out is not one where it's telling girls that they too can join a man's world if they get into engineering/science. I like that they are showing girls that everyone is capable of building something cool, and it's quite easy once you actually try.
[deleted]
I think far too many girls shy away from coding because they think it may be difficult or confusing (or even boring). I spent some time on Made With Code this morning and absolutely loved it. I wrote a piece as well: http://techgirl.co.za/2014/06/20/google-wants-help-girls-learn-code/  This is such a great website. 
&gt;they are just dudes that girls don't like for ~~one reason or another~~  obvious reasons.  FTFY 
rape isn't always violent. rape is simply when someone doesn't consent to sex and the act is still performed. you expressed your feelings yet he still continued and legally (from where i am from), that is rape
I just reqd that early means it just needs less hCG to confirm. But yea, I assume two sensitive tests a fee days after missed period is prettt accurate. Thanks 
[deleted]
[deleted]
It's never been a serious concern, But I'm always thinking "That symptom I am  are feeling? wouldn't it just be horrible if I were preggers" then I quickly back track in my head if there is a chance I could be pregnant. It doesn't take long, I arrive at "well the last time I had sex was 2012 so I probably would have noticed by now" At no point do I fear it or concern it, I just entertain the idea.  My breasts ache, I spontaneously lactate, My uterus is always aching or contracting and any mild disturbance to my cervix (like a bumpy ride while seated on a train) causes spotting. I vomit when I have migraines and I always get migraines in the morning, even my doctor tests me for pregnancy despite knowing I haven't had sex in forever.
I've never heard an OB/GYN say this to me ever. I think complications are rare. I have let mine grow and I hate it. It's itchy and uncomfortable no matter how long I leave it on. Let's see some actual research than a few people saying it's not right.  By that logic then men should stop shaving their faces...
Good job! I don't think you should have just said "thank you" and moved on at all.  "Quietly" (do you mean he was mumbling?) saying "you are very beautiful" is a very creepy thing to say at any point in a conversation with a stranger.   Surely "excuse me, I noticed you were looking at the magazines. I was going to buy one for my wife and wondered if you could recommend one" says everything that needs to be said.
stop oppressing me!!!!
Theres a really good app called PinkPad that tracks your period. It'll let you know when its due a few days in advance,  so you can wear pantyliners. Its actually really accurate if you use the app regularly. 
[deleted]
They ready addressed this in the FAQ  http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/comments/9283g/addressing_the_genetics_issue_you_dont_have_to_be/
Ugh something similar happened to me in middle school. At the time I didn't know what pads were so I just wore a bunch of pantyliners. Towards the end of the school day I had a feeling I had bled through my jeans, and it wasn't until I got home that I saw a huuuuge blood stain right on the bum of my pants. I had walked all the way from my last class to my locker with it there, at least. And I had a short shirt on.  I didn't know exactly how long it'd been there but since no one said anything about it and I was already a target of bullying I sort of just said fuck it, oh well. But in the back of my head it was upsetting, although I rarely think about it these days.  Just be glad no one said anything mean. No one gave you a hard time so don't give yourself a hard time!
I HATE "safety!" There is no such thing as safety in my relationship, what the hell? My fiancé knows to duck and cover from pillows and such at this point, I swear he has lethal gas. .___.
don't blame me, blame the militaristic patriarchy, or the patriarchal military. Subtly but importantly different institutions.
Not an excuse.
What? How can you fit a Diva Cup and a penis up there?
But surely one way of getting that stigma removed is by having more representation? If something becomes normalised (men as teachers of young children), the stigma lessens.
Just saying, I saw "Floyd Merryweather"
If you're worried about the reaction ... Why don't you tell the bride and the groom first, in private? Even if it's a simple "Listen, if I'm not-quite-there during your wedding, I apologise in advance. It's just that ..."  Worst case is, they understand why you're acting strange (because, as much as you'd like to pretend to act "normally", some people *will* notice and possibly take it as an affront against the newly-wed) but will ask you to wait with the announcement for a day. Best case is, they'll offer to tell everyone themselves. One more reason to party! 
But a wolf whistle or catcall isn't making the first move. I'm not talking about someone awkwardly trying to get my number. We're talking about the people who are not trying to have an actual interaction, who are just inflicting an opinion upon the woman passing by, specifically as she is passing by.
Of course one can not have an exact number, are you seriously that thick in the head.  When one can use statistics and even give you the benefit that 99% of them actually deserve it that 1% are actually either wrongfully convicted and or convicted of a crime society is ok with. Sleeping with someone who is a minor, but actually consenting, just being a minor yourself, or near their age.   So go pull that giant crusader cross out of your ass that your mouth is attached too cause you are just speaking shit now.  Avoiding people is attuned to a form of attack via exclusion. You are taking innocent people here and basically removing them from normal society by excluding them from it.   You are not allowed to use the slipperier slope effect against them, but not against yourself.  Try having some perspective in life other then your own ignorant views.    http://www.pnas.org/content/early/2014/04/23/1306417111  &gt; The rate of erroneous conviction of innocent criminal defendants is often described as not merely unknown but unknowable. We use survival analysis to model this effect, and estimate that if all death-sentenced defendants remained under sentence of death indefinitely at least 4.1% would be exonerated. We conclude that this is a conservative estimate of the proportion of false conviction among death sentences in the United States.  If were to take this and extrapolate this to other areas where people are more likely to be convicted for less sever crime where rates would actually be higher then 4.1% we are talking about potential for over 50,000 people on that list for every 1 million persons on that list actually being innocent, let alone convicted for something society would accept.   It is impossible to have an exact number, stop being completely dumb. 
[deleted]
Not really, it's a reflection of the content of the default subreddits.  2XC has moved a few steps closer to TRP on a scale of pro-woman to pro-man since becoming a default.  Pics and Advice Animals have been been anywhere from borderline to blatantly misogynistic for a while, and racism is a vein that runs throughout the comments as well (almost always as a "joke").
[deleted]
General reddit user base are lurkers just like in almost any community. The people who downvote stuff in this sub are minority of general userbase but they're still bag of sticks though. Keep fighting ladies.
Have you thought about talking with a counselor about this?  Suicide is earth shattering, and you may need someone to help you get the pieces gathered up and put back together.  Guilt is a common feeling here, but it is not a warranted feeling - you are guilty of nothing.  If you don't want to talk with a counselor about this right now, it's understandable - but if this anxiety, fear, guilt and grief don't dissipate or if you notice any other signs of mental strain/stress begin to develop (increased alcohol or drug use, too much or too little sleep, inability to concentrate, etc.), go see a professional.    Above all, remember how much he loved you.  Take pen to paper and record all of the wonderful things you did together, all of the troubles that he helped you through, all of the truths of life that you discovered together.  Write the GOOD and productive memories down and when you're in a place so dark that you can't seem to get out of it, read and re-read all of the things you did for each other that made your lives beautiful.
That depends.  I had a positive test even earlier than that.
I lived with 4 boys last year, and they ALL used to have phone conversations whilst on the toilet doing a poo. It creeped me out a little, but made me think it was a normal thing. One of their girlfriends used to do it, also.
&gt; It's pretty clear that feminists who are in the business of deflecting/ignoring or even being hostile to men's issues are the scapegoats  But that's exactly what they (/r/Mensrights) do themselves. It's not exactly a two-sided argument with them either.
No bra?    :-)
Thanks!
Sorry, I didn't realize your two woman sample was a *rational argument*.  Stop being a passive aggressive pussy, dude. You think women are dumb, so man up and say so.  It's either that or you're a dipshit that makes broad generalizations off a single person. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
So what?  The principle knows what goes on at school, and most people don't see his office anyway.  The yearbook is the one that goes out into the world, representing the school. You really need to start *thinking* at this point, or I can't discuss with you.
Medicaid covers contraception and the ACA required private insurance provide it.....and then there is condoms and abstinence. 
It's been two weeks. In a bad financial market. Maybe stop judging her taste in tv, stop judging her overall, and don't be so smug about your new job.  Getting a new one right away is very difficult, and just because you got lucky does not make you entitled to be down on someone else.  Anyway, you can *help* her, thus:   - Go through her CV, résumés, and so on, before she sends them out. Offer to do this by yourself.  - Talk her up to her. Remind her what she's good at, get her to talk about the aspects of her work that she feels really confident at, and remind her of other things that went well. Get her to feel good and hopeful.  - Be realistic about the time frame. Two weeks is nothing. It doesn't reflect on her, just on the job market.  - Don't be a judgmental ass.  ***  OP downvoted this. I guess actual advice isn't welcome to the conversation. Can we get an Ass-pat Tag, so we can know what threads require only ass-pats and complete agreement with OP?
There's a difference between complimenting someone, and cornering them to breath that compliment in their ear. The second one is absolutely crossing boundaries.
You can give compliments, it just shouldn't look like [this](http://fc04.deviantart.net/fs71/i/2011/331/4/1/link_and_ghirahim_by_yueloverforever-d4cpc40.jpg) where you're coming up behind her (or him!) and breathing it into her ear.  That was what was creepy about this situation, that and he got mad when she didn't give him the response he expected. 
Your parents must be so proud. Congratulations!
It happens because you're either still a little damp from your shower or already sweating. Give your body a little more time to cool off before you put it on and dry your pits a bit more and I bet it will stop happening.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Ugh. Slimy Underboob is the worst.
Such a cute photo!
Ooh! Is this a repost?
No, it's a case of balancing competing needs and rights. Which puts it in a grey area. Ideally you'd induce birth, once the birth was over the mother renounces all rights to the baby and it's legally the ward of the state (or father, if he wanted the fetus and the mother didn't).  Of course this is a major hypothetical, bordering on straw man, since I doubt you could find a case of someone going 28 weeks and then deciding to have an abortion for any reason other than medical necessity (or possibly legal and financial red tape leading up to that point, though that may be far fetched).
Isn't violence in general bad?
Thank you for all the kind words of encouragement! You're beautiful too, for harboring the same sense of care that should seem far more common than it does at times.
Please, please ask for help. This could be professional help (which means that you or your insurance will pay for it and that you won't "bother" your friends with it). On the other hand, I'm pretty sure that your friends would want to help you if they knew how you felt. What would you do if this had happened to one of your friends? Would you not want to hug them and listen to them?   You are mourning the loss of someone very very dear to you, and I think you need others to help you get through.   I'm so sorry that he didn't see any other way to stop his pain, and I'm so sorry that it has left you with this much sadness and anger and everything. Big hug from across the ocean. 
How dare women be nice to each other! Harpies!
Nail on the head for that first part, actually. It was like I was scared that someone "Could" say something. I also know that I look young. People take me to be anywhere from  16-20, and I'm turning 27 this year. I just kept imagining the things certain people might think/say if they saw me and thought that I really was just some young teenager, etc.   And I think it was more of the by myself. But it just struck a cord when he said it the first time. Like I just needed to go and fix it, and that it was some remedy that didn't require thought. Yes, It is a remedy, and for some it may not require thought,  but to just blurt it out, it made it feel like it didn't really matter what it was. I just needed to fix it and get on with it.
[deleted]
Aw. :(
It looks great! The styling, too!
Thank you for your genuine and helpful advice.
That's true! I know that personally I'm in no state to date again (even though it's been 10 months!). Congrats to you though, I'm happy it worked out!
Maybe you shouldn't use gendered slurs in twox assface.
You know that scene in Avengers where they first enter the control room of the helicarrier? The FIRST thing I noticed was how many women were wandering around as SHIELD agents. It actually took me out of the movie for a second because it startled me. I later found out that Joss only made it 50% ladies working in the background. 50%. In the background. And I was still stunned at how many women I could see in a technical, non-speaking roll, just background characters doing their thing. Don't get me wrong, I was THRILLED when I had time to think about it, but just noticing it shouldn't be that big a deal. How many movies are there where background characters are nearly all men?
[deleted]
[deleted]
If you're Irish you probably know what Ireland looks like. 
I knew it would make me cry and I read it anyway. I haven't even lost my mother, but the knowledge that I will one day, and likely sooner rather than later, makes me turn into a blubbering fool.  Texting my sleeping mother messages of love now.
I don't know what anti-depressants you're taking but in my experience, they can make it hard to orgasm. I take effexor and so does my SO, and both of us found that it can make it hard to reach that point. It still feels good, but you just aren't ever able to get there.   Talk to your doc about adjusting your meds, or maybe switching to a different kind. And if you're not comfortable with your doc, by all means, switch to another. 
[deleted]
Ireland is more than Dublin
Pictures like these bring things into *focus* for me.
Close... West Beach!
[deleted]
I met my wife a week or so before she dumped her fiancee. We dated for a couple years and have been happily married now for 5 years. You never know what can happen.
They absolutely should raise medicaid reimbursement rates (can't expect doctors to work at a loss) but ultimately if she can't make some arrangement for birth control she shouldn't be having vaginal inter course 
[deleted]
&gt; but so is going through every post, in every thread, and downvoting each one that doesn't have a positive / flowery outlook.   A person reading a comment and thinking 'this doesn't add to the discussion' and downvoting it is vastly different from someone coming to a sub (any sub) and thinking 'I am going to downvote everything here'. The first isn't childish, the second one is. I'm not sure why you can't see the difference. You seem to be equating the two and I have no idea why. The commenters here don't troll posts looking for comments to downvote and disagree with.
I'm waiting for him to get off work to give him a call about it. I just want to go into the conversation without being angry
[deleted]
[deleted]
lol okay because she was asking for validation and an opinion on her appearance from you, right?
[deleted]
[deleted]
My SO and I have peed in the toilet at the same time just to see if we could.  It's kind of stupidly fun, worth doing once at least - sit and pee, and have him try to stand and aim his pee between your legs. Bonus points if your streams unite.
I think some people don't realize that back in the day, when you didn't have a lot of resources to expend towards fancy things like art or writing, it made sense to make things that had multiple purposes. Hell, the Hymn to Ninkasi (http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ninkasi) is both religious in nature and a recipe for the making of beer!
2012. Not my favorite year but I'm looking for low miles, and the one I'm checking out is about as unmolested as a used WRX gets.
Okay...the video rubbed me the wrong way. I've got better things to do with my feminist agenda then steal the damn covers.
Haha exactly, he just skipped over the asking part. 
I KNOW RIGHT?! I used to make fun of people who used eyebrow pencils or any thing of the sort. Retroactive apologies! 
&gt;But they are defensive tools, and if you have one, you aren't going to be a victim of someone else's crime, mental illness or violence.  Huh?   &gt;people who carried guns were 4.5 times as likely to be shot and 4.2 times as likely to get killed compared with unarmed citizens.  Edit: Updated source  [Source - American Journal of Public Health](http://ajph.aphapublications.org/doi/abs/10.2105/AJPH.2008.143099?journalCode=ajph) which is listed as a reliable and scholarly source.
There's a lot of ugly in the comments section here. Thanks for the comment. :)
Seconding this! Big fan of these
Ugh, please don't focus on that tidbit. This article is more than that.
Killing someone "just because" and killing someone because of their gender are two very different things. In GTA you're not killing the people because they're men, you're killing them because they're there. For this achievement, you are killing someone specifically because she's a woman. Quite a big difference IMO. I think most would argue that having a higher representation of women among bad guys in video games is a good thing, but having women as targets due to their gender is not that at all.
I mean this sincerely when I say... "It's better to have a dream marriage over a dream wedding"  After 10 years of intermittent and often solo travelling. I have figured out that at least 80% of my wedding budget is going to go on the honeymoon.   $100K wedding = $80K+ on honeymoon as long as possible.  Heck... I even think it wouldn't be a bad idea to switch it up and go a "honeymoon" first and see if your relationship can stand a test like that.  If a couple's relationship can't stand the test of travel together then you wouldn't give them much hope for married life.  I wish you the best of luck and safety on your solo travels. It will open your eyes for sure. 
Absolutely gorgeous!
I find it a bit annoying (as not an 8-year old girl) that the majority of the projects they have available are for 'girly' stuff - making bracelets, customizing your selfie, making an avatar, etc.  Because obviously what we need to get girls interested is to make it all about appearance...
I agree.  I've switched a couple times in the past 4 years. I found something that worked really well for me - very little weight gain (mostly breast increase), shorter period, very little mood swings.  Just ask, and they should be okay with it. :)
I remind myself that being single means you don't have to make sacrifices for a douchebag who doesn't appreciate it then goes on to cheat on you.  I also remind myself that just because a person's relationship looks shiny and loving on the outside, doesn't always mean that's what's going on behind closed doors. 
[deleted]
Hi! Hairstylist here! There is no reason to believe your hair will fall out from color or bleach IF you take care of it. Use a good conditioner, or a good leave in treatment when going lighter, the bleach can be very damaging if not used correctly. I use 'It's a 10 Leave in Miracle treatment'. It does amazing things for your hair! a good thing to do after a color service is a deep condition, don't go paying a bunch of money at a salon for something so simple.  1.Get a good conditioner (color protect is best for colored hair)  2.wet hair and apply a good amount of conditioner throughout 3.put a shower cap/ processing cap/ in a bind a plastic bag works, over your hair  4. apply heat with a blow dryer (lightly) for about 5-7 minutes 5. rinse! If you don't need to wash everyday, DON'T! also a good heat protector is a must! Paul Mitchell Heat Seal is wonderful! 
I'm sorry to hear you feel excluded. It's not intentional. A person just can't verify every detail, especially when it doesn't impact the situation (e.g., to use your snake example, giving it a fast pronoun - in which who cares about the gender? - versus asking whether it's pregnant). People grab the most relatable or frequent term and roll with it to fill in little blanks. Like you said, Reddit's mostly male. If your gender doesn't specifically affect the topic, then assuming everyone else is male for the sake of simplicity actually helps reduce borders between people. They're on a 'We're the same in this way, so we're comfortably chatting as a group!' wave. Likewise, I assume everyone on TwoX is female because it personally makes it easier to empathize with them.   Can't stress this enough: if you're really fixated on calling a snake a guy or on a total stranger who can't see you and can't reasonably be expected to dig through your comments to check if you *are* male calling you a guy off-handedly but otherwise respectfully, I think you're overreacting. If, however, gender has *specifically* been a factor in the conversation and/or someone stomps on your opinion because of an assumed gender (i.e., dude's being an asshole), you're in the right but probably have bigger issues by then (you're dealing with an asshole). The problem I see is that your comment is focusing on the part I think's an overreaction rather than the legitimate concern. 
That is unkind :(
OH tuxedo kitties!  Yeah, my husband wasn't so enthused, as he is convinced I am going to try to keep them. I know I can be strong! But who knows what this could lead do. He knows I am 100% fine with being a crazy cat lady, and I think this scares him. He DOES have pet allergies too...so seriously, he is an amazing man for putting up with me! And to be fair, he LOVES ours. PJ is an odd duck: I think what stings the most about these kittens is that they are the way I feel kittens are supposed to act...PJ was always "different." She was NOT snuggly or affectionate; when you went to pet her, she'd run off. She's come to terms with love, and the thing is, she WANTS it, but doesn't want to want it, lol. She loves attention now...but God help you if you try to carry her somewhere. She makes guttural sounds of the damned. Ripley we found in a park close to adulthood, and she is just an amazing lovebug. Our roommate has a fun weirdo cat, Tiny. She's 13, more spry than both of my young kitties, and has such a chip on her shoulder and is also one of the cuddliest kitties ever. She cracks us all up with her antics...ANYWAY, and now we have a dog! It's a full house, to be sure.
Well, in order for it to be "harassment," wouldn't it need to be unwanted? Thus, if the women didn't mind the behavior or enjoyed it, it wouldn't be harassment. I think the issue is that random man A doesn't know that random woman B would or wouldn't like it-thus it becomes a risk v. reward, but the only thing he is really risking is her perspective of safety.
That's not what I'm saying at all.  But I do believe OP should think it through and trust own instincts.  I agree we can fuck the police - but before engaging with them, it's good to know how many of them think.  I really think actually telling someone to shut the fuck up here is ridiculous.    OP's safety is my primary concern.  If it helps, I can talk about my experiences as an abused woman rather than my experiences with the police - but I do have both.    
[deleted]
:D I feel ya. Plenty to pick from! 
Love them! I can't wait to be in that position where I can splurge on something over-priced and very pretty. I've got sparkly Christian Louboutin's to buy one day  =) 
Sorry princess, you're dead wrong. 
[deleted]
I looked at Louboutins but couldn't find any that I liked that wouldn't immediately snap my ankles in two...
[deleted]
[deleted]
Yes, do explain to your profs.  Every single thing about this puts it way up on the scale of total grief and stress.  It's way too soon to expect yourself to know how to act/be after this.  But you *will* get through this phase.  He loved you (and in my view, still loves you).    
If you're not being an insufferable child hater, they probably see your choice not to have children as a slight against their choice to have children.  Probably similar reason why vegans and vegetarians get shit on.  A lot of it is just projection and nothing to waste time on. 
Staying in hostels is a great way to meet temporary friends. They're not as swank as real hotels, of course, but it's a fun atmosphere.
Market research? Im not trying to advertise, as it's not even on the market yet? Solely being tested, I just wanted real women's feedback on something like this
When you have to tell that to enough people , it means it should'nt be a default.
Congrats on rediscovering yourself! I did something similar when I was in the same boat :)  Also, I don't know why but I have you tagged as "om nom nom."
Oh WOW! Look at you cutie! I love your hair/outfit. I've always wanted to cut my hair short but was always too afraid I'd end up looking like Meg from Family Guy. You have given me the courage to say "fuck it" and get my hair cut.
Why?
[deleted]
That is my opinion, too, but I've heard conflicting things on patterns with white. And I read through this similar post from last year where the guest was wearing (what I thought) was a very similar dress and many people were saying that patterned dressed with white need to be almost totally not white: http://www.reddit.com/r/wedding/comments/1doyva/how_much_white_is_too_much_white_to_wear_to_a/
[deleted]
Jelly.. I have a regular impreza and it doesn't have nearly the same punch and horsepower and radness that WRXes do. Have fun with it :)
Oh my, you're going to have a busy time ahead of you if you're going to go around Reddit telling everyone not to share their stories of stuff that has happened to them! You'd better get going, lots of commenters to lecture. 
Love the pics. What does your tattoo say?
Thank you :) 
To be honest, my sense of smell is not great. I think they're all designed for men. 
AHAHAHAHAHAHA What a story!! I swear that while i was reading this I start laugh  so hard!!!
Thank you. Yeah, I am about to take step 1. Been studying 14 hours a day for over a month now. Terrible stuff. 
Could somebody please make this drawing into an image as if it were going into a 2014 video game. I think that would be so cool!!!
175!!!  Holy shit.  My best was a 49.  I am a disgrace to my grandmother who routinely bowled over 200.  
Just because you have bipolar disorder does not mean that you are just like your parents. People with bipolar live normal, healthy lives all the time and form healthy relationships with all kinds of people. You are not your parents because you're seeking help on your own and you're going to treat this and find a medication regimen that works for you, and you aren't going to stop treating it. The important thing is that you recognize that bipolar disorder doesn't go away and you never go off your meds without consulting with a psychiatrist. If you do that, you'll be ok and you won't be anything like your parents.
Take a loan, pay it off for the next 30 years while making min wage at Starbucks.
I am mobile so I wish I could elaborate on my own plan Bstory, but I had a similar experience as far as how I felt. I couldn't figure out if I was embarrassed or ashamed or something, because I was so self conscious and like I had done something wrong. The condom had slipped off inside of me, so my boyfriend having to get it out of me and how awful and panicked I felt not even being able to do that "right," it was too much. I also reacted really poorly to the hormones because I didn't know at the time that I am intolerant to synthetic estrogen. It was an all around shit-show and I was convinced I would get pregnant anyway.  If you feel any need to talk to someone please pm me, I'd love to help. I felt really alone when I went through it and felt like my boyfriend at the time wasn't very understanding from the way he communicated with me and the way he reacted to my feelings.
I don't see anything wrong with it. In my opinion, you shouldn't wear a completely white dress to a wedding, but something with bright and noticeable patterns in a different color on a white background like that doesn't seem inappropriate to me.  If you're really concerned, you could always ask the bride like you mentioned, but personally, I think it's totally fine. If I were getting married, I wouldn't be offended if another woman came in that dress!
Absolutely beautiful!! It reminds me of old Victorian pictures of flowers.
They are totally real! They did an earlier one that's equally [funny](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=0XnzfRqkRxU)   I appreciate their efforts to get rid of the whole white yoga pants/blue water bs. 
Can a dude post here?  1) Accept you will never be RID of that emotion. Youre a people pleaser. So am I. Who knows and who cares why? Emotions are involuntary. All you can do is choose to react to it or not.   2) Realize this anxiety is irrational  The fact of the matter is, everyone is fucked up, and you really only see bits and parts of people. That person doesn't know you, and you don't know them. So FUCK IT. Not everyone will like you and THAT IS OK. They are a blip on the radar in your life.   3) Change your patterns of thinking We are habitual creatures. When these anxieties come up, don't argue with them.a   "They hate you" "Yes but it was a misunderstanding. If I only do xyz I can fix it"  Just say "I don't need them to like me." That is the only response. Anything else is rationalizing and arguing with your fear, and is bullshit. Try to shift your focus by either intently and fully focusing on some activity, or by clearing your mind completely. Both will be far harder than they sound at first.    Hopefully you'll learn not to worry and ruminate on the situation less. You'll also see that in time your more confident reaction makes the other person like you and RESPECT you more. Apologize for the misunderstanding ONCE and do it CLEARLY then move on. Expect that they act like and adult and accept the apology.   Eventually your natural reaction to these situation will be "fuck it".    
[deleted]
Ahh you two are super cute together! Also, your flowers added a really nice touch of color to the whole thing, awesome!
Hey baby I heard you might desperately marry me so you can gain a form of us citizenship. 
People are awful. 
I checked my youtube search history from the last time I had a break up.   Results are in, and it's definitely not a gender specific progression...  
Eh. You're a troll but I'll answer anyway.  It depends on what you think feminism is for. Do you see any major feminist campaigns or memes or articles or hashtags out there telling women to pay for half the meal, or pay for a dude's meal entirely? Right. Not really. They're not concerned with stuff like that. So, no I don't think that's setting them back. 
[deleted]
As a vegan who doesn't want kids, and also is going to be a lawyer I get  SO MUCH SHIT. I feel ya', lady.
Houston has its own charm. I used to not enjoy it, but now it's grown on me to such a degree that I actually really feel compelled to put in my two cents.  We have some really lovely neighborhoods. A rather respectable local music crowd with some wonderful venues, and a surprising number of good artists that come through here (Mountain Goats this weekend, hell yeah). A decent local art scene, and an even better museum district. Awesome restaurants dot the town (Indian, Mexican, and Vietnamese especially), and you've got a great bar scene to accompany them. Clubs are rather fun if you know where to go. Lovely little parks dotting Montrose and the Heights.  And the people who go out to these places are often pretty nice. I can't say I've had any bad experiences, just from memory. Hey, just don't expect anyone to let you change lanes in front of them without begrudging you for it, and you'll have a great time down here. Oh yeah, and it's hot. Grab a sixpack and I'll see you at the Menil.
I have that exact dress!
And that's why I believe it's a good thing that this is a default sub. Varied perspectives and possibly some new information for some people. Even if we end up with some downvotes from the mob, who cares if even just a few people learn something new?
Thanks :D Yeah I was heavily relying on flowers, jewelry and the cake to spice up the fact that the dress and the venue was pretty plain. Worked out pretty well and most of the flowers were succulents that were replanted and given away so they can live on :)
Regardless of why she's acting this way, she's still being incredibly disrespectful and hurtful.   Next time it's just the two of you, you need to tell her that her behavior is unacceptable and no "whatever" and flipping you off is an acceptable reaction.  She needs to think about how her actions affect other people.   If she can't be respectful to other people or even you and your boyfriend in your own fucking house then she can leave and find other friends to be around. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
Ummm, what day? Because I was on a delta flight from Detroit to Tokyo in May... 
[deleted]
I think that media offers people models upon which to draw their values and behavior.  Interrupting the tropes and norms represented in media offers voice and perspective change for folks that do that.  I rarely see an androgynous woman in any popular media, and few of those women are represented in a way where they assert their nonsexual value when those values are forced upon them by hetero sexualization.  Expanding upon this, most media narratives are male driven.  It is so bad in the culture at large that women, sometimes even feminist women, look at each other from a standpoint of personal sexual value.  An integral, yet overlooked aspect of this male narrator effect is that the protagonist's agency is never questioned and their intrinsic capabilities never need explaining because the nature of media narrative tends to put the viewer in a place where they "root" for the protagonist.  Not all stories follow this pattern, some subvert it (the devil's rejects plays with this in a very conflicting way), but mostly, when a protagonist in film, tv, article, comic, or book is represented, the audience is expected to invest in their journey and share their stresses.     If the lead in more action films with the bodyshape and demeanor of Andrea Gibson or Tig Notaro, and they took no shit when onlookers perform those common real life sexist micro-aggressions and then followed up by refuting the bullshit "you're only feminist cuz your ugly" response that is so commonly offered, the effect on a male mind is to follow the action of those heroes, and maybe, by offering a vision of heroics that has the social pressures of a non-cis male life but follows the the tried and true formula of "hero doing right" you would subtly lead the viewer to follow/root for the hero, while being given a primer in sexist social pressures not commonly felt.   I think people draw closer what they can comprehend.  I think this phenomenon in the US is why black males were able to vote before white women.  I think this is partially why America had a bi-racial president before a woman president.  Voters can follow the male narrative through their own racism more easily than they can comprehend a woman's path to success through that narrative.      I probably caused more questions than answers.  These are just theories and are subject to change with good counterpoints.  
[deleted]
[deleted]
This post would be more [appropriate elsewhere.](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/wiki/faq#wiki_xy_here.3B_am_i_allowed_to_post.3F)  Thanks!
Well then how would you describe it? Despite plenty of real world experience showing this as more or less a fact what is your perspective of it?
Also, people will come up and talk to you if you're obviously a bored foreigner. If you're with someone, especially if you're an obvious couple, people won't want to interfere. 
Make sure you have the costume designer look at it under the lights.   Your makeup looks amazing right now, but if they will be using a full lighting rig, its a little too light.  Gotta be heavy handed with that stuff (**especially** liner under the eyes)
well, if you have to avoid them anyway, these friendships are not that great, are they?
the idea is to get over your break up, might as well have sex with other dudes on your solo trip.
Nope! It was a complete non-issue there.
Once I was biking down a path and I'd give the typical polite smile to everyone going the opposite direction. Then up came a young guy without a shirt on. My immediate thought process was, "Don't smile, he'll read into it - wait, wtf? - this dude's just another person - I'm smiling at him." I smiled, and he had to do a doubletake because I guess he wasn't expecting it. That made me sad.  Compliment her makeup, person-to-person. She should appreciate it :) If not, well, that's not on you.
Holy shit yes that was me! I believe your words were, "You'd be my daughter's favorite person right now" and you said that the movie is on repeat at your house.
F-yeah Repair her Armor! I have so many cool pictures to model my D&amp;D characters after now! 
(\
As long as you keep it conditioned; I've never had trouble lightening my hair a little bit at a time. And you look damn good with it!
Thank you!!
I dunno why you're getting downvoted, but it seems that everyone these days are getting downvoted in this sub.  But to address your point, I wonder how many of those men prefer Asian women simply because they're Asian.  I've gotten my fair share of creepy messages from guys stating their interest because of some ill-conceived notion that Asian women tend to be more submissive and easier to handle (vom) than Western women.  As an aside, I have no idea where this "submissive" Asian woman thing comes from.  If someone really believes that, most likely they haven't come into contact with Asian women who weren't sex workers. 
Honestly, I kinda do see where you're coming from. Vegas doesn't particularly appeal to me either. But going to Ireland for castles and shit just seems kinda like going to Papa John's for pizza. There are so many countries in Europe that have much richer histories than we do, more beautiful landscapes, better art and architecture and food, better weather. The lack of language barriers is the sole reason I can see the appeal of Ireland, and even at that there's places like London and Edinburgh (probably my favourite English-speaking city I've been to) just across the pond. There's Barcelona and Amsterdam and Berlin and Fucking Bruges, some of the most beautiful places in the world just a few hours away on a plane if the language thing isn't that big a deal. I just don't understand why you'd get off at Ireland.   I'm not trying to dissuade anyone from coming to Ireland, but there is most definitely a romantic Idea of Ireland that gets sold to foreigners across the world, and it's really, really not true to life. I just feel like, if I was coming from a position as an American or any foreigner who thought Ireland was this beautiful place with some pure, "genuine" culture, I'd be pretty disappointed with it when I got there.  But maybe you're right, maybe it is a "grass is greener" deal. I mean, I've never really had to walk through the dodgy areas of Amsterdam at night worrying about getting started on, but I've been assaulted in Dublin after a night out before, so I guess that colours my experience a lot. As a tourist, one does tend to fixate on the positives and the castles and the ogham stones and passage tombs rather than the working class areas one passes through on the way into the city centre. 
I hear you. I am Irish and Scottish on my father's side by descent, so all of those areas feel more like "home" to me. I haven't been to Ireland, but I've been to Scotland. The trip really made an impact on me. There are some big differences between Scottish culture and the culture in Southern California, and I really enjoyed driving through the countrysides and seeing ruins and castles. I am the kind who is content with a plot of land in the country far away from a lot of contamination, so maybe that's why it seems so appealing to visit. I know every country has its good and bad though, I can see a lot of good in America even though there is a lot of nonsense. 
Not really. It wasn't said with any malicious intent or aggressive tone. I was simply stating an opinion of a front page sub. I see by the votes the opinion is unpopular, but that is a prime example of why this sub is **not** front page material.  
That's really interesting. My friends and I are all turning 24 at some point this year and of my main girl friends and I, I'm the only one in a relationship. Every girl in my close group of high school friends has yet to have a boyfriend, so it seems they're always searching and searching for someone.  That's great you found out so young with so much of your life ahead of you. Imagine how you'd feel about life if that hadn't happened. Life is really crazy sometimes.
This is horrible and sad. I understand people have opinions and that some of the time the things they are saying can be true, but don't generalize that into every case. 
[deleted]
That is an incredible design and amazing work! It's gorgeous 
Good for you! Sorry things went south, but I'm inspired by your fortitude. You go, girl!
Did you exchange contact info? If you're feeling this way, you could try reaching out to him.  Otherwise, as others have said, time really mends things. I had a short fling with a friend, and remember missing the company for months afterwards. Also, try to stay busy! It will keep your mind from wandering. 
Both! Canadian med school decisions went out mid May, wait list offers started a few weeks after that.  
Maybe condoms would help. If he's overstimulated, a little latex might add a few more minutes onto your rounds.
We absolutely can't dance outside of Just Dance. Not even in the slightest. We just have really goofy little celebration dances we do at home in private and that's it :D And while we could have done lessons, I was glad we didn't since we really ran out of time by the end...  So yeah, color me surprised because there's very few posts about reception entertainment that aren't dancing, even on sites like Offbeat Bride. Plus we like board games, so it was a good match. But apparently we invited all the right people and nobody felt bored enough to pull them out! Our other alternatives were bringing our wii u or a goofy iPhone app we write.  AT Monopoly is really cute but there's some flaws I wish Hasbro/CN would address :( I've seen better themed Monopoly sets - like one of the little tokens is Treetrunks! Should have been Marceline or something, I really don't get it. The others are more obvious - Ice King, PB, Jake, Finn and LSP I think.
Thank youu &lt;3  We're both usually just tshirt/pants and frizzy no-effort hair so it's pretty crazy that we managed to pull that off XD 
what's that crazy metal contraption you're carrying in "before"?!  ^((also, your _user name_... it's... uhm... i'm not quite sure what it is! heh)^)  EDIT: it just struck me how clever you are in taking that last photo, regarding the placement of your arms :D but how are you even controlling that smartphone with your hand like that? :D
I've been trying to figure out exactly which part of the song this is, but it's difficult... The last line? Like where he sings, "Any way the wind blows"? 
I guess we're an unpopular opinion lol. The truth hurts sometimes.
Still would sink in mud. They still focus the pressure from your steps into a smaller area, which results in sinking.  [These](http://3.bp.blogspot.com/-gohf29EEqMw/UDQF_1hHeHI/AAAAAAAACE4/ymS6LTXBBvU/s1600/506-with-2-shoes.jpg) are the kind of shoe things designed to keep your feet out of the mud.
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
if hes not tech savvy enough for a console like wii, maybe upgrade him to an adult version of that toy, they make some pretty advanced versions for adults, real putters, electronic scoring. nifty stuff. next christmas or birthday maybe? good post :)
[deleted]
Thank you, I will try. I hope this won't end the relationship, but if it will I will just have to let her go. It would be unkind to hold on to someone if I at all remind them of their abuser.
Have you actually applied anywhere?  Did you take the SAT or ACT and what scores did you get? 
[deleted]
Agreed. It's definitely not "in good fun", because sexism like old-fashioned attitudes about men needing to control women's sexuality are not fun (and never were).
[deleted]
VA VA voom! Love it. Any tips on how to make my hair smell good after not washing it? I can also go like a week without washing but it doesn't smell...like fresh....don't like perfumes
[deleted]
[deleted]
I watch a lot of sports for the same reason (although, personally, I have a vendetta against MLB and will never support them).  Part of the reason I posted this is because it's from a straight-up sports site. The article, at least to my mind, isn't an obvious move on their part. I just felt that, for all the regular outrage here it's nice to see people that don't have to making an effort. It's also a fair article, in my opinion.
[deleted]
If you want to push a friend away, you sound like you have figured out a good plan to do it.
[deleted]
Thank you so much for your reply! While I've got someone to ask, I guess I'll take any and all advice about telling your friends--if it's a good idea, when it's a good idea, whether it helps or hurts. I'm hoping to get a professional to help me be more proactive about stopping, but I can't actually do that until I graduate, which is still a ways away, and I'm not sure if I should pull my friends into a problem that isn't being fixed.      Sorry if that was way too specific; thanks again for the advice!
thanks for asking this, I need this advice too: I've basically broken down crying at every job I've ever had at least once because a higher up got unjustly angry at me.
Since he only has his permit and not his license that means he can't drive without an adult in the car. Which means his mom was probably in the passengers seat when it happened. 
I've been wearing dresses with bare legs for a little bit now. It only seems to make me nervous at work. But courage prevailed! My forests of splendor are out in public!
[deleted]
[deleted]
Yay Kim!  Hi Mare :)
As someone who plans to get a tattoo to cover scarring at some point, How does the scar tissue interact with the needle?, is it more painful? less?
[deleted]
Thank you for this. I have never been sure about reddit as a trans woman. While this while situation was wierd and bad, your support and even addressing this makes me more comfortable with the community as a whole. Now if my home town could be more like that...
The Trail of the Lonesome Pine. An album of being the lead last year: http://imgur.com/a/TgyCf
congratulations! you are the archduke to the piss lord of shit mountain. thank u for hefting turds down the mountainside so that we, the proles, may feast on your bounteous craps
Losing a pet is so hard. He looks like a sweetheart. I'm glad you have so many good memories of him!
Yeah that pretty much nipped any idea of being a nurse. Lol 
Some men prefer a woman with texture.
Gottman always has something to say about disillusionment: http://www.freepatentsonline.com/article/North-American-Journal-Psychology/159922637.html   I also recall hearing in my psych of romantic relationships class (Dr. Jim Graham at WWU, if you're interested in his notes) that believing your relationship to be wonderful and perfect and superior to others' relationships is a big predictor of relationship success.
I was with him.  If you read correctly he has his PERMIT to drive. 
That's awesome! I remember when I bought my dress a month before my wedding! I bet you're going to look fabulous in it! 
I love his tie. Happy for you both!
I am happy with the number of kids I had.  I waited as long as I could bear to.  :)
I'm so sorry. He looks so cute, I love those unique things dogs (and cats) have that make them so special. I have an old dog and it's hard when you know that the day is coming, when they're not here anymore. But what makes it a bit easier is knowing that they were loved and had a happy life with you.    
Thank you! I will let him know you said it! He was actually very proud of his suit and cravat as he picked everything himself!
read that as 'space olympics'
I personally don't like it that much it looked better before, but thats my personal opinion. Whatever floats your boat.
If anything it's patronizing to assume that women who come from from less privilege will take whatever they can get in the way of male attention. I have friends from different racial and class backgrounds, and I've never known any of them to giggle to herself and feel extra-pretty because some rando hollered at her. 
Oh, I'm suggesting that you THREATEN to write a bad review if they continue to shirk responsibility.  I agree with the above comment-er. You sound very sweet!   Edit: In retrospect it sounds like I'm bragging about my dress. That was not my intention. I was kind of suggesting that most places in the bridal industry will go well above and beyond to make you feel gorgeous.   Side note. I am also very petite busted. You *could* go the push-up bra route in a pinch (Bombshell Strapless 2 cup size from VS)- but that's not the point dammit! Go raise some hell and get them to do their jobs!!
It sounds like a sign of an emotionally abusive relationship. Isolating her from her friends, controlling what she wears. Making her AFRAID to tell him she saw her guy friends. It's got bad written all over it.  I wouldn't scare her by saying that, you may just want to read up on it and see if it really does fit the situation. i could be wrong!  You could try saying 'If my boyfriend told me not to hang out with you wouldn't you tell me to dump his ass?"  Just try and pull her out of the situation.  And remind her that there are plenty of nice guys out there who  wouldn't treat her this way.... there's plenty of other fish in the sea.
People are cruel and so are you and I.  But I've never had a group of women call me misogynistic.  You get how that taints it a bit right?  Edit:  The OP made [sexist and even a racist comment](http://www.reddit.com/user/rainbowsparklepoops).  OP also edited a post about pregnant women using their entitled status to subjugate their coworkers.  Click on their post history and read the crazy stuff, stop upvoting trolls.  
Sorry; looking back over my comments, I don't think I've been very clear. I'm not trying to argue that the study itself is somehow wrong. I'm saying that the statistic, in and of itself, doesn't really give us any real information. We would need to look at this in much greater detail to draw any valid conclusions from it that aren't wild speculation.
Okie dokie. So what exactly are you looking for in these comments? They didn't come from the rafters CAW CAWing at me about how I'm an awful baby hater. There were half a dozen of us at the entire company. They brought up politics when I brought up politics to the manager.   You do realize this is not the first time someone has ever used their legal privilege to subjugate other people right?
They are not air conditioned, and the company is required by law to provide a space outside the restroom for nursing.
[deleted]
My experience has been that friends who had kids early chose not to go to college. They got jobs to support the child. I would think you would have to look at the mom's age when the baby is born to determine if this is just a reflection of very young motherhood. 
Logical.   The cost behind it would be immense, not to mention how would that even work? Who wants to play a weaker character.
[deleted]
Ok I will do that. I don't really have the problems you described, I just put on some weight but that's because I really ate shit lately, so no wonders there. But I already had a few problems iron deficiency anemia in the past, so a 	deficit of some sort is probably possible.  Another question, if hairloss is because of that and you find the reason and treat it, does is grow back normally? I read somewhere (don't ask what the exact reason was in that case, I don't remember) that you can basically stop it but what's gone is gone, made me pretty scared.
Are there other break rooms with AC?
One of my good friends experienced severe hair loss with her birth-control method. Are you on a hormonal contraceptive?
Find a nice attractive dude and ask him for his umber. Vet him a little and then fuck away. It's that easy.
This week my dog turned 15. I have had her since I was 10.  When I look at her and think of the adventures we had together, I can't help but smile. She still sits attentively by the back door, and makes me leave it open just a crack so she knows I'm ok. And her favorite food in the world right now is tortillas. 
He looks like a good boy. Yes he doooooes!
You're welcome. 
Then they need to go home if its a problem.
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
I've got smaller boobs so I have no issue going out with no bra on. It's only a social constraint if you want it to be. 
[deleted]
Agreed. It might also be worthwhile to make forays into engaging with porn / erotica / sex toys -with or without the boyfriend- to get maybe a bit more comfortable with the idea of arousal leading to a desire for penetration. Also so that in the meantime you have fun things to do that feel sexy and good.   I don't know if OP has ever successfully masturbated externally (clitoris stimulation), but that might also be a first step toward getting comfortable with it. I know I didn't start getting wet during sexy times until I started masturbating on my own. It tends to give you a better idea of how you feel / what you like when you're aroused.   OP, I imagine this must be quite frustrating. I wish you all the best! 
No.
[deleted]
Beautiful post.  But I'm getting the fuck out of this thread.  &lt;sniff&gt;
I went off of BC even knowing I was going to face a monster period again because I lost any and all emotions as well as my sex drive.  In all reality it is YOUR decision, but if I were you I would talk to your doctor, because every single month I just want to stop having all the pain as it's there, but when it's over I don't regret going off of birth control.
&gt; The fact that people are trying to dredge up 40 year old crap like this because she is a woman planning on running for President just shows how low certain groups will stoop.   ... because she is ~~a woman~~ planning on running for president   fixed that for you. The fact that she is a woman has zero to do with it. Politics brings out the worse in people. And don't forget that Hillary is included in those groups that will stoop so low.
It is watching shit like this that really makes me self reflect. Am I living life to its fullest?
So, you guys run a business and it has a lot of debt?  Is the business not thriving?  Does he take responsibility for his portion of actions within the business?  Does the business allow him to otherwise avoid the workforce?  What level of contribution to everyday life (rent, food, utilities, transportation, his own personal expenses) does he make?
I lost my dog three years ago due to cancer.  It was really hard to deal with at first, however the memory of him now makes me happy.  His last week with us was his "Kingly Week".  We allowed him on the beds/couches, cooked him a steak just for himself for dinner one night and just gave him nonstop unconditional love.  When he passed, he was in my arms.  My cats, especially one, now sleep where he used to sleep.  It's funny how they paid him no mind when he was with us but showed significant signs of mourning after he passed. 
This is the first time it's happened to me and this is the time I would have otherwise been on and no I don't :) I have a liner now because of spotting but I knew it was coming as plague of cramps attack me in full force haha but no cramps or anything until now
My little guy died today, this really helped me to remember the good times and grieve properly for him.
Make me want to cry. Potato chips! It's just too damn adorable. 
Your new hair is gorgeous! 
I think it affects each person differently though! A few of my friends are also on it, it's kind of popular at our school and they say it has made them less emotional. Good luck anyways!
I'm digging the Jacobean influence. What a great way to use lines. I haven't seen it before in tattoos, mostly textiles. What led you down that path?
[deleted]
There is a difference between me respecting your ability to do something in private and a business being required to support your ability to do something in private at the cost of other employees.  This isn't like using the bathroom, which is universally considered to be something done in private.  This is deemed acceptable to be done in public.  Imagine if someone was raised in a culture where they couldn't eat in the presence of non-family.  It was extremely taboo.  It is one thing for them to choose to not eat in the presence of others, and I'm not going to go be an ass and disturb their privacy.  But it is another for them to force others to comply at the expense of others. 
Just curious, when you eat your lunch, do you pull out body parts that require privacy and a private room?  Especially if she wasn't bottling the milk for the baby later on and instead tossing it, this would fall under excrementing bodily fluids in privacy.  Where does that tend to be done?  I get why the law requires a separate room in general, because either there may be a baby eating or the milk may be saved for the baby to eat later.  
how did you find running interesting?  Like walking, I find running boring.  Any tips?
I remind myself that sadly, people just are not taught the true roots of feminism. So many people have had the luxury in living in far more feminist times than previous generations and have no idea just how bad it once was, just how bad it could be if we don't stay on top of sexism. They see things they consider trivial held up as examples of sexism and don't understand the truly pernicious history behind them.  I ultimately believe most people want equality between the sexes, but get scared off by the words (patriarchy, feminism, privilege). No one wants to be the bad guy, and often react instinctively against things they perceive as accusations. It's bothers me, but not nearly as much as it would if they didn't even like the concept. The only solution is to be kind and show compassion towards those you can tell have the best intentions. Youtube...isn't really a great place for that kind of discussion.
Of course. However, saying 'not all men' only serves to diminish her life experienced and derail the conversation.   &gt;Why is it not helpful to say “not all men are like that”? For lots of reasons. For one, women know this. They already know not every man is a rapist, or a murderer, or violent. They don’t need you to tell them.  http://www.slate.com/blogs/bad_astronomy/2014/05/27/not_all_men_how_discussing_women_s_issues_gets_derailed.html
1. Do you have a vagina? 2. If you don't happen to have a vagina, do you still see yourself as a woman?  If you answered Yes to at least one of these questions, congratulations, you're a real woman :)
with different sections, some that are not as serious. You really need to start thinking at this point, or I can't discuss with you.  Compare apples with apples and oranges with oranges  Is there any bare chest photos in the same section. Since you never said yes, I guess not
Thanks for sharing! This was really neat!
[deleted]
I don't choose to be negative, I react to things that are presented to me. If you know of a better course of actions to take, I'd love to hear it.
We all get those. Hope your day gets better &lt;3
Let us observe, ladies and gentlemen, the mindset behind the full fledged hivemind. Fascinating.
This song, for some reason, helps me when I am sad. My boyfriend of two years left me today. Hang in there. I'm an elementary teacher, I had struggles getting there too. Keep trying :)  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=e5xkTyCPvks  Also this one.  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=5t_pVwFze60  
Probably listen to the second one first. "The scales always find a way to level out." 
tl;dr:: almost zero real support, some minor obvious misogyny, and a helluvalotta internalized sexism, victim blaming, #whataboutthemenz, and a complete inability to sympathize or empathize. 
I believe she peaked at 8th in the world, somewhere around there. She was never a serious world championship contender, as far as I know, but she was the first female chess player to even break the top 100. And she could take a games off of anyone, even the champions (as OP said)
Hilary is not a woman. She is not a man. She is not a Democrat or a Republican.    She is first and foremost a lawyer. This is what lawyers do. No one should be surprised by this.
That is really creepy!  When I read the title, I assumed it was only verbal harassment, which is really bad.  But even worse to get touched by some weirdo.
There are lots of pills that are all very different in terms of side effects for individuals, so it's worth trying others. There are also options like the Mirena IUD that have low levels of hormones and like the Paragard IUD that have no hormones. I really advise against planning on using Plan B, just because it's pretty rough on your hormones to take a sudden massive dose of hormones like that. If you really hate the other options, at least look into a diaphragm and spermicide, which is slightly less effective than condoms but is much better than taking Plan B on a semi-regular basis. It has the benefit of being a barrier method of contraceptive, so basically no hormones and no long-term commitment, without the unpleasant sensation of condoms. That combined with withdrawal can be pretty dependable.
I've almost normalized the verbal harassment I get because it's so common to me, blech. Dudes touching my hair has also become a pretty regular occurrence too unfortunately. Fucking grossssssssssss.
How so? In my experience issues for both genders are usually flip sides of the same coin in most situations, and aside from that,  quite often the easiest path goes to someone who is male and white (this varies for sexuality, race, ablebodiedness, etc). 
[I made this comment for people who know a little about chess but need a bump](http://www.reddit.com/r/videos/comments/1w0xu5/world_chess_champion_magnus_carlsen_plays_bill/cext0az)   **TL;DR** Watch the video series, It's the best beginner series and I searched around a lot when I started. Download ichess for android/ipad/iphone and do some chess puzzles. Play online at chess.com. (after a few games it gives you a rating so you'll be matched with people of your skill level)
I bet she's worried because you aren't the only one she's stealing from and if you sound the alarm they might figure it out. Our maybe you aren't the first one she had asked to keep her secret. 
&gt; Sharing the break room by having it open when she isn't expressing milk seems like an ok idea, until someone walks in on her by mistake.   Cheap and easy solution: add a lock to the break room door.
Very sorry for your loss &lt;3
*lose. (I hate to be that girl).  I feel for you. See a doctor and take a multivitamin. 
The same can be said for feminists, and the man hating groups.
Thank you!
There's empowerment, and there's delusion. It's fine if OP chooses to legally carry a weapon and draw confidence from her ability to use it, but her stated attitude of a gun somehow meaning she "doesn't have to worry about criminals" and "will never be the victim of a crime" is objectively nonsensical, as any half-way decent firearms instructor would be the *first* to tell her. Guns ain't magic. Having a gun isn't going to protect you from getting coshed from behind or having someone (or several someones) get the drop on you. Her stated reasoning for her confidence makes it clear that she sees her gun not as a "tool", as she claims, but as a totem, and that makes the confidence she draws from it false. And false confidence is an extremely dangerous item to carry around.  "YOU GO GIRL!" should be something you shout to someone taking their first bungie-jump, not to someone leaping off a cliff because they believe they can fly. You should be concerned that you're apparently valuing your ideological purity over the well-being of someone you claim to care about.
if you have something to contribute to the conversation you can try doing so instead of posting "no" and simple disagreement without reasoning
This is not what I expected to see behind that title. Really happily surprised. Thank you!
If you honestly feel that way, you have some very flawed and misogynistic views of women.  Drinking has nothing to do with the situation. Drunk or not, I made my intentions clear. Just because I didn't have the strength for 5 minutes does mean he can stick his penis in me!
[deleted]
I live in an area with a high native population, rez issues, that kind of thing, so it's kind of common where I'm from. I see how it could be problematic though, will edit. &lt;3
[deleted]
I didn't see those comments and that does change this situation, but I also think this sort of thing bears discussing. Every woman should have the right to breast feed and to express milk as needed while at work, and they should be able to do that somewhere clean and relatively comfortable. At the same time, not all workplaces are big enough to have a room specifically designated for that purpose all the time, and spaces need to be used strategically. The person I am responding to also seems to be unable to imagine a situation where a compromise is reached that is advantageous to everyone, and that irritates me as much as someone saying that a woman requiring a private room to express breast milk is acting entitled and asking for unnecessary special privileges. This isn't an all or nothing issue in any work space, and acting like it is just makes everything much worse.
I agree with the bad reviews. I always do more of my own research in addition to asking other's opinions on things.   Yeah I'm thinking of getting one. I mean I'm almost 20, it's time to start taking care of myself more.   Thanks for your input :) 
yeah I just checked.. It's Alesse..... So embarrassing.. Editting post now
You DESPISE stuff like "ban bossy"? That's pretty innocuous, really. 
That's not maths, that's called counting.   You don't need to go to school for that, can be taught in a couple of weeks.  _____________ edit: bad translation. Better would be [elementary arithmetics](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Elementary_arithmetic), and it has very little to do with mathematics, which is about several times more difficult and more esoteric.
[deleted]
Sorry you feel that way, but i've known about this sub since it's creation.
[deleted]
There is a significant inequality in the human system when you look at men vs. women at a global scale. When I observe nasty or rude comments, I mentally note that reflects the individuals limited experience or their inability to extend who they are (i.e. empathy). Unfortunately my only tactic for dealing with the "paint on the wall" comments is to ignore them. :(  You're not going to get through to most of these individuals via a depersonalized medium... and the few I've had conversations with, it's like selling evolution to a creationist.   One thing to note, 10% of men are born without empathy (roughly) and expecting a potential psychopath to change their mind about their food supply is not something I've observed. Take heart, humans are all on the same side. :)
[deleted]
[deleted]
He groped your breast while you were sleeping?!  What a charmer. Please tell a friend that he fondled you. That might help you.
Horse walks into a bar. Bartender says, "Hey, why the long face?"  Ugh, I know but fuck it. 
It's common in tests for purposes of gathering info on demographics, although they tell you that it is optional to answer or not.
Again, however unpopular, rape deniers are not inherently not feminists, obviously.
[This](http://www.usatoday.com/picture-gallery/news/nation-now/2014/06/19/unlikely-friendship-between-lynx-and-kitty-cat-at-russian-zoo/10848233/) should make you smile.
Useless rageoholics?
This would be more appropriate for /r/askwomen.  Thanks!
[deleted]
I seem to recall that Andre Agassi was raised the same way.   And he claims that he actually *hated* tennis throughout his entire career, but he was extremely good at it.   Although I think now that he's retired, he likes tennis *ok*.  
They're an intellectually dishonest, extremist hate-group echo-chamber and they should've been banned from reddit a long time ago, except it seems like the admins are protecting them. It blows my mind that they ended up being portrayed like a normal, rational feminist group by PBS. It stay actually made me think much worSe of PBS for failing to understand them. 
Congrats!
Hey! I'm an Aussie so my options are possibly diff to you, we can't readily access iontophoresis over here.  First off I tried aluminium chloride - if you slather it over the sweaty areas it will eventually start to help, but I found that it's also really painful sometimes, especially in the groin region ):   I'm now taking clonidine/catapres - this is a tablet that is normally used to lower blood pressure, so it has some very annoying side effects, particularly f your BP is low to start with, but I've found it's decreased my amount of sweating quite a lot. I now have days where I nearly don't even think about sweating at all, which I'm sure anyone with hyperhidrosis knows is rare!  I still find I sweat a lot on my butt and feet, which can be embarrassing, but I've started to care a bit less.  Cotton is the best fabric for not sweating too much - synthetic fabrics tend to cause more sweating. It's not a solution but I often carry a cardigan or scarf around to sit on if the chair will show up sweat.  Good luck - I'm 21 and it's been a hard road so far. Doctors often don't see it as a problem worth doing much about, but it just gets you down so much sometimes.  When you find a good one they'll help you. It's pretty tough but I find tablets the best option, as they reduce sweating everywhere.
Firstly, it can be a lot of things. So don't take any one answer here as the solution. Your best bet would be to go to your GP and get some bloodwork done. This will be the easiest way to go.   That being said, I do know from many of my friends that diet can play a huge part in hair falling out. This isn't uncommon for vegetarians who aren't exactly careful about protein intake. 
I think men and women are equal. If I call out any kind of sexism on the internet I get accused of being a feminist. These people are the ones lowering the bar for the definition of feminism.  
I was hoping on Berlin. 
&gt; Second, I never said false rape accusation didn't happen. I objected to the claim that "It usually comes out after the man is sentenced. The woman admits that she made it all up," because I don't know who the fuck you're talking about. &gt;  &gt;  &gt;  &gt; Who did it? Who made it up? Where is your source that backs up what you've said?  Use Google
[deleted]
&gt;I am not taking sides on what jobs are paid enough or not.  If you're claiming that you can turn 77 cents on the dollar into "equality" by normalizing for the *type* of work then, no, I'm sorry, but you are *definitely* taking sides on what jobs are paid enough.  &gt;I am simply saying that women will leave the office when they get pregnant even if they return because the guys take the paternity leave.  What's the difference from my wife leaving the office for 8 months when she got pregnant and me leaving for 8 months when she went back?
It's against the law to require her to pump in a bathroom.
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=iARHCxAMAO0  http://msmagazine.com/blog/2014/06/06/protest-saturday-misogynistic-mra-conference-in-detroit/  http://fullcomment.nationalpost.com/2014/04/15/robyn-urback-if-this-is-the-new-womens-movement-its-no-wonder-girls-dont-want-to-call-themselves-feminists/
Oh hun, I'm sorry. I know it's got to suck right now. What you're feeling is grief for your relationship and you're completely allowed to feel the way you do. Give yourself a day to mourn. Get some of your favorite snacks and ice cream and have a netflix or crappy movie binge. Don't feel bad about crying. Cry and hit stuff and do whatever you need. But only for a day. Don't let yourself go weeks in this awful post-break-up stage.   You're a month away from your deadline. You've made it this far! Just think about how much farther you're going to get! Put all your energy into working on your thesis. Just think, you did all the work for your PhD, not your boyfriend.   He's clearly dealing with something if he's deciding to experiment with drugs and other women. Don't let his decisions drag you down. Until the lease is over, it might be the best move to sleep in separate beds. Just try and keep busy and keep your distance as best you can. It's going to be hard, but you've made it this far. You can make it a few more months.   You're smart and strong. You can get through this. Just take it step by step. Focus on your thesis, your friends, new hobbies. And remember, you have the backing of all of us behind you! Whenever you need to just vent or be sad or whatever, know you have an entire forum here for you!
I'd support their cause. I just don't think there would be anything wrong with society as a whole if the majority of those workers remained male, which would probably be the case even if every single one of the women trying to break in did. That's my assumption, I haven't seen the statistics. In fact, I'd appreciate feminism a lot more if they mentioned more stuff like this along side things like STEM fields. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
This is, from my personal perspective, true.  For what it's worth, I think a lot of it has to do with the social convention that men are supposed to ask first and thus risk rejection.
Well said. Equality is about embracing differences, not ignoring them. To be fair, though, /u/usuallyafakestory probably doesn't realize this, taking "equality" to be "sameness", which it definitely can be mistaken for.
You are not overreacting. That was entirely inappropriate for anyone to do, let alone your boss. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
The unnerving part is that she swings back and forth between being nice and being terrible. Only about 20 minutes after this incident she approached me and some other staff to joke about something funny that happened.   It's like she doesn't notice what she is doing is wrong, or she doesn't care.  
[deleted]
The only time I've had exes hide female friends from me is when they were cheating with those "friends". Your boyfriend's relationship with his female friend could be very innocent but it's still a sign of bigger problems in your relationship. He doesn't trust you enough to be honest with you about her and without trust a relationship is worthless. Trust him until he gives you a reason not to trust him but also express to him how important it is that he be honest with you going forward. At the same time though, don't get upset with him when he is honest with you.
[deleted]
...move to Paris! :D
Magnus Carlsen (the current World Champion) also mentions the physical aspects of chess. He exercises a lot and takes his diet rather seriously. I've seen comments from him saying that if he doesn't get exercise or a good meal, he doesn't play as well.
&gt; so how can you say  Because they have?  If you look at the stats for the things I list they are all gone down. For example for rape:  *[There were an estimated 83,425 forcible rapes reported to law enforcement in 2011.  This estimate was 2.5 percent lower than the 2010 estimate and 9.5 percent and 12.4 percent lower than the 2007 and 2002 estimates, respectively.  \(See Tables 1 and 1A.\)](http://www.fbi.gov/about-us/cjis/ucr/crime-in-the-u.s/2011/crime-in-the-u.s.-2011/violent-crime/forcible-rape)*  If you dig up the stats for the other crimes they show the same thing.  &gt;they're talking about them because they're still issues  Not saying they aren't issues.  More saying to the extent and level they are talked about doesn't match that the levels they are at in society. Its like as if its still the 1950's or something and rape and what have you are sky high and its an edemic.  
I didn't say that she was 'just doing her job', though. I said that it shows that she can look at a situation objectively and that her actions elsewhere show that she has a moral compass.   The only reason this is being brought up again (forty years later) is because conservatives want to drag her name through the mud in case she decides to run. If it comes to the election and you feel that this issue means you can't vote for her, then by all means, that's your decision. Personally, I doubt that if she gets that far she'll be up against anyone morally 'better' than her. 
!!!!!!!!! Amazing!
Try this for a couple of weeks and get your money/experience up. If this BS stays consistent, just start looking for jobs elsewhere and get outta there when you've found the right fit. Service jobs, even high end ones I have worked at can be stressful but a manager doing that is just one who is way too comfortable in their 'power' position (more like stuck there) and thinks they're always right (the added connection also allows her to not take responsibility for her actions but don't worry, a time just might come in the future when her and the owner will have to make a decision over herself or her and obviously this immature managers leverage; which is actually a dependency on other people as power will fall apart). Do what you need to do to get where you need to be, if this becomes a recurring pattern start formulating that exit strategy. Obviously this isn't the only restaurant in the world. 
Thank you for telling us your side of the end of your relationship.
[deleted]
Her personal feelings were involved though. She wanted to win the case. Nothing to to do with facts or objectivity, she didn't care whether he raped her, which shows a lack of humanity.
You're either uneducated or a psychopath, I'll answer as if you're the former.   1) The clitoris closest equivalent would be the head of the penis.  2) I was circumcised as a child and everything works fine, yes I may be losing some sensitivity but nothing compared to losing the entire end of my dick. 3) The motivation behind circumcision and Clitoridectomy are completely different based on the society you live in.   In short sir, I feel terrible if you had a bad experience with your circumcision. I would not put it in the same category as women who have had their body mutilated for some psychopathic reason. 
I actually thought about explaining his point to you but reading your post history I don't think you'll understand.  He's not really making reference to the "coveted status of victimhood" in that quote at all, at least not in the sense you are smugly trying to imply.   Tip: Ask yourself who "they" is in your own quote
I completely get your point - you're not a party pooper. I have played the piano for 20 years. What was important to me was really having the "any way the wind blows" on the top of the wrist. The rest of the line had to be modified to fit on my wrist, which I don't mind. There is missing a flat yes - I actually hadn't noticed that! So thank you :) Since the tattoo is on my wrist the lines are actually the same size - it all depends on how I move my wrist. The same goes for what line the notes appear to be on. The staff lines had to not be there otherwise it will all be a big mush in 10 years according to the tattoo artist. I think that might also be why he omitted the flat, but I will def. ask him about that. Thanks for your input 
Nobody should need to rely on "I'm taken" as a reason for someone to back off with unwanted sexual advances.
&gt; I know some people here have been making some rather unsavory comments about her arm hair.  Fuck that so much. I'm not sure why some people care so much about criticizing the appearance of strangers when it wasn't solicited. I posted my wedding pics on Friday too and got a couple of ridiculous comments as well... and also got much of the same about the hair on my fingers when I posted a pic of my engagement ring.  All I can say is this is basically what was going through my head while I was laughing at the dumb comments: http://24.media.tumblr.com/tumblr_m4ooxnodFq1qfeoifo1_500.gif  Haters can keep on hating - they can be jelly all they want of your and your wife's beautiful pictures (omg that dress!), my pics, everyone else's awesome pics every Friday :)
A friend of mine (guy, but still) got a bald spot the size of an egg from the stress of finals. Just happened like that in a month tops.   I say definitely possible. 
I can understand why they segregate men and women in sports like basketball and swimming... but I've never understood for things like golf and especially chess. 
[deleted]
This applies to all competitive gaming, online or traditional: when you're playing against someone, forget about genders, races, religion and other stuff. You are a player and your opponent is another player. You are equal.
Male here, I agree with most of those, but not everybody would, everyone has different taste and perceptions
Yeah, and I have no idea why. Was weird. 
Some do, which is why that list exists in the first place. Thankfully most I've come in contact with generally treat women like individuals, rather then "all are the same" but that being said there still are a lot of female stereotypes that men believe but these "girl vs women" ones are one's I've actually never seen or heard of before so I'm assuming the are not that common because I've never been faced with them before.  
Precisely the reason there are women's leagues in all sports.  I'm not aware of many professional sports that prohibit women, but women don't develop in the same manner as men.  If women were to be required to compete against the men, you'd end up with the same professional sports we have now; that is, without women.  Not much opportunity for the ladies when they cannot compete professionally against men because they cannot dunk on a 10 ft hoop, cannot pitch 100+ fastballs, cannot tackle a 300 lb man, cannot return a tennis serve with the same speed, etc.  It would be a shame if women weren't given some platform to demonstrate their capabilities in competitive events.
True, population problems should be fixed on a bigger scale, but dealing with people at most risk of being bad parents is part of that. In a bigger scheme, such people shouldn't be missed out.  
[deleted]
Yeah. I think that's something he should know as well. I already dress conservatively (to the point that older people think I'm stealing my parents' clothes) so it was a real surprise to still encounter catcalling. And then my reason for dressing more conservatively was to make myself less attractive (my logic was that men on the street only catcalled attractive women). Needless to say, it seriously lowered my self-esteem and made me less confident. If I could go back in time, I wouldn't have done it.  Not sure what your circumstances are, but I hope you don't go too far with your more conservative dress code. The street harassment has everything to do with your gender, not your clothes. As for safety, it's not dressing conservatively that makes you safe, it's making sure you don't advertise an abundance of money (expensive bags, jewellery, etc.)
I dont agree with the sentence, but she had it coming when she stopped at a highway for some ducks, without giving any fucks.
For real.   At this point they might as well make f7u12  a default.  
&gt; Actually, it's a solid fact that some minorities do. The question is, why?  Yeah, I in fact wanted to say that "minorities don't have lower intelligence". There are indeed some difference in the IQ score, but there are so many biases in the IQ testing methods that at best it is a faulty scale. 
they wanted to win too
I don't think this is really normal. I have wet the bed once as an adult, I had partied a little too hard one night and had a dream I was peeing on a toilet. As it turns out, I wasn't. 
[deleted]
Are you victim blaming? 
Ugh. During middle school, I was in a class where I was the only girl. The discussions comparing different girls' "racks", the gossip about which girls were "sluts" who would suck guys off...it was horrible for a self-conscious 13-year-old girl. In other words, THANK YOU for noticing and caring about this.  Unfortunately, I don't have any useful advice for you. I don't think it's your *responsibility* to challenge these views. I do think it would be great if you could do something anyway. You shouldn't risk your job, though!  In no way, shape, or form are you overreacting or crazy. By contrast, you sound like a really good educator because you care about helping your students to develop character.
Examples? Because for the life of me I couldn't readily find an obvious example of this 'stirring up controversy'.
[deleted]
A lot of times things like soaps can cause yeast infections, so if you do have a yeast infection it was probably caused by soap on the rag, if your going to wash that way i would recommend a separate rag for your vag.  On that note, if you think you have a yeast infection go to your doctor. If you are in pain bviously something is wrong.
:)  I just hope you'll feel better soon. Sounds like just about everything went wrong at once. Think of it as just another moment you can look back at - moments pass. Suddenly you'll find yourself on the other end, feeling okay again. That's how I survived a lot of hardships, at least :)
You see for example, the thread has already a single downvote with no explanation from who did it as to why, or at least a simple response that implies a reason why they did it.  This is imput response. I can't get this from other places.
[deleted]
Just be present. Being there is huge. Share a little TV time. Talk if she wants to. 
I'm not sure it was much of a kiss. I mean it lasted one second. I hate having to point this out, it's comical.
It was fine for the first few hours. Then the regrowth was absolutely horrific and I've never done it since. I much, much prefer waxing to shaving.
[deleted]
I think discussions are important, and these discussions happen every day on this subreddit. A more observational approach may get you more worthwhile data depending on what application you are planning for this knowledge.  Questions as a form of data collection, where some people obviously feel attacked to some degree may not get you very clean data. 
The exception that proves the rule. 
Check out http://www.colormekatie.com she hasn't been active in a while but I find her blog, art, colourful apartment &amp; cute cat inspirational on those dark days. Good luck with everything -- you will be ok! 
Haha,  I'll go over with every intention of saying that,  then probably freeze and say "I'm not trying to make the sex with you  or anything,  look,  not naked or owt! But, um. . &lt;blink&gt;  Coffee?" And he'll run away screaming and that will be the end of a beautiful potential friendship.  I'm smooth like that. 
I can never tell if people are being sarcastic on this sub. 
chesstempo.com is free (Subscriptions add several enhanced features) and gives you chess problems taken from actual games.  Every problem has a difficulty rating--do well and you'll get tougher problems; make mistakes and the server will lower the difficulty level automatically.   It's a good way to learn some killer chess combos.
I hang out on the A Voice for Men forums so I don't have this problem, I consider myself "The Town Drunk of the MRM", though that form of posting is on hiatus because my stomach is probably bleeding in multiple locations right now.
So this isn't just a one-off? Is he **really** that special that you can justify cutting yourself off from people you like and activities you enjoy just to please him? If not I think you either have to tell him to grow the fuck up and accept you're a person that has a life outside the relationship and you're not abandoning it for **anyone**, or you save yourself time and heartache and ditch him now.
Do I? How so?
Not really true that the reasons are the same because in chess there is no physical reason a woman cannot be as good as the top men.
Nope. Last time it happened was about ~10 years ago when I was 16 sleeping on a floor and I was dreaming I pissing in the toilet, when in reality it was my pants :(
There are plenty of consciously sexist people, too. Supposedly around 10% of people will say in surveys that they wouldn't vote for a female presidential candidate. Bill O'Reilly, to pick a prominent cultural figure as an example, had a segment on his show a little while ago where he was trying to convince people of the "downsides" of having a female president.
She was a lawyer. It was her job.
Consider yourself validated. 
He left you because of his own issues, not because of a problem with the relationship. Him doing that, and seeking help, makes it seem as if he's actively doing something to improve.   In that light, starting to see him again is not a bad decision. On the other hand though, if his mental health continues to be fragile, or he suffers from an illness, that will impact the relationship in the future as well.    Talk to him, and ask for full disclosure about things. 
This is the rule I have about relationships:  Don't make the same mistake twice.
I made [this cross stitch](http://i.imgur.com/RctNyzv.jpg?1) for Secret Santa last summer!  It was my first time stitching since I was in middle school.  I watched an awful lot of Project Runway while working on it.
[deleted]
No, this doesn't appear to be sexist.
Well, maybe you can meet and befriend some single parent families. Your kids are still young and he may change when he gets more empirical evidence. 
Normal or common does not equal 'right'. When concerns of sexism comes up the best course of action would be is discuss with her and empathize, talk about what can be done to improve the situation, and talk about why it might not be sexist. A lot of guys in my area are very brash, rude or inconsiderate. There's a lot of hypermasculine (as in "to be a man you must be gruff and rude") influences in society around here so they pick up on that and internalize it as part and parcel of maleness, despite the fact that being a douche is a Bad Thing.  Re: money responsibility, I don't get where you are reading that from the tone. The article comes off as a concerned and somewhat protective parent giving advice at worst.  Re: Doctor visits, I don't know how that implies that women &gt; men at all. Wat?  Re: Products by women, see [chacala's reply.](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/comments/28ssbt/dae_find_this_feminism_article_sexist/cie3wsm)
I think everyone should call them out -doesn't matter if you're a man or woman- call them out when they do this and do just as you did- state that it is unacceptable behavior and go about your business. Wouldn't it be great if every time a person cat-called, they got a group response from every person who heard it telling them that is asinine behavior?
white men are not marginalized. try again.
Oh shit..... This is my fear!!!! But I won't be drunk so that might help... and hopefully will know the music well enough to avoid this... Agghhh!!
That's amazing that a mod can just read a post and by the use of telepathy automatically know the gender of a poster /s
&gt;what happened to you last night  Um, is this referring to a rape case? Because criminal offense &gt; jail time.
Were you hurt by the fact that he called the family you grew up in not a family?  I suspect this is why you had such a strong reaction to this comment.  He is basically calling your upbringing illegitimate, and that is not ok. He may not respect your dictionary definition of the word, but he should absolutely respect your family and your feelings.
Well, the reason I said it implies that women already consume many cultural products made my women is because the article is only suggesting men to do so.  No where on the site does it suggest that women should also be aware of this stereotype and consume more women made cultural products.  Also you can't really tell you agree with the following:  &gt;When a woman tells you something is sexist, believe her.   &gt;Ensure that some of your heroes and role models are women.  &gt;Don’t treat your spouse like a “nag.” If she is “nagging,” you are probably lagging.    
Nope,not since i was 5.
I recognize that I only have this story and the facts presented here, and therefore a not entirely clear understanding of the situation,  but this sounds like pretty classic control and manipulation.  There's a lot of red flags; the retaliation especially.  I'm guessing this sort of thing is just starting with him; it's a good situation for him to start with; you had what could be interpreted as a romantic moment with this friend, so you can sort of justify his jealousy. But if he's manipulating you, he'll start objecting to other situations, and separating you from more friends.  I think you already know that this isn't ok, and you're asking here because you want that hunch justified.  Either he is doing this on purpose and you should leave, or he isn't emotionally mature. If it's the latter, you're doing him the bigger favor by not backing down.   Either way, your next move is going to suck. It's going to hurt if you stay but draw a line at this behavior,  it's going to hurt if you leave, and if you back down it'll hurt later when the next thing comes up.  I'm truly sorry about that.  Unfortunately,  you're in a shitty situation where all the next moves forward suck.
I can't speak to the effectiveness as I don't know the answer to that question, but you will *not* get withdrawal symptoms.  Birth control pills are not a medication that causes physical dependence.  Many insurance plans offer an "ask a nurse" service.  You might also call a pharmacy and ask them.
I think you're taking the campaign too literally if you think they *actually* intend to ban the word bossy. It's an awareness campaign about how girls are treated differently than boys when they take charge, and how we need to alter the social perception of girls in those instances. A lot of people don't think about how they treat girls differently than boys, and it can be pretty dry stuff reading those studies about how women are seen as dominating a conversation when their input is only 30%, or how girls are asked fewer questions than boys in a classroom, or they're interrupted much more frequently. If you start an awareness campaign like Ban Bossy, then you can inform people through the program and hopefully in the future people will be more aware of those problems and catch themselves when they start to fall into them. I've also seen a lot of great women doing posters and advertisements to give good examples to girls that they can be in power positions, in control, which is something that girls don't see very often. I think they have a wide agenda, and it's a good one, and it's not literally attempting to ban a word- I haven't seen any talk of that. 
To make some points of rebuttals, because I like arguing on the internet :  &gt;I have never seen any feminist anywhere advise women to take up the slack where men's tasks are concerned. There are no popular feminist outlets telling women to **pay for half of a meal**, or to buy men **meals on dates** as much as they themselves are bought meals or drinks.  The bolded part's mine. Uh, so this is not feminism's fault, isn't it? It's a part of patriarchal culture (or if you're uncomfortable with the term, use another term) that says something along the lines of *'men are breadwinners, women are not, so the ones more financially capable pay for meals and dates and house finances'*.   In fact, it's a strawman because I've never heard any feminist, myself included, that doesn't *oppose* the 'male paying for dates' thing. Because it's benevolently sexist.  &gt;This is irrational. If a woman says something is sexist, she needs to demonstrate that what she's talking about is sexist.  That's the whole point, though. Quite a lot of time, when a woman talks about her experience or opinion (e.g she's telling you a story about her being catcalled), she's not believed. The point is not believing a woman 100% all the time, that's just stupid.   The point is to make *a show of support*, like when a woman said that she's been sexually harassed by her boss, you don't automatically jump to her boss's defense, saying 'maybe he's misunderstood' or things like that.  &gt;I don't see why anyone should do this. Your heroes should be your heroes for personal reasons which are particular to you. You shouldn't be obligated to seek out women to consider your heroes.   To make this statement is to ignore context. Historical context, to be accurate. There's a *lot* of women scientists, politicians, heroes that has been forgotten by history or just plain uncounted for. There's this little thing called gender inequality, too, in the past several hundred years or so that made women in the past not living up their full potential. To ignore this, I think, is the equivalent of saying that we don't need black history month because... I don't know, you tell me.  About nagging,  &gt;Again, this implies that a woman is correct by virtue of being a woman  No, it's not. *"Nagging"* is a gendered insult. The author asked that men do not use them : that's all. Simple.  &gt;The only way in which I find this problematic is in the instance of your romantic partner's body changing in a way that makes them unattractive to you.  This one I agree; obviously people's tastes are different, they have rights, etc.  &gt;audience consists of middle/upper class white people  Intersectionality exists.  &gt;I prefer to take each issue on it's own merit and decide what makes sense to me as far as what constutes equality and what doesn't.  For each their own ways.
I'm not saying the paper is totally off base (it isn't), but you can't take the Heritage Foundation at their word. If someone is unfamiliar with a topic, it's easy to mislead them by citing only one side of an argument. That's what peer review is for: to make sure the topic is approached in a way congruent to current knowledge.  This paper takes into account effects which reduce the gender wage gap, but doesn't mention occupational segregation or establishment segregation. These are perhaps not relevant to this discussion thread, but are an important factor in the issue the paper discusses. Women may make near as much as men for the same work, but they don't have the same ability to get into high paying sectors.  Furthermore, the paper gets it's 5% figure from a 2009 CONSAD report, which itself characterises the gap as 4.1%-7.8%. They aren't lying by saying five percent, but it may just as well be nearly eight percent. They just chose to lowball it, because it makes their narrative easier to swallow.  I want to say that I mostly agree with the paper, but it *is* biased, and there are better papers to use as an introduction to the topic. In general, I would say that, to the layperson, papers published by politically motivated entities are best avoided. Without knowledge of the subject there's no telling how skewed an analysis may be.
Basically, as with much in life, the biggest enemy women have is the imaginary threats that live in their own head. 
[deleted]
I have the same issue, it is a total pain! I don't think it's about your body though, just everything is so short lately, it seems to be the current trend.   You can either attach some hem weights that you can get pretty cheaply from ebay which will weight down the hem of your skirt so it shouldn't blow up in the wind OR you can do what I do, which is wear opaque tights or leggings with skater dresses/skirts.  Also, try looking at midi skater skirts/dresses. They're similar to the normal skater skirts/dresses but they're a bit longer (about knee length, sometimes slightly above) and they look soo nice and summery. They're super popular right now too so you can get some really nice ones for not too much money at places like h&amp;m and asos.
Can you give us a tl;dr?
This is what I was gonna say - definitely itchy...
Agreed on mutilation, do not agree on the context for the OP or the fact the motivation behind the two are different. It should not happen on any level in a modern society. 
There is a time and place for kids to be kids, but THAT behavior, in class, isn't one of them. Teens need to learn the difference between public face and private face- and it seems these kids don't mind having explicitly sexual conversations in front of their authority figures. That's ripe for disaster when they enter the job market in a few years. 
He basically said your family (the one you take part as a daughter/sister) isn't a family, I think I understand why you took it badly...
Sometimes we'll both go out with friends or with our dogs, grab dinner, maybe play wii, or watch a show we both like. When we're home it's nothing too fascinating. 
Sounds like a second study would have to be done to try and determine the reason they played less well.  Some women like to appear unthreatening to men (because they think that increases their attractiveness) by losing at games with them.  I imagine many factors are involved.
This comment was removed:  Respect: No disrespectful commentary is permitted.     [2X FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/wiki/faq) | [2X Rules](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/wiki/rules) | [reddiquette](/wiki/reddiquette) | [reddit's rules](/wiki/rules)
Thanks so much! I'm actually very interested in makeup artistry and am currently taking courses with that, I'm just concerned that it won't be lucrative enough to support me. With an administrative diploma what kind of things can you do? 
I'm a girl, and I think that even if you find an argument irrelevant or easily refutable, that doesn't mean that there is any reason to insult that person. And it doesn't sound like you want to "discuss" anything, you just want to have people agree with you, seeing how I can see on multiple threads that you are completely shooting down anyone disagreeing with you by calling them irrelevant.
My SO is also a gamer and can get very caught up in his games. I am a reader and can get very caught up in the internet and books. What works for us is to just plan quality time the way people do when a relationship is serious but they're not living together yet!   For instance we will have a full breakfast together on weekend, go for walks together, play board games, watch a movie together, etcetera, just ordinary stuff really, but we plan those things, because we know we both want and need time spent together but if we don't plan it, the day may be over before we know it. 
Try to think about the positives. If you chose to, you can do almost anything that a man can do- and additionally, create a freaking life in your gut. You will become generally less squeemish and more pain tolerant than your average male counterpart- thanks to those gushyblood days. You (likely) have intuition, a great sense of smell, and detail-focused eyes that see more colors and patterns. You've been socialized to be great at teamwork, communication, compromise, and empathy-- which have been proven to be more beneficial in both the workplace and personal relationships than the typical "male" behaviors. If you want to pursue a carreer you can, and if you want to stay at home w/ the kids, that's a valid choice too. Hell, you can even feed them for free using your fatsacks!! You've never lived in a better time to be a woman- increasingly our voices are being heard in politics, science, history, and art. If you're living in a "first-world" country-- you can finally own property or your own business, learn to read, live childless or even with other women, choose to not get pregnant or likely not DIE during childbirth, and probably go about without being owned by someone!! We do better in higher education, better on testing, and we live longer than men. While the pressure to look perfect has never been higher- at least now we talk about how absurd those standards are! And we can buy vibrators and watch porn!    Ladies have got our spaces for improvement, but you only have to accept the social constraints if you want to. It'll be ok. We're tough old birds, yeah? :)
He is selfish (he admits it constantly) but I think this is really hurting him, and that's why he's not able to stop trying to communicate. And the impotence of his position isn't easy for him.       I think you're right about a message explaining the reasons that I can't maintain contact anymore, it's at least fair to give him an explanation that is less emotionally convoluted than our text messages.      Thanks for telling me about that subreddit - didn't know it existed and will definitely be using it for support
I *think* there has been a recent surge in feminism-based biological treatise/research, but I could be wrong.   Anyway. I agree wrt MRM ; I've seen good things coming out from it like some analyses of fatherhood or the rape of men, or the lack of DV shelters for men, and some brilliant articles on masculinity in modern world -- in fact, I remembered there used to be a blog about it.. I forgot the name, but it's written by a queer woman talking about men's issues, then she joined a larger blog. They have some good points and articles.  Oh and if you're interested in, a good source about gender difference (or similarity) in the brain, you could check [Delusions of Gender](http://www.amazon.com/Delusions-Gender-Society-Neurosexism-Difference/dp/0393340244) by Cordelia Fine, a legit neuroscientist talking about bad research a la Goldacre (of bad science fame). Pretty good book.
Not all implants look fake, though. When they're done well, they have a natural shape and the sort of natural sag that you expect larger breasts to have.
If you want that one girl to drop out of the class, keep letting the boys act the way they are. Your classroom is a very hostile environment for women right now, and the girl probably feels very uncomfortable and out of place.
Mine started with an ex years ago who was forceful with sex (he also had a bent penis that hurt) and I still experience it now before penetration. It is painful and mine is anxiety driven- if I am not mentally prepared or in the mood then it hurts terribly. I haven't told my current bf as I know he'd stop having sex altogether and blame himself for it...   Anyway, I've found things that turn me on and try to recall them during foreplay, when I start to hurt, I tell myself how I want this to happen and focus on slowing my breathing and thinking sexual images- sometimes touching myself to make myself wet has helped. If it's too bad I tell my Bf that I just want to masturbate him and he's ok with that.  That's how I cope, like I said I don't have it often with this bf as I did my ex and I really have to get myself worked up and focus on something else. 
You're absolutely doing the right thing!  Yes, you'll be hurting him, but not as much as you'll be hurting yourself if you continue a relationship with him - you want more from the relationship than he can (or is willing to) give.  You say that emotional stress is a major trigger for you - you could point out to Jon that his continuing to try and contact you is a major source of this. 
[deleted]
It's cute! :)
I made all the music on here and more!  www.soundcloud.com/megancarnes
Let's not be quick to judge other women who prefer plastic surgery to au natural. It's not always about self-esteem.
Oh noes, I better revise my understanding of history to show that art/literature/anything not stem has had no positive impact on the course of history whatsoever!
Okay, keep telling yourself that. The professional chess world will surely take note, no doubt.
&gt; But competitively speaking, if you want to get better you have to play against stronger opponents.  Of course. But it's not like you can only play against stronger players in co-ed tournaments, or that women's tournaments keep you from participating in co-ed tournaments. Yes, you need to play against stronger players. And yes, stereotype threat is a real harm. But stereotype threat doesn't exist because of women's tourneys. It isn't made worse by women's tourneys. And playing co-ed doesn't make that stereotype threat vanish. OP is extrapolating from a few knows and assuming a whole tonne of other stuff that is at best, totally unproven and worst shown to be inaccurate.   Dumping on women's tourneys, and the people who actively work to get more girls and women to play chess and blaming them for socialisation issues is nuts! And I included my story so that OP got some of a sense as to why organising women's tourneys and groups were important. OP not only blames women's tourneys for societal issues that they actively fight against, but he's missing the larger picture. If only a fraction of women play chess, it's a fair bet that a great many of the women who would be great never touch the game. If of those fraction, a great many give the game up because of the sexist crap they face, then they too can never be great. OP is looking at the lack of women as GM and assuming that it's a problem with the women. That they aren't competitive enough, are afraid to play against men and they're affected by stereotype threat. OP misses the enormous amounts of crap they had to deal with just to get there. And that women's tourneys likely were crucial for them. Instead, he blames them for not doing enough to overcome socialisation and that's fucked up.
[deleted]
&gt; think about the standards that you expect of men you are intimate with.  Um.... no.  Think about what *you* want to do and what makes you comfortable and happy.  None of us, regardless of gender, should be spending lots of time money on something that we don't want and that makes us uncomfortable, *just* in order to be attractive to the other gender.  (Or the same gender, if you swing that way.)  Also: do you honestly think that women who don't shave are not accepted as full members of society?  Seriously?  This is news to me.  
Holy crap that was amazing!  That grace!   I wish I could dance. :(
[deleted]
"This is a sub for women from women's perspective."  You say this, yet you (a man) feel that you have the right to tell us exactly what we should or should not do in this sub.    Do you seriously not see the contradiction here?
there's nothing wrong with being a virgin. You're only 18!!! It's nothing to be embarrassed about.   Guys won't mind at all about experience or anything, in fact most guys find it much sexier if the girl they are with is less experienced as opposed to she has been with loads and loads of guys.   At this stage I really don't think you should just rush in with the next guy that winks at you or rush into having sex with some guy you're not all that into just so you can be more experienced when mr right comes along.   You're only 17 ... gosh there is nothing unusual about being a 17 year old virgin at all!
[deleted]
Go you, girl! I shave my legs about twice a year as a treat for my SO. No one really notices, or cares. Next step: arm patties! Much more noticeable, but again, no one cares.
[deleted]
Did you only kiss the friend? Was it a close friend? I think there are some missing details that MAY explain, not excuse, what he did. It's easy to say he's being controlling and manipulative based on the information.     If he went dinner with some friends from High school, including a girl he used to sleep with, without telling you,  after you asked him not to, would you be upset? Know it's a different situation but the emotions are on the same level.      I'm just saying there are a lot of people saying just dump him, which a really easy thing to say when you aren't invoked in the situation personally. You have to look at everything he said and did knowing his personality to decide what's best for you. Had he ever been manipulative before? Does he seen like the kind of person that would cheat on you?     I see his actions as more of a defensive move rather than aggressive. 'Well she is out hanging with her old flirt after I told her I didn't like it, so I'm gonna show her I have options to.' I could be wrong but so could everyone else. Everything comes down to your judgement. Personally I think you should talk to him and explain your self and Figure out his intentions and see where he feels your relationship stands.     I wish you the best. 
how old is he?
- Yes a kiss that lasted one minute (like the way you give someone a kiss on the cheek, but on the lips) - I don't care if he goes to dinner with some friends if a girl he used to sleep with/kiss in HS was there (I do however care that he is still in contact with his ex who he was still sleeping with when we were in the early stages of our relationship. He refuses to stop talking to this friend). - He is a highly anxious man with a constricted social life. He has on every single occasion refused to meet my friends, except on one occasion when he was 5 mins away. - Would he cheat on me? I think he would maintain a connection with his ex so he could return to her. I think that's totally possible. He even said he might return to her a while back if we didn't work out, but changed his mind after they discussed it which was kind of offensive, but oh well. - Well, yes it was defensive, but designed to make himself feel better and guilt trip me into stop seeing my friend (I don't view him as an old flirt, I've been friends with him constantly from 2009 and after my boyfriend admitted sleeping with his ex, he then told me I had to stop seeing my friend which I did to calm him down because I loved him (unhealthy love tbh) but now I feel wth should I dismiss my good friend, it's utterly cruel). - He just keeps saying "you don't understand" and threatens to return to live with his ex. So there you go. 
Have you told him straight up to stop commenting on it? If he keeps fdoing it, clearly you aren't getting your point across.
Don't even fucking bother to respond to someone who wants to be *skeptical* that you have a husband who likes natural looking women. I mean, hopefully Bro will figure out one day that not everybody else is a bro. Or not, but right now he's in some fanciful world where everyone else like hops in their beer or some shit, no difference in tastes exist, *everybody* likes blondes, everyone wants *DD tits* everyone wants what he wants because he's the arbiter of American maleness. 
Oh, no doubt they could if they wanted to, but maybe women feel they shouldn't go into a "standard" competition, since there's others that cater exclusively to their gender... I guess it's an issue that comes from far back, sort of a neverending circle. Personally, what I loved most about your post is learning about how Polgár refused to participate in female-only competitions - I completely agree with this sentiment and think more of us should do that.  Thanks a lot for sharing, by the way! :)
It really does work! I'm a very nervous person when it comes to making new friends. But when I saw this guy in a class of mine I knew I wanted to get to know him. We never really had a chance to talk, but we had the smiles just like you described, OP. Finally, as we were leaving class one day I kind of blocked the door and nervously stammered, "Wow. I want coffee. I'm going to get some. Do you want to? Come get some? Coffee?" He stammered back "Um. Yes. I would like some. Or tea." It was SO AWKWARD. Sitting there, trying to think of topics when we really hardly knew each other, maintaining conversation despite being pretty introverted. But 1 year later and we're still together! So cheesy :)
"Only strippers shave above the knee"
Why, because you want to sleep with every woman you've been friends with and have made moves on them? Not fair to generalize, if this is the case.
My SO was not always my SO. First he was my friend, then my very close friend, and then he told me he wanted more from me. I wasn't sure I wanted the same.  Before I get into that, I'll get into a bit of my dating history. I always dated guys I felt a 'spark' with. Sexual attraction, physical attraction, chemistry etc. My body made decisions for me initially and when I would start to like the guy on a deeper level I'd realize he didn't like me, had awful view, was an idiot, was a narcissist, we just weren't on the same page or we weren't a great fit.  There were a couple of times in my life I made a decision to date someone that I didn't feel that huge physical pull to initially and they were long term relationships that ended eventually but ended on good terms and mostly due to circumstance (they were moving away for work or school and I don't do long-distance).  So enter my SO. Obviously if there was some huge physical thing we would have dated from the start but there wasn't. I decided to give us a chance and see how I felt about it.  As time went on, I fell in love with this guy so deeply. I feel so much more for him than I have for anyone else. I love everything about him. I love physically being with him way more than with anyone else. None of those feelings were there at first, they grew.  So powerful feelings, a powerful bond of love, affection, compassion and trust can grow over time. It doesn't have to be BOOM sparks chemistry all at once. It can just be a slow process.  I love him more and more every day and I'm so happy I gave this a chance because I feel so strongly for him.
Smooth as fuck! I always want to touch my VJ when I shave for the first time in a while. It feels very velvety smooth. 
Yeah I agree completely, I meant its okay for him to feel that way and maybe even ask her not to, but not to try and control her like that.
If you need peace of mind - take a test.
[I make pictures!](https://www.flickr.com/photos/sonja-newcombe/)      I also crochet, but I don't have any good photos of the stuff I've made.
you can refuse to represent a client unless the court orders you to be their counsel. Sounds like she is admitting that she knew he was guilty and in the course of her 'job' a little girl became a victim with no justice. That little girl grew up to become a troubled person. The victim does blame Mrs Clinton btw.  So to answer your question; Yes, I have done things for work that I didn't agree with. No way I would help to get a child rapist off though. No one can force you to ruin someone's life like Mrs Clinton helped to do
Dude fuck that I'm sorry. I don't shave anything. I stopped when I got pregnant and it started being a bother and now I prefer it this way. It's hard getting comments from people but it's your body. I hope you can get them to back off. 
Is it possible to meet a guy who uses women for sex but cleverly comes across as a cool open-minded guy who seeks women with similar intentions?   How would you know the difference.
[deleted]
you're right my bad lol
Tend Skin has good reviews. Someone said you can make it yourself with five ounces rubbing alcohol, two and a half ounces witch hazel, and twenty six aspirins (salicylic acid) crushed up. Haven't tried it yet but I will soon.
I've ordered sex stuff online and it all came very discreetly, in regular UPS packaging. Even the packing slip was discreet in their labeling of the contents.  If you are worried, order some other things that aren't sex-related. 
Only if it breaks the rules. Please feel free to report them if so. I thought you were leaving, anyway :)
i know...it's interesting actually, the difference between how generally iranians think in contrast to americans, not authorities, people.  it's hard to explain, she/he said men focus on the game, that means she thinks the cause of  "the problem" is assumed to be men. no, the cause is mixing up itself, they aren't worried about women being raped by men or things like that, it's not about where mens focus is at all , just women and men mixing up and cheering a team, singing and laughing  is  "the immoral act". morality police cracks down parties and weddings all the time, it's not them being worried about safety of  damsels in distresses. 
I favor organizational dividers. It's at least a way to separate the important stuff (keys wallet phone) from the Stuff
I pointed out the theme of the sub because I'm honestly sick and tired of men being downvoted for simply saying, "as a man" etc. If a guy comes in and says this simply to demonstrate his opinion is superior or more warranted then fine I understand, but in general, being that this is a womens sub there literally should be no other reason to find fault with a guy pointing out who he is, since like i mentioned its dominated by women as it should be. Its no different then if a woman came in a mens sub stating "as a woman i agree/disagree". Downvote people for content, not because hes pointing out his sex which is pretty damn important considering the subs main theme and population is women, and well, hes not....  I'm not telling anyone how to feel about anything but I believe finding fault and brushing off every guy stating his sex before his opinion is nonsensical.
&gt;No lawyer wants to represent a child rapist, especially when the attorney knows their client is guilty. I think most lawyers with a backbone will turn down those cases.  Again, what do you propose we do with all the accused rapists out there, then? Even child rapists need lawyers. That is the difficulty, here. I'm not saying 'yay' in regards to this case, I'm saying that people are painting it as truly horrible and saying she should have turned it down and neglecting to realise that *even fill-in-the-blank criminals* need lawyers.   &gt;Realize Hilary is asked about her legal experience and this is the story she chooses. She chooses it because it makes her look like a great attorney...  Maybe that's where you and I differ in how we approach this, because I don't think she was saying at all "oh, here's a time I was a great lawyer". I don't think that's what she was saying at all, because in the tape what she *actually* says is "I had some really tough clients".   I don't think she was telling this story to gloat over getting a child rapist a lighter sentence, I think she was telling this story to show how truly difficult being a defense lawyer can be at times. I think she laughed over the fact that he passed the polygraph because in her eyes that showed how useless they are, and I think she laughed over the man 'preventing a miscarriage of justice' because in her eyes, her client was guilty. But he needed a defense lawyer and someone needed to do the job of defending him and so she did it. She had two years under her belt at that time and I doubt that it would have looked good for her or her career if she had turned the client down or half-assed it.  The situation is undeniably screwed up and you're right, it was hellish for that girl. I just don't think it's something that Hilary was proud of or something that she enjoyed doing. 
I've been a member of 2X for a lot longer than the past couple weeks.  Just because it's about women doesn't mean that you can't talk about men, or that you should be able to shit all over them and say "Hey, that's *derailing*" when you're called out.  If you want to talk about men, that's fine, but don't be a hypocrite about it.
Yikes... yeah, maybe it's not so bad!
We should consider ourselves lucky! I will consult with my male colleagues to see if they are experiencing the same issues :)
[deleted]
Order them ON amazon and they will show up in boring looking amazon boxes!  Source: have ordered sex toys on amazon. No regrets
Yes, and if OP said something like the original commentator suggested to someone outside of the context of twoX she'd be met with a similar response.
Does he play Wii games? Kirby's Epic Yarn. I played this with my SO. Being a gamer myself, it's freaking adorable but also REALLY fun and well designed which he'd probably appreciate.   Co-op games can be good too, because then it doesn't matter how good you are, you're on the same team. Games like Supreme Commander or Dawn of War. The rounds are pretty short too so you wouldn't be spending heaps of time on it. Or Portal co-op - it's a puzzle game at heart, and you have to physically talk to the other person in order to solve the puzzles together. Have fun :)
I have considered it in the past but decided not to, mostly because I'm  afraid of surgeries. However, I'll tell you my mom's story not to freak you out, but just to give you one perspective.   My mom did go under the knife years ago (If I were to guess I'd say maybe 20 years? But I don't know exactly) and they look very natural, not fake at all. However, she did have complications last summer when the implants started leaking into her body. I don't know what they were made of, sorry. She had to undergo surgery to correct it and then couldn't lay flat for a week, was in a lot of pain, couldn't lift anything, etc. all over again.   Keep in mind she initially got surgery 20-something years ago and like others have said, implants have come a long way since then. From my perspective, her experience was mostly positive and if I weren't such a scardey cat I'd very likely have it done too.
Why not both?
Because cheating is wrong and a 'semi-clingy' boyfriend is never going to agree to an open relationship?
Ok, thanks for your input. I will keep quiet unless she brings it up in which case I'll be supportive of course.
So?  Judging people based on their opinions is not a bad thing.
Heh, guy here but I hope it helps. My GF used an epilator, but recently switched to waxing and it works wonders. ( I sometimes help her to remove an ingrown hair, als her skin is very pale and every spot is seen as in big red dot, especially around her "hooh-hah". ) It gets better and better, a week ago was her 7th? waxing and the problem with ingrown hair is almost gone and the hair went extremely tin. She uses "pfb Vanish" and says that it helps allot.   A tip I can give as a guy. Try to heat up your razor/epilator blades/metal thingies in hot water, it helps. Braun has got epilators with a combined razor, they are pretty cool.
If my father had done this to my older sister, he would probably be dead and I would be in jail.  I'm glad my dad is a good man.
I am an Australian and I love the Irwin family, they have done great work for the environmental future of Australia. I worry that Bindi is going to get Jayden Smith'd a little bit - she is becoming increasingly outspoken (which is AWESOME) but at that age it is incredibly difficult to develop a reasoned opinion. We all change a lot in the decade between 15 to 25 and everything that Bindi says is going on record. She is going to develop detractors before she fully understands the world and the consequences of her actions.   Thank god no one has access to my social and political opinions at that age! I worry that Bindi won't have that luxury. 
The prime shipping gets me every time.
[deleted]
[deleted]
&gt; "as a woman i agree/disagree"  Just say "I agree/disagree." What does being a woman have to do with it? If what you are saying is true and relevant, then how does your gender help?  Here's another one:  "I think women with shaved legs are more attractive, but I wouldn't blame her for not shaving."  Why would it matter if the speaker were a man? Does being a man make it more true? Do women care what men think more than women? If so, why aren't they posting in /r/askmen or something?
[deleted]
OP was out on the river with her dog and left the purse in the car while she was away.
That's like saying upvoting pictures in /r/aww is objectification of animals.  They have personalities and emotions too, you know.  And, they have even been known to accomplish amazing things!  The point is we find animals cute.  Cute enough to idolize that cuteness, that aesthetic quality that has nothing to do with who the animals are.  I don't think it's fair to say they are just animals, because if they are just animals why do we keep them as pets instead of livestock?  Is it just the aesthetics?  Men find the attractive female form beautiful.  You are ignoring a huge part of the worlds philosophy and religion by suggesting that men expressing their attraction to women by up voting pictures is representative of the objectification of women.  The bonding of a man and a woman to create a child is one of the most amazing of human experiences.  Attraction itself could be considered a religious experience.  Choosing to express that amazing experience in art is not wrong or an immoral thing to do.  Finding a form attractive and objectifying it are two completely different things.  Are you going to tell me that the man who sculpted [Aphrodite](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Aphrodite_of_Cnidus) was only objectifying women?  How about the man who sculpted [David](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/David_%28Michelangelo%29)?  While objectification lies in ignoring something's agency to view or treat them as an object, simply admiring beauty is not necessarily objectification.
I'm sorry this is happening to you. I didn't really start shaving my legs until college, so all through high school I was natural/hairy. Douchebags in my school would make comments about it, but I realize now how lucky I am that my family was supportive.   Anyway, some good advice here already. If these comments are bothersome to you, the best thing to do is not really engage people when they start talking about it. Or if it is your mom and dad, and they keep bringing it up time and time again, you can calmly tell them that it is really hurtful to you to have them keep talking about this and that you would prefer not to talk about it anymore. 
[deleted]
It's pretty normal for a girl's first periods to be very sporadic. My first lasted two weeks (!) and didn't come back for 6 months.  (And as for the trolls, please downvote and report, don't engage.)
Meh.  "Boys will be boys." is an incredibly lame excuse, IMO.  This sort of thing is just incredibly immature and disrespectful to the women who use this site.  It's gross and inconsiderate, and, as men and human beings, we should expect better of ourselves and each other.  If this is a male dominated space then that's all the more reason to take responsibility for making it inclusive.
I rarely shave (my mom was so excited that I shaved for my wedding day), for a long time my friends thought it was some sort of feminist statement. It's not. I just don't care. My skin gets really irritated when I shave so I might do it once every few weeks (I've gone months before).   My husband doesn't really mind, he jokes as long as my legs don't look like his he's okay (I once got self conscious and asked how he felt).  My mother says people will notice but who cares? Those people don't have to deal with my irritated skin.   I wish I could just tell you if people say anything just ignore them but I know that's easier said than done. At the end of the day, you should do what makes you comfortable. 
Same here! My skin gets dry, itchy and irritated if I shave them. So my only real options are to go natural or wax them. My boyfriend actually prefers that I don't shave my legs, because they stay smooth (quite lucky to have light colored, fine hair) and I'm happy because I'm not uncomfortable. 
-shrug- some people dig it, to each their own. I'm not about to look down on anyone's personal preference. But other facial hair options exist. Chinstrap is one of several options 
Hahaha okay
If the glove doesn't fit, you gotta acquit? Thanks for the laugh, but I do prefer to resolve this so that everyone's happy, and you know, not dead. 
That is definitely part of it. I suggest this book http://www.amazon.com/gp/aw/d/0520207025?pc_redir=1403132095&amp;robot_redir=1  (Sorry on mobile) for further reading on the usefulness of "oppression" in managing people, even when the oppressors seem to be protective and looking out for best interests. 
That's exactly right, even if they were to overhear and bring it up to our single parent friends or my mother I know they would be deeply hurt. He admits that his views are "old fashioned" so I will also bring up to him that even if I don't change his mind would he be against raising the children with my views.
Not acknowledging his stupidity or bother looking at at him is probably the best thing to do...verbally  abusing him or yelling at him just lets him know he has your attention, from there get could possibly turn it around and try to play it cool and make it seem like he isn't such a pig. I've seen it happen to plenty of young girls these days, and they always Fall for it.  Honestly you don't want to give anyone the time of day that will holler and whistle and anything that walks. The men who cat call need to realize that shit will not work for every woman. Those women who respect themselves and want to find a real man, should not acknowledge this type of behavior.
Oh wow, maybe it's like others are saying then; he feels threatened by the idea of a 'family', his family, continuing without him. Maybe he'd better understand the flip side of the situation. What if, God forbid, something happened to you; does he believe he and your kids stop being a family?  
I was responding to this.  &gt;  in a male-dominated environment, you're going to often encounter things of male interest with little or no sensibility.  Implying that, because there's mostly guys here, this sort of behavior simply comes with the territory.  We should ask and expect more of men.
I'm also considering getting breast implants within the next couple of years and I love all of these positive stories. They're making me feel way more at ease with everything. I want them to look and feel natural, obviously! That's what I'm so worried about. How do I even start looking for the right surgeon? This is so stressful.
Hiking is probably not the way to go on a first date. I think it would be perfectly acceptable to call him and either say straight up you're not comfortable going hiking alone, or if you'd rather tell a white lie, say you had something come up and you can't devote the time to hike, but maybe coffee would work? And definitely tell friends where you're going and when you plan to be back if you do decide to go, complete with phone calls to check in during. I actually agreed to meet a guy I met via a mutual friend at an archery range off the highway, way away from any civilization *facepalm* I went through with it and it went fine, but it's better to be safe than sorry sometimes. 
First of all, let me say how sorry I am that you are having such a terrible time.  Having been pregnant and not wanting to be, I know how it feels.    You do sound depressed, and as I have read further down, you do express that depression has been an issue in the past for you.  Apparently you were never on any medication that was effective for you, which is very sad, because there are meds that work well, and your doctors should have found the right one.  I too have depression, and though it took years for me to find the right one (I am much older than you are and such drugs were not available until the recent past), they are now.  You should speak to your doctor sooner rather than later.  You do have options with this pregnancy, but I urge you to get counseling before you make any choices.  Counseling is the first step to making a rational choice.  It has also been shown to be as effective as any medication as far as chemical changes in the brain.  As your doctor for a referral, or check with your county mental health association (I can guide you if you need assistance).  I work for such an organization in my county, and we provide free and reduced services to those who have limited or no income.  At one point, I had no job and turned to the very agency for which I now work.    I was in your shoes -- pregnant, and with a partner I didn't love.  I went through my options and was considering open adoption when I miscarried.  But I now know how trapped women can feel, and I want you to take a deep breath and consider the fact that this might be your only chance to have a child.  I know that sounds harsh, but my pregnancy was my one chance.  I never got another.    Please do consider counseling before you make any decisions, and know that many of us women would be supportive no matter what you decide.  Your life, your choice.  (((hugs)))
Thank you for the feedback! Thankfully he was on the third floor balcony and I was parked close to the entrance, plus the place was packed so I doubt anything would have happened. I didn't feel threatened necessarily, just a bit flustered at the whole thing. I probably would have felt more in-danger if he were across the street or something closer.
Who ever said anything about my boyfriend's standards? The guy mentioned in the original post is a good friend that happens to be a guy.   I *wish* my boyfriend would grow a beard, but if his itchy stubble makes him uncomfortable, I'm not going to complain if he shaves. And he doesn't care if I shave my legs or not. 
[deleted]
There is an engineering design principal called 'fail fast'. It's best to test your ideas early and aggressively so if there are issues, they get exposed quickly. Having learned these lessons, it should be easier to avoid them in the future; at least you have that going for you. Some people look at their spouse in middle age and realize they don't like them very much.
How do they feel? Sorry if that sounds creepy, I'm just really interested in getting them. I'm a big 34B/small 34C right now and I would like to be a DD. I don't want them to feel weird. I'm definitely going to get fat transfer but I don't know if that will get big enough. 
I can't get over him cheating on me with an escort.  I just can't.
Huh. That's pretty cool! Hehe menstruation, huh? 
Well we are hoping to cover "home building" and stuff like that. I have had a few subscribers tell me that they want to learn how to host a dinner party. One thread already there is about books on being a better wife. I started this as a healthier alternative to RPW since there has been a recent influx of women coming to TBP from RPW who have expressed an interest in a similar subreddit that doesn't promote toxic ideals.
It's just another chapter in your life book. Breakups always hurt, no matter how long you've been together or the reason for ending it. You will be okay. Just think of your cats :) they will be so happy to see you.
The only thing you can really do is make sure she knows you are there to support her no matter what decisions she makes, good or bad, but also make sure your opinion is heard. You can always add "do what you feel like you should do, but I definitely think..." You want to make sure she gets another point of view but always ensure lines of communication are completely open. Even if you disagree.  Sometimes people just have to make there own mistakes and deal with them in their own time. I've had situations where my friend headed my advice, and some where they disagreed until they were finally crushed under the circumstances. In that case it was good they we were able to be close even though we disagreed so she came to me immediately when things came crashing down. To be fair I also had a friend who dated a guy that we both just knew to be a terrible human being before they started dating. She tried to convince me that he changed, which I didn't believe and 2 years later they seem to be going strong.  For your case specifically, it might help to go the route of pointing out that if she really cares about him, she'll want to push him to change some of these bad habits as well.
[deleted]
[deleted]
The fact that someone may want plastic surgery doesn't mean they have horrible self esteem issues. Sure, sometimes it can, but sometimes people just don't like a certain feature. They don't have horrible issues with it, they just don't like it. And if they're aware of the risks and understand the procedure and what it entails, why not let them get something done? I think it's superficial to judge someone based on what they do to their appearance. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
What's weird is that you've reduced men (i.e. complex human beings) down to essentially two dimensions: (presumably physical) attractiveness and financial success.  There are lots of other traits that men may possess and women may find attractive: integrity, kindness, generosity, intelligence, open-mindedness, tolerance.. I could go on forever, because humans are rich in their complexity.  We are multi-dimensional beings.  Just as men are diverse in their attributes, women are diverse in what they look for in a potential partner.  And thank goodness, because a complex world of human diversity is so much more interesting than one populated primarily with gold-digging women and superficial men!
[deleted]
oops, I linked the wrong one! /r/oney is the one I've seen mentioned here before. I'm not sure about the gender makeup of the subscribers but I know they discuss men's issues. Sorry for the confusion!
[deleted]
It's not promoting it at all. It's just a place where women with typical maternal interests can go and hang, and not have to be in an environment with dozens of negative posts. It's a valid choice to be maternal, and to deny them that right is downright oppressive. 
I usually do exactly what you did,  they aren't worth my time. 
I never subscribed, they just appear on the front page in my feed?
[deleted]
OHMYGOOB. Stop.  You keep saying the same damn thing.  I'm going by what he stated, not assuming he meant something he didn't say. Youre not responding to what was said. Youre responding to what you think he meant to say.  Its obvious in all of your "clarifying posts".  Youre going by the fact that you want to talk about the "boys will be boys" issue when he didn't even bring it up.  I'm putting my phone on vibrate.  This is the type of thing that makes me (for a split second) want to steer clear of any equality movement.  Then I realize that you, thankfully, are not the leader or the voice of any of them.
[deleted]
[deleted]
The way I understand it, harassment is unwanted attention that is persistent, invasive, violent and/or degrading. There's a lot of room for different types and degrees of harassment. Someone politely flirting but refusing to stop after clear rejection- that's harassment. Somebody flirting only once, but in an inappropriate, sexually explicit manner- that's harassment. Random ass-grabbing is harassment. Someone saying and doing nothing but following you home and watching you- that's harassment. And yes, unasked for comments made about people's bodies are harassment. None of those things are equal in degree of danger or emotional upset, but they can all be defined under the same broad type of behaviour.
Try these. They're in our sidebar:  /r/feminism and /r/feminisms
[deleted]
Let the haters hate. Your life is your own. I would have a baby without getting married no worries.
That's what she's saying. Fuzzy legs bad? He can pack it up if she doesn't wanna shave.   People, including you and me, are shallow. Just about many different things.
[deleted]
So many people have made a lot of great comments in this thread. I hope you find what works for you.
Keep in mind that a lot of men don't like breast implants. Attractive guys have standards and have several girls to choose from. Why would he settle for a girl with breast implants when he could get a girl with real big breast? You will end up with ugly guys who cant do any better or a guy with a breast implant fetish.
[deleted]
I'm the same way with my boyfriend. He shaved his beard out of the blue one day. Eventually he told me it was because an older lady at his job told him that all women hate beards and I was lying to him so I wouldn't hurt his feelings. We talked about it. The beard is back! I'm glad I found someone who understands. Haha.   My boyfriend likes to make comments about things like this on Reddit that I tell him about. I think he does it to try and fit in with the assholes that surround him. In reality he shaves his armpits, prefers being the little spoon, and cries every time the animal abuse commercials come on. I have a feeling it's the same with most guys.  I don't think too many people will say anything rude to you. 
That's a very mature attitude. As part of an ethnic minority, I am always slightly more self-conscious about how I am perceived by strangers. All people have an innate cognitive bias towards outgroup homogenization, so I always feel a little pressure to not create or reinforce any negative prejudices that others of my race will have to work against.  Thank you for trying to prevent others from making dubious generalizations about minorities.
The main thread is about the front page. r/pics is part of the default front page. It's all part of the same question. Although if you'd like me to ignore the main thread topic and focus solely on the r/pics sub topic I can do that, it doesn't really change anything.  In short, what belongs on r/pics is whatever the r/pics mods and community choose to allow there. If you don't like what is on r/pics then create a custom list and view one of the subreddits that agree with what you want to see. Or you can post to r/pics and ask them to start censoring these types of images.
Lol no im from cali just joking with ya.
In general, a woman should book a gynecologist appointment as soon as she starts a period. So yeah, your kid can always benefit from a health check up. Do 't ask the internet regarding health. 
Yea seriously,  you didn't do anything wrong in this situation. He's an ass and I'm from Chicago too, If you ever want to have him know what it's like to have someone bigger than him yelling in his face about nothing,  you just pm me his name and whereabouts 
Okay, just because I'd at least like for us to come away from this understanding each other.  My thinking is that we are having a conversation about how X is a problem.  There is a common idea (which I reject) about how members of group A really like X and can't really be blamed because that's just how A's are.  So someone mentions "Well, you know, there are a lot of A's around.  That's why you're getting all this X."  Of course, no one was really talking about *why* there was so much X (it's common knowledge that there are many A's around), so I'm thinking "Why bring this up unless you mean to suggest that the 'problem' is not so much a problem as it is an unavoidable consequence of having A's around?" (per the aforementioned commonly held idea about A's)  You're thinking is that the commonly held idea about A's is irrelevant unless someone explicitly invokes it, and, although it's kind of odd and unnecessary for someone to point out the obvious that X is prevalent because many A's are around, we shouldn't worry about that.  Who knows why they felt the need to bring that up?  Does this all seem about right to you?
Yeah and the smell sometimes never really comes out. 
Sorry about that - it was all very neatly formatted when I typed it up, but when I hit post my device ate the spaces.
No relationship, I'm done. I'm currently living in this god forsaken house. He ran away and is currently living at his parents cabin up north about 5 hours away. 
Because my husband is my best friend.   He's the only person that I can act like a four year old with (he literally spent 20 minutes yesterday repeating everything I said, which ended in a tickle fight), but who also supports me no matter what, and can always make my day brighter. He comforts me when I'm sad, and celebrates with me when I'm happy. I can't imagine my life without him.   To be fair, we haven't been married even a year yet, so it's not like we've exceeded expectations or anything, but I feel like we're both in it for the long haul.
The amount of reaction shares by women on fb for things such as shoes and cute Animals all the time, not to mention sad stories, shows that it is a natural thing for both genders.  
The fact that you think you will not win the case through police but will win your case at the uni And that your so vague about the whole thing makes me think there's more wrong with your case and the uni than the police or the boy.
I've never been to the US, so things may be different there.  I've traveled frequently by train in southern Europe, and at the age of 15 I attracted the most unwanted attention. Sitting in the front train cars is excellent advice. What worked best for me was not smiling and putting on a slightly disgruntled but confident look on my face. People seem to be less inclined to approach you if you look grumpy.
You are in no way over reacting, she should not be dating him, any 16 year old thats willing to date a 12 year old is just looking for someone to manipulate. Do what you can to keep her from meeting him.
&gt; I would give anything to not be pregnant.  If you would truly give anything, then get an abortion.
I am liking Orphan black. Female leads, themes of body autonomy, medical decisions, consent, ownership, non straight relationships, sisterhood, motherhood, Some scenes could be triggering but they are always in the light of "no this is a bad thing and this person is terrible". Recently introduced a trans character and has POC characters.   I love it and Tatiana Maslany is a great actress. 
You are very welcome, good luck. :)
Because he makes me laugh.   Because he has all the enthusiasm of a child at times.   Because I love nothing more than waking on a weekend and snuggling into him to go to sleep.    
Don't forget to hit report on stuff that breaks rules in the subreddits you like too :)
You do what you want with your legs!   And as a bit of advice I usually don't go to parents for advice on how to look. They don't tend to understand the reasons for someone doing something and tend to fallback on bad gender stereotypes. At least in my experience in a very traditional town.
You're on fire. Thanks. You're really smart and you have no idea how much I appreciate your help. 
I'm not married yet but i wish someday my wife will talk about me in words like this without my presence. 
I was just thinking that my parents would hate it too, but there comes a time when no one else is left. My parents are in their 60s, my inlaws in their 70s and it's been on my mind a lot lately about how we are going to share the burden of caring for them amongst us equally while we ourselves are dealing with small children, careers etc.   It's one of the unfortunate truths about old age that very few choices are left to us in life, and those are mostly unpleasant - and that between sitting in your own excrement or having somebody else wipe your bum is surely one of the worst. But if a little old lady has been doing it alone for 2 years, and now is carrying a significant injury, that's sadly not going to be sustainable for much longer, regardless of anyone's wishes or dignity. Old age is no respecter of either. 
Np! You just paid me back anyway. The internet is way more fun when it's about sharing smiles :-)  Congratulations, you have succesfully communicated online with a transgender woman, I'll let the girls know you're cool and call off any righteous indignation we had scheduled for you.  Dodged a bullet there, buddy! :-P  
[deleted]
Married for a week so I might not be qualified for this but I married him because he is my other half. My best friend. He raised my self esteem when it was at a really low point. I love him with all my heart and he makes me feel amazing and appreciated and beautiful (even when I nearly died of the flu earlier this year). He sticks behind me with all of my crazy ideas and loves me for it. 
You're making the assumption that shaving legs is just 'wipe it over with a razor once and you're done' which it may be like for yourself.   For others though, it is a chore. Some of us have thick, black hair that takes ages to shave and is then left with stubble that looks like tiny black dots everywhere. Some of us have ridiculously sensitive skin that results in painful ingrown hairs and razor burn. Some of us have back pains and are unable to bend far enough to shave our legs.  And that's just the legs. Then you have to deal with the more sensitive areas such as armpits, bikini line, the outer labia and unfortunately for some women, directly around the anus.   All of this combined with lots of factors such as what razor to use, what shaving cream doesn't give the women constant itching.   But it is an unfair expectation. Why do I have to shave my legs because I was born with a vagina? It's either shave your legs or be considered gross and unsanitary. All of these factors combined is what makes your comment so ignorant and frustrating. 
I wish German women wouldn't shave, than I wouldn't feel the pressure to shave that much. Though for some reason hairy (trimmed) armpits seem to be more acceptable than hairy legs. Tough luck for me, I like shaving my armpits, but I would really like to stop shaving my legs.
I don't know if you're giving Reddit a lot of credit and imagining these comments as 25+ year old males or such but they're obviously coming from 13 year old adolescents who believe they're in "their space". This is obviously  the result of poor education and not the cause.   &gt;Keep it to yourself.  Anonymity does this, unfortunately :/
Haha, I guess I haven't had a case of the flu that serious then, good for me :)  In any case, if you are unwell enough that:  &gt; I couldn't remember how to tie my shoes - I had difficulty doing something as automatic as focusing my eyes to read the text on signs.  You probably aren't about to accept many challenges to a chess match.  I would still be putting my money on the world champion though (against a beginner).
I think this has become pretty socially acceptable to have babies without being married.   If you have a child now, you can make sure they don't feel like they were accidents by telling them you wanted kids so badly that you couldn't wait till you could afford a big wedding, or that you wanted them to be able to come to the wedding. (Not that I think it's a bad thing to have been a unplanned, all but one out of me and my siblings were happy accidents).  That being said, you're only 25, so you could safely wait a few years to start your family. Either choice is fine. You just have to decide what you want most, and by default what you're willing to sacrifice - either you wait for the wedding, wait for the kids, or sacrifice the big wedding. What can you live with?
[deleted]
My parents only really got married once my mum was pregnant with me and even then the wedding took place when I was a few months old (technically a bastard, woo). It was kind of a 'well, we might as well do it' thing.  I don't think there's a right way to do it anymore. Families can be just as happy without marriage, or heterosexual couples or single parent units/adoptive kids- what have you.   I know that legally the rights you get can differ if you're not married so that would be my only concern really.
i'm starting to think many redditors borrow tiny kittens from friends then claim they rescued them so they'll get karma.
[deleted]
&gt;Because seeing the pretty girl naked is obviously more intriguing than the underwater welding she is pictured doing  I reckon seeing a pretty girl naked *is* more interesting than looking at some underwater welding..
I use [this one](http://www.amazon.com/dp/B00742JW8S/ref=pe_385040_30332190_TE_M3T1_ST1_dp_1) but it was much cheaper when I bought it.    Don't worry about the fancy features like a light or a skin massager or ability to use it in the shower or anything.  A basic one works just fine. 
This is AWESOME. Barring one, there's quite a lot of them that I've never heard, so this is a really pleasant surprise. For those who don't want to go to huffpost, you could go directly to [the website](http://www.rejectedprincesses.com/). I think it's a cool concept with equally cool (if sometimes problematic and with some unneeded flair) artwork and stories. Here's one of them, [Hatshepshut](http://37.media.tumblr.com/7e453374abd51e82dd57e0a3f4ddab63/tumblr_n7dnf296kJ1ry5q8mo1_r1_1280.jpg) with some snippets from the site : &gt;  &gt; This princess definitely falls under “too awesome”: Hatshepsut, arguably the greatest pharaoh in history. Forget Cleopatra, King Tut, or Nefertiti — Hatshepsut was the jam.  &gt;  &gt; You’d be forgiven for not knowing about her, though. Thanks to a sustained campaign by her successors to erase all traces of her reign, it was not until fairly recently that she came back to historical prominence. She was re-discovered due to the fact that her time in power saw such an incredible proliferation of architecture, statues, and art that it proved impossible to scrub mention of her from *everything*. So much of her work has survived to present day that almost every major museum in the world has at least one piece from her. The New York MoMa has an entire room devoted to her. &gt;  &gt; All this, despite the fact that she ruled for less than twenty-two years, fifteen hundred years before the birth of Jesus. &gt;  &gt; In fact, speaking of Jesus — you know the myrrh that the wise men brought to his birth? Almost certainly due to Hatshepsut importing it 1500 years earlier, in the first recorded attempt to transplant foreign trees. &gt;  &gt; Moreover, she did her own PR. In order to solidify her claim to the throne, she spread word that her parents were told by the gods that she was to be pharaoh. The official story was that, at the gods’ behest, her mother gave birth to her in a LION’S DEN. To quiet the gossip at court, she began her rule wearing men’s clothing, including the pharaoh’s false beard. Once they stopped flapping their gums, she went back to wearing whatever the hell she wanted.  edit : changed princess
The fact is that you really don't understand.   Your partner thinks a certain way and has expectations of you that he outlined explicitly. He told you not to go to a meeting and you did. He has no obligation to stay with you or explain himself, just like you have no obligation to explain going to the meeting.  The fact is that he outlined something he didn't want you to do and you did it anyway. He is probably a controlling asshole, but you brought the situation upon yourself when given a choice. If that's the kind of behavior you don't want in the relationship, talk to him about changing or leave, but don't complain to an online message board about people getting upset when you do things they tell you not to do.  TLDR  You are not obligated to meet a demand like that He is not obligated to stay with you if you fail to meet the demand
http://www.scientificamerican.com/article/birth-control-pills-affect-womens-taste/  http://www.huffingtonpost.com/2013/04/01/birth-control-attraction_n_2981391.html  You're normal.  Hormones (or lack thereof) will change what signals you consider attractive.  
Not really. Except maybe Sarah Silverman because she wants it that way.
[deleted]
I WISH. This is marvelous.
Dumb.
Geez, everyones is so sappy. Married for 2 years. I've been told the first few years are the hardest, sure hope that's true. Sometimes I want to punch him, sometimes not :P Your SO will figure out how to push your buttons, and push them. I won't sit here and lie and say marriage is easy all the time - you're going to argue, you're going to fight, it happens. On the flip side he's dependable, takes care of all of the housework, cooks, takes care of our daughter, changes diapers etc. He gave me an insulin shot daily while I was pregnant and made sure I always took my prenatal pills. We get each others jokes. I wouldn't want to start over with anyone else. 
We are discussing traditional femininity in an atmosphere that encourages everyone to join. We are preventing political discussions so everyone feels welcome and so we don't have RPW like beliefs advertised there.  If you look at the sub, a lot of us are feminists. Including myself.
I read a great story on FML once. It was a woman who wanted to freshen up down there and grabbed the deodorant in her bathroom quickly after her shower. The she went to the gyno and he said "you made yourself pretty /wink". And she thought it was weird until she went home and saw that she's grabbed her glitter hairspray instead.
[deleted]
Approaching our ninth wedding anniversary in just a little over a week, and we've bene together for nearly 15 years altogether.    Simply put, I'm still married to her because she's an amazing woman.  She's strong, is equal parts loving and affectionate yet independant, she's a terrific mother, I know I never have to worry about being judged by her... etc.  We just work.  I can't imagine a time for us where it WON'T work.  We disagree about things, and we had a period of time where we were on each other's nerves, but that was caused by a lot of personal problems we both had... and we helped each other past that point.    Love this woman forever :)
Married for 2 years...we went camping near the beach this weekend.  He woke me up at 5:00 so that we could walk to the beach and watch the sunrise.
I love threads like this! Just for a thought experiment, can we come up with a reason that is selfless? Basically a reason that doesn't revolve around what your spouse dies for you?  My wife and I have been together since high school, together for 10, married for 6. I've lived getting to grow with her, and I live to make her find joy in our life together. 
I would highly recommend a cup, I've had mine just over a year now and I've never thought about going back to tampons. Easy to use, very convenient, comfortable, and exercising with one in is no issue.   I think there are a lot of different brands of cup depending on where you live. The brand you are ordering from will usually have all the info you need to know about what size you need so just read around on their website. 
You may be right, I'm not sure if I'm ready to admit defeat quite yet though haha. 
Depends, in a BDSM context submissives really hold all the power since they choose to give it up in a sexual context. Many sexual submissives are not at all submissive outside the bedroom. 
Depends on the anti depressant, and not all anti depressants work for all people.  It's possible that the medication needed to control OP's particular form of depression is also a medication that is counterindicated with pregnancy.
Quite common actually, often the doctor will propose it as an option during the consenting process, the staff in the doctor's office don't decide all this, they may be asked to participate in consenting. I worked on a med-surg/ob wing at the start of my career, we weren't "suggesting" sterilization,it was just common practice especially after a second or third c section, many women still find tubal ligation to be a reasonable BC option. 
No is the short answer.   The longer answer is:  Not yet, so far I have only seen my mum care for her parents with dementia, who died whilst I was in school/college. I remember bits of that very clearly - helping clean up the fecal incontinence, seeing the bedsores eating away at a frail body, the wanting to "go home" to a house that's been demolished 80 years, the temper tantrums and wild accusations, the loss of speech and the occasional heartrending wailing of a lost and frightened child trapped in my grandmother's body. Fuck. I hate remembering that and it's over a decade ago.  But there is only one alternative to getting old... I do have both parents and both parents in law, still thankfully in good health, but whose care will eventually fall to us and our siblings.  I don't anticipate it will be fun. In fact I anticipate it will be gruelling, mentally and occasionally physically.  But it's not something I would like to let my elderly mother do alone for years. It is a shit deal, no matter who does it, but I am younger and stronger and more able to deal with phone calls and hospital appointments than they are.  Sadly right now I see my inlaws getting more frail each visit, and I think we will be holding that particular family meeting in the next five years. 
Just say no. I have been through all my friends getting married, many of them more than once, and I only agree to be in the wedding party when I can afford it.   Yes, weddings are completely out of hand, but some people really want a big to do. Some families want a huge production. To me that is wasteful and ridiculous, but they are more than welcome to do what they please. It is their marriage, debt, and family. I just take care of myself by saying no when it isn't financially viable for me. 
Yes it will, keeping your mortgage in line with rent will keep you on a decent path, and your mortgage payment won't rise with inflation so you should start earning more over time than you need to be paying.  Keep in mind property taxes depending on where you live for a modest home they can be 2,000-5,000 a year.  As well as factoring in closing costs into your calculations too, they can be upwards of an extra 10K+ depending on what the home may or may not need out of the gate and again where you are buying the home.   As a note make sure that after your down payment you want 6 months mortgage car payments bills and food money set aside, you don't want to lose your home or raid your retirement accounts to make due if catastrophe strikes.  Remember sometimes life falls down like a row of dominoes on bad thing after another, you'll never know when your SO may get into a serious accident and can't work and you get laid off the very next week, I don't wish this on you but plan for the worst.
&gt; I'm not ok with aborting a child at 8.5 months  26 weeks is not 8.5 months.   24 weeks is considered "viable", meaning the baby has a slightly better chance of surviving outside the womb ([approx. 50%](http://umm.edu/health/medical/pregnancy/labor-and-delivery/what-happens-if-my-baby-is-born-prematurely)), but not without significant medical intervention and long-term care in a NICU.
I am so, so sorry you are suffering through this.  I think you need to talk to your doctor and a counselor or therapist and see what your options are.  It does not seem like it is the right idea for you to raise this child, and being in a relationship because you feel as though there is no other option will never end well. Especially when it's someone that "talked you" into keeping a pregnancy.  Is adoption an option? That might be something to consider. You are young and it is not fair to you or the baby if you don't want to raise it.  Personally, I am terrified of being pregnant (I was, once before for a short time) and I am married and do want kids relatively soon, so I can't even imagine how you must feel.
I didn't say that at all. I said late thirties and forties. I really wish you would have read my post before attacking me.   You allusion that I'm not a woman because I've had sexual reassignment surgery is absolutely insulting and ridiculous. There is so much more to womanhood than reproduction, and if you weren't blinded by cisgender privilege as well you would probably be more aware, but I look at it from a rational standpoint.
I've been having them for a around a year, and they started half a year or so after the abuse stopped, when I had a non-sexual traumatic experience that started off my anxiety/PTSD and started seeing my now-boyfriend. But, like I said, I don't have them all the time; a month could go by in which I seem fine, but then I'll watch a disturbing movie or try something new in bed or just get too stressed out by other things.   I had only just begun seeing my boyfriend when I told him. I knew my anxiety would get in the way of things, and I wanted to give him the option to back out and let him know that me seeming unsure and occasionally acting strangely wasn't about him, and that I really did want to be with him. He let me know that he was more than willing to stick with me, and he's held me through many panic attacks since then.   I still struggled with the fear of overburdening him. We ended up breaking up while I studied abroad--something I decided before we started dating--and when we decided to get back together, I knew he'd had the chance to think it through, and knew even better what he was getting into. Since then, I've trusted that he has made and keeps making the right decision for him. I still ask too much of him sometimes, but either he or I will bring it up, and I'll figure out something else. As an example, I had a rough experience a few weeks ago that sent me into an anxiety tailspin. After leaning just on him for a couple of weeks, he said it was getting to be more than he could manage, so I talked with my mother and one of my other friends, and I've been trying to let them into more of my anxious moments instead.  My point here: it's totally possible to build a healthy relationship even given your difficulties, it's just challenging. 
As someone who was raised in a very patriarchal society, here's my advice.  Don't confront the guy. Avoid him if you can, but *definitely* go to the police and file a report. TRY to get a restraining order. Yeah, maybe the guy is all bark and no bite, BUT DO NOT TAKE THAT CHANCE, IT IS UNLIKELY. Someone with anger issues like that will use his cultural values to believe that whatever he does to you is justified.  If you are unwilling to go to the police, talk to your roommate. You have to tell your roommate that what her boyfriend is doing is NOT okay.
[deleted]
Is is possible that it's the lawyers who don't see their profession clearly?
[deleted]
IUDs are naturally more invasive.  In both types of IUD, there's a risk of infection, which if leading to PID (pelvic inflammatory disease), there's a risk of infertility. Infection risk can be minimised however.  IUDs can fall out. Copper IUDs make your period heavier, while progesterone IUDs can cause dryness. 
How long have you been off of the pill? Your hormonal profile is probably still adjusting and you should give that time. It took me about six months to feel normal after stopping birth control. In the meantime, why not do more "first date" type things with your boyfriend and see if that helps bring back the attraction.
My 8 year wedding anniversary is in two days, so this questions is really appropriate!  I'm still married because my husband makes my life better every single day in a thousand tiny ways.  He supports me in all my choices, helps me think through things in ways my brain wouldn't do, and is always kind to me.    I'm still married because I can't wait to see him be a father to our unborn daughter, and to see who she becomes with his influence.    I'm still married because he inspires me to be the best version of myself when I'm with him- to be kinder, more engaged, more intellectually curious, and more present.    I'm still married because the comfort of companionship is an amazing gift.    I'm still married because my husband is a goof who makes me giggle at LEAST once a day (usually more).  I'm still married because it's joyful.
Why am i still married?  because he is my friend, and enemy. He makes me see the world when i'm too scared to get on the plane. He takes me to the doctor when im sick and comforts me when im sad.  He pushes me to do the best i can, even when i want nothing more than to be lazy. He tells me a marriage is a job like any other. It takes work and commitment to make it great. We both push each other to do the right things even when its not the easiest.it is work to understand each other, but I want to be with him and he wants to be with me. We met in 2003, married in 2010 and we still want each other.  i honestly love that man.
Hahahahhaha I'll have to print this list so I remember what to strive for. Where can I get the hot wife? Is there a queue for that?
I've been married for exactly one day now. So far so good! :-)
They may be interpreting your "decline nicely" as mixed signals.  Make it clear that they're being awkward and you're not interested in them, then stop responding.
good luck girl!
Everyone here posting about abortion being option still an option are right.  I wanted both of my babies before I got pregnant with them. They were accidents, but in relationship where we were planning to have them soon.  During both pregnancies I felt depresses and suicidal (sometimes homicidal). If you are having thoughts of suicide you are NOT THINKING CLEARLY.   [Antenatal depression is a thing.](http://www.pandasfoundation.org.uk/help-and-information/pre-ante-and-postnatal-illnesses/pre-antenatal-depression.html)  I just urge you to see a doctor as soon as possible to work out what is best for you. But it would be a terrible idea to make a decision on terminating a pregnancy while already under that kind of emotional stress.   Even if you keep the pregnancy, there is plenty of time to work out what you want to do with it after it is born. Right now I am very concerned by the way *you* are feeling.
We are still married because she puts up with me.  Damn, I love her for that.
Yep. Adam &amp; Eve and Eden Fantasys both send their goods in unmarked boxes. I suppose if you were to pick up the package, read it, and google the return address you'd find out where the package came from. Liberator is pretty good too. I had some of their cubes delivered. I wasn't home so my neighbor took the package into her condo (she was on the HOA board and we knew her quite well so it wasn't so weird) and she likely didn't know anything despite the huge package.
Just so we're clear, this guy's "BEEP BOOP RELATIONSHIP CONTRACT ROBOT ANALYSIS" is trivially true, but also entirely worthless. You and your boyfriend aren't obligated to be together, of course, but by being an asshole to you over something trivial, your boyfriend is demonstrating that he's insecure and unreasonable, and the craigslist thing is incredibly petty and vengeful. 
This post made me feel hopeful that someday I will be able to be in the kind of relationship I have always wanted. :)
exactly! I think if my boyfriend did the mowing for me one week I'd be a bit disappointed that he took my fun away. lol
Well now I don't have to write mine out as your reasons are EXACTLY the same as mine. We're boring and it's awesome.  Our 20th anniversary is Wednesday and I can't wait to celebrate with him :)
[deleted]
[deleted]
Depends on which set of hormones is funky.  Start with your GP, who may run a thyroid check.  If it's your thyroid, you want an endocrinology referral.  If it's your androgens, you want an ob/gyn or a reproductive endocrinology referral.
A lot of men don't even realize how degrading and annoying catcalling is. The more women stand up to themselves and retort back instead of just ignoring it, the more they might realize it. And those who catcall because they objectify women, it seems all the more reason to verbally defend yourself. After all, objects can't speak up for themselves, but people can.
The primary reason is because of her hoarding issues.  We both grew up as children of hoarders, and while neither one of us is close to being a neat freak, I truly believed that we could work past the issues from our childhood.  Unfortunately, it didn't work out that way.    Time and time again she resisted the idea of keeping a clean house, while paying lip service to it.  She would even run to stop me from cleaning and throwing things out.  Even a visit from the local child welfare agency did little to change her behaviours.  In the end, I just couldn't deal with it anymore.  She did seek help in the form of a counselor and support group but that was of little consequence.  After several decades I just had to leave for my own sanity.
I understand where you are coming from, but doing nothing risks more.  She is 12 and he's 16 in another town. If a parent cannot prevent that then they have failed as human beings imo. I'm thinking a call to the 16 year old boys parents is most likely to get him to back off, as would be pinging his friends if that did not work.  The parents, if they know this is an issue, can also install key loggers to monitor their child to see what type of things they talk about. If its over the top it can be given to the police or used in court for a restraining order.  at 16 he is thinking about sex, and that is his intentions if he is calling her his gf imo. 
The same thing happens to us.  I'm glad I could offer a little solidarity and I'm happy to have read about your experience.
[deleted]
Yeah it sucks, but Reddit is what you make it.  I hate memes in all their forms, and so have filtered out advice animals and twoxmeme or whatever it is called these days,  I also dislike many other things, and again I've either unsubbed or filtered them out.  Start looking for smaller subs to subscribe to and staying away from /r/pics, your enjoyment should hopefully go up.
Quit with the pearl-clutching and internet judging.
It's okay to say no to being a bridesmaid. I was only a bridesmaid once, and said no to the shower/bachelorette because it was in another city (I was a student at the time, in school and didn't have money to blow on a trip like that).   It's also okay to *not have any bridesmaids* at your own wedding, as a way of making the wedding easier and less expensive for all your friends and guests. I did not have bridesmaids or any other "role" besides bride/groom when I got married.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Thanks!  That's a really romantic story.  We are definitely going to do it at some point, as we get older the balance of practicality shifts in the other direction.  For one thing, I want to make sure she gets all of the soc-sec benefits she is due if I go first.  
[deleted]
He's hilarious, witty, genuine, goofy, and brilliant. Being handsome doesn't hurt at all, either. Aside from being the best possible person for me, he makes me the best possible person I can be. He motivates me and supports me. He cares for me and about me. I'm very lucky.  We're married because we both realize how lucky we are and we both work hard at continuing to make each other happy.
Marrried 6 years. Anything I might be doing is drastically improved with my husbands presence; he just makes everything slightly better. 
Neither you nor your friends are wrong. Them pushing their opinions onto you is wrong. I'll even take it one step further and say that they don't seem like the greatest friends; friends should be supportive of your goals, not try to change your mind and make you feel bad.      
Agreed, she'll just become a doormat if she lets him get away with it.
Ultimately, I don't think there IS anything wrong with it.  I had problems with his lying about it, and he had problems with hating himself for it.  But it's really a pretty harmless kink in the greater scheme of things, and something I think we both could have dealt with if his anger hadn't gotten so out of hand that he became violent eventually.  
[deleted]
To the opposite side...I wish my MOH and bridesmaid would have said no. They fought me on every decision, didn't throw me a shower or bachelorette party (I suggested going for drinks...crazy huh) and wouldn't help me the day before with little things. They both work full time, got the weekend off, plus the friday before. The day of the wedding, they wouldn't help me get ready or anything. I got ready alone. I didn't ask for much. The only thing they paid for was their dresses, which were $100. The best part? They were my sisters.
Oh my goodness, me too!  I *love* the Curve ID jeans.  Only pair I've ever had that don't gap at the waist.
[deleted]
Same can be said of male adverts. They have unrealistically low body fat and unrealistically high lean muscle (given that amount of body fat).   They are also tend to be heavily photoshopped. 
Yeah, /askwomen don't like the relationship-type questions either if I remember correctly. /askwomen or r/relationships would probably be best. Thanks for pointing that out. IMO, guys should try r/oneY. They have a great community.
[deleted]
umm, troll?
A 9mm Smith and Wesson Shield is only $370ish. Consider it and some range lessons.  I have had some strange men on my property TWICE and all it has taken was a peek at my holster as I was speaking with them for them to leave. I prefer to let anyone who thinks of fucking with me know that I am not going down without a fight if they try to force their way in or are casing the place.   I also have a german shepherd that sounds very mean so that helps. 
He's trying to shift the blame and avoiding responsibility for his behavior to you - which is flat out ridiculous. You did what any reasonable adult could (confronting him, laid out your arguments, tried to find a resolution) and he refused to be mature and do the same. He seems to be very immature and kinda skeezy, which is not boyfriend material. I wouldn't trust him to have your back in a long-term relationship.  Your next actions are up to you. Some have suggested spreading awareness about his actions to your group of friends which has its merits - warning others about his groping is a good idea. But I would limit it to friends who understand it as a safety warning instead of taking it as gossip. If you're no longer interested in him, you can let him know that due to the previously stated reasons clearly so that he knows how and why he fucked up. You can also give him a fair warning that if you hear that he does the same thing to someone else, you will be letting the other girl know that he's done the same thing before.  Some have suggested legal action, which I can't give much advice on since I'm not experienced in this area. But there are plenty of threads in 2X which are informative. And I know this can be scary, but consider speaking to your family about this since they will be your core supporters if things get messy (legally or not), or if you just need support. That's what family is for.
Thanks for the help, but my question has already been answered in this thread!
Ah bummer, I'm in Boston! Maybe someday the stars will align, I'll get into that grad program I'm eyeing at Berkeley, and we'll have adventures!
Start today.
&gt; Anonymity does this, unfortunately :/  Sadly this. I like to reference Penny Arcade when it comes to the internet and some of the dumber things it seems to spawn from people: http://www.penny-arcade.com/comic/2004/03/19  Not that some people don't act like that in real life, but far more do so when they know there is no one in their immediate area to Gibs Smack them for being an idiot.
It was hidden under a seat but from now on if I'm going out and won't be able to take the purse with me, it's going to be left home. I don't need to learn this lesson twice, that's for sure. 
My boyfriend is not:  - ambitious - has no dreams - is considering going to college aged 30 (but won't look into courses until he gets a job) - working - cares about people enough to open a door, but will never spend money on anyone, not even on a date with me (he has worked in a restaurant and says food is overpriced and he doesn't care for restaurant/cafe ambience).  My boyfriend is:  - good at hugs?
Isn't that what alimony covers?
Traveling together is good. I don't recommend moving in together before you're married because that makes it harder to back out if things go wrong (I don't know about you but I haaaaaatttteeeeee looking for new places to live and moving), but the more hours you spend sleeping over and being real with each other (not on your best/date behavior), the more you'll know about how compatible you are. Daily logistics can be the death of a relationship. I recommend giving it a year or two. I should have known it wasn't going to work about 7-8 months in when we started living together, but by then dates were set and deposits were starting to be paid. There were other, dumb reasons too, but a lot of it was inertia. 
There are too many reasons to list why I am divorced, but here's a few reasons.   He physically and mentally abused me, he cheated on me numerous times including getting one girl pregnant while we were married.  When I left him to get some perspective on our marriage he moved one of the girls he was cheating on me with into our house.   Once when I was picking him up from work he had a male coworker come up to our car and throw five dollars at me and say that my ex had said that's how much it would cost to have sex with me.   Once in our house he had a bunch of his male coworkers over drinking, and  when they asked what I would do if they tried to rape me,  he laughed.   There are many more reasons,  but those are standouts.  What's worse is he tells people we were never married,  yet he and his family keep trying to request me as a Facebook friends, and keep messaging me asking why I don't want anything to do with them.   We've been divorced for six years and have no children together. I don't understand why they won't leave me alone.  
[deleted]
Nothing. But the option to be completely selfish just isn't there.
It's always good to not be a rapist, I recommend it for everybody!
Yep absolutely. I was just pointing out that all your examples you can do in a relationship too.
[deleted]
It made zero sense and added nothing to the point.
*shrugs* We can agree to disagree.   &gt; Where we are really differing on here, is that you feel that open sexuality is an oppressive thing. If you can understand that not all people think this way, you can see why people wouldn't take back an impulse upvote that doesn't give them a second thought.  Where did that come from? I don't have a problem with open sexuality, I'm bisexual and frequent a lot of subs where both men and women are posted. I have a problem with that content leaking into subs that aren't designed for pictures of pretty people. 
Since she isn't in the states I doubt they are carrying guns.  Even tho it would be crazy to pull a water gun on someone so I agree with you there.  She should just get some bear mace.
They aren't coming from /r/gonewild or /r/gentlemanboners.  So that doesn't really matter here.  My point is not that there should be testicles on the front page.  My point is that no one wants those pics of men on the front page, including you?  If so, the hypocrite is you for wanting those pics of women on the front page and not of those men.  Not people saying "why do they put so many up there"?  And yes, there are pics like that of women on the front page quite often.  There's some great sexy pics of women that DO belong on the front page.  But there are far more that don't belong there.  You say it's because there aren't enough women and gay/bi men on Reddit, that's not true.  So what is the truth then?  Edit:  And, just to try and be less confusing, IMHO this is not about keeping hot women off the front page, it's really a discussion about applying standards evenly and cultural norms.
r/datingadvice 
[deleted]
[deleted]
Canada actually does not have restrictions on abortions at a federal level, so it varies by clinic. 
Why is everyone on here putting words in Ops mouth?  No ones saying you can't find people attractive.  Admiring someone's beauty is not the same thing as reducing said person to a fuckable  object and thats what were discussing.  When you look at a person as nothing more than eye candy,  when you post shit like "no gone wild history guys"  or "10/10 would bang",  that's what pisses us off.  Surely you can see the difference.  Would you rather have someone tell you you have beautiful eyes or that they would bend you over the nearest object and stick you?  (I dont know if you're a guy or a girl so that may not be the best example)  but that's the difference.   I'm sure those athletes would rather be getting attention for their prowess than their assets,  some of the pictures I've seen on r/pics lately have been little more than creep shots.  If I were an actress or athlete,  or hell if I ever get famous for my art I wouldnt appreciate a picture of my ass going viral,  and who would?   There's nothing wrong with finding people attractive.  But focusing only on that or expressing your attraction in a way that is disrespectful or dehumanizing is problematic at best.   
Awwww that's great hun!! 19 is still young, I'm sure you'll get HEAPS more like that!
[deleted]
[deleted]
Cedar Barn? That peanut butter pie, mmmmm...
[deleted]
You can go through your insurance company (most have websites with lists of in-network providers) to look up a licensed psychologist or psychiatrist that way. You can also use a service like the [Psychologist Locator](http://locator.apa.org/) to look up psychologists in your area (you can sort by gender).    The main difference between a psychologist and a psychiatrist is that in most states, psychologists are more talk therapy focused and don't prescribe. If they determine you need an anti-depressant, they'd work with your PCP or a local psychiatrist to get you a script. Psychiatrists in my experience tend to jump straight to prescribing, which isn't always what people need.    Psychologist and psychiatrists are both doctoral level providers; there are also masters' level providers like social workers or licensed professional counselors (LPCs). Some are very good, but keep in mind they have much less education and training. 
So what does shallow mean to you?  Should I court ugly women and beautiful women equally?   Beautiful people give me joy by being beautiful. I should clearly value them somewhat higher than ugly women for that. It shouldn't be the *only* thing that I value, but it is certainly a rational aspect. 
My mom does most of the yard work. She likes it. It's never really been an issue. If she needed help, dad or we would help her.
Ahh, found that in the comments. Wasn't mentioned in the post. Thanks for clarifying!
I'm sure it's a troll account, don't take the comment to heart :)
What industry are you going into? Some are more strict than others when it comes to dress code.  
I find that kind of interesting, actually.  When my mom was younger, she was the one that did all of the yard work. I remember watching shows with her on what plants are hardier and other stuff such as good pavement. New family friends would always think that my dad was the one that did the work until my mom claimed credit for it. It was honestly not out of the ordinary for her to be out all summer on a project; kinda surprised me that people automatically assume men do it by default.
Sorry, I'm not trying to be a jerk.  So, here's an exercise.  Go to google images.  Type 'woman in thong bending over' then type 'man in thong bending over'.  You get most of the same images of women in thongs bending over, not one man in a thong bending over.  Why?  Why do you have to go to a gay website to find men bending over in a thong?  But wait, thongs are more for women right?  So that's the problem.  Then go and just type woman bending over (lots of sexy women bending over, lots of non-sexy women bending over.  Perfect, exactly what I would hope for).  Then type Men bending over (1 sexy man in the whole lot bending over from the side, lots of comedic pics about men bending over, lots of sexy women bending over).  Why is sexy men bending over on gay websites and not the rest of the internet?  Why is sexy women bending over everywhere?  The balance is the problem.  So, like I said, 'women bending over' on google images is perfect.  A nice mix of hot women and normal women bending over.  No problem.  The problem is the lack of anything resembling balance of the sexes.  And here's the last question.  Why is it normal for women to wear thongs and gross for men in many countries?  IMHO, the answer is men don't want men's asses and balls in their face all the time.  But when a woman doesn't want a woman's ass and cameltoe in her face all the time, there's a fucking uproar.  Balance my friend.  Apply standards to both sides the same.  That's what the problem is.
Even if this relationship is *mostly* good times, the extent to which the bad times are *really bad* is a huge red flag. This is not the kind of thing that you can let pass by. This is the kind of thing that you look back at, years later, and say, "You know, I saw all the signs, and I thought it'd get better, or that I could deal with it." If a significant other had shown these signs, and they were actively pursuing therapy, I could *maybe* consider dealing with it. But you're having to push the guy, and even then he won't go. You're spending a lot of time talking about the family history, but in the grand scheme of things it doesn't matter - all that matters is his behavior now. There are other people out there that you could be totally compatible with, and would treat you better.
Remember that men are actually victims of crime much more often than women. So you already have one thing going for you!  With that knowledge to help you feel a little better, some advice to make you *actually* safer.   1) Find a friend if possible. Like any predator, criminals prefer to target solitary or easy-looking targets.  2) Project confidence. The more you act/feel like a victim, the more people will treat you like one.  3) PAY ATTENTION. This is especially true for dealing with thieves.  
Thank you very much. I just finished my first shift, just have to get the hang of it now and study the menu. My last day of training is Friday!
oh snap, that is a brilliant idea.
Cannibal The Musical. While it might seem to be a story about a man and his horse the horse is named after the writers girl friend. "Friends dont just leave!" And you will sing all the songs the rest of your life...
I should never have married. I was fresh out of one relationship where he didn't want marriage and I did. I fell directly into another relationship with someone who was desperate to get married, no idea why. I let him push me into it, mostly because I was a single mom, found out I was pregnant and didn't want to continue being a single mom. We got divorced because he lied about every aspect of himself to fit me and what I wanted. Six weeks into the marriage, he took off. I haven't seen him since. That was 5 years ago. Just got divorced last month, happily so. Pretty sure I'll never marry again.
you have the choice to pursue the life that you believe suits you.  nobody should make you feel bad about that.  having said that, what i wanted at 17 was different from what i wanted in my 20s and is different from i want today.  none of those changes were easily predictable or foreseeable to 17-year-old me.  among other things, an education that broadens your perspective and grants you new experiences is insurance against the fickleness of youthful desires.  why not hedge your bet?
I was a severely awkward kid. I don't mean adorably awkward. I mean embarrassingly awkward. I was 5' 4" when I was 11 years old. I was (and still am) thick and rather muscular. I had big glasses with a prescription that made my eyes look weird and distorted. I had braces. And headgear. And Hermione Granger hair. My feet were (and still are) extra-wide. I had to wear boys sneaker's because girl's shoes were too narrow.   I was never under the illusion that I would be pretty. Being a smart girl, I realized it would take more than lipstick and a new wardrobe to make me match the beauty ideals of my world. So I was sad. Then, after a while, I was free. I realized that if I didn't have a chance of meeting those beauty ideals, I didn't have to worry about them! I was 13 when I gave up on being thin, pretty or sexy. I couldn't be any of those things, but I could be ME. Being me was pretty fun and I couldn't fail at it 'cause I'm the only one doing it.   Funny thing is, I grew up to look like your average white girl. Nothing great about me, but nothing wrong with me either. The only difference is I'm happy and thankful for the way I look, rather than disappointed that I'm not beautiful.  
[deleted]
I work in Kitchener/Waterloo and figuratively every city landscape worker is a 20-something female (I would go out on a limb and assume post-secondary students, since there are two universities and a college just within the city alone). They do basically all the city landscaping work including mowing, trimming, hanging/watering/planting plants, painting hydrants etc.  I don't recall actually seeing any males do that job here...
I don't know why you're getting down votes. My first thought was "where the hell was your shot gun?!"
I'm on the east coast :-) but thanks for the offer! It's nice to hear that people do find somebody they trust.
Absolutely because it can cause it to become dislodged, cause an infection, and seriously injure the glans of the penis. I had to bring up testimonials of this in patients to my NP who was very stubborn in believing that it is so far up and so small that it can't be felt, ever (then she told me she personally had one and it worked great). I asked her to refill my prescription for hormonal and haven't looked back. 
&gt; I hope if in the future, even if someone makes a rude comment, you can ignore them and focus on what make you happy!  I'll definitely get there. I'll work that self confidence!!
Yes! You can also find dresses that end in a pencil-skirt style.  I'm not sure what these are called but I find them very flattering on pear and hourglass shapes as they cinch in at the waist.
Me too! I thought the epilator would eliminate ingrowns.  Nope! Clearsil pad wipes (2% SA) and bikini zone.  The wipes may burn momentarily in certain areas (keep them away from the important stuff!) but it will eliminate those bumps
&gt; Honestly, after the first half of this she started sounding kinda misogynistic, making it sound like women are entitled and how great it was "back then".  Not surprising coming from one of the more prominent spokespeople for the so-called "men's rights movement" - and pretty consistent with some of the [other outrageous stuff she's said](http://i.imgur.com/ws67sQD.jpg)
1.) It's not easy the first few times, which means your first month on it you might want to wear a pad just in case. Because if you dont put it in right you could have a little leakage. Also you said you had trouble with tampons in the past. I had a lot of trouble with tampons with aplicators, but I found that if you use a brand like O.B. which doesnt come with an aplicator it's much easier to put in and it feels less foreign.  2.) The cup never really gets stuck, but during your first few attempts you might feel like it is. The trick is to just reach your thumb and index finger in and gently squeeze the bottom of the cup. This causes it to lose suction and you can slide it out a bit to grip it more firmly .  3.) Yes, much more comfortable than a pad. All brands do come with a stem which is there to help you take it out and  find them to be kind of irritating, but you might not. The great thing is that after you have a bit of expirence with putting it in and taking it out you dont need the stem to be that long so you can cut it if it bothers you.  4.) It's fairly easy once you get the hang of it.  5.) If you're doing it right you shouldnt have a murder scene, you should have a chaliace of blood that you can then pour into the toilet for your fallen homies.  6.) Generally you can excercise, but if you're going to be stretching certian ways it might slip a bit and feel weird.
You may save money with this option, but I honestly do not think it would be healthy for you. There is a high likelihood you will regress in your therapy. I encourage you to seriously look for other options, I'm sorry I don't have any other suggestions. As another redditor commented, it would be much more helpful if your family helped you pay rent instead.
You don't have to. Time will help make the pain less. You don't have to forgive and forget. If you do decide to forgive, it's for your own sanity, not for him. You chose to forgive when you are ready to let go of the hurt. It doesn't mean you will forget it though.
I was so excited when I first got to mow the lawn. I made very careful lines, not missing a blade of grass as I rode around the half acre lot. I surveyed my handiwork, satisfied that it was perfect. Then, with the eager anticipation, I disengaged the blades. This was what I had been waiting for the entire time I made slow passes under the trees and around the rose bush. I moved the gear shift into full speed and tore around the yard, laughing and cheering as I bounced along recklessly. More than once, I was almost thrown from the seat, but I didn't care. I was invincible with this roaring machine at my command, the wind blowing through my hair. Dusk began to settle, filling the darkening air with the flickering pinprick lights of waking fireflies. I decided that was enough for one day and shifted down to a lower gear, driving the mower toward the shed. I paused outside of the shed door, considering. I didn't know if I could maneuver the mower through the entrance, but reason didn't dictate the free spirit that had just raced across the yard in wild abandon. I grinned at the challenge. I rested my hand on the gear shift, prepared to gently put the mower into a slow reverse and begin the process of lining it up with the entrance. However, at that very moment, what I can only imagine was a pterodactyl flew directly past my ear and shrieked. Startled, I whipped around to catch a glimpse of this demonic creature. Unfortunately, I did so without removing my hand from the gear shift, unintentionally pulling it all the way to the furthest back setting....full speed ahead. I was not fast enough to put it back into park before it crashed into the side of the shed. That particular dent is still there over 15 years later, like a misshapen seven, mocking me.   I was not allowed to mow after that, and I never did until recently. It's not a riding mower, so I don't get to take anymore joyrides...but I still love the experience of mowing. There's something about the clear distinction between what's been done and what's yet to be done. There are so many tasks that seem to just never end. There are always more dishes or clothes to wash, there's always another mess to clean up....but you know exactly when you're done mowing. The smell of fresh-cut grass is also awesome. :) 
[deleted]
Hey mod - can you look at this user's history and maybe consider banning her? concern trolling and bsing throughout here with no respect for fellow users. Its ~~a little~~ gross.
None of us think that he's a rapist and going to break into her house, don't be absurd. We think he's probably a sexist jerk who hit on her in a clumsy, ignorant fashion. 
That went SO much better than I was expecting. That's just a really awesome story! Very happy for you, unknown interwebs person!
You stole my response. LOL 
We're talking about it because privilege allows people to shut down people who try to speak out about their problems.  Agree with you on pop culture feminism being anglocentric, but feminism is more than just what you see on the teli.  
[deleted]
Doesn't negate the fact that he was a sexist asshole.
...and his go-to for light banter centers on his subscription to 1950's gender roles.  Can't go wrong with that one...
As long as it's done politely and constructively, I think it's fine. I'm totally one of those people who will solicit and give advice in fitting rooms.   If someone's trying on low-rise jeans with a terrible muffin top, I might say something along the lines of "you should totally try a high rise jean - they're back in style now and you have a great figure for them!"  rather than something inappropriate like "OMG, MUFFIN TOP STOP."    
I guess I disagree with what rude means.  I think telling someone you don't know that they shouldn't be doing something because of their gender is absolutely rude.
[deleted]
Purely the cost factor for me. IUD would be a minimum of $800, because it is not covered by my insurance. My NuvaRing however, is completely covered (free to me) and I have never had complications with it.  Can't justify an IUD into the budget when there are no additional benefits for me.
So lets not tow the line.   OP, if its legal where you live and you're comfortable handling one, get a [crossbow] (http://www.gandermountain.com/modperl/product/details.cgi?pdesc=Barnett-RC-150-Crossbow-Package&amp;i=614605)  Edit: a gun is a tool, like any tool, they can be a bit scary if you do not know what you are doing. I know I was intimidated by circular saws and saws-all. But one you have some knowledge and experience, operating any tool is a piece of cake. 
at least you were able to get away from that.  Poor roommate, sounds like she is set on staying with crazy. 
6 months? I've lived with this shit for 6 YEARS
Whenever I see a Dove ad I remember that they are owned by the same people who own Axe. I can't take anything they do to make women feel good seriously when they also make money off [shit like this](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=zo_k5E0azps)  Soooooo many body types and kinds of beauty there, right?
[deleted]
This reminded me of an experience I had recently. I'm a male. My girlfriend enjoys yardwork and really goes to town on pulling weeds. We live next to a very, very busy street going in and out of town.  My girlfriend was out front pulling weeds. I wasn't doing anything in particular. I watched for a bit and she got a weed that was extra tough, so I went to get a tool or two so she could hack it out of the ground.  I came back and gave her the tools and just stood there watching her and passing traffic. I made eye contact with some guy driving by due to his overly obnoxious blaring music. We stared for a second at each other. He was stopped in traffic and turned off his music.  He leaned out of his window and yelled at me "Hey, are you just going to stand there or are you going to help her!?"  I yelled back "No! I'm pretty sure she has it handled!"  I was offended for me and her. Eff that dude. If she needs help she'll ask me for help. Why on earth should I jump in just because she's having a little trouble with a real tough weed? Chances are she'd get before I could anyway.
I love chess, my boyfriend taught me and I became obsessed with the game. Within a week I was destroying him, within a month I was destroying all his friends. Every time I would be challenged by a male chess player they would often ask me smug questions, like you know what this piece does, etc. Honestly, most the time I don't think it was my skill that helped me win the game, but the fact that they assumed I didn't know how to play. Regardless I love chess and thanks for posting this. I have always felt that with chess and other games which aren't similar necessarily (like magic or DnD) there is this wall that is built up against female players as they assume you are too vapid to be interested in games that require strategy and wit.  Anyway rant over, thanks!
There is nothing to do. What could you possibly do in that situation that won't make it worse? They wanted your attention and you gave it to them. Freely, of your own volition. Any action you take, any word you speak, will be giving them exactly what they want. 
You can want that for yourself, sure. But be open about letting others enjoy the freedoms they'd like. 
You'd be surprised. Did you see the thread the other day asking cat-calling redditors why they do it?  They aren't mindless automatons. They are real people too. They are my neighbours, for all I know. I could stand here and condemn them for objectifying me, but if I don't acknowledge their humanity then I'm guilty of the same crime. So I'm saying, given that this man is capable of hearing my response, what is the optimal response to give?
So I'm kinda in the same position you are. Six months together still in the sex-every-day honeymoon phase and...engaged. But it's a long engagement. I put a stipulation down that BOTH of us needed at least an Associate's degree, and I'm working on my Bachelor's. So it's going to be 4 years until we get married, minimum.  So while we didn't wait on the engagement (oops), we're still waiting on the marriage and hopefully that'll be enough time for the relationship to run its course if it isn't meant to be.
You should have asked him if he likes to prance around gardens planting flowers.
ah i see. it doesn't sound like he's trying to be sexist but i wasn't there so i wouldn't know. thanks for explaining though! 
It's hilarious watching my pervious 85yo neighbor mowing the grass. She's got a bit of property and uses a riding lawnmower.   You'd think she'd have problems getting the wheel turned, even looks like a stiff breeze would take her out, but on that mower she's happy as a bug in a rug!   And if you tell her she wasn't supposed to be doing something you'd get an earful for a week!
Sure it worked out and yes I'm happy that she mentioned it but had she not said anything I would have been fine with it either. Here, once I was wearing a dress that I knew I wasn't going to buy and some lady said "oh it looks soooo good!!!" Then it just made me wonder when I knew I didn't like it. I wished she wouldn't have said anything although she was nice about it. So yes as much as today that lady's comment made my day **I** still wouldn't pass any comments unless I clearly asked to. 
I think it depends on your body style. :)
I think it's only rude if the person means to be rude.
There are other consequences besides legal ones.
[deleted]
i just don't think he's educated and was raised in a way where this is an acceptible thing to say. i don't think he is trying to oppress woman. i even bet that in his mind he was being nice.
You're allowed to want whatever you want in a relationship and conversely,  the other party is allowed to comply or not comply. Best thing to do is be open and talk about it.
You said you really like your job, and that's great: does it pay well enough to afford raising a child?
My dad never gave me the sex talk. Instead, I got an hour and a half "you better not date anyone but a white guy" before I went to college. Funny enough, he's 25% Native American. After that, I didn't tell him about any boyfriends for about six years.  Now I'm in a serious relationship and we're talking about moving in together in a few months once leases are up. I've learned to phrase things as "I'm doing this, just letting you know out of respect" and never "*can* I do this?" I'm a 24 year woman and 100% financially independent. I don't need approval to do something that makes me happy and neither do you. It's nice to have, but sometimes our parents and family turn out to be racist, sexist, misogynistic asshats. If they actually love and respect you, they might be able to drop those outdated opinions and support your decisions. If not, then hey, you know who not to invite to the wedding!  If you don't mind me saying, your guy sounds cute. :)
What are you even talking about? When did I make an "all of" statement   A white person can easily be underprivileged by having the ill fortune of being born poor. They have white privilege, but all that says is that if you hold all other variables constant then they'll be better off that a minority in the exact same position.  And recognizing that privilege opens the door to discussion. It doesn't close any doors  because without being mindful of your privilege the door wasn't open to begin with
Yeah, my mom is like that too. My BMI is 20, yet she always talks about how I have "elephant thighs" and how my "butt is way too big". Lady, I am 110 pounds. Just no.
[deleted]
[deleted]
That's scary :(
Lingerie parties? I for one do not need anyone picking out my underwear for me. 
[deleted]
I don't actually smoke. I'm a big fat phony. :(
I had my pitchfork sharpened and everything.
&gt; There was no artistic...component to the picture.  &gt;t was just a picture of a hot woman.  I feel like your definition of "art" is pretty distant from the professional and academic consensus. I also feel like it's been tailored to serve a particular agenda.
[deleted]
What do you mean? 
Never should have married him in the first place. I was still in love with another man. I lost him in a car accident. Kind of a long story but, basically, what I'm trying to get across is that you should completely get over the other man before marrying something new and exciting. That seems obvious but I guess I'm dumb. 
It took a lot! We've been thru a lot. Sometimes test is the best.
[deleted]
I'm non-mormon in SLC too. I didn't expect such a harsh ruling. It sounds like her previous ward was really vindictive and noncooperative too. Now I'm wondering how harsh the penalty for John Dehlin will be. It's just really sad. Excommunication seems so cruel.
Really really? I guess it's fair enough. I don't know much about other countries.  No, Ireland is very much independent now. You can read up on it here if you want something constructive to do :p  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Irish_War_of_Independence
[deleted]
I couldn't even get a girlfriend so I probably should buy a lifesize doll and treat her like one which might seem solve my problem and take the doll on dates such as restaurants, parks, picnics and such.
As everyone should.
Sounds like a fucking idiot what with that "decision of 2 people" bullshit
Like I totally said that. Wow. 
[deleted]
&gt;. Is it really that bad for someone to tell her that it's gross.   Ummm yes?? If you think the problem is with the size and fit by all means suggest a different size. (Having worked in retail, the easiest way to tell somebody they may need a bigger size tactfully and without inadvertently offending is to say "that style tends to run small.")  But your job isn't to judge a person's taste or police their body shape. You are there to sell and unless your opinion is solicited you shut your damn mouth. And you sure as hell don't use language like "gross." I mean what the hell.
all good just easier to read and give advice :)
That sounds like a novel/movie in the making. 
Like you, I'll probably stick with the pill. I've had one child, plan on another, so having an IUD, or any kind of long-term BC seems silly for now.
To sum up, "Men bad!"  It's to be expected of a self described, with great humility i might add. A self described internet history and anthropology master, PhD? Anyway, your mindset is so entrenched into patriarchy of oppression. That you admitted to requiring a man to mold himself into a more "correct" version, before you would deign to even contemplate carrying his children.   Who has custody of those children now i wonder... Since you've since left said sperm donor, no doubt even his "improved" form was found wanting.   You are the stuff of my nightmares.
This comment will be lost to the abyss but I wanted to say that I am truly happy for you (and myself) just from reading the excitement in your words. :)
I don't know if complete compatibility is a real thing. I'm not married to my partner, but we're common law, which has similar legal implications as marriage. We've lived together for going on 8 years and even though I would argue we're not sexually compatible, he believes we're perfect together. And I've been considering throwing in the towel sometimes, which is hard, because he's wonderful, really. Handsome, smart, loyal, dependable, stable, responsible, laid-back.    But I never envisioned my life being here, with a house and cats. I want to get more degrees, and travel the world, and live in Europe, and every time I think about doing these things with him, I have a hard time seeing it. I don't think he'd enjoy the experiences like I would. I think he'd want to calculate the moments, to have a plan, to know where he's going. I would want to experience freedom and instability. The life I'm currently in makes me feel dead inside, where I cook and clean and sometimes get to reddit, and have a desk job pushing papers and filing. And I think about doing this for the next 20, or 30, or 50 years, and it makes me nauseous. But I have no idea what I want because my entire life has been dedicated to what he wants, and fitting in to this image that I don't feel I can maintain any more.    And I love him to bits, but I think the things I'm wanting out of life are different than the things he's wanting. He's said at one point that he wants kids, and thinks I'll change my mind on them. I'm adamantly child-free. And I know he wants monogamy and a white picket fence and that American dream, and I hope he gets that. But that dream would absolutely stifle me.
If you're comfortable doing so, I'd talk to the boyfriend. He probably thinks its cute and hasn't really thought about how it might make you feel. If you tell him it's an issue of safety, perhaps he will knock it off. "You're conditioning your girlfriend to open the door without seeing who is there and I'm afraid someday it won't be you." 
[deleted]
You go girl
Yep. I expected the woman to go home and say "I saw this girl try on the wrong size shorts today....bless her heart."
My mom does the same thing. My BMI has always been about 18.5 so right on the border of underweight. I only exercise about 1 hour 4-5 times a week now that I'm in college but I look pretty much the same as I did in high school when I had swim practice 6 hours a day. Even at the height of my swimming my mom would always be asking me "you should start coming to the gym with me so you can get in shape." She still does it all the time and even though she weighs at least 30 pounds more than me she always tries to make it seem like I'm so much bigger and lazier than her. She will be mean if I'm eating something she thinks I "shouldn't." I hate it. I honestly do think they do it though because they are insecure with their own weight and feel the need to make us suffer with them to "bond."
Congratulations. I was starting to get angry at first.  Good for you.  I gave read the sidebar.  So...perhaps a  pic in Friday?   
Thanks so much for your reply. I appreciate it. I'm pretty skiddish about telling my parents. I almost worked up to it but my mom told me I didn't need therapy when I broached the possibility. So I didn't press the subject. I mean, I'm feeling a lot better in some ways but I think about death and suicide a lot. I'm not mentally prepared to accept I will die one day and I'm so fearful I think about it SO MUCH. That's just one thing. I cut I guess to have control over myself. Sometimes for the sheer "fun" of it. Makes me pleased I guess to see scars and marks. That's just how I feel. But I like your response and I CONSTANTLY told him I was unsure and didn't know if I was ready or prepared. He kept coercing me and convincing me it'd be fine and fun. It wasn't fine or fun. I regretted it. I went home and took a bath, feeling dirty and upset. I felt like I lost my innocence or a huge part of me. I feel deeper into my low. I think I really was/am depressed and mild anxiety. Again, thanks for your advice.
i am very sorry you have had to experience those reactions from people you love. i think the best thing you can do is tell yourself and your mom and your dad and your friends that YOUR BODY is YOUR BODY, and it is absolutely no one's business but yours whether or not you shave.  you cannot control their reactions. you can, however, build up your own confidence and self-esteem about your decisions and the beauty of your body exactly as it is.   when in doubt: your body hair is your wolfpelt. your wolfpelt is your power. no one can take your wolfpelt away from you. no one can take your power away from you. 
[deleted]
Totally not where I saw this going!  I wanted to punch that lady in the face for like 2 seconds.  That's an amazing feeling, girl, ride the high!  Congrats. 
lol I'm sorry, but how did I criticize you? All I did was call you out for making unnecessary comments about OP.  How do you know what his gf thinks about the issue? Why even mention him being a dweeb for not trusting his gf being STD free when OP has noted that it is not the problem?   You are the one doing all the criticizing: &gt;girls that are sloppy with their pill I find are always somewhat screwed up in other ways; immature or messy priorities.   
[deleted]
&gt; it's obvious you still didn't get it  Heh yes...keep telling yourself this. It's easier than actually engaging with a single thing I write.   But yes this is completely pointless. You have proven absolutely incapable of admitting that a single thing might be wrong with this column. Astonishing. 
Roll it in flour?
Sure, if you love it then embrace it!  OP said she felt gigantic so I was giving her some tips to minimize.  I prefer to de-emphasize my tush and show my personality with tops in ethnic prints and rich colours. Whatever gives you confidence!
[deleted]
with all the "be a fat and proud women" sayings these days...  interesting to see a girl be happy that she is better looking, more fit, and more healthy.. something to be proud of.
[deleted]
Aww *hugs* Sorry you had to go through that, street harassment sucks.      I used think 'but you're not like other girls' was a compliment too.   Reddit can bash feminism all day everyday, but I still need it.  Hooray for having an open mind!  Check out  http://www.ihollaback.org/      
That'd be pretty nice. I know that this is instituted in Sweden which I can't help but believe really aids in the child's development. 
took a turn for the positive...nice
Phew, thought I was gonna get my heart broken on reddit, again. 
I cant even get paid vacation or sick time... I think if we're gonna go the mandated paid time off route we should start there first.
Be honest...  If we were to look back at the physical attractiveness of people you've dated in the past (by measuring based on classic traits society recognizes as attractive), would the people you dated correlated well with your on level of physical attractiveness, or would they be all over the place (since you find beauty in everyone).
Thanks for the advice. I don't even know what DBT is, but I will certainly be doing some research now.
Indeed, I feel it is.  I grew up around people that had wild passionate love affairs. But those relationships ended quickly and caused a great deal of emotional distress.  I never wanted that. I never wanted one of those relationships where you yell and fight and throw things. I never have felt attracted to "bad boys". I always wanted a man that is a good person and would treat me with respect. I find respect, loyalty, and kindness far sexier than a bad boy mentality. 
Ugh, thank goodness!  I thought this was going to go another way!  Congratulations on your weight loss and I hope there are tons more compliments and encouragements to come :D    Have fun in your summer shorts!
Congratulations, I love how you call four years of very hard work "free." :-)  Be a great Doctor!
&gt; When I wanted paid maternity leave, I got it.  Good for you. Many people don't have that experience.
I am Southern but live in an expat community with lots of non-Americans.  I always tell them if my calling them sweetie or whatever bothers them to let me know.  I can't help it.  It is engrained from childhood.  I don't do it to toal strangers though.
When I get to school I plan to start volunteering as a health educator in that area for foster youth, I think a lot of circumstances could be different if we educated these children and their mothers on how to care for themselves physically and emotionally.
I think you need to ask her flat out what's up! And also be very honest about how you feel  and what you expect or want to happen you can't allow yourself to continue to be strung along 
Real people have scars and imperfections.  A scar just means you're living life.    I used to swim with a woman who switched pools, because the college students would act differently around her.  She said they would very obviously avoid her or move to a different area.  She had huge scars from surgery for cancer.  We're there to swim, not to have a beauty contest.  
&gt;Let's keep it civil. Just because someone doesn't see it as you do doesn't necessarily make them an idiot.  Although, not being able to read is certainly an indicator. I wrote:  &gt;You're not an idiot.   
Women want a whole host of different things. We are humans, after all.  I personally don't want to be approached or noticed by strangers ever. I'm pretty paranoid, and I rather like my autonomy. If I'm out by myself and haven't approached anyone, it's because I wanted to be out by myself and don't want company.
I highly doubt she's using tortured in a literal sense. 
It must be unpleasant, but there could be multiple reasons : maybe he thought you didn't want to meet her, maybe he thought they would talk high school memories and you'd be bored, maybe she saw you unfriended her and asked him not to meet you, but really: you say you never had a reason not to trust him in 3.5 years, she is married, and if he wanted to cheat on you I don't think anyone would do this, it makes even non-jealous girls wonder...  I'd say: if you want to meet her, say it, but I just think you wouldn't be interested in what they're going to talk about...
1) that's already true of some sexist hiring managers, mandated maternity leave or not. 2) that's illegal. 3) that's why parental leave instead of maternity leave is crucial. 4) the existence of sexism in others isn't a reason to not have something so essential.
[deleted]
I am an ex professional chef, so me. He is an amazing audience though. Totally interested, loves eating new stuff, wants to participate, asks how to do things, and cleans up everything. 
Thanks for your reply :) I feel like I might be doing something wrong because I tend to feel that my friends, who have had more long-term relationship experience than me, tend to more about them and how to have one. One thing my friend says a lot is that "everyone has the potential to cheat", which makes me feel very confused because I have no desire to cheat on my boyfriend. So because I didn't feel the same way as her, I wanted to double check on here was the general consensus for this kind of situations was. Thanks for your input :) it's nice to get an idea of what other people think.
I wish I had stories like this. I remember being 17 and a size 6 walking into a store and having the Manager there comment about how she didn't think they carried sizes large enough to fit me. (They went as high as size 16)   I mean, I do get that my bum is almost double what my waist is, but it was a bad experience to say the least.
[deleted]
I've barely been replying to any texts, but yeah it might need to full stop. I just keep saying I'm busy.
The people who answer the phones at clinics are office people. They book appointments and give very very basic advice. They aren't licensed clinicians or anything of the sort to be giving medical advice.   Book the appointment. If your doctor thinks it'll fit in your uterus then I'd go with their advice than some random person on the phone. 
[deleted]
Ugh. Sorry this happened to you. I'm usually a completely immature brat and love saying "I told you so" about everything possible whenever possible, but I don't feel that way now because this shit IS NOT FUNNY. I always thought I'd be so "strong and tough" when I got catcalled, and that I'd "totally laugh at the guy" and "just let it roll off my shoulders"... but when it happened I felt so ashamed and weak and terrified. :(
&gt;merely be the breadwinner   Wow tell us how you really feel! But the mom who is working (and still recovering...) probably isn't "merely" the breadwinner in this scenario, is she?  Most men do no view their role as "merely" being the breadwinner. Their goal in life is not to just "be the breadwinner," but rather provide a secure environment for their families to thrive in. Last I checked, once again, men don't give birth and more importantly postnatal, men don't lactate. It's not about ~traditional gender roles~, it's about what's best for the family. 
Awww this brightened up my night!
Exactly, lol
Maybe everyone's afraid of horizontal hostility?
[deleted]
Because it betters society to have parents taking care of their children?
If your boyfriend doesn't care, and you're not attracted to the guy, and the guy knows this isn't a date- there isn't a problem. You're not messing things up. Men and women can-and do- have platonic friendships that don't lead to cheating. Just be sure that if you and the guy friend really hit it off and hang out a lot, you keep your boyfriend clued in. 
Mental health is my main reason for not wanting my own children. Aside from my own issues with depression and anxiety, there are several other illnesses that run in my family on both sides. Knowing how much my relatives and I have gone through, I don't think I'd be able to watch my own child suffer through that. 
Wow, this is *totally* not the place for such a ridiculous gun rights argument. I will simply say two things and then I'm not replying to this thread any further because hijacking OP's thread with this is totally not cool.  One, OP had no idea those people were there until she was already out in the yard because they were behind a building, so unless you're promoting the paranoia of packing heat whenever you step outside for half a minute to take out the trash your entire screed is a little off-base.   And two, your last paragraph says "selfish to deny tools" when the conversation was just about reasons behind downvotes. Clicking a button on an online forum is now equated with censorship and passing legislation?! Wtf...
[deleted]
No, there's no way to rephrase this. This community isn't here to give you guidance on your love life. Hence my suggestion. You can also try r/AskWomenAdvice.
Maybe he didn't cheat on you with an escort. He already did the hardest thing- breaking off the relationship. I think it is very likely that he was unhappy- thought he'd do this last hurrah before the wedding and that might help- backed out when he realized it wouldn't help- and then did what he should have done in the first place- called off the relationship. More importantly- you say this isn't the first time you've questioned his loyalty- well good riddance. 
That is not only rude but doesn't do anything to help the current situation. 
[deleted]
Oh my God how embarrassing!! You must be pretty cool if they still liked you, haha :) I will definitely be wary of silicone lube whilst visiting!
A friend of mine was in a similar situation. Keep trying, both of you. Even if your dad wants to ignore the relationship altogether, you shouldn't humor him because that only justifies in his mind that he's absolutely right. Bring your fiance up in conversation like he's part of the family, no more and no less attention. Emphasize the "we" when he's talking about your life. On your fiance's part, he should try to talk to your dad as a (future) son-in-law, and persist even if your dad continues to ignore him.
This is exactly why poverty is cyclical. I mean I'm all for respecting choices, but you really have to strongly encourage her to reconsider. She'll be bringing a child into a world of poverty, raised by a single mother with an abusive father. She has no qualifications, and can't support herself let alone a child.  It's in the best interests of herself, the child, and society.
Printing the pictures out, gluing googly eyes on the penises and mailing the picture to my sister
I was feeling pretty mad until that second to last paragraph that's awesome good for you!
Just like I said in my reply to cellengineer.    I still (even as someone who doesn't hire or own a business) can't logically reconcile the possibility of losing an employee, possibly a very important and CRITICAL one, for a year.  Business's exist to make money as efficiently as possible.  Losing an employee, potentially a critical one, for a year severely hinders that efficiency.
At first I thought she was going to be a major bitch hut then I read the rest! Congrats on the weight loss and enjoy your new shorts!
[deleted]
&gt; The problem is that you have persisted in an aggressive effort to persuade other Church members to your point of view and that your course of action has threatened to erode the faith of others. You are entitled to your views, but you are not entitled to promote them and proselyte others to them while remaining in full fellowship in the Church.   The irony is absolutely staggering. How can anyone be this casually hypocritical? It's astounding. 
It seems like these discussions always get hung up on some people's basic ignorance of the whole raising a child thing, where people who haven't gone through it before often seem to think that the difficulty in having kids is about the last few months of pregnancy and then the recovery period instead of the fact that you *then* spend at least twelve hours a day for a couple *years* juggling the baby's needs and praying for sleep.
You're gonna probably get downvoted, but I'm here to agree with you. It should be all or none. I'm out of work for at least another 6-8 weeks after just having a knee operation and I made either too much or not enough for every form of disability/assistance I applied for, aside from food stamps. I have serious life long medical issues that will eventually cripple me, and it's quite painful already. I am fortunate to work with really awesome people, but was limited to about 15-25 hours most weeks because of my problems. It wasn't just always being sick that was the issue, but I have to have lots of regular doctors visits, tests, bloodwork, etc and that's very time consuming, so I just couldn't work full time for that reason alone without feeling ridiculously overwhelmed. People choose to get pregnant and raise a family. I didn't choose to be born with degenerative health problems. No offense to anyone, but I feel much more empathy for people in my shoes. Either fix it for everyone once and for all, or don't bother. 
Talk radio.   My grandmother used to play talk radio out on her patio, to keep away critters from her trash cans outside (it worked for her).   The room I used to sleep in when visiting was on the other side of her patio, and I found the constant talking comforting.  Now that I'm grown, I still don't like a quiet house, and keep talk radio on frequently.    Talk to your local police.  You can get statistics of crimes in your area.  You can see how close you may be living to a registered sex offender, or how close the nearest burglary was.    You will most likely find out that crime is a lot rarer than the tv news old have you think.  
Did they sue?
:D In Finland talking to strangers = you are on drugs.
I think the problem with the US is that they have to take it one step at a time. A country firmly entrenched in anti-socialist beliefs will find it difficult to accept any of this, let alone if it was changed all at once. I wish they could do it all at once, though... The older I get the more I realise that the US really fails its citizens in a lot of ways. 
Definitely don't disagree with baby steps at all, anything in the right direction is a good start. I guess I'm just bitter because it's so frustrating. I come from a working class family and have always worked fairly hard myself. I would love nothing more than to work full time or more , but I simply cannot. Child rearing, more often than not, is a choice. Being sick/injured/handicapped, etc usually is not. I see it from both sides as well because I have been sick since I was born, and my mom was essentially a single parent. It was unfortunate that she couldn't have more time off to care for me after working 6 days a week, but it is what it is. 
Wages?  I said *you have to make yourself valuable.*  If you're measuring your pay in dollars-per-hour, you're not doing a very good job of setting yourself apart from the herd.
[deleted]
Had to go and look this up...   &gt;If I am eligible to receive EI benefits, how much can I expect to receive?  &gt;We cannot tell you exactly how much you will receive before we process your application. For most people, the basic rate for calculating EI benefits is 55% of your average insurable weekly earnings, up to a maximum amount. As of January 1, 2014, the maximum yearly insurable earnings amount is $48,600. This means that you can receive a maximum amount of $514 per week.  [From here.](http://www.servicecanada.gc.ca/eng/ei/types/maternity_parental.shtml#much)  Oh, and there's a Family Supplement for low income families (below 25k).   Caveat: I'm just going by what I can find and what I'm aware of, I've never had a child myself so I might not be 100% accurate.  Edit: Not sure what you mean by participate - do you mean do they pay into it? Everyone who works does through their taxes, but I'm not sure if there's anything that companies specifically do. Some employers offer more benefits if they wish.  
For some reason I pictured a big burly guy wearing a way too small school girl uniform, mid drift exposed and chest hair sticking out, prancing around, giggling and blowing kisses.  And I'm more than okay with that. 
You're 100% right.
[deleted]
Absolutely.  I work in an industry with extremely HARD deadlines.  Often with lots of overtime.  To loose a highly skilled employee for 3 months, let alone a year, would be a HUGE blow!
did you get an exam done? I had the same issue, turned out I had a polyp causing all the bleeding
Any participant has the responsibility to say no and make it clear that 'no' is the answer. Otherwise, it could be misconstrued as a yes.  As much as people want to live in this ideal world where yes and no are clear cut and formal, people often act on implied consent, which is the reason for these 'gray areas'.
0 respect given to women, 0 respect deserved.  
[deleted]
[deleted]
My boyfriend and I have been together for 5 3/4 years. We met in a chatroom, became friends through AIM, met IRL and became best of friends for 4 years before becoming official.  **BTW we met online when I was 12 and he was 14.** So your story is definitely nothing to be ashamed of. It's the age of the internet, and it's starting to become a norm for friendships and relationships to happen because of it. 
I agree! She was very nonchalant about it, which I think was kind of weird. And it was after sex, and for me some things sexual after sex is  kind of weird.  edit: took out always
Those negative repercussions are gonna happen whether you said no of your own accord or you said no after being prompted.  Rapists, immature, violent, emotionally unbalanced, whatever people will act out regardless.  And in the case of a rapist he's not gonna care about your consent anyway.  I'm not being stubborn.  Im just approaching this from a place of logic and simplicity.  If you don't want sex say **NO** Don't wait for their asking permission. 
It kind of sounds like she needs a hobby, or a harder job, or something where she can focus some of her energy and get some feeling of value that isn't derived from John. Maybe you can help her find something like that? Then more hanging out one on one, more things you can bring up when she's not letting you talk where she still gets to converse, and maybe she'll start to chill out some and be ok not being the center of attention. 
Across the mighty oceans, the people of Tibula are awaiting to meet you
That sucks, but it's not the end of the world. If this is what you want, take a few days for a pity party, then gear up to try again in 6 months time. Try to work out why you failed. Were you unprepared? Did you get too nervous and freak out? Did you just get unlucky? See what you can do in the next 6 months (or even take 12 if you need) to improve your chances. Another 6 months (or even 12) is a small investment for a career that makes you happy. 
You are right, dads should also get it.  But right now one of the biggest challenges is getting women to breastfeed their children. If it's possible physically for a woman, organisation around work should not get in the way. The World Health Organisation recommends 6 months of exclusive breastfeeding. It helps for immune response in infants, breastfed babies are less likely to become obese, etc. There are many reasons why women are not able to do this and we should strive to give them this opportunity, for health.  In addition, women also need to recuperate from the physical strain of pregnancy and birth, and it takes at least 6 weeks, and in reality more like 6 months to fully regain function in the abdominal area and genital area.  These are the two main reasons why it's more urgent for women to get maternity leave than for men to get paternity leave.
Just to be clear, do you believe that Skylar is emotionally abusing Walt? Can you give some specific examples of when she does that, in addition to the credit card example?  I think she's cold, aloof, dispassionate but I don't believe she's controlling or abusing him.
I thought i was the only one...  "I smoke two bowls before I wake up, before I work, I smoke two bowls. I smoke two bowls when I'm building engines, and after every few bolts."  Eh, I tried. Maybe it's because I'm sober and lacking sleep.
[deleted]
I have never and would never hit my significant other in anger. 
Bhahahahahah!!! Thanks! Needed a chuckle!
I had a hysterectomy last year and the intake nurse said to not shave any areas. (removal was like giving birth, through the vag not a tummy cut.)  I had to chuckle.  I shaved anyway, so used to it.
Do Pita Pizzas count? They should totally count. Preheat the oven to 400 or so, get some little pita circles, brush a layer of olive oil on the bottom so it gets crunchy. Lay down your pizza/whatever sauce, your shredded cheese, and whatever toppings/seasonings you think are delicious. Pop in the oven, preferably on a rack thing so the bottom can cook nicely, for about 7-9 minutes or until the cheese is all melted, and BAM. TINY PIZZA.
There is, like, an entire *aisle* of breast pumps at toys r us.
Well... I for a pickup line out of this post. Thank you for that. 
Hitting is never okay. It doesn't matter who's bigger. It doesn't matter that she's a woman. It's never, ever okay.
Some women experience the same problems during natural breast feeding.  The pump does work for the majority of people, for example it only took my wife two hours a day to get 1L. I mean, it sucked, don't get me wrong pumping was *awful*, but it certainly didn't keep her from working.
[deleted]
We have "lactation rooms" at my work for breastfeeding mothers to use to pump in.  But they get so much shit, I probably won't do it.  It's pretty accepted that a woman who is an admin or in HR can pump at work.    But when one of the engineers at work was using it guys talked so much shit about her CONSTANTLY, how lazy she was, how she's getting paid not to work, etc.  They were asking me: "Are you gonna have a baby soon? Get 6 months off work and a 2 hour lunch break?" And this was a woman who was really well liked/respected before she had a baby.    I pretty much decided not to pump because of all the backlash she got.    AND I work at a company that's on the Working Mother's Top 100 best companies to work for.    So I can't imagine what it's like at other places.  Even worse I'd imagine. 
I've got Nexplanon :) In fact I just got my new one in April so I'm safe for another 3 years! Woo! It totally grosses her out when I tell her about it. So she knows it's there and how long it lasts - which confuses me further tbh! She maybe just thinks that 3 years is a long time and I'll change my mind? 
[deleted]
When you said your smile didn't last long, I took it quite literally you see. c: If so she seems out of her mind to shout at random joggers out her car window.
This article is awful. It completely ignores the fact that the Titanic and Birkenhead were exceptions to the rule. [In a study of 18 maritime disasters  from the 1850s to 2011, the Titanic and Birkenhead were the only ships to employ that policy. In all the other disasters, men had the highest survival rate.](http://www.abc.net.au/science/articles/2012/07/31/3554854.htm)
I shave for me, but yes I'll make sure that it's baby smooth if somebody is going to see it. I'm considering drawing a smiley face on it next time....
I've been married 8 years (together for 10), and it's awesome.  I love being married, but that's because I have a strong and mature relationship with an amazing man.  I can see how if you didn't have the right partner it could be miserable.  As for kids, from what I can tell, they're hard, yes, but offer a deep sense of satisfaction.  I'm hoping this is true, as I'm having one in August!
I'm not sure what's worse...the supply of this stuff, or the honest demand for it. 
[deleted]
Ugh what a terrible experience! I am sorry you had to go through that. I feel like I would indignantly send them a very angry letter. Was there any higher-ups that you could contact at that practice? My mind is shouting, *shitty yelp review!* Warn the other women!
It's BUSINESSES, NOT business's. 
&gt;So essentially, it's a cultural problem? Germany, for example, manages it well while remaining productive. Holiday time also, for that matter. If it seems illogical to you it doesn't necessarily mean it's infeasible.  Haha, funny story, but actually in Germany women typically don't return to fulltime work after having a child. It's pretty retrograde.  Get your labor participation rates for mothers up to something normal for a developed country, and you can talk about how feasible it is in Germany. 
[deleted]
Your first 2 statements are contradictory.  You would trust a judge if they were a different gender, but the public won't trust a judge that's a different gender is basically what you said.  That's not a problem with the judiciary but a cultural problem in that region.  To your third statement, judges don't rule anything.  They make rulings on court cases.  These should not differ based on gender, but rather academic interpretation of the law.  That is gender neutral, if the judge is doing their job.  Do you not trust a specific gender to perform their job properly?  Diversity is a worthy goal in that lifts people out of ignorance towards enlightenment and accepting all of us as children of humanity.  But, that noble goal can be undermined by allowing people to be judged based on any standard other than their abilities and actions, even in the name of increasing diversity.  I don't want to use a bridge designed by an engineer who was hired because they're a black woman.  I want to use a bridge designed by a smart, qualified engineer hired because they're the best candidate for the job.  I don't care what color or gender they are.
[deleted]
Honestly, I look back and wonder what the hell I did with my life before my kids and husband lol! Are there hard times? Yes. Are they expensive? Yes. Does your sex life change? Yes. In my experience though, it's completely worth it. I have three beautiful daughters and a loving husband. I get to see the world through their little eyes each day and it's beautiful! I get to see my husband loving the shit out of our girls. It makes me love him even more. I have a lot more laundry now but I also have a lot more love...both given and received. I have a lot more dishes to do, but I get to watch the look on their sweet faces when I cook their favorite meals. Sure, my hair and makeup aren't always done but I do get free makeovers from my girls who remind me that I'm beautiful no matter what I look like. Our sex life is different now. We have to be creative and sometimes I'm exhausted but this won't last forever. Children are amazing! They are innocent and beautiful. Mine have taught me so many lessons...way more than I would have imagined. 
[deleted]
"Sucks to be jealous sweetheart" zoom on by
What? I never meant to suggest that in any way! Of course the attractiveness of the person making the comment has no impact on the offensiveness of the comment!  What does impact it however, is the tone and context with which the comment was made, as well as the content of the comment itself. If anything, a more analogous quote would be "if a guy who has shown you no signs of being threatening or disrespectful does it in a tone that is friendly and simply appreciative, it's not bad", and even then, I was only saying that it doesn't seem bad to me, within the context of my community. I wasn't at all trying to discredit anyone else's feelings, or suggest that they are wrong for feeling that way, I was just providing a different perspective to be considered, and trying to understand from your perspective better.
This was exactly my experience, and I have blonde eyelashes as well. Barely a noticeable change even with the black dye and definitely not worth the time or money.
In this post, where did I link to my website? 
[deleted]
Wow, I didn't know that! Seems strange but I suppose there are reasons. I don't want to be rude but I'm overweight too and have always wanted to donate my body so what is the weight limit on donation?
&gt; "Wait a second...why is it okay for you to attribute this behavior to their blackness? Isn't that racist?"  A lot of black feminists discuss blackness and problems within it. It's not up for a white person to discuss that, which if that's what you're saying, I agree. For example, a black feminist on twitter I know (who I won't link because I don't want her to be harassed by reddit) always says she is mostly harassed by black men. If that's her lived experience, who am I to say she's generalizing?  To me, *in my lived experience in Brazil*, men (both locals and foreign) are generally sexist towards women. In my opinion, that's something that needs to be tackled. I tried to keep my post balanced but it's really hard when I am harassed 2 to 3 times a week. Maybe generalizing is useful when we are deconstructing things like masculinity. I also want to point out that all people are raised in forms that feed prejudice and perpetuates oppression and power structures.   Thing is, I *know* not all men don't respect women, because I *know* men who do, but pointing out generalizations is really unhelpful. Like it's derailing, and saying, "You've suffered this but not everyone is like that!!". Which is an obvious thing to point out, and I have generally found that it's mostly because the arguer wants to point out *they* are not like that.  I guess something to keep in mind is that when feminists say "men" they mean patriarchy or masculinity. I always say, not all men disrespect women, but all men benefit (in some way) from the patriarchy.  
I don't know why some people are assuming this isn't a sexism issue and is just an engineering issue. It is entirely possible, since I know little about the science of the topic, that it is a product of engineering as to why a female model is not necessary or appealing. It is also possible that this product of engineering can be used to hide the more sexists reasons as to why a female model does not appeal or seem relevant to the auto industry. The same can be said for the opposite reasoning where this issue is just being used inappropriately to point out an issue of sexism which serves more as a red herring to distract others from the engineering issues for the female model. I am just saying that if you don't have solid proof by having been around to psychologically analyze the important employees in the auto industry for years in order to learn if they are sexist or not then you shouldn't be throwing out the possibility that this can be a sexism issue or the opposite. Everyone just try to have an open mind.
You know damn well that if this was a man he would be in prison. 
It's not just "some reason". It's a reminder that anyone can be a creep like that, even someone that's just like your dad, brother, uncle, or friend.
If you don't mind explaing a little further so I can in turn understand you, what is your goal in making a hurried compliment to a stranger?  I understand that you will (of course) occasionally have opinions about how people look, and I'm not saying anything negative about that.  What I want to understand from you is what your intentions are when you decide to convey those opinions to another person.  If I understand your goals and intentions, I (or someone else) might be able to give more advice.  I guess what I'm asking is why you "want to acknowlegde the other persons looks."
I thought about posting this to /r/relationships but honestly I'm kinda afraid it'll be filled with comments telling me I'm crazy and we should break up and nothing actually helpful so I really hope its okay I chose to post here instead. Thanks to everyone who's taking the time to read and help me out here
You're right, I was sort of worried about when I'd bring it up and what if it didn't go well, etc. It definitely seems appropriate to talk about it afterwards!
&gt; Go to a beach in a thong speedo and see who tells you it's not ok.  In reality, I'd get stares from men **and** women, but no one would actually tell me it's not ok.  &gt; Your response is to deny the majority of responsibility on men, where it clearly belongs.  I don't claim majority of responsibility on either men or women, and wonder how you'd come to such a conclusion.  &gt; Men sexualize women and forbid men to be sexualized the same way.  Men "forbid" other men to wear thongs?  How so?  Men are socialized to avoid thongs.  It is society telling them that they aren't for men, and society includes both men and women.  &gt; Honestly, do you really think that's women's doing?  Do you think women would find a man attractive if he wore a thong?  Do you think they would do anything other than laugh if a man in a thong approached them on a beach?  Do you think women have zero affect on socialization within society?  Can I ask how you think they accomplish this, given that they are more than half the population, a big part in the upbringing of the majority of children.  &gt; Men often talk about not wanting to see that from other men.  I've never heard of a man talk about this.  Examples?  &gt; Men don't date women taller then them because it 'emasculates' them, which is insane to me.  Women don't date men who are shorter than them for the exact opposite reason.  Are you forgetting that?  &gt; That culture is changing slowly, but in general it's men who are against male sexuality displayed and fetishized the way women are.  All you do is restate your opinion.  Never mind having any sort of evidence to back it up.  &gt; Do you really believe that men subjugating women for thousands of years has no lasting social implications just 1 generation after husbands could beat their wives with a stick no bigger than their thumb?  Women had influence on culture even then.  Are you denying that?  Seriously?  &gt; Do you really not see sexual harassment on the street and date-rape culture in college? Do you actually think women are just as responsible for that as men?  Complete non sequitor...  How does crimes against women prove that women have no influence on societal norms?  &gt; Women do not sexualize and objectify women in a way that men are not societally allowed to be.  If I wore a tight skirt and tight shirt went to the bar, do you think any women would be responsive when I approached them?  You are kidding yourself if you think women have no affect on the behaviour of men.  Most men do everything they can to make sure that women consider them attractive.  Thus, women have an effect on the behaviour of men, and this includes the relative modesty of male clothing (in this case thongs).
[deleted]
I've seen in some of your other replies that you are going to schedule some one-on-one sessions for her -- that's great.  Since he is a friend of yours, I would not have him weigh in on custody or visitation.  But, it sounds like he will be a good person for her to talk to.  I agree the vacation thing is a bit...weird.  But, for now, the most important things will be getting some stability in her life and working with her mom/dad/stepdad to do that.  
I'm unaware of where she's located, but I assumed that she was from a western nation. Canada for example, allows abortions past the second trimester. Half of Australia does too, if there's a substantial risk to the mothers mental and physical health. In this case, this determining factor has far been exceeded.
This...  &gt;**When loads of men get together, they seem to want to prove to themselves who is louder, manlier, braver, who can get laid the most times.**  &gt;**The truth is that football (or soccer) has a huge element of lad culture and masculinity.**  &gt;**I wish men would respect women. I know this is not an isolated issue, but it does seem that a lot of men come here thinking all Brazilian women are receptacles for their semen or something or that they will welcome their advances.**   ...is a againt the rules.   &gt;**Grace: No tactless posts generalizing gender. We are a welcoming community. Rights of all genders are supported here.**  See the sidebar.  Edit: I need someone to explain to me how this is not a tactless generalization. Mods?  &gt;**When loads of men get together, they seem to want to prove to themselves who is louder, manlier, braver, who can get laid the most times.**   
Please don't make comments like this here.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Because I wanted to make sure I didn't give any advice about a situation I can't speak for, and don't have personal experience with. I didn't want a misunderstanding. And I said twice I didn't have kids, not 3 times.
That is a bummer. But...Happy belated birthday, regardless! 
&gt; What we need to work on is encouraging partners, men especially, to feel comfortable staying home with their children.  This. It needs to be seen as normal for fathers to take time off after having a child, and offering financial incentive may help. I'm currently pregnant (grad. student so not in employment, I simply have had an extension of my thesis due date). We can really only financially swing 1-2 weeks, which sucks, especially as we both identify as feminists, and for us, part of that is him being able to share a large proportion of the parenting responsibility. 
I agree. There's nothing wrong with wanting your body to look a certain way, especially if it boosts your confidence and makes you happier with yourself.   Sure, there are people who take it to extremes, but so what? It's their body, so let them do what they want with it.
As a retail employee at a plus-sized store, I have to say that I do the same thing all the time. Nothing gives a gal more of a boost than saying she is rocking what she's trying on, or that she can fit into a smaller size. Good on you, and be proud of what you have! 
I think you're right, it needs to be said. Even my fiancé is getting annoyed and he's pretty laid back. He's mostly annoyed because I'm really down these days because of it. I'm meant to be excited about planning my wedding, not frustrated and upset over stupid baby pressure! Thanks for your help :)
I tried both tampons with and without applicators, and I actually found it easier to apply without an applicator. You can actually feel where everything is going. 
How do you keep people from taking advantage of these system, i.e. having children over and over and get paid leave?
[deleted]
Hi, you should look into charities! There may be a charity that will cover the cost of your IVF or egg freezing. I underwent medical treatment that may have left me sterile, but before I did I was able to have 15 of my eggs frozen thanks to a charity called [Fertile Hope.](http://www.fertilehope.org/financial-assistance/women_app_rev2012_FINAL.pdf) It was completely free! This particular charity is for women diagnosed with cancer in their reproductive years, but your situation seems unique, and you may be able to find support there or at another organization.  Even if you are not able to carry your own child, freezing your eggs will give you time to wait until you are ready to be a parent and find a surrogate. I know how you feel - learning that I may never be able to experience pregnancy left me feeling pretty sad. But there are many options out there even if you do need an ablation or hysterectomy.  Hope that helps. Good luck.
[deleted]
Oh that's awful. If you don't mind me asking, what did the doctors do for you to control the bleeding? Did it work? Or did you just spontaneously stop? I found that initially, about 4 years ago when this issue started, the medications worked great. But it was almost like my body built up a tolerance and they just slowly stopped being of any use.  With the lack of energy, did you feel like you were seen as lazy? I often worry about that. I am a bigger girl, and working on changing that, but I seriously worry that people just see me as a typical, lazy fat girl.   Stress reduction, oh man I wish it were that easy. I am in the same boat as you, I just had exams for university last week, I've had to move back in with parents as my husband lost his job. Stress is my middle NAME, haha. But in all honesty, it isn't something I've ever connected with the bleeding. I might try meditation!   Thank you very much for sharing your experience with me. It's amazing the difference talking to similar individuals can make. Truly, thank you.
My guess is that you are feeling tired constantly due to the stress your body is in trying to keep up with blood production. And also being slightly anemic with the constant blood loss. Can I ask if the periods are just light each day or fairly heavy or alternating?  Just keep trying to get as much iron as possible in your diet and vitamin k.  Sorry you are going through this. I hope for your sanity that mother nature takes pity and stops her torture on you!
As someone who has been in a similar situation recently, I know how terrifying it is, and I feel for you.  And I want to start by saying that most likely it could be a cyst or ingrown hair, but it could be something else and if you have noticed anything else that hasn't been normal please also bring those up to your doctor, no matter how unrelated they may seem.    When I discovered my painful right-sided lump I google-searched and also came to the conclusion that it was most likely a bartholin gland cyst that got infected.  The doctor, OB, and a surgeon believed it was an abscessed cyst, but not of the bartholin gland because it wasn't quite in the right spot, and I had no swelling that is usually associated with those type of cysts.  So I was prescribed antibiotics and told to apply heat and it would dissipate. But it didn't, it got larger and more painful and it was at that point the surgeon wanted to make a small incision in my vagina while I was awake to drain the "cyst".  This is when he found out it wasn't a cyst at all, it was a blood clot.  He told me that he thought he got all of it and he would speak to my OB about it because it was "weird" to find a blood clot there.  Google searching vaginal blood clots came up with nothing except when speaking about clots in periods.  Nothing I could find in any forum or anything had a situation similar to mine, which only added to my anxiety. After about a week of healing I started feeling around just to make sure it was gone and my nightmare was over... but it wasn't.  The lump was smaller, but definitely still there and still painful.  So I went back to the OB who had told me he thought that the blood clot might in fact be an endometrial mass, and that I would need to have surgery to remove it.  A few weeks later, I had the surgery and discovered through lab tests that it was endometriosis.  I had other symptoms I thought were unrelated at the time so I never mentioned them.  I was too focused on the lump to really think too much about other things that were going on with my body.  It's been 5 weeks since the surgery and I'm feeling mostly healed and doing much better, even mentally, even though I know there's a possibility that the Endo could be growing on other organs...but the lump is gone for now and I'm feeling better.  Anyways I just wanted to share that with you, I know it probably wasn't that comforting, but I felt compelled to tell you.  No one knows your body like you do, so don't discount anything else that has been going on, if you've noticed anything.  Hope that you get this figured out and quick.  Waiting sucks, especially when you don't know what is going on.
True that. You want it to be an identifiable "creep". You're right, there's rarely such a thing.
Ignoring something worthy of derision is a form of enabling too you know.
[deleted]
Have they tried testing you for any genetic issues or diseases? http://www.livestrong.com/article/257540-what-are-the-causes-of-constant-menstrual-bleeding/  Im sure you've already taken the time to look this stuff up but just thought I would throw that out there. Was there a recent surgery before this happened? Anyone else in your family had this issue or have a diagnosis of some auto immune disease like Lupus? Hope this might help, best of luck to you!! 
Here's my brief story in an easy to read bullet list:  * Started the pill in my teen years * Was on it for 13 years total * Went off it last October * Cons so far: period is just slightly irregular, and cramps and other PMS symptoms are more noticeable than before but not awful or unbearable * Pros so far: increased sex drive, but only mildly so   I went off it for medical reasons as well and am glad I did. I haven't lost weight, but I also haven't had insane mood swings or crazy periods (thankfully!). Good luck to you!
I love being married and having kids. I would tell everyone every day about how awesome it is, but I don't want to bore people or make them sick with how fantastic it is to have a team of four people, two of which I made, and to know that we're in this all together. 
Guy here. I definitely agree with what everyone else has said about these just being thoughtless things that he's saying and he's not necessarily trying to be hurtful. I know I have had problems saying stupid things to my SO before she started calling me out for it.  My only thoughts were about Example C: &gt; "Wow, that was great. It's so much more taxing on my body than jacking off, though."  Well he's not wrong... Of course sex is more work than masturbating! Although, if sex is really that "taxing" on his body, unless you guys are having crazy monkey sex, he probably needs to get in shape...  &gt; "Can you be tighter somehow? Like exercises?"  Yes, you can. I know some people on here have said that you shouldn't have to do anything like that for him, but **if you want to**, Kegels are a thing, and different positions are also a thing.
Not trying to say what you did was wrong, but a stranger speaking up might make a world of difference to that girl (or anyone for that matter).
Thanks for your input and for giving some context to how these kinds of comments make you feel and why that is.  I agree with you that most of the time such compliments probably are made for less than noble reasons, and in all such cases, I can absolutely understand being offended and made indignant by them. That's kind of what I was getting at when I was talking about tone. It's the rest of the times which interest me, and which I'm trying to discuss (because I come from a community where that sort of better-intentioned sexual compliment is more common than the jeering, self-satisfying sort).   I can absolutely understand a woman having her defences up automatically when you hear any sort of sexual compliment or proposition, given the amount of dickheads you have to regularly deal with, and that has been something I've heard a few times in the more insightful replies I've gotten. It seems such a shame that it renders so many women unable to separate the two, or to give the later a chance to get to know the passionate, hard-working chemist in you, for fear of it being ignored over the attractive woman in you, but when I think about it, I'd likely be exactly the same in your shoes.
Yeah I intend to ask her again what she'd like me to do. My initial thoughts were 1) do nothing and avoid giving the words any power and also to avoid any potential escalation or confrontation 2) if I'm present, to stand by her if she were to tell him something like "I don't appreciate the random catcall, and most women don't either" 3) if I'm present, to myself tell the guy something like "Most women don't like catcall and find it degrading, harrassing, and annoying."
[deleted]
I just played it this last Sunday! I was excited when it came out, but I'm not much of a gamer so I didn't rush out to buy it. I'm glad that it went on sale during the Steam summer sale!
Have they tried a continuous GnRH administration like leuprolide or a SPRM? It would tell your brain to stop it and the other would tell your uterus to stop it. It would send you into a menopause-like state but my god, you might welcome the hot flashes at this point. I don't know if they're indicated for your problem (I'm a medical student, so I know very little and maybe someone on here can comment further with greater wisdom), but it might be worth mentioning to see if it's an option. If it worked, it could give you a little time to consider your options while feeling better.     As for the now or never aspect, I had to start chemo urgently and had a now-or-never situation. I was so sick that I decided not to store eggs, and now I no longer have the option of having biological children. I really think a therapist would be a good person to talk to, as well as a fertility specialist. See if there is ANY way to preserve fertility if you decide to go through with the surgery, including storing eggs and getting a surrogate. For me, I wasn't thrilled about not having a choice but the delay in chemo could have been fatal. It sounds like you're at a point where you need to do something or else your mental health will suffer significantly in addition to your current physical state.    Finally, I had severe anemia during chemo and it was pretty awful. The throbbing heart after climbing a few steps, extreme exhaustion, how EVERYTHING hurt and your fingernails get weird and everything tastes funny... lord. Eat lots of beets, get lots of rest, drink lots of water, and try to do things that you enjoy that are physical but not strenuous. I liked to get in the pool and water walk, and doing gentle yoga was nice. Acupuncture and massage helped me feel better too. 
Your relationship might just be getting boring. Most people who are dating wish to be in a relationship. Maybe work on that first before considering other options.
Something very similar happened to my dearest friend. Fibroids and eventual uterine cancer. She bled pretty much from the time she got engaged until two and a half years later when she had a hysterectomy. It's disheartening and sad and frustrating, and the endless medical stuff doesn't do anything for your stress levels. *hugs*
Oh my goodness! What an awful time in your life to be going through something like that. How did you cope? I can certainly imagine how horrible a time in your life that must have been, and I'm only half way there.  If you don't mind sharing, what made you stop after all that time?
Hey, I don't blame you. It's easy to develop that kind of an attitude when you're in an environment which fosters it. I understand that it must be a million times harder for a woman who has to put up with obnoxious and self-gratifying men giving her a hard time on a regular basis to be so blasé about it than it is for a gay guy surrounded by other gay guys who spent the better part of a century carving out their own space within a city where they could be open and honest about all aspects of their sexuality.  I hope things get easier soon, both for you, and for women in general.
If you sit down and talk about it make sure you say "I feel".  Also Oreo Cookie things "You do X really well, can you fix Y. And you also do Z well". Basically say something positive, give your critique and end it on a good note. A joke or something.  I assume there are more problems than just the dishes. I ended up keeping my dishes in my room in a similar situation. Just eliminating the opportunity for conflict fixed things until I could find another roommate.  Also, chore chart!  Have each person write down chores they like doing and chores they hate. Try and make it so everyone does chores they 'like'.  I don't think notes are passive aggressive if you have different schedules. And it reminds you to do it right then.
[deleted]
My periods are normally about 6 months apart. It's never been regular. When I first started the pill as a teenager my period came... and stayed for 3 months. I tried to talk to the doctor about it, but she insisted it was normal. I had a feeling it wasn't, so I had my mom take me to a different doctor, who put me on a different pill. And everything evened out.   That doesn't compare very well to your experience, but those 3 months were so incredibly frustrating. I felt powerless.  
If you arent worried about kids, there is always an endometrial ablation which is about a 30 minute procedure where your endometrium is fried which causes it to stop reacting to hormones that make it bleed. My wife had it after her tubal caused her to have very heavy periods. For her it was the most awesome thing ever, shes been about 3 years period free as there is nothing left to bleed and no side effects.
I'm 24 with no kids and on the Mirena now (had it about 2 years) and I love it so far!  I had to search far and wide to find an OBGYN who would let me get it though.  I haven't had to wear a tampon or pad since I've gotten it.  My periods are like nothing...  I do get cramping and mood swings a few days before my period (especially every other month - ovary thing?), but it is nowhere near as bad as my cramps were before going on bc.    My first bc was the NuvaRing, which I loved when I was 17/18, but it started annoying me after a couple of years, just the feeling of it always being there.  I had heavier periods on that, but didn't have the painful cramps, diarrhea, sickness, etc. that I had without bc.  I hope the Mirena continues working for me.  If not I was considering switching to a non-hormone IUD, but I'm not sure about how effective those are for cramps/painful periods.
[Kay.](http://time.com/2827314/most-stay-at-home-dads-not-there-by-choice)
[deleted]
I commented about paternity leave on the thread you mentioned because the issues are linked.  If my wife needs care after a C Section, or just general help because she recently gave birth and has an infant to care for, I'd like to be able to be there to support her.  And lets not forget situations of single parents.  What if the mom doesn't want anything to do with the child and its up to the father to take care of the infant?  Or, worst case, the mother dies during child birth and the father has to stay home with his child for a couple months?  Offering a man's opinion isn't turning things into a male-centered problem, but rather showing how are problems are intertwined and there really isn't as much separating us as some people like to think.  That said, there will be a little more male opinion expressed because of the higher ratio of men on reddit.  Be happy that so many men on here care and are trying to be respectful and understanding.  That's already a huge departure from 10 or 20 years ago.  Very few problems are women only problems.  As long as men have mothers, sisters, daughters, and wives, we're affected by these issues, too.  EDIT: To clarify, I'm not trying to be argumentative, but these issues matter a lot to men, too.  A chain is only as strong as it's weakest link and we are only as free and strong as the weakest and most down trodden among us.
Hard work good, hard work fine, but first take care of head.
Please do this.  
Thanks for your post, I understand that male opinion is not turning it into a male-centered problem. It feels very framed like that when you've been on Reddit forever, thank you (and others) for clarifying it to me.  
http://www.ebags.com/ is having a sale right now, and lets you filter by fabric/price. Might be worth checking out.
[deleted]
You need to send one clear message (like example in below post) stating you wish to have no contact, in any form, again. Keep it emotionless. Don't say anything like "I hate you, you're scaring me, I hope you die, you're freaking me out, can't we just be friends" - any emotion is good emotion to him and he'll feed off it.  At that point, if he contacts you again, you go to the police and file a report. They will likely grant a RO.  Workplace has nothing to do with it now - you are in control of the steps. If you get a RO, you give it to your workplace. If they were to facilitate the breaking of the RO by scheduling him near you, then workplace is in hot doodoo. Also, if they'd fired him before, it likely wouldn't have stopped him anyway. It might even confirm his belief that "the world is against us" - everyone is just trying to stop you two from being together.  Source: Been stalked.  
Freeze your eggs and use a surrogate.  Bam you don't die and you can still have a kid that's yours.  
Yeah. Being realistic and taking care of yourself (whatever that means for you) is all that should really matter, but I guess not. Which sucks since there are plenty of people on both ends of things who can't help the size they are because of genetics or medical conditions not brought on by their genes.  Mmm. Indeed. BMI should *really* be replaced with something better or just tossed entirely since it doesn't take muscle mass into consideration and was created by a mathematician, not a scientist (or a doctor, for that matter.) That's probably a conversation for a different thread, though.  
Now you're backpedaling. You said that I was so angry, but now you claim you knew I was joking. Which is it?
Not all men feel this way.  We know that George Clooney does.  It appears Brad Pit does not.  I think it's fascinating that you'd reject Angelina Jolie if she came on to you (or would you wait until after you sexed her?  I'm truly curious).    The only man who is important in this convo is OP's partner (if she has one).  Otherwise, there are tons and tons of men who don't care a bit about augmentation (and even more, hilariously, who *can't tell* unless they are told).  I do have the advantage of having interviewed young women about this issue for 20+ years (I teach a class on sex and gender and we talk about breast augmentation, beliefs about it, penis enlargement techniques, how people feel about it).  Guys go get that penis enlargement surgery (where the tendons holding the penis to its base are cut and the penis pops out - it's a porn star surgery, but of course, non porn stars get it too).  Some women absolutely can't stand it, but many women don't care.    I have naturally bigger breasts and have been able to deal with spurning unwanted attention since my mid-twenties, when I finally learned how (part of the trick is to avoid certain subcultures of men).    You have no idea how her current size looks or feels, btw - you're just saying that you like women (which is wonderful) and like how they look naturally (which is wonderful too).  But to discriminate against a woman who has augmentation merely because (why?  you don't like it?) is insensitive and really, in the end, rather controlling.  I hope you do not intend to be one of those hat guys when you start balding.  That's ludicrous too and a lot of us don't like it.  (Are you really going to bald comfortably?  And if your response is "people in my family don't bald) well, think about the others who do.  A person's self-image is a real part of their identity.  BTW, are you so far into this belief that you'd want a woman to self-disclose before sexing her?  Because it would be really weird to me that there would exist a man who, after finding out a woman he was sexually involved with had implants, needed to go find a different woman because of augmentation.  That's sort of how you sound.  Most men don't figure it out for quite awhile and I think it would be devastating to most women to be rejected six months into a regular sexual relationships just because of augmentation.  I sure wouldn't do that if my guy decided (for whatever reason) to, say, augment his hair. 
What does feminism have to do with hating men? If anything, feminism helps men by interrogating the fixity of gender roles. 
I can't say if you needed one or not, but I can tell you my experience with transvaginal ultrasounds. I had one when my periods were fucked up after getting off of depo provera. I never had a stomach ultrasound or whatever it's called when they ultrasound you from your stomach.. The radiologist or technician (this was a few years ago) was very gentle, easing it in at a pace I felt comfortable with. And there was lube. Lots and lots of lube. The wand was covered by a condom, and she squirted a lot of lube onto the condom prior to insertion. I was also experiencing quite a bit of pain during sex, so I was really concerned. It didn't feel any different than getting a speculum placed in (and I always have them use the smallest speculum they have).  You shouldn't be worried about your doctor being angry. If the doctor questions why you didn't get one, just tell them that nobody told you why you needed that one and you didn't feel comfortable.
Yup. I bet half the shit on everysub is made up. Everyone gets too involved over silly things. We're not on a debate forum where we can make change we just argue whole nothing happens.   Seriously - Why do you care so much?
[deleted]
The one he suggested me to I've been to before when I got pregnant with my first child. It's very uncomfortable, you go in for a simple drug test and you have to endure a meeting with a counselor, and it's very religious based. I have no issue with religion, I'm not atheist or agnostic, I just don't like religion that is pushed down a person's throat. It was not one of my favorite experiences. I know better than to go there or call, they would not leave me alone if I did.   I'm going to look into it, because I thought he was crossing the line. 
My personal record was 1281 consecutive days of bleeding, followed by 2 glorious blood free days, then another 410 days of bleeding.   After that I didn't get a period for two years, then had sporadic periods which would be two weeks or so of bleeding followed by a dry spell of sometimes a week, sometimes 3 weeks, more often 3 months, 6 months, 8 months... It isn't a fun boat to be in.   I am 25 now and currently on my 12th period in a row to have been 6 days on and 27 days off. My mother baked a cake and we wore party hats. There was confetti and glitter and ribbons. 
Taking a shit without my iPhone. Yeah, I feel so pitiful but I haven't been able to do this ever since I got my iPhone.  Also, taking a contrast shower every morning. Feels so invigorating.
I don't, I reply with links to comics strips and political cartoons that illustrate how unfair they're being.
[deleted]
BREAKING NEWS: The Pope is still Catholic. 
Yeah, but are you happy?    
I'm glad that you could achieve being together and go on with out part of your family. That's they're loss that they missed out on the chance to see you being happy.  It seems that the most important thing for me and my fiance is that we are together. When we are together, we are always at each other's side. 
You know, that's an odd way to assume how the OP is feeling. The boyfriend's action seems to make it look like he's avoiding OP meeting the married friend. It may or may not be intentional, but it's just a strange behavior that stood out and is causing confusion. That is all. It may or may not be a big deal, but comment like this is projection that leads to minimizing and invalidating OP's concern and feelings. 
I think it's 55% in Canada, too, for both maternity and parental leave. A common misconception is that Canadians on maternity/parental leave get paid 100% of their salaries. I am not speaking from personal experience though; any other Canadians care to chime in?
then you haven't seen any good boob jobs
Whether it's statistically gendered or not, there's no way to infer that it was used in a gendered context. Maybe 'pushy' is just the correct adjective to use when describing this person.  Other than that it seemed like a well written article, an interesting read. The writer did an excellent job in staying objective for the most part.  
I agree. Don't put yourself at risk just because you want children someday, because its a possibility that you won't be well enough to raise them if you  keep on like this. Adoption is always a more viable prospect, even if it's a bit difficult, than continuing through this just for the sake of kids, which, with this problem, you may never be able to have anyway. Take care of yourself first, please.   I hope you manage to get sorted. Can't ever imagine how difficult that must be. 
The SJW of the feminist movement, commonly seen on obviously tumblr, r/srs, r/feminism.   That's exactly it, you keep "hearing" about them but they are less commonly seen than normal, healthy, egalitarian feminists. The fact that they are heard is what is creating this negative view of feminism, the vocal minority can speak for the passive majority.
It is about time to settle. Your looks and ability to procreate are already going downhill, and will end up in free fall once you hit 35. You might have to settle with a guy of way lower attractiveness than your short time flings. If you dont, at 35 there are more women struck by lightning than there are marriages.   Reference http://www.usa.gov/Topics/Reference-Shelf/Data.shtml
[deleted]
Why should a woman have to hide her menstruation?
I'm in a similiar situation as you.  Not as long as you but I completely understand what you are going through.  My Doctor prescribed Megace to stop the bleeding and it worked, but it's only temporary.  I have until September to decide what they'll do next.  Mirena IUD (no way!), an ablation (Never!), or a complete hysterectomy (I think I'm still too young for that, 37.)  Where are you from?  There may be a better choice of Doctor somewhere close by.  BTW, my OB told me you can still get pregnant after an ablation but it will most likely be etopic.  I'm just not willing to put myself at risk like that.  (Someone please correct me if this is incorrect.)  Best of luck to you.
you should look up some of Clay Bennett's stuff, he's probably my favorite political cartoonist ever.
It wasn't just short comments, he wrote two fairly long, detailed blog entries about it. I read all of the links he was replying to as well. I agree that white people are sometimes attacked for their race, of course, but his attack on the Is This Racist guy seemed very unprovoked and unfounded - I mean of course he is not going to address racism against whites, that is not what his blog is about? It was obnoxious, and unnecessarily aggressive (he told the blogger "fuck you" more than once). Again, this shocked me because he is always so calm, even tempered, and reasonable with me, so I just don't understand.   I will definitely give him space to say his piece, though. 
Big tip:  don't offer compliments to any woman until you know her a little.  This can be seeing her several times in the same setting (apartment lobby, bar, restaurant, school, etc).  See how it goes.  Even better, wait until she responds to a smile and a simple hello.  Where I work, we're all so trained in how to behave regarding this issue (big lawsuits when this happens on a college campus, of varying kinds), that my male co-workers often ask in advance if it's okay to mention my physical appearance when I look nice!  These are men I've known for 25 years!  I had to rethink my own spontaneous habit of complimenting others (women have never complained to me).  So I did ask some of the men I've complimented whether it bothered them and all of them said, "More, please and can I compliment you too?"    If a woman compliments *you,* you can be pretty sure you can compliment her back.  (saying YOU SEXY is not a compliment).  I mean real compliments, such as, "That outfit is great on you."  Or "The red accent really makes that outfit."  Or "New hairstyle - looks great on you!"  This presumes that you are paying attention to style and to people's appearance well enough and long enough to make those statements.
&gt;If you don't mind me asking, what did the doctors do for you to control the bleeding? Did it work? Or did you just spontaneously stop?  She said she controlled it with diet change. She cut out processed foods and ate more iron rich foods. Never underestimate the power of diet.
[deleted]
Not for everyone.
&gt;some might be fully content being a teacher, or a nurse, or a stay at home mom. And there's nothing wrong with letting little girls know that...which today's feminism does not pay any attention to.  You know that feminism does support women doing those things if it's their choice, right?  &gt;As a society, we are 100% equal.  You're very ignorant. I really hope you take some sociology classes and history classes if you ever attend university. If not, you should do some research on the topics. There is an abundance of social scientific research that directly contradicts your belief.
how can surrogacy be treated legally the same as adoption?
What was his mental illness?
I didn't have my friends vote for me or against you.  Now you're outright making shit up, since you've run out of things to ignore  And yeah, trying to shut down people who remind you that your privilege can blind you to certain hardships was something I need to fight against because the article pretty much exemplified how people do that  And you're still refusing to talk to me instead of just screaming and whining that I'm trying to dominate the conversation.maybe that's why people are downvoting you?
I meant feminism in the form of her forcing her pro-choiceness taken to the extreme down my throat. It was pretty clear to me she had an agenda based around that kind of women's rights; I myself am a feminist and that's why I know she took her beliefs to the extreme in her attempt to "protect/save" me from ruining my life by having the baby, or whatever fuckes up logic she had going on.
[deleted]
Forgive me for the possibly ignorant suggestion, but is nexplanon an option? I don't have pcos but I do tend to bleed about 12 days a month, and I just spot a bit on this.
Well, this guy was blatantly staring (and nodding on top of that). In general, people do not like to be stared at by others and find it unnerving or simply awkward when someone is doing that to them.   I just had a construction worker who was on break, sitting on his truck, stare at me for like 3 blocks as I walked home on my residential street. It was very uncomfortable and upsetting to have this happen right outside my house.   In general try to be discreet. If you are doing that and only glancing, most women won't be bothered (or even notice). Also, be aware if the woman is significantly younger than you (or is possible a teenager) she is more likely to feel uncomfortable with you checking her out. It's not personal, but most people get more uncomfortable when people outside their age group show sexual interest in them. And it's far far worse when the man is old enough to be your father. 
There are downvoters here, obviously, with a decidedly different worldview.  
Unbelievable.  I'm getting a headache (tears of anger).  
&gt; Because the odds of something bad happening in a hospital bed are scarily high.  Can you tell me some of the "scarily high" complications that can occur during a hospital birth and not during a home birth (including figures of comparison if you can)?
does it say anything to you that the only other countries besides the United States that don't have paid maternity leave are Liberia, Papua New Guinea, and Swaziland? our human rights standards are comparable to third world countries. the rest of the world has realized that families are more important than business profits, and what you don't seem to understand is that maternity leave is demonstrably cheaper to the taxpayer in the long run. struggling parents will be less likely to have to rely on other social services that you are already paying into.  it seems to be working pretty well for the rest of the world. can we agree that societies should show some level of responsibility for its citizens? 
It is amazing right?   
I understand, it's like you don't have to touch the stove to know it's hot
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
That's great to hear. But I have to say, it doesnt even seem worth the effort to sign up for something I know is off-base with my personal view points. Like a red-pill online dating site. Just don't go there... 
pretty much describes the Catholic church really
Please. Paid time off at someone else's expense is not a human right. It's not at all cheaper - it just changes the collection method. The additional costs will be passed to consumers. Some families take advantage of social services (mine, and millions of others, just burn some vacation time and save some money ahead of the big event). Under this plan, the vast majority of mothers would become entitled to a new benefit at other citizen's expense. And when that expense hits the price tag on the milk, eggs, formula, diapers, gas, etc., additional families will be taken into the system of government dependency.  How did our country function this long without paid maternity leave? Did your mom leave you crying in a box in a parking lot while she worked 12 hour days? If you're like most of America, the answer is no - your parents took a financial hit and took care of you, at their own expense.
&gt;ar·cha·ic  &gt;ärˈkāik/  &gt;adjective       very old or old-fashioned.     "prisons are run on archaic methods"     synonyms:	obsolete, out of date, old-fashioned, outmoded, behind the times, bygone, anachronistic, antiquated, superannuated, antediluvian, old world, old-fangled  No, seems like more-or-less accurate word choice to me. The connotation of the word implies that the passage isn't used any more (patently untrue), but it was certainly written ages ago in a different time. And the meaning of the word definitely isn't contradictory to misogyny.
And I understand that, completely. But, as others have noted there are also that tiny percentage of men-hating feminists that end up weakening the idea at heart. Men-hating feminists aren't about treating men equal. I believe that's his point. Some "feminists" are not feminists but people that will argue women are right, even if they are actually wrong. 
I only get a period about once every 3 or 4 months on Implanon. It has ranged anywhere from light spotting for a couple of days to 2 weeks of continuous bleeding. Still not bad since I get them so rarely in my opinion.  No noticeable acne or weight gain, and it's definitely nice not to have to remember a pill or ring.  Honestly, it can be so variable from person to person, though, you never know until you've tried it.
HAR HAR HAR YOU'RE SO FUCKIN FUNNY.
my mom was lucky enough to have a job that provided maternity leave, but it shouldn't be about luck. every mother should have the basic right to spend time healing and bonding with her child. the rest of the world has realized this, the benefits have been proven and that's why EVERY COUNTRY except four has some form of maternity leave. it's about time that the United States adopted the ethics of a modern and caring society. 
adoption is a good thing, you'll make you happy and give a little child whose hope is lost a new chance, a new life. It will be really hard for you in the next months, so just remove it all. Your husband will understand you. And then, when you have removed it all, you are healthy again and strong, then start to adopt a child, mess with the government. You'll be strong and get this child, which you wanted for so long. I mean, you dealt with a 400 days period, you can do anything! ;) good luck in the future.
I try.  No but really, most of my dating experience happened when I was a little hottie, so I can't speak to it as well as others, but I felt that I should post something, no matter how little on topic after my other comment calling out that "thirsty" post. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
&gt; and for me having a biological child isn't worth dooming another life to chronic illness and disability  I wish more people had the same mindset as you. I think one of the key traits of a good parent is selflessness, and putting the needs of an already existing child (as well as considering the potential suffering of a biological child) above your own desire for biological children is a wonderful display of selflessness. That is way, way more important than sharing DNA.  
[deleted]
This is a gross oversimplification. 
Thank you for the encouragement and advice! Another commenter suggested looking at my diet, and I have had very good times on keto in the past for different reasons (I'm into endurance running and it helped until I just became unable to eat enough with how strict I was). I think if I do another modified keto and avoid so much coffee and spicy food and milk it would help a lot. I notice my face/hands get puffier and I generally am bloated and feel worse when I eat poorly (or average food choices even).   As far as doctors go, I will definitely ask about a reproductive endocrinologist at my upcoming appt, and I keep detailed journals of my symptoms for doctors to read, so I will add food diary to that as I am in the habit of tracking for my athletic pursuits!
My sister and I have PCOS. The longest she had hers was like 30 days.  I can't imagine how awful 400+ days. I wish you luck.
That's great! I'm glad it went well. 
You are wrong.
My mother had the same problem with doctors. My half brother is biracial so the doctor's would force my mother around telling her that she didn't have to keep the child. 2 years after my brother, she was taking birth control and that birth control they put in your arm that last a year(I can't remember what it is called). She was about to get married to my dad so she wanted to be able to have kids but the doctor she went to kept telling her "you should stay on the birth control, you don't need more kids." My mom was freaking out because she wanted to have kids with my dad. The Doctor was telling her his own beliefs that a woman shouldn't have children if she already had one with a different father, it would confuse her white children(which i didn't, by the way I was never confused on why my brother was biracial).   Then after she had my sister and I, she wanted to get tubes tied but the doctor kept telling her no because she shouldn't because she should have more kids. He kept forcing his beliefs on her. He kept saying that just because the husband doesnt want any more kids doesn't mean you should get your tubes tied. My mom was livid, because she had to have 3 C-sections(one for each kid) because she has torsion of the legs(basically didn't have child baring hips) and also endosmosis, so having another kid would kill her most likely because it was having 3 kids was so hard on her. She kept screaming at the doctor that she cant have anymore kids because of how bad the 3 were. But the doctor kept saying no until my dad stepped in and had to talk with him for about an hour until he agreed to do the operation. It is so messed up that doctors will force their beliefs on their patients. It isn't their place. If the patient knows what they want let them do it, it isn't their place to step in and say no because this what i believe.  I am truly sorry for your experience. 
I am totally with your discomfort on this (and I am disappointed but not at all surprised to see the Stormfront invasion of downvotes).   One possible silver lining is that, hey, he was at least reading the Yo Is This Racist tumblr. Given that you've had conversations about race and systems of oppression before (and presumably they've been okay), maybe this is kind of a yellow-flag situation. Were I in your shoes I'd try to figure out what would make you feel comfortable. If that's waiting to see if he ever makes these comments again, cool. If that's sitting down with him and asking about it, cool. If that's dumping him, now or later, that's cool too.  Good luck! This is tough.
&gt; but I will consider that for my next set  Do you still need to get them replaced periodically (with older implants you did), or is this just something you are planning to do by choice?  
I wonder why we didn't see all this outrage against the dudes circlejerking over [her](http://i1.kym-cdn.com/entries/icons/original/000/012/798/3tnyip.jpg)... It is a mystery.  
Of course, but just more of a heads up for other readers.
I believe your best course of action is to keep this to yourself. He confided in you, but, you are not responsible for his behavior. You are not responsible for reporting him. As a rule, most people who are going to get into hot water, can do it all by themselves. If he relapses, and some family member later asks you if he had discussed his intentions with you, you need only say that it is his business, and needs to be discussed with him. It really isn't your business or your responsibility even though you consider him a friend. If you volunteer to take the blame, you will get it.
uhhh she's not having repeatedly *skipped* periods, she has had a nonstop period for a year and a half. Maybe read the post before you get all holier-than-thou?
Usually in pregnancy hair stalls in the last phase (telogen - resting phase) rather than progressing to falling out and going back to the growth phase (anagen). Because of this, usually you have more hair on your head by the end of pregnancy, making it lush and full, but a few months later as hormones get back to normal, all the telogen phase hair falls out and you feel like you're losing a lot of hair but really you're just making up for what you should have lost in pregnancy. I'm not sure what the story was with your friend in that sense. Could have been a related to thyroid hormone or iron levels though, that can definitely cause hair loss.  It's unlikely that this would happen with mirena as there is very little systemic hormone and she probably maintained her usual cyclic hormones during that time, but who knows! Hormones are interesting, complicated things, hahaha.
Actually, in this case, not necessarily. I'm in the UK, and as the NHS does tests for free, they don't order them unless they are actually necessary. Having a TV ultrasound as well as an abdominal one is fairly standard when investigating menstrual issues, as it means you can get a picture of the ovaries and uterus from a different angle, and it's often clearer than the abdominal ultrasound one anyway.  OP, how do you find having smear tests done? I **really** don't get on with having the speculum inserted, but I found the transvaginal scans fine after the deep breath on the initial insertion. It feels a little odd when they move it at certain angles to get a better picture of various bits, but it has never been painful at all. At my local hospital they definitely use a significant amount of lubrication, as even after using the tissues they provide to wipe myself off afterwards, I've always found panty liners necessary too.  I'd suggest calling your doctor and explaining that you hadn't expected the TV ultrasound, and ask whether they still think it's necessary having looked at your abdominal one. If they do, take a couple of paracetamol (acetominophen) an hour or so before you're due to go, and you should be fine.
Come on!  Only 100 days?  Step it up girlfriend! J/k! :-)  Have you tried B-12 shots for fatigue?  I know they helped me.  I do not have fibromyalgia so I am not sure if that would effect you or not...
1. Hah.  2. Mm.  3. Please. I shouldn't have to look it up. It shouldn't even have a designation that renders it separate from the genuine movement for gender equality. Intersectional feminism should be the default feminism. Not for you guys though. That's just what you toss out there when you deign to acknowledge that there are other people besides straight pretty, well-to-do white girls. 
I had one for 18 months after my 3rd depo shot. Thought I was dying. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
My mother had this. Was stuck as "peri-menopausal" for two years. Of which included all medications (just about) that you mentioned and one blood transfusion before THEY would agree to a hysterectomy. I worry every month this will happen to me.   But she was not 25. I'm so sorry. I hope that isn't your only option. 
If this is an ongoing experiment, can you grab some stats for gender-neutral names too?  Establishing a "Reddit asshole baseline" would be sort of depressingly fascinating.
That is a very good question.  I used to drive myself crazy trying to determine why he would do those terrible things to me.    I stopped about two years after we divorced because it didn't matter.  There was no answer that would make it justified, or that would make me feel better.  So I just dropped it.
Even with the cast off, take it easy until the doctor gives the all clear. You'll eventually be back to or as close to normal as possible.
And regarding your "selfish" comment, what's more selfish? Me not wanting to pay for your time off, or you wanting me to pay for your time off? 
Please read "Shameless: How I Ditched the Diet, Got Naked, Found True Pleasure...and Somehow Got Home in Time To Cook Dinner" by Pamela Madsen.  Here's the link to the book on amazon :http://www.amazon.com/gp/aw/d/1605291757?pc_redir=1403464595&amp;robot_redir=1  I read this book for different reasons, but her story may speak to you.
Have a silly question. Why is /r/ShitRedditSays so demonized in the main subreddits? I've been there before and the only thing that I didn't like was some of the posts they linked to were very obviously supposed to be sarcastic, and not actually offensive. Otherwise, I like the idea of that sub. It's a place dedicated to pointing out the sexism on Reddit and calling them out for their bullshit. I don't see how that's bad at all.
I read it as a criticism of the show's portrayal of the decision more than the decision itself. They take something that's relatively safe *if* your midwife is a trained professional, which is less common in the US where it's not even regulated, and move the participants to an isolated area. Certainly the women in the show have emergency staff on hand in case something goes wrong, but not everyone can do that. The issue with this sort of show is that it simultaneously mildly shames women who choose something different for themselves and it portrays an inaccurate view of what's going on and how safe a medical procedure really is when there isn't an emergency crew on hand or when your midwife isn't actually as well-trained as you might hope.
1.  It will make a bad thing worse. 2.  Good luck proving it if the manager knows how to keep their mouth shut. 3.  Gotta mandate it or else culture pressure will still have an effectively difference even if they are technically the same under law. 4.  It is a cost that needs to be considered.
She brought up that exact quote and said that it often gets misconstrued for meaning that the wife basically needs to be a slave to the husband. She said that it basically just meant that she had to honor him/respect him/die to her own selfish desires for him and the good of their marriage (but he would have to do the same for HER.) But really, as I said, the arguments almost always had holes in them and it really seemed like they were just making things up as they went along.
It's not the only quote ;)  I agree that many many Christians don't follow literally.  But let's not call a spade a heart.  There are many places in the bible that make this clear.  Obey is not really that ambiguous.  
The Monistat 3 day is too strong for my parts too.  I use the 7 day kind.  It's best to use it at night so it doesn't leak out all day.  And it's recommended to see a doctor for a first yeast infection so it can be properly diagnosed.  Treating a yeast infection promptly before it really sets in is the best way.  Otherwise your symptoms can be worse.  Don't worry you will get better.  Avoiding sugar and keeping the area cool and dry will also help speed recovery.  I have used ice in a baggie wrapped in a towel to help with swelling.  Hope you get some relief soon.
Is Sarah Palin representative of feminism if she calls herself a feminist?
Hear me out...you have your boyfriend who you love and he supports you emotionally ALL the time. Probably more than you know; yet, for your sexual support, you go to other people?  In that situation it is the BF who feels like he is being used. And is he not? Is it really that fair for him to get upset thinking about how he does everything for you, and how you want and desire for him to continue doing exactly that, but also want him to let other guys fuck your brains out so you can get off on them and their attractiveness, but not involve them in your emotional affairs at all? Just he is the only one involved in supporting you emotionally?  I think a true open relationship would have several people all taking part in fulfilling both your emotional and sexual desires. All contributing equally. That sounds like poly-amorous to me. But the thing is, one the surface - open relationship kind of screams that one person is going to be used.  I do NOT support the ideas above, I was just giving you an example of what guys MAY think when you mention open relationship. I'm just trying to help you understand what's going through his head when he gets upset over the thought of it.   **TLDR;**  it probably sounds to him like you want to keep him as an emotional crutch but go get all your sexual desires tended to by other people. Almost as if he's being completely used and that you don't really desire him anymore.   That's my best guess here. Hope this helps, and also hope it didn't offend you, I was just trying to give you a guy's logic.
I definitely can see what you mean; that makes the most sense. I thought that pro-choice (regardless of *how* pro-choice you were) was a fundamental feminist thing. Granted, I only get my information on feminism from this subreddit so I will absolutely not claim that I have a clue what I'm really talking about!
Based on what you've said I think you should see a doctor, but for some quick relief try using yogurt. Plain, UNFLAVORED, unsweetened yogurt. Just glob it all over your vulva and put some inside your vagina. If what you have is, in fact, a yeast infection then yogurt should be a miracle for you.  I know this probably sounds kind of out there, especially since you're young and most likely have never heard of this. I don't really know what to say (*trust me, a random anonymous voice on the internet you know nothing about, suggesting shoving food inside your vagina*, right?) but google "yogurt for yeast infection" and that will at least show you that I'm not joking.
[deleted]
No, I said that THE READER wouldn't understand economics well enough to see the flaws in their logic.   Learn to read.
It's relatively new and doesn't get as many submissions as this sub, but the submissions they do get are usually high quality, well written and thought provoking.
Thank you!
It doesn't sound like your in *any* position to tell me I have a "false understanding" of this then.
I don't believe I've made any claims about whether you "know anything at all."  All human beings know *something.*  Whether they know much about the topic they claim to (say, "what many men think" or "what most men think") is highly debatable.    I have lots of experience with men, too.  We could start comparing total numbers of men known, I suppose.   Where did anyone say "experience is all that was asked?"  When did that become a rule here?  How many men do you suppose you know well, to the extent that you know their experiences with various kinds of breast augmentation?  How often does the topic come up?
[deleted]
I've been in this exact place - all of my doctors thought I had an eating disorder, but really I was dealing with panic disorder. It did not get fixed until I saw a psychiatrist, which I recommend you do ASAP. If you can't, ask your GP about anti-anxiety medication in the short term, like Ativan. (Also go see your GP for a thorough check up anyway, to rule out any other issues).  People are sometimes resistant to taking medication, as I was, but personally I found it a heck of a lot better to take an Ativan than to suffer. This is a medical problem that is affecting your health. It's not a long term solution, and you should explore therapy to deal with your stress, but a short term medication to treat anxiety symptoms can be enough of a band-aid to help you get started.   You can also ask about an anti-nausea medication like Zofran to help keep your food down. And Boost, while not particularly delicious, can help you gain or keep weight on. Maybe your doctor can refer you to a nutritionist?   Like I said, I've been there, and more than once, so I know it sucks a lot. You might be afraid of everything, but you have to take steps to get help. Once you first reach out it starts getting easier. Best of luck, you will be okay.
Haha, he's the one the suggested wine. I'll see if I can pry some better ideas out of him. And I agree, beer is definitely better than wine!
Favorite detective is a tie between Stabler and Fin.  Benson kind of annoys me at times.  My favorite episode is when Benson is driving Stablers wife to a pregnancy doctors appointment and is T boned by a drunk driver.  Then her water breaks while they try to rescue her with the jaws of life.  A super powerful episode that nearly made me cry.
I'm glad you're here!
Yeah, I'm pretty good at insulting people.  How about that.  I have no idea whether I'm smarter than anyone else.  But you continue to see things in a pattern that's more black and white than what I'm accustomed to (especially on this subreddit).  You could consider trying to learn the culture here before wading in.    I do not hang out with people who agree with me.  I hang out with people I enjoy and who share central values.  You can share lots of values and still disagree.  I dislike many kinds of people, but since I am in a profession that has required decades of arguing with people with different viewpoints, I'm pretty accustomed to it.  I just prefer the discussion be reasonable.  You continue to *try* to be insulting, but you're not there yet.  You're just telling me a bunch of stuff I already know.    You need to find people with *different* viewpoints who also spur you on (you might like /r/philosophy - where I certainly can't chime in because...reasons...but there are certainly different viewpoints and a high level of discussion most of the time).  I'm not insulting you, I'm just saying you can only make the kinds of arguments you're trying to make by developing tertiary (and further) ways of building your arguments.  
I just don't understand why you would put yourself in a situation where you may not get the proper medical care quick enough to save you or your child should an unforeseen complication arise. I understand that midwives are there ready to deal with what they can, but we have *modern medical facilities* designed to give a mother and their child the best chance at making it through the birth not just alive but healthy. I don't think I could ever forgive myself if I did something like this and my baby didn't make it or suffered complications that handicapped them.  *Edited for clarity because when I type on my phone I apparently use weird wording
Because you have no data to back up your claim I hope you appreciated the free prostate exam you got by sticking your head up your ass.
Can someone explain the incest thing
I will, thank you.
Don't leave reddit - just don't frequent the darker parts. Unfortunately many default subs are cesspools so change your sub list and you should find your experience improves. 
[deleted]
The same thing guys do when they see ignorant comments against them I guess?
You can't really compare that to reddit. That would work if you have face to face interactions with individuals but over reddit you will get no where by arguing with sexist trolls. That's just my opinion. 
I seriously believe that not every single person in the world is as simple as you'd like for them to be.
I'm not sure why it wouldn't make it, but thanks ;)
Sometimes people are not very good at saying what they mean - I've recently lost 30 pounds and my SO told me I was fitting well into my fat jeans. 0_o I was like, you mean my SKINNY jeans? He did and was trying to compliment my butt. But it was a miserable fail for a minute. This from a man who regularly asks if/what I need from him and is never mean to me on purpose.  Just be vocal about your needs, too. A good relationship is a two way street and no one is a mind reader. What I hear him saying in D is that he's happy AND content with you but needs to realize that there's a difference between being in love and loving. You're never going to be ecstatic all the time.  Just be brave enough to talk to him right away if he's says something hurtful. You might even have to model it for him - in your example B, I would say 'I'm gonna pretend you just said you saw a pretty girl and thought of how sexy you think I am' or whatever it is you would have liked him to say instead.  If he discounts how you feel after you've told him, then it's time to go fishing for someone who hears you. But I bet you can work out if you can have an honest, non - confrontational conversation with him. It's worth it! 
Good for you for keeping your cool when he started talking about prayer.  I might have lost my shit, lol.  I'm wondering, though, couldn't you have politely told him to stfu about your pregnancy plans because his advice about your situation was unwanted? And then, because it's unlikely he'd immediately take you seriously, told him to stfu about it in less polite terms?  I've had to do this with a new dentist when he wasn't getting the hint about me not wanting any tooth-whitening treatment.  Also, had to be a forceful dick with a new doctor who wanted to argue with me because he thought my minor sinus infection might be just an allergy or an allergy plus a sinus infection so he recommended starting allergy medicine by itself instead of an anti-biotic and allergy medicine.  (This made no sense to me since if it was a sinus infection, then starting with the anti-biotic first would mean I would not need to come back -- which was seeming more and more attractive the longer I argued with this guy.)  Pretty freaking annoying when folks you are paying need to be reminded who the boss is.  Spoils your whole day.
Oh my gosh. How do you even cope? I feel like I'm losing my mind already. If I may ask, how old are you? I assume you've tried all the same things I have and then some, yes?
High-five, unlikely birth buddy! My parents tried for 8 years, IVF wasn't really plausible for them, and my mom underwent really invasive, cutting-edge at the time surgeries which put her in the medical journals. 1986, there I was, first viable birth after said surgeries. I sincerely hope the OP understands tech only gets better, and her own health and comfort are paramount--baby times will only get easier.
Thanks! Glad you switched!
Wow what a rollercoaster! Which did you find worse, with or without? Don't you just love when doctors ask "When was your last period?" or my personal favourite "how far into your cycle are you?". Everytime my response is "What's a cycle?" just to drive my point home.
It isnt just difficult.  My aunt and uncle were on adoption lists for 10 years before they gave up.  They tried to conceive for 5 years before that.  Adoption in Australia is an impossible dream for some.
True, I guess it's just hard for me to picture it myself.  Maybe I am just giving people to much credit. 
If you're not used to carrying a purse around, you have two ways to go about getting used to it:  1) Get a super-cheap purse from Walmart/Target/Amazon and only fill it with your bare essentials. This way you can practice carrying a purse without also worrying about the cost of repair/replacement in case you lose or damage it.   2) Get a more expensive, good-quality purse and fill it with whatever you want. It will cost you a lot more if you lose or damage it, which should be incentive enough for you to force yourself to quickly develop a purse-carrying habit.  
Wrong.  Listen, you REALLY need to start reading these things before commenting on them because you sound like an idiot.  Here is what I'm saying...  They have a political agenda.  They use flawed arguments to push said agenda.  They likely DO understand that their assertions are invalid, but push them anyway to further said agenda.  In other words, they are intentionally misleading the reader.  Because they have an agenda.
What do you do with all the kids whose parents died &amp; have no family left or the kids who get taken away because their parents are abusive or drug addicts etc. ? Is there a foster care system? I never knew that in Australia people didn't really do adoptions (I'm from Canada). Do you guys have a foster care system?
Pretty Much 
[deleted]
Are you talking about "The Business of Being Born"? It's quite interesting and made me realize that a lot of modern medicine might not be for benefit of mother and baby, but instead the doctors and medical system.
Go back up to 21, and that's where my reading starts.
"ughhh I've got you tagged as 'feminazi', nobody gives a shit what you say, shut up" and wind up at -8 downvotes, hidden from view, like it never existed.  I had a guy admit he went through my archives to downvote every post I ever made. Why even bother anymore? Nobody takes us seriously, and the guys who even vaguely agree that we're humans don't want to risk being ostracised, or being called a 'white knight' who only acknowledges what we say so that we'll fuck him out of desperate gratitude, that he says nothing. What the fuck do you even do when everyone else rolls their eyes?
[deleted]
If only the boys would let me into the treehouse.
[deleted]
That sounds vaguely familiar. I'll be honest, it was one of the late night, watch everything, can't sleep binges, so I don't quite recall the title. 
I'd love to know why subreddits that are most frequented by women don't suffer this same bullshit.
Afraid that while I am diametrically opposed to most of Wendy Davis' beliefs, I can also objectively say this woman is damn near a total dimwit. She will lose to Greg Abbott, and rightfully so - Abbott may be an establishment goon, but he is a lot more savvy and intelligent than Davis. If you think for a second she could beat him in a debate, you greatly underestimate ole noodle for legs.   EDIT: Spelling, also a note - Don't downvote this because you don't agree (or if you do, at least respond). It is contributing to the conversation, and I mean no offense with my straight-forward and blunt speech. 
I wasn't suggesting that he should have made the claim that she would not face discrimination as that is just not accurate, but from OP's phrasing, it sounds like it is the guy's personal opinion that she *shouldn't* be taken seriously, or at least that he sees no real problem with it. If what he meant was well-meaning, he might have said, "Being a pretty girl in coding is not easy; you will not be taken seriously by many coders, etc."
not necessarily. Lots of arrogance and entitlement in rapists, aside from him being a worshipped football star. Also he may have been hoping that she just thought she got drunk and hooked up. Or he just didn't care.
at a guess, highly unlikely.   OP can't stop menstruating. her body is constantly in the process of shedding the uterine lining, so a fertilized egg of any kind is not going to be able to cozy down and implant because she'll just menstruate it out.   IVF involves fucking with your hormones so this doesn't happen. considering OP has had her hormones treated to get back to baseline for over a year I am highly doubtful that her body is going to respond to them if it hasn't already.   also, pregnancy is dangerous and requires a lot of energy/nutrients. OP barely has enough iron in her blood to post things on the internet, what makes you think she's got enough to handle a pregnancy? 
I completely agree that poor women in rural Texas are getting the shittiest end of the stick. I am terrified for them. I'm guilty and grateful that I do not number among them. I just think that to get all women to care, even if they have means to run out of state in an emergency, they need to understand that their lives just got even more disposable. When women start understanding how far reaching these laws are, they might cop a clue as to how the state is trying to nationalize their bodies. That Munoz thing...what the ENTIRE fuck? &gt;.&lt;  Suffice it to say, everytime I have gone to SCOTUS blog this month, I've done so with a puckered butthole. The fact that I was Pro-Life, albeit before the invention of the internet, weighs heavy and low in my belly.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Not so much in Austin. The cities in Texas are largely progressive with Austin being at the helm. Women's issues are pretty much covered in the major metro areas. It's the women in North, West, and South Texas that are being hit the hardest. There is a region the size of Connecticut here without access to reproductive care. 
&gt; 2) No night sweats  If you're at a certain temperature/humidity threshold where not having that extra layer would get you on the right side of it, sure.  Just remember that your bed sheet &amp; covers are your clothes when you sleep naked, and might need to be moved to a different cleaning schedule.
[deleted]
Try going braless around the house more often, if it doesn't give you severe back pain. You're more prone to boob pain due to size if the muscles that hold them up are weak from constant bra use. Until then, this sounds weird but it'd be fairly simple to make a super comfortable and breathable bra out of elastic tiny-hole mesh material.
Call your/a/any doctor immediately.  EDIT: Don't want to make you panic but you really should call a doctor asap.
HOW?!
[deleted]
[deleted]
So, your user name.....I'd think you are ok. Perhaps he saw you changing, was afraid you were seeking more than he had offered, and figured he'd better say something or lose you. Go back. Put it back together. Be open and honest and let your relationship develop naturally. It may or may not work, but you'll never know if you don't give it a chance.
[deleted]
OP needs to read her some Dale Carnegie, stat.
Snooping is bad, obviously, but I think that anyone who would end a marriage over it is either hiding something from their partner or is just not that into the marriage in the first place. If I found my girlfriend snooping on me, my first worry would be to help her come to terms with whatever anxiety caused her to think that it was necessary, not to get upset at her about snooping. I'd like to think that this is how most people would react in a caring relationship. Everyone falters, the hard part of being in a relationship is being there to pick your partner up when they do. If someone can't manage that I don't see how they could expect to have a successful marriage.
You suggested that, because PC volunteers knew that they risked being raped, their healthcare shouldn't cover the consequences. Uprightsquire was sarcastically suggesting that, because servicemembers knew that they might get shot at, the government shouldn't have to pay to treat them when they get shot.   TLDR: your logic is terrible. "They knew the risks" is no reason to deny someone life-saving medical care.  EDIT: I confused sobok with MrOppositeDay. This comment was uncalled for.
" I don't even use deodorant anymore and haven't for years because there's just no sweat to deal with." Reddit, the only place where bra-less women don't sweat. 
[deleted]
Being drunk should be a clear no. He did cross the line and that isn't okay. You shouldn't have to feel dirty or embarrassed but sadly thats what we're taught. You were drunk and very obviously pushing him off of you. His actions weren't okay. I hope you realise that you aren't dirty and that you didn nothing wrong
Atomic pink has been coming up red for a lot of people recently, I'm sure I heard SFX changed the formula. Next time you dye I'd use Virgin Rose diluted, it should be properly pink then. And as everyone else has said, just wash your hair a few times with clarifying/dandruff shampoo. Dish soap works as well, just be sure to deep condition afterwards!
[deleted]
No problem. I'm going to start with CP, as knowing this helps with checking CM. You check your CP by putting a finger inside your vagina and feeling your cervix. After you've done this for a while, it's easy to tell when you're fertile because your cervix feels very different. When you are not fertile, it is low, hard, and closed. But when you are fertile, it moves up higher, gets softer, and opens up; it feels kind of like your semi-parted lips when you're fertile, actually. So I know when I'm nearing my fertile window because the first thing that starts to happen is that my cervix starts to move upwards.  Yeah, you have to be comfortable with your own body to do this, but I looooove how much more comfortable I am with myself since I started. And doctor's visits are much easier now that I'm so educated about/in tune with my body.  You can check CM in a couple of ways. 1. Look at the toilet paper after you wipe, or 2. Check it internally when you check CP. CM is also really easy once you get into the habit. When you're not fertile, sometimes you have no CM, and a lot of the time, you have creamy CM (kind of like lotion). But when you're fertile, you have what's called eggwhite cervical mucus. It's called this because the consistency is quite like eggwhites; it's really stretchy, clear, and wet. [Here's](http://www.babycentre.co.uk/l1047500/what-cervical-mucus-looks-like?ModPagespeed=noscript#/0) a series of photographs demonstrating this.  These two signs don't sound easy at first, but I promise you that what's great and empowering about this is that it becomes really easy once you get to know your body. When I check CM, I just need to look at the TP or touch myself just barely inside my vagina to know, and I can tell by feel really quickly.   Ovulation pain is not something everyone experiences. But if you do, it's another indicator that you can monitor and chart. Personally, I get generalized pelvic pain when I'm in my fertile window, and when I'm ovulating, I get sharp pains on the side that I'm ovulating on. But this only works for the women who experience it; many don't. It's totally not necessary, as CM and CP with BBT is more than enough.  There are other signs, too! First of all, if you get a fertility microscope, you can look at your saliva. When you are fertile, you demonstrate a [ferning pattern] (http://www.ovatel.com/fertility-ferning-%E2%80%93-understanding-your-fertility-window/) in your saliva. Also, you will notice changes in libido if you are charting. Your libido is a lot more active when you're fertile.
Your first statement sounds a lot like blaming me (the victim) for being there.  And how as a guy am I not threated when a bunch of people are making crude sexual comments about me and treating me like a piece of meat.  I would never treat anyone like that because it's wrong.  I'm not entirely sure how I'm not supposed to feel threatened when a couple of drunk guys are talking about what they'd like to do to my ass.  I think you're also misreading my statement.  I said when gay guys hit on me in general I take it as a compliment.  There are perfectly acceptable ways to flirt without being crude.  That's fine.  Those types of people I'll generally have a nice conversation with and turn them down politely.  I did not stop to talk to the guys making crude comments about me while I was working.  If you took my story and simply changed me from a man to a woman and the guys were straight, its the exact same situation.  I was approached by some one making grossly inappropriate sexual comments that made me feel very uncomfortable.  What made it worse was it was my work place and my manager wouldn't do anything about it because he had the same opinion as you.  That I'm a guy and it shouldn't bother me.  I would say your being singled out by sexually aggressive people as targets.  The fact that it is mostly men is a separate sociological issue.  They single you out as a target because they're ass holes that think other people are less than them.  If they were heterosexual women, they'd think the same way towards men.  They say it because they live in a culture that accepts or even endorses that kind of behavior.  The women in my example don't because there isn't really a culture where that is considered acceptable.  So what I'm saying is that those shit nuggets are on all sides, it's just some are more vocal than others because of their culture condoning that kind of action.  So in the end, she's not alone, and there are more people than she thinks that understand what it's like to be treated that way.  There's more of us than there are of them.  They're the loud minority.
[deleted]
The way I think about it is that in youth, our personal capital (capacity to get enjoyment out of say $500) is high while our capital may be low ($500 may seem like a lot). However, in adulthood, the two are reversed.  I balance enjoying myself with saving money, although part of that is that unless something goes terribly awry, I will be a doctor. I definitely keep enough for emergencies. Other than that, I try to treat myself to something every two weeks at least.  Personally, I find that things aren't as enjoyable as doing things, so that treat is sometimes pretty cheap -- renting a boat, volunteering, going to a parade etc. However, I also buy treats for myself that I can afford. 
To be fair, she was smeared pretty badly when she first brought up running for governor.  She was called a liar for supposedly overstating her single-motherness I believe and regularly in my part of town gets called Abortion Barbie. 
I remember watching her on tv, in those pink tennies. It was really emotional and I cried a bit, I tear up thinking about it now.  I've had an abortion and to see one woman literally make such a huge stand was overwhelming. Wendy won my vote that day. 
You might be surprised.  I've heard from more than one socially awkward dude that they wished they were a hot girl, because hot girls get laid Alllllllll the time, don'tchano.
Ok definitely will be getting it numbed. What's the nuva ring like?
I am a fan of the free-boob, however with age and dd cup size that has become more of a negotiation between freedom and comfort.  I find the best compromise a lot of the time is soft bras, that give just a slight and comfortable support, but feeling barely there and usually being pretty enough to be a bit of a wardrobe statement (if you want them too!)
It's something I throw out when I'm feeling flush or deserve a treat -- because it means new underwear!  But I don't have any problem wearing it again after laundering for a while.
I buy a lot of darker colored underwear so it doesn't show (obviously, I treat the stain and whatnot). As long as they've been washed well, they're still perfectly usable.
I doubt a grown ass man at a job interview said you're too pretty to be taken seriously. At GOOGLE?! If this really happens so often you really ought to secretly record it on your phone and leak/sue them for discrimination. 
I hope your mail carrier sees the PP logo and says to themselves, "This classy individual supports everyone's right to health and wellbeing!"
I don't know... It's weird that he considers something like that too comfortable. I would consider too comfortable to be something like not showering because hey, it's not like you have to impress your new date... Or now that we're living together you best get in that kitchen and make me a sammich...  I would have a talk with him about what else he might think are things he would consider too comfortable... You might find it hard to continue a relationship with him.  I'm currently on year 16 with mine and we've been through some odd shit. If it wasn't for having an open mind and some basic understanding on psychology and human physiology there'd be no way to cope with some of the things that are bound to happen living with someone of the opposite gender. 
Absolutely never because I know the difference between what I want and what I need.  You sound like you are on the right track to be a mature adult, to me, and when you really want/need something you will have the money because you didn't buy every new blouse and perfume that caught your fancy for a minute.  
[deleted]
Ah yes, too lazy to look something up therefore you just make it up.  Gee, I wonder what a discussion with you will be like.
Wow. Way to validate the utterly sexist way OP is treated. 
I do agree that it is unfortunate that Obamacare basically gave employers the incentive to cut hours to avoid increased insurance fees.  And, while not all couples who get married would get access to potential insurance benefits, even if they don't, at least it is a wash -- it doesn't cost them more.  As for a wedding being expensive -- again, an expensive wedding is a choice.  People can choose to march right down to the courthouse -- it costs next to nothing to file for a marriage license.  So, I still see nothing that in any way restricts or makes marriage a "luxury" for the "upper class".  It is merely a choice -- a good one for some.
[deleted]
seriously. i don't go around asking my friends to prove themselves, wtf is up with that. neither are they asked to provide proof of their skill when they vent about something - ever.  i majored in cs in college, i've been writing code in some fashion or another for a huge chunk of my life... what is it going to take to get people to stop asking? what? like IOCCC-winning most obfuscated C ever to tell people to not let the door hit them on the way out?  wait, not quite sure they'd get it - selling UI components is a real thing and I've considered it a few times in the past. if they don't know that I'm not sure what they know.  oh my god i'm so fake and so are the other awesome ladies I had dinner with last night. oh wait no, not rly. /me flounces off to google i/o.
gah im too scared of messing it up. waiting for her to try and kiss me 
You can be pretty and smart. My wife is smart and gorgeous.  Downside is, she completely owns me ...so... yeap.
No.. You're not. Stop living in denial. 
It's up to you but as a big-boobed woman myself, it's much easier to run with a well fitting sports bra. Nothing moves, it doesn't hurt, and it doesn't entice complete and utter morons to yell at me. 
[deleted]
Baptism of fire up in here! Haha.
Well. I would consider that sort of behaviour very rude, so it's not really what I had in mind.   I just want to harass people a bit. You know. Looking at people, trying to start conversations with people, smile a bit, maybe make eye contact, telling people if they drop something on the floor, etc. All the things that the people at /r/askwomen find very creepy.   If someone feels threatened, they can just say so. It's not like I want people to feel threatened. I just want to interact with people.   Most women here seem to have a huge problem with that, but I think most women outside of this little internet community don't really mind that much.
If you think that's what I'm doing, you misunderstood me.   I'm all for choice. That's the point. But a choice that is based on social pressure and isn't equal isn't much of a choice.   The point is removing the stigma of working mothers, stay at home fathers, and the societal expectations that woman are caretakers and men are breadwinners. If you want to do those things: fine. I just think they shouldn't have negative aspects unfairly tied to them or all land on one gender.
unfriend whoever is posting this stuff. This was just posted in this sub, and IMO the best response is still to unfriend.
Maybe it was the Frog bra?  [Title Nine](http://www.titlenine.com/category/frog+bra.do) discontinued them a while back but is apparently still working towards fixing that.
Well, what is the point behind the statistic that women earn less than men?  That statistic simply shows that if you look at all women and ignore very important factors, then they earn less than all men (on average).    But you have to ask yourself, what is the point of that statistic?  does that statistic demonstrate that women should be paid to have children?  By whom?  (Who pays for it?)  Doesn't that degrade the incredibly important station of motherhood?  Doesn't that turn women into baby making services?    So the fight for equality really should be focused on equal pay for equal work.  Take all women who work a certain shift who have X years of experience in a certain profession and compare their wages to all men who fit the same criteria; according to that incredibly important statistic, women and men earn about the exact same (within a small margin of error, women often make more than men).    While there are still some areas where the gender equality fight is still raging, some other battles have been won; we should embrace the fact that the gender wage gap is gone.    Now, whether a forum devoted to talking about women's perspectives should be all pink and purple thus perpetuating gender stereotypes visavis colors... perhaps that is a symptom of a societal problem.  But the wage gap is gone.  
I just went through a month of their history and this is the first time.  Your attitude seems misplaced.
As a guy cat, meeeeoooowww, baby.
There's a 50% chance that Super-Muscles was a good dude.  BUT, there's also a 50% chance he was white knighting because he thought you were foxy. So, your weight probably isn't too much to worry about.
[deleted]
The product of forced SHARPs training like 25/7 366 days a year the army likes to conduct.
There it is again! It warms my heart! :):):)
I think in Saudi Arabia theft is still punishable by chopping hands off. Though women can vote there now. Voting is kind of useless in Saudi Arabia so it doesn't mean much. But Saudi Arabia has made some advances in women's rights, like letting women drive on their own. 
I love you
No I get that, I mean what do think of the establishment itself and what they pay waitresses to do. 
[deleted]
Here's the thing. If someone already holds sexist beliefs, why would they pay attention or give weight to what someone of the other gender says? By having someone of the same gender point out that their behaviour is not universally accepted, it may have an impact and cause them to re-evaluate their beliefs.   Yes, women should stand up for themselves. Yes, men should stand up for themselves. And yes, men and women should also stand up for each other. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
&gt; She argues that surrogacy has become a baby-buying operation that allows wealthy couples to exploit vulnerable women, often those of lesser means.   Can some please explain to me how someone can be exploited when being (a) compensated and (b) a willing participant?
and if we are shitty at something it's a standard ["How it Works"](http://xkcd.com/385/)
[deleted]
Sleep naked and they will learn. Mine certainly did. 
Wonder Woman, Batwoman AND Superwoman!!!
I only half-heartedly negotiated my salary at my current job. The offer was only $5k less than the person who had the position before me was making, and she was a published author with 10+ years more experience than me. Plus it was WELL over what I'd expected to be offered. I tried to negotiate for that last $5k, but decided it really wasn't worth quibbling over. I've since made it up in raises. 
At some point you're objectively overweight. If you're 400 pounds you better be in the NFL or WWE or something.   I'm sure someone will correct me but I find it hard to believe that anyone (save elite athletes and even then...) can be healthy at 400 pounds.   
I like it when people call out bullshit, regardless of sex. If you see something, say something.   When you're confronted with something that is actually inappropriate and shocking, the silence of others is very disheartening. Sometimes it takes somebody NOT trying to avoid looking at the uncomfortable scene and saying, "Hey, not cool." 
Why be offended? What is the purpose of having a reason to be offended?  Just because you *can be* doesn't mean you need to be. Thats how heart disease starts. 
[deleted]
Ummm are you sure you know what chivalry means?  Just to make it easy for you.... [Chivalry](http://dictionary.reference.com/browse/chivalry) orrrr if one source isn't good enough. [Chivalry](http://www.merriam-webster.com/dictionary/chivalrous) Meh..  
But they aren't.
[deleted]
"Hey baby" is harassment. 
Well neither does countering bad behavior with similarly bad behavior.
[deleted]
Don't feel bad about sharing as much as you did. You were under the assumption that you had a good friend, and someone you could open up to. But unfortunately, he turned out to be a jerk.   I was in a very similar situation, and now the only thing I can do is learn from it. There ARE men in the world that can just be your friend without turning it into something sexual, but they're hard to find. It works the other way around too. It's nothing against either gender either. It's probably just in our nature to mistake friendship for romantic/sexual feelings.   Just take from this experience and learn where to draw your boundaries in the future when sharing personal info. Sad that we have to do it, but it's best to protect yourself.
[deleted]
I am not but I am around babies all the time now-a-days.   You know that point in life when people tell you that they're pregnant and you don't automatically think *oh, man that sucks*; yeah that's where I am.   I guess the transition occurs around the point where you meet a lot of people who are really excited about their pregnancies or are totally bummed about miscarriages you start to reevaluate your position on when random goo in a lady's uterus is a human. 
What's sexist about saying the leader of an organization that explicitly forbids women from holding leadership positions probably isn't the best person to listen to if you're trying to achieve equality for women?
Your question is "accept this lie as truth, and tell me if it's fair".  I am answering your question, you're just not liking the answer.  Men are not better suited to be garbage men.  Men are not better suited to be truck drivers.  Men are not better suited to pull a trigger, and warfare has long since passed hand to hand combat in 99.9% of cases.  Men are not better suited to be pilots.  Men are not better suited to be power line installers.  Men are not better suited to be roofers.  Your belief that they are is the problem.  It's also the answer to your own question.
I was there too! I changed my picture on facebook to the one of me with Cecile Richards from that night for the day.
I'm gonna be honest that is an adorable thought. But you gotta understand that most of our interactions with strange man are not that adorable.  I do not contradict the fact that some people do go to the gym to meet others but the fact is most go to get in shape. Most people I know who go to gym like to be left alone.   Other than that, you are free to try your luck. A simple "Hello, how are you?" is a nice opener for example. I personally would not respond favorably to any approach at the gym because of the reasons I mentioned above but at least that wouldn't get you a punch in the face.
Joanna Newsom is the best!  I love Have One on Me too.
No, but I've never had a problem washing the blood out. I think it's a little silly of your boyfriend though. 
are peace corps volunteers dying alot from lack of abortions these days?
Why do people keep cherry-picking STEM?  There are fields in which are dominated by men and some which are dominated by women. For example if you look at installation/maintenance/repair occupations, men consist of 95.8% of workers, whereas speech pathologists are 93.4% women. In fact, percentage wise there's a more women in computer/mathematical occupations (26.1% of the industry) than in construction (4.6%).  Fact is almost every job has gender and race disparity. For example, Hispanics only make up 3.8% of surgeons and physicians while Asians numbers 22.6%. On the other hand, only 0.1% of judges are Asian. Or in terms of vets, only 0.6% are Asian and 1.5% are black. 
It's almost like the entire point of wage discrimination (when intentional/malicious) is to *drive away* a demographic because of the low pay...
The OP
[deleted]
I'm pretty sure my point was saying this sort of behavior was pathetic.
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
I love this suggestion and it might just be worth the slight inconvenience!
edit; didn't realize you were Canadian, sorry. Can't help with Canadian stuff since I don't know your laws
Replace "period" with "shit" and ask yourself this question again. Hopefully you will come to an answer.
I get them when they're on sale at Macy's . You can get a pair for like $2 sometimes.
[deleted]
Next time I see a baby I'll be sure to ask if it likes being covered while it eats...
Sounds like they're spending more money on those mailings than what you donated. 
Yeah the show is shit.  It's also poorly written and downright racist.  My problem is the faux outrage showed by the columnist and people like her.   It's cheap reporting, you want to write about rape and all the problems associated with it?  Don't spout off about some forth rate TV show on a third rate network.  Do some real research and do some real reporting. I think the subject matter deserves that.      
Try again, only off by 121 months
Oddly enough, ever since I replaced my Buick with a truck the size of a small tank, people are a lot better about giving me room on the road.
You're damn right you do! ;)
Not once the fetus is viable outside of the womb, no. But to add context, about 1% of all abortions are performed after 20 weeks.  Of those, almost all occur because testing has discovered a fetal abnormality that will affect the health/life of the fetus and/or the mother.  Bottom line: we're all ostensibly after the same goal, here- a reduction in unwanted pregnancy (and thus, a reduction in abortion).  Restricting abortion access has not been proven to do that- but comprehensive sex education and easily available birth control have.  Edit: fixed typo 
I disagree, as a woman, that the man does not have an equal choice in the matter. While, yes, we are the carriers of a child, I think if your partner desires to keep HIS child (because it IS equally as much his DNA as the woman's) and commit to becoming a father and loving the child, then you cannot hold those 9 months of carrying over the child's entire lifetime that a father wants to experience and be present for. Nine months does not overpower that fact.  EDIT: this is not saying that I don't understand and feel for you in your situation 10 year ago. 21 is a young vulnerable age and sometimes decisions happen and I would never say you are a bad person for the choice you made. My comment was more directed towards the idea that men don't have a choice
[deleted]
[deleted]
The page I Googled said the term was unusual outside of the UK and similar products in the US are labelled as 'with enzymes'. The brand examples given were Wisk, Era and Biz.
Confused as to whether you're being sarcastic or not... 11 months old...
&gt;Abstinence is one of the many options available to you.  Even the best of all the other options fail occasionally. Rape happens.   Abstinence is one of the worst methods, because so very few people have the will to maintain it constantly. If you offer me a way to cure cancer, but 99% of people can't use your method effectively, it's not a cure for cancer.  &gt;We all know how babies are made. If you don't want a baby take precautions so that a baby is not made  We all know that driving is risky. You take precautions to try to drive as safely as possible, but it's always possible that you might get into an accident and injure someone.  Therefore, if you injure someone in such a way that they end up needing an organ transplant or blood transfusion to survive, you should be legally required to donate your organ or blood, because it's your fault that they're in this position.  You knew there were risks, you took precautions but they failed. Your actions made someone else need to use your body to live, therefore, you must give them your organs. If you don't want to, the law can punish you, or even have you tied down and your organs/blood removed by force, right?
I believe the exact phrase was "if your baby was a girl it would be okay, but it's a boy so it's akin to molestation." I couldn't pick my jaw up off the floor to say anything in response.   Spelling 
Well, to be fair I think OPs problems are well solved with non-monogamy, but she's already expressed that she is not interested in an open relationship. Still, I think keeping the discussion and option on the table (even if the trigger is never pushed) could go far to alleviate a lot of the pressure and guilt that she has expressed.
&gt; Rape happens.   Ok, this is the appropriate scope for your comment alluding to someone siphoning off your resources against your will as the sex act was, by definition, against your will.   As for the rest of your comments, you're delving off into hypothetical and I suspect that you're goading me into saying something that the downvote patrol in this sub will pounce on. With that I say good day. 
It isn't a worry with billing since she's in Ontario. :) 
&gt;But men do not have equal options. They cannot choose to stay home with their kids-that right is reserved for women. They can choose to work or they can choose to be homeless and lonely. The ironic thing is if we fought to help men open those options, we would ourselves have greater options. I would not say family time is less value than a paycheck.   Well, they DO have equal options. They may socially suffer for choosing to stay home with children as it goes against gender roles, but the same is said for working mothers in male fields. Which you say further in your comment women are free to enter. Agreed on the overall point though, it would help everyone if women were more valued as employees and men as parents than they currently are.  &gt;My own financial issues stem from my own choices. I chose to stay home with my kids most of my life, and work small, part-time jobs. If I had stayed in school and gone into a profession I would be making a lot more. We just felt the kids deserved to have a parent available to them and we were able to financially swing that.   &gt;Yes, I am scared to live on my own. Not because I make less than the men (because I make the same as the men in my job), but because I have never lived on my own before. Again, my choice. This has nothing to do with a lack of opportunities. Why do you think I would value money over the ability to be the primary caregiver?   &gt;What my point is trying to address is that while women make less overall, most of the reason for that is our own choices. I do not see very many people looking at that logically. If men work harder and take more risks then they of course be paid more. if women are working equally hard and are asking for equal pay and are denied this, I have a problem with it. I keep seeing statistics which do not tell me if this is truly accounted for.   &gt;For risk, in general, since women only make up 7% of work place deaths, obviously men take far, far more risks in the workplace.   I don't see how this is relevant. Men account for 0% of deaths during childbirth, does that mean they are less valuable parents? Women make far, far greater physical sacrifices for children, our biologies are suited to different tasks, and currently only men are compensated for theirs.  &gt;Women can choose to go into any field they wish. Yes, when in a male dominated field, they may face some resistance. The same for men who go into elementary education, nursing, and other female dominated fields. I do not see anyone complaining that men get the shaft in those fields, which deliver flexibility, high job satisfaction, and excellent benefits.   There is less of a push for men to get into childcare than there is for women to get into engineering. Likely because people aren't generally clamoring for jobs with low pay and low respect.  I do complain that there aren't enough men in those positions though. Affirmative action works both ways and it should. I think it would be great for children to have more male role models in school and daycare. I think many of these professions would benefit from the prestige of not being considered "women's work" any more.  &gt;I just feel that we would be better off looking at specific ways we can positively help train girls to be more assertive without being jerks (no one needs to be a jerk, man or woman, and being a jerk is not going to help your career). Teach them to ask for decent pay, teach them to catalog their achievements while on the job and give them the confidence to ask for raises. Encourage them to take risks. Show them that we do not need to take the worst traits of men in order to be confident and successful.   &gt;And expect women to support other women in the workplace rather than waiting for the law to fix things. The majority of women I know who have had bad bosses have dealt with women bosses. Articles I have read support that when women get in positions of power, they often exclude other women. We do not support each other when in positions of power, and that needs to end. We should not be biased towards women, but we should be mentoring each other and supporting one another.   This is great in theory and all, but speaking as a female engineer, I've worked for 6 years in 2 states and I've been the only woman in my group with rare exceptions (like a female EIT who lasted 2 months before quitting). My boss, his boss, all the way up the the CEO (and I work for a large company) are all men. It's great that more and more women are graduating engineering school, but their careers don't go very far once they start working. We need laws because there aren't many women at the top to mentor and support us through our careers. And women do have different needs in the workforce, it wasn't even until the 90s before it was illegal to fire a woman for being pregnant. Fathers to be don't face that stigma when starting a family.   
What?  No Ellie Goulding?  Lights and Halcyon.  Both excellent, Halcyon has a more sophisticated sound, a little more trancepop if you will but Lights is full of vulnerability and has a softer tone.  Her voice is beautiful.  
Sounds like the same response a bible-thumper would give on an atheist post. Does nothing. 
Ha, funny. In my field, we call that projection.
At the moment, it's Grimes - Visions. Saving this thread for everybody's musical suggestions.  ETA: Liz Phair - Exile in Guyville The Raincoats - Looking in Shadows Camera Obscura - Let's get out of this country Tegan and Sara - So Jealous Peaches - Impeach My Bush  Mazzy Star - She Hangs Brightly
Because he thinks you should get off your lazy ass and do your own searches. He's not your mother, after all.
&gt;You have a moral obligation since it is as much his child as yours.   I'm a little iffy on the idea of a moral *obligation* here. I think it's morally preferable to involve the guy, but that decision should take into account the emotional and physical health of the women.  &gt;[PP is] a business like any other and their only intent is to usher you to the procedure table and wave goodbye.  No actually, PP is a nonprofit. That's not saying the care you received was good. But don't confuse the motivations of nonprofit and for profit companies.
That reminds me... about 3/5 times people insult me or try to humiliate me, I just ignore their existence.. it's not worth my time and I'll forget about it within a day. 2/5 times this kind of shit happens to me I point out how incredibly stupid they are for saying what they just said and very loudly degrade their character based on what I just saw/ heard them do.  People don't deserve to be in public when they can't act like decent people.. never gotten hurt or seriously threatened. It makes other people around them aware of their shitty character, so family members/ friends know what their loved one's doing wrong. I just hope that when this shit does happen that those assholes learn from it. I hate to see innocent kids grow up to be like their shit parents, continuing stupid patterns that are only a detriment to their lives.
All the managers I've had truly want to pay people what they're worth and will fight upper management to get budget for raises. Hell my father in law holds a senior management position and has never once in his life applied for a promotion or raise; every step up has been a result of his managers advocating on his behalf.  Managers with the OP's outlook undoubtedly exist but that comment makes me wonder what his employees' morale is like.
[deleted]
This reminds me of my friend who went from a C to a G when she started breastfeeding. She was afraid she was going to smother her baby with her newly giant tatas if she fell asleep while breast feeding him.
Agreed - you'll notice I didn't say people
Just say no?      You're in a high-demand field and good at your job.   This start bodes very ill.   If you stay long enough to find out how bad it could get you'll end up with a stain on your resume. 
You have great taste in music, however there's a disturbing lack of Mary Timony in your list.
I've had both. I had the mirena for the full five years put in when I was 19 and I'm currently six months in on the copper IUD.   IUDs have come a LOOOOONG way since they first came out. they actually were pretty dangerous in the 70's and 80's which is probably when your mom's friend had problems with hers.   They're pretty damn safe now. I never had any horrible side affects from either.   Insertions for both were very quick. uncomfortable and kinda painful for a few minutes but quick and definitely worth the years I dont have to deal with anything in that regard. Some women are prescribed a numbing suppository and pain pills but I was just told to take three ibuprofen an hour before my appointment another two immediately after and whenever I need it until the cramping stops.   Removal is super easy. It's just a simple gyno appointment for them to take it out and you're good to go.   I prefer the nonhormonal Copper IUD mainly because the mirena did a number on my sex drive and hormones can have some other not so nice side affects that I dont want to deal with. I get heavier periods with the copper IUD and some mild cramping but totally tolerable and they evened out pretty quick. 
Yes, but that's not an economic issue. The market can still be working fine in that situation. That would be a social issue. 
I don't. And I never comment on it except for here. I would never yell at a mother for doing it and I believe the baby has a right to eat, but I just don't like it. Can't I have an opinion?
[deleted]
It's on spotify by the way
I'm pointing out that you're being hypocritical, your argument makes no sense and you were kinda shitty to /u/1282.
Equating breastfeeding with the other things is truly disgusting - more disgusting than anything you mentioned.  
Pussy Whipped - Kathleen Hanna/Bikini Kill
[deleted]
The "and take a picture for me!" thrown in there doesn't help matters.
Even then. I mean, I've always had unprotected sex with every partner I've been with (eight partners) and I haven't gotten anything. However, I do regret not wearing protection. I've been tested since my last relationship and I'm still completely clean, but I'll wear protection, even in relationships, until I'm a bit more comfortable with them.
Yeah, in my opionon I dont think this sub should be a default sub. Mainly because men feel the need to come in here and defend themselves, as I a man also do at times, and it takes away from the content because its just two groups of people entirely frustrated because they feel the other is ignorant and needs to be set straight and neither really looks into what the other is saying because their opionons are already set and certainly aren't going to be changed by a nameless low karma comment that, to them, seems to only have been written in aim to shoot down their beliefs. So both get defensive.
It's something I try to keep in mind personally.  I was WAY guilty for years of being the "I'm so sorry.  What can I do for you?" type and didn't realize until much later that it's so hard to answer that question when you're just numb with pain.    I would also say to those reading - the grief article also often applies to people with depression.  They won't ask for help or know how to ask for help most of the time, so forcing yourself upon them (and I know that sounds terrible, but it's true) by saying, "I am coming over in an hour to help you with yardwork," tells the person that you care for them, puts them in a position where they'd have to be rude to refuse you (most people don't like being rude), and also sets an expectation of, "I know this is hard, so I'm going to help, and I expect you to participate."  I finally learned this in time to help my mother with her hoarding.  "I'm coming into town next week, and we're going to clean out the ______ while I'm there."  She was horribly embarassed, but acquiesced.  Once we got past the "OMG I can't have you see this apartment" phase, things got very productive and she always felt better afterwards.
He's allowed to feel uncomfortable, but asking her to throw out her panties is way too demanding..
True.  I had those same beliefs and they were only holding me back.    I used to be a model.  I thought I'm going to be different because I'm smart!  I bet they've never met anyone like me before!  I was humbled by 15 year old girls calculating how much Italian and American taxes would be taken out of our pay in their heads and telling me which dialects were spoken in whatever province of China I was headed to next.  I was not at all special.  I just started my first job in engineering.  I saw a lot of thin, attractive, well dressed women here and thought they only hired me to look good.  Now that I've gotten to know everyone, I see that they are very smart and hard working and it gives me something to aspire to. 
It would potentially make a believer out of me, but that's because I've been abused.  You can't expect a person who hasn't been abused to believe this story over the word of someone they love.  Abusers are manipulative - if their claws are sunk deeply into the mind of their current victim, some "crazy ex" isn't going to shake them loose.
I've got 4 tattoos, 3 of which are in some of the worst spots (inside arm, ribs and pubic area, all three took about 3 hours). Generally speaking the areas with more skin and fat will be less painful. The only way I know how to describe the feeling is as an annoying hot scratch. Once the endorphins kick in it's surprisingly bearable, I've had more painful waxing sessions to be quite honest.  edit: extra info
I love love love Sharon Van Etten. I have a soft spot for her first album, though.
[deleted]
Wow. Couragegirl logic.... "Define already defined words with my own sexist view and then when the opposing party attempts to explain their understanding blame them for not knowing my own" even though your definition is batshit. For you there is no wrong... lets get a r/circlejerk started! or would you rather do the female equivalent and have a r/ovaryoval?
No, I'm arguing that it's safer in a country with a modernized healthcare system and when you've got the (presumably) wealthy people whose child you are caring paying for the best available medical care.  It's not like we're talking about random people off the street with no medical coverage being asked to carry someone's child. These surrogates are specifically chosen by the 'parents' for their overall health, the likelihood of a successful birth, and other factors.  I'm afraid I'm not using the correct terminology, hence the quotes.
Its hard to decide when he wants space or when he doesn't. We'll still kiss and he's still pretty happy to go down on me but the minute it moves to full on sex or taking his clothes off, he stops getting into it. It's like there's "safe zones" where I can take it to but past that, he gets uncomfortable.
It really doesn't. It's alright if he doesn't want to touch blood, that makes sense. But a stain on undies? Have him buy all the new pairs. He can see how practical it is. Plus, if you already have stained pairs you can wear those during your period so you don't stain more undies. This is something he should get over. Itd be different if they were even freshly stained, but washed?
I am not upset, I have no idea why you keep saying that. You were off by 10%, that's not insignificant. Moreover, your major, along with environmental engineering, are somewhat of an anomaly, and are not particularly popular to boot. You started with a "myth about woman in STEM fields", then found 1 out of the 2 outliers and used it as an example. Like that actually disproves something. 
[deleted]
I am with you there on being both.  It's impossible!  Do you think that there is any resentment from them at play, or do you think it has more to do with stereotypes?
Also I just noticed your username. As a boob haver and Star Wars lover I wholeheartedly approve and wish I was as clever
In the US, doctors can't reveal any of your medical information unless   A) you've signed a disclosure form for a specific person, or   B) the information is being passed to another medical professional for continuity of care.
This is one of my least favorite things about the current state of sexism. Men who are obnoxious and walking around in public shirtless, with their pants falling off, being extremely loud and rude.. illustrate so many things wrong with culture.
[deleted]
I had two dream insertions.  Almost no pain.  Took less than a minute.   My paragard actually made my period lighter and easier to deal with.  It also took away my cramps.  &gt;if I were to want to make a baby what is the process to get it removed early?   The same as to if you have it removed when it's time to replace it.  They basically pull the strings, and it comes out the cervix.  It's a pinch that lasts about 10 seconds. 
The Peace Corps doesn't exactly have a stellar reputation when it comes to taking care of their own- look at the Deborah Gardner case.  EDIT: Link http://nymag.com/nymetro/news/crimelaw/features/n_10403/
My comment pre-supposed she needed a hand with that.
I hear you. I'm in high school, I'm in this special STEM program for science-oriented students, we do a ton of project based learning... it's basically science class but instead of boring worksheets we do group labs the whole time! Anyway, we've had this substitute multiple times and every time he subs for my STEM classes he rounds up the wopping 4 girls in the class (out of 30) and goes on a whole birdwalking story about his time at Stanford and how he dropped out and yadda yadda yadda, and in the very end makes sure to tell us "They say 9 out of 10 girls are pretty, and the other goes to Stanford!" haha, funny guy. And when we were working on our building designs, I was keeping my group on track and finding other jobs for some of them to do when they're done with whatever, and he comes up to my groupmate and he's like, "Wow, she's acting like my wife. Glad you don't have to deal with her like I do." LOOK, YOU'RE HILARIOUS I KNOW, BUT SOME OF US HAVE WORK TO DO AND IT WOULD BE GREAT IF YOU COULD NOT MAKE SEXIST REMARKS AND KEEP EVERYONE FROM THEIR WORK BECAUSE WE DO HAVE DEADLINES WOW
&gt; A stint at the front desk is a fine way to get to know a company's inner workings.  Ummm.. Nope!  I was hired to shore up and fix broken corporate security.  My time needs to be spent figuring out the holes and patching them, quickly.  Not to direct office traffic and answer mundane questions.  As a "CEO", you're telling me you'd rather see your corporate network continue to get fucked, just so someone can familiarize themselves?  I doubt it.
[deleted]
did not say anything about appearances and expectations, do not have expectations regarding appearances. was commenting purely on the notion that no one cares what you look like. it's a laughable notion, hence the haha.  conscious versus unconscious caring. your employer might say, "I only care about what a person does" but s/he is a person (obviously) and subject to the same influences as other people.   beautiful people get [better grades](http://healthland.time.com/2013/12/10/teachers-give-better-grades-to-more-attractive-students-study/), [more interviews](http://www.businessinsider.com/beautiful-people-get-more-job-interviews-2013-9), [and lots of other neat perks](http://online.wsj.com/news/articles/SB10001424052970203687504576655331418204842). combine that preference with a gender that is (more often than the other one) valued for appearance...  we tell ourselves and each other no one cares about appearances, but it looks like that's pretty far from the truth.
Excellent link.  I think people resorting to surrogacy are not in the right mental state to empathize with these women. Plus, they don't know the true picture. The middlemen tell them that these women are being looked after well. The people using their services don't understand the following:  1. the women live away from family for all those months. Sure they are given good food but is that enough for a human being? We are talking about human beings here, not cows.  2. usually their mothers-in-laws etc. force them to do this, once they do this job they are ridiculed by the same people who make them do this  3. the money they receive is rarely spent on themselves.. ha! It's wasted on a motorcycle or some such thing for some man in the family  4. the money they receive is peanuts considering pregnancy has altered their bodies forever  5. nobody is there to care for these women if they develop post-natal depression  6. it takes 1-2 yrs for a woman's body to recover from childbirth, these women  are going back to back-breaking work after giving birth to the child, they are not given the care that western women get 
I got so lucky w my mom. She had natural births and nursed all of us till we chose to ween in the early 80s so she was a big help.  I apparently gave her mastitis though by one day going on a permanent nursing strike at 9 months. :/ I was a stubborn baby. 
Ah I can see that. My mother nursed all of us and all my aunts nursed my cousins in the early 80s when we were babies. I think I'm desensitiZed.   Also it is important to note that people who have suffered sexual abuse have a very difficult time with nursing as well. 
[deleted]
Yes, but you have to consider that some people will still have problems that you haven't experienced that still affect them negatively. I've never been to DC, however, so I'm not experienced with them. Street harassment, expectations of gender roles, even things that happen rarely or only between families are still examples of problems which feminism should addresss. 
Possible Game of thrones spoiler below! Watch out!
[deleted]
I have learned when opening reddit, to put the drinks aside.
If something inside of you is telling you that it's not going to work then you should listen. Always trust your gut. When you're in a long distance relationship it's easy to romanticize the relationship. You see each other so rarely that it's always exciting when you do so when you're together you're generally happy. But you don't truly know someone until you've lived with them - even if you've been dating for several years. That's when you start to learn about all the little quirks your partner has and you get to experience being together every day in close quarters. It also says something that you're willing to make concessions and compromise on issues (like religion and politics) but he's not. It's a red flag that he's not flexible and that you'll most likely end up making most of the sacrifices in the relationship. He could bounce back and come out of his funk once things settle down for him and he gets his life and money issues sorted out but you should also keep in mind that this is what he'll be like every time he encounters a setback or is unhappy. You're only there for the summer so you can certainly stick it out for a few months to see how it plays out but you should start asking yourself some serious questions about what you want, what you're willing to put up with, what sacrifices you're willing to make, etc. And certainly don't make any major life decisions (marriage, kids) until you're absolutely certain that it's the right choice. The last thing you want is to decide you're unhappy and should've trusted your gut after you're married with kids and it gets messy. Give it more time but proceed with caution and listen to your gut and watch out for any other red flags.
It's funny you mention this, as its not a scenario I'd thought of.  The guy that hired me left for another company, and a new boss is now in place.  (Long hiring process with background checks, drug tests, waiting for new fiscal quarter, etc...)  He seems like an IT n00b, and I know for a fact that I make 3 times his salary.  (He left his pay stub sitting out in the open, no I wasn't snooping)  I really really hope that I'm not jumping in to the lion's den here.  I think everyone is right that I need to address this pre-start and see how it plays out.
&gt;Based off the fact that I'm in the top 1% of the US for size, actually.  ...oh I can imagine what kind of size, actually.
"truck driver, pilot, construction, farmer, logger.  Women do a lot of that."Do they?  Been on construction sites?  I have. 99% men.
That is awful and frustrating, but I've found nothing good from trying a public argument against it. The kind of people who post these things are usually the kind who you can't have a good balanced conversation with over these kind of views and it will likely just end with the same difference in opinion as before. It wasn't posted because it's a factual story, it was posted just to say I HATE BABY KILLERS AND I AM NOT ONE OF THEM  However if you must fight, i'd suggest "She needs to find a doctor who listens to her."
[deleted]
[deleted]
I am thinking they want a game of rugby after the wedding? 
What about a very round knob?
&gt; If you are breaking the law and paying someone less than their labor is worth, you don't think that's exploitive?  Assuming that both parties are engaging willingly, no. Yeah, the situation might suck but the employee is making a calculation that this is probably the best alternative. Outside actors may not have all the facts about what their alternatives are.   &gt; What if they don't have all the facts?   What makes you assume that you have all the facts (this is assuming that you think you know what's better for these people than they do)  &gt; If someone's trying to sell you a drink that will cure your cancer, and I have research that says it won't, I shouldn't try to maybe show you that research or try to stop the person who wants to sell it to you?  That is the role of activism. Activism is an informative endeavor.  
That's because it's a women's community. Can we have one place where the male opinion doesn't dominate please? 
The OP clearly states that she 'engulfs her face in bronzer '.
I'm saving this for future stupid posts from my bible-thumping relatives. 
&gt; Shouldn't parents have the right to decide this?  Yes  &gt; I really think people who are doing the parenting need to decide. On a case by case basis, with aid from medical specialists and anyone else they wish to consult.  Yes  
Read up on it - you can search this forum for hundreds of threads or read this one.  It's been asked and answered hundreds of times by thousands of people, just here on Reddit.  You can also go to other subreddits and do the same thing.  You can keep researching this as long as you like.  
[deleted]
[deleted]
What is it about breastfeeding that you don't like, if you don't mind me asking? I'm just curious. 
That cat would chew my car up, spit it out, and then give me the stink-eye. 
[deleted]
The image is of her standing in front of an eatery. She had pinup artwork out there in the 'verse and most of it is in her mag, just that this was a more "look where I am" photo, not a celebration of body meant for purchase. Its more strange because he doesn't know her AT ALL. 
Sounds alike. Probably is.
Um..... completely off target. I live with my SO of 7 years, really only hang out once a week with him, and sometimes I find that to be too much, although I do try to accomodate *him* with more together time as best I can. Oh, I also get plenty of attention from other men. If I dated a new love interest every year, I'd be dead before I could get through the line. Smart, independent (financially and emotionally) women are in high demand after all.   Good Lord what an idiot you are! Lol! Me not liking myself. Lol..thats a good one. My friends will get a kick out of that.   No my dear fool, I'm just more of a lone wolf than your standard run-of-the-mill woman could ever handle. 
[deleted]
Well, we'll never really know what you would've written had the game been about solving a mystery instead of 2 girls running away together, but I can bet you wouldn't have referenced Feminist Frequency or posted to this subreddit if it didn't. But seriously, think what would've happened next: Lonnie would've been missing from her unit and pronounced AWOL, and Sam would've been reported missing. That's terrible writing. I'm not saying every story has to end a certain way, but I mean come on, that's just silly. I would've also liked to learn more about Katie, at times I felt more like a "ghost" or imaginary friend of Sam's named Katie rather than her flesh-and-bones sister.
Freeze those peaches.
Found an image of a busty woman online in a leopard bra and substituted the boobs with little baby faces (I was in an all-female band) for a show poster. Women thought it was great, guys were mostly grossed out.
[deleted]
Lol, that was probably the wrong word.
Bait and switch is a horrible way to start a relationship with a new employee. It's also likely par for the course with these employers. GTFO while you have no vested interest is my opinion.
Not even a hundred years. Wow.
I dunno, if you're that concerned about false rape charges, maybe you'd be better off doing things that are less rapey looking.
Actually most people don't care. And where exactly is the mom supposed to sit in a public bathroom? On the dirty floor? On the toliet? Would you like to eat your lunch while someone has liquid fire shits in the stall next door? What about if the mom doesn't have a car? What if it's freezing outside or it's the middle of a hot summer day with temps reaching above 100F?  It seems you haven't thought your argument through.
&gt;Who said anything about any of this stuff?   Sorry, I guess I assumed you did on some level since you said that the law could handle that situation, and you only didn't support outlawing abortion because you don't believe in it regulating morality, not because it couldn't be done.  And you say it can be done, but when I ask how you say, "I'm sure it would."  &gt;Pregnancy is the sole method of creating a human life. It is one of the most unique experiences in the world.  So that means it allows people to violate the bodily integrity of other people against their will . . . I don't see how that conclusion follows.  &gt;How naive. Those "oversights" and "loopholes" are carefully crafted by legislatures  Some are, but it's also pretty naive to think that legislators are all brilliant strategists who never make mistakes. And why would it matter if those loopholes were intentional? If there are many legislators who think abortion should be completely illegal, and they make it so a woman who was raped will have a very hard time getting an abortion anyway, how does that at all make it any better?  &gt;I said it was selfish  So you don't think selfishness is immoral? I do, but I guess maybe that's why I misunderstood. And I could see many scenarios where it wouldn't be selfish at all. If you know you are too poor or in bad health or if you have severe psychological issues or you have other kids that you can barely take care of or you live somewhere very unsafe, maybe bringing a child into the world because you want to do the "right" thing is pretty selfish, or at least not very considerate of the suffering the child and the rest of your family will experience.
can't say if its gender related or not but frigging RUN from that posting.
thank you for that! 
Huh?  What are you talking about?
I was just clarifying, as I re-read my OP and saw how it could be interpreted that I'm talking about my existing baby. There's no need to be condescending.   I justify baby and its mother staying in the building simply because they're not the ones who are unreasonably offended. In your opinion, should they be forced to leave because some people can't cope with seeing a breast? Breastfeeding mothers still have lives, still want to visit cafes and be in public in general. I feel it'd be very unfair and isolating to ask them to "find a more suitable place" away from any other potentially offended people.   I'm totally with you on people being wrong to take babies to movies and sporting events, but I don't feel that they can be compared to breastfeeding. Crying babies at movies disturb everyone. Breastfeeding babies only disturb those who allow themselves to be upset by it. 
Source?
Don't worry, you have no discernible "attitude" and anyone who says you do hasn't worked with people with real attitude (and it can come from anyone, but you're entitled to a little, anyway).  
We do have some things to go on... A lot of people don't like to admit those things though. In egalitarian countries, where there's less sexism and much more gender equality, as well as more social welfare (networks you can fall back on in case you end up unemployed, sick etc), you'll find a trend that less women are going into things like STEM, or other male dominant fields. Most likely because it bores them, and they already have the financial security to let them make the decision to pursue a career they want, they don't have to go into a field that is more or less guaranteed money. But of course it could be because of cultural reasons too, but afaik girls aren't exactly discouraged to enter STEM fields, at least not while they are in school... You did mention "you'll never have to deal with people at conferences assuming that you're a secretary when you're really the lead engineer." which doesn't have too much to do with this, as you're not going to go to a conference as a lead engineer when you're getting the education, you wouldn't be faced with these assumptions until after you've acquired your education and started working.  You also have to keep in mind that not only are female and male brains different (not necessarily in a way that matters in this case though), but their bodies are also affected by different hormones. Hormones do have an effect on decision making, how driven you are, self-confidence, attitude, and possibly interests and goals too, they are very powerful chemicals.  There may be some social pressure into pursuing certain careers, but I think a lot of it just comes down to nature, rather than nurture. The world today is very different to how it was 30 years ago, if you're in your early 20's you'll probably have had a very different experience with this than if you are in your 30's.
hmm strange, music and religion are usually so closely tied. Thx for explaining.
You think the redditors making shaming comments are grandparents?  That's interesting. 
It varies from state to state. Broadly speaking, you can secretly audio/video tape anything if at least one of the parties involved understands that they are being recorded (usually the one doing the recording). However, iirc a lot of judges have held sexual encounters up to a different standard, as it is more intimate and the potential for damage to the aggrieved party is much more substantial. If you want to know more, you will need to research your specific state's laws and court cases to get a better idea.
In the U.S., yes.  Lots of other places, not so much.  
Not sure I understand your question... I would assume that most pro-choice people support laws that restrict abortion when the fetus is viable outside the womb... that is the Supreme Court ruling, after all.  Abortion is a difficult issue because it's an intensely personal and often difficult decision.  To get politicians involved in a decision like that is extremely dangerous; that's why the choice should always be left up to the woman and her doctor, and whomever else she chooses (partner, god, etc).  When politicians get involved, it is very simple for them to subvert it for their own agenda- and mark my words, 99% of them don't give a shit about abortion; they either want to rile up their base, or punish women.
Once he distributes it to anyone save law enforcement or a lawyer it is no longer protected by wiretapping and home security laws and shifts to voyeurism laws. 
How often does he get to go home? If it isn't very often, I think you should maybe cut him some slack. 
Some babies won't take a bottle you fucking moron
It's normal to feel uncomfortable and what's sad is people here will try to make you feel like it isn't. Stick with your own guns. Don't worry about your feelings because they obviously don't care about yours. 
When you ask, "When do you think formula was invented?"  they always look worse than deer caught in the headlights.  They are amazed that anyone would even think to ask such a question and of course, have no answer.    If you say, "Your grandmama breastfed your mama," they often get outright upset.  The proposed alternatives (mama was passed around to wetnurses) also upset them.  Sometimes you have to change the generation (your great grandma breastfed your grandpa!!  Your grandpa must be gay, right, so that's how you figured this out??)
There's an 18 year old on this very thread who is having trouble with it too.  It's not really all that age-related.  It's not going to be over soon. 
I'm really sorry to hear she passed away. It's ok to cry a lot! I cried a lot when my grandma passed away and I cried typing this out. It's ok and it's normal and it does get better!  My grandma passed away a few years ago and I took time off work and I cried almost constantly for about 4 or 5 days after she died. The funeral happened in that time too.     After that I went back to work and the distraction really helped although it is hard to let yourself be distracted in the first place.  When I was alone I still cried a lot- usually in the morning I woke up thinking about it or before bed and I would cry some more.  Over time you will cry less often but you will not love her and miss her any less. It can take a long time. Sadness will still catch up with you once in a while but you will get through it.    Every time I get sad I try focus more on how lucky we were to have her instead of the fact that she is gone.     That's my experience. I hope it helps a bit.     Don't let the fact that your mom is so calm get to you. She probably has a different way of dealing with it than you do. My mom is the same way so I'm just guessing it is either to do with raising children or having gone through this experience more than once.  
That's pretty horrible. I'm sorry people are so ignorant.
So I can have a couple beers and go drive around town? So long as I'm not 'drunk'?
No, not yet
I was wondering about that. This warrants a discussion: what *is* the best manner and means of arraying one's clothing for quick and efficient retreat?
-Adele, 21.     -Florence + The Machine, Lungs and Ceremonials.     -Little Boots, Hands.     -Garbage, Version 2.0.     -Spinnerette, Spinnerette.     -Poe, Hello. 
I'm sure she's quite aware that people will look at them.  Having your friend make them his cover photo is another thing entirely.  It's just creepy.  It makes it seem like he's obsessed with her since he actually knows her. 
Exactly.
[deleted]
My mom told me that she was let go from a job and it led to her finding a job that was a much better fit. Her coworker, who was not let go, stayed in that job for years even though he hated it. I hope this becomes a change for the better. Look for a new job, wear your lucky dress, and I hope you find something amazing.
Upvoted for comment *and* username. Prosit!
Fucking pwnd. Teh Lulz.
I don't. It's on my SOs and my "to buy" list - but as it is winter now, they are quite pricey. So will just wait till Spring.
I didn't know there was any other way to sleep!  I love nakedness!
&gt; I would face major harassment.  You would possibly face tiny vibrations on your eardrums that might convey meaning if you allowed them to.  &gt; "And women complain when they get raped. Shit like this is just asking for it."  Don't feed the troll.  &gt; We don't complain that a women who won't walk home alone at night is "allowing the thoughts of strangers dictate her actions."  We do actually.  What it does is to buy into unnecessary fear mongering.  A woman is more at risk driving to Starbucks in the morning than she is walking home alone at night.  &gt; We as a society should not be enforcing different consequences for the same actions on men and women.  No.  We as a society should not allow how others, strangers specifically, dictate our actions.  "We can't control the words and actions of others, we can only control how we respond."  
ahahhaahah  what do you want to know?  I  sit by the pool naked all day, read my book,  get  lunch,  and  play a little  water  volleyball.    you meet lots of neat people  and seeing people nude and being nude does wonders  for  your  body  image and self esteem,  no  matter what size you are.   basic rules:    no  staring   no boners   don't be gross   take a towel and sit on it everywhere you go.   One of the things that pissed me off so much about SF  outlawing  public  nudity  was that  people  were  refusing to take and sit on towels,  which is basic  nude  etiquette.   We  need more young nudists though!  there are too many old naked fogeys.  more young naked people  means  better prices,  more  activities  and  events,  and  more  awareness.   also,  we're  not ants,  we don't  live in a  colony.   we  go to clubs and resorts.   hope that helps!
No, it's not a normal part of sexual intercourse. Make an appointment asap or better yet go to a walk-in.   It is better to get looked at than remain proud and damage your Lady bits/ labia minora
I keep them. But he could always buy you some of these!   http://www.dearkates.com/  (cute, stain resistant undies, albeit a bit pricy)
&gt;Most straight guys (girls too?) will unconsciously dart gravitate their eyes toward these parts (women do something similar to crotches).   Haha, what? Where did you hear that? My glance does not "gravitate" to anybody's crotch... I would look specifically there only if they had wet themselves or were sporting a severe enough erection to notice while focusing elsewhere.
Nah it's pretty necessary. Unless you've been in a position where you wanted to withdraw consent because shit is going south, but you've been to anxious or too scared to speak up, maybe it's harder to understand why active consent is so useful. Asking if things are ok definitely makes me more comfortable speaking up because I know that what I say is going to be taken seriously and is going to be acted on immediately if I reply in the negative.
I'm not sure I agree with you when you that being white isn't presumed.
Yup, yup, yup, yup, and yup. Even fully clothed.
"We live in a very male-dominated culture/country - she just laughs at all the genuinely perplexed freaked out guys everywhere she goes. She runs a team of devs - all guys - who quickly learned not to fuck with her. Not because she is the boss (she is) but because she can out-code the lot of them combined."  Total bullshit.  if you have never done coding please stop.  Don't insult other coders.   How can she out-code (??) all of them combined ?  she has lost all coding touch she might had.  she is just another bitch put in charge and everyone is saying things about her behind her back.  I guarantee it.   Only reason they are not speaking is job security.  
I gotcha girl.  My sil once told me "Well if you're going to pull out your boobs in public, then I guess I'll just suck my husband's dick in Wal-Mart."  I asked her if she *really* felt she could equate breastfeeding to dick sucking, and she said "It's just sooo gross!"  How ridiculous.  I nursed my children in her face for a combined 2 years, just to get her goat.
[deleted]
[deleted]
"Not legally required" being the key phrase.  There is NO situation in which a person is legally mandated to keep another person alive through use of their body.  Pro-life groups want to make pregnancy the exception.  It may be praised, or be a noble thing to do, to keep someone else alive using your body, but it is universally, and legally, recognized as being a CHOICE.
&gt; what did she expect, people to smile at her and be happy that she was showing her tits?  I imagine she wanted people to go on with their own lives while she went on with hers, feeding her baby.  &gt; she couldn't wait till she got home?  I'm assuming you don't have much experience with babies. They eat when they want to eat. Would you rather a baby cry or a woman feed that baby to keep it from crying?
[deleted]
Just don't go out. Then you'll never have to see anything. It's your fault that you've sexualised breast to the extent that they put you off eating.  Breasts are for feeding babies. 
So, because it makes you uncomfortable, you don't think women should be allowed to feed their children? Babies don't give a really give a shit whether their mom's in a private place.
[I looked it up, it was 26% in stem in 2011.](http://www.census.gov/prod/2013pubs/acs-24.pdf) Still the statistics they use is garbage. I'm pretty sure if you ask a 4th grader what their favorite subject is, they would just respond with the first one they think of. 
&gt; another couple may have just watched their 13 year old boy just find out what a breast looks like in person in what should have been a very non sexual situation.  But the situation is non sexual already. To be honest, the parents aren't really in the business of regulating of whether a 13 years old know how breasts look like. We see this on our biology class. My history book had a paining of a nude woman in the cover at around this same age.
&gt; Because he couldn't view me as an individual but as an extension of him  This gives me legitimate concern. 
Yep. I wish I'd known that when I was seventeen. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
Summary of your post: he's a man so his opinion doesn't count.  Sexist pig.
Not at all. I'm just saying just because he's the leader of a sexist organisation, which all religions are really - doesn't mean that you just throw his argument out. 
&gt;I had chosen to take my baby's life rather than be willing to slow my career.  What exactly defines life? Is it a beating heart or breathing air? On a biological level your claim of taking a life makes sense, but on a moral level there isn't much life happening inside of the dark, wet womb. You didn't take a life, you terminated the fetus growing inside of you.
Same. *da booty*
It very well may be that the manager is either a dumbass or he could hate the fact that there is a woman making 3 times more than him.  Or it could be that her position is a lot more junior than she thinks or than it is.  There are a lot of things we just don't know.  She just needs to be careful with how she approaches it because it could come across as her being egotistical or overstepping her place.
[deleted]
Are you twelve? Does your daddy know you are using his computer?
&gt;Saying "not all feminists hate men" is a valid response because it means you can be a feminist without hating men.  Dat logical fallacy. *sigh*
Wikipedia, and a link that literally has the researcher stating "In order for these 'preliminary results' to become 'definitive', Rouillon says he needs to recruit a much larger sample of women, and to conduct further research on the subject."
Yeah, it is annoying at times. I stems from that whole "lol no girls on the internet" idea which for some reason is still a thing.
One of the US pictures uses completely different eyes, even
I will be sure to follow the specific guidelines you have laid out when complimenting women.  Thank you.
Personally, I'd rather be left alone entirely, although I wouldn't be impolite if given a compliment respectfully.
By left alone, I mean I don't wish to receive any unsolicited comments on my appearance, not that I literally don't want anybody to talk to me. Just a phrasing issue, haha.
Generally it depends how the recordings are taking place. In your case, it's usually perfectly legal unless he decides to make it public.  Over the phone recordings are usually illegal unless both sides are aware it is happening. Nothing is stopping him putting a recorder in his pocket in a face-to-face meeting.  As for a camera in the bedroom well... it's his bedroom, he can do what he wants inside it. The only illegal part would be if he decided he was going to share that recording with the public, which it doesn't sound like he intends to. He can't set a camera up in your bedroom but nothing stops him from continuing to use a recorder stashed in his pocket
Maybe it's just me, but breastfeeding mothers don't bother me. At all. Covwered, not covered--I can promise you I ain't looking. If I catch a glimpse? So what. I'll go back to looking at other stuff.
[deleted]
I don't see an answer to my question on the right the mother has to encroach on anyone else's right to comfort in that post. The situation we're discussing is one in which the mother knowingly partook in a luxury, not in public, and you're point of view is that she is allowed to do as she pleases, regardless of anyone else's feeling toward it.  Seriously, what is it that some of you guys don't understand? Going out to eat is a LUXURY. You are not ENTITLED to do whatever you please regardless of other people's feelings without consequence. There's a time and a place for everything and a restaurant is not an appropriate place to breastfeed when other patrons are forced to see it.  "Look away"? Fuck yourself. Sex is natural, does that mean if I start jacking myself off in the middle of appetizers or bend my date over and take her to pound town you should be expected to deal with it and look away? What's the issue, I'm just trying to join the baby-having gang. That's the logic you guys have and it's laughable.
I know you want "women's perspectives", but I'll give you his perspective regardless.  He spends inordinate amounts of time doing hard work. Oil rigs aren't exactly known for allowing workers to blow off steam while on them. So now he sees an opportunity to pursue his own hobbies, such as meeting old friends and dealing with getting his quad. Has it occurred to you that you're not the only aspect of his personal life? That he was other hobbies and other things he wants to do? Does it suck that you'll only see him for 6 days? Sure. I'm sure he's not exactly *thrilled* by it either.  However, he's in Montana anyway for the funeral. So he decided to pursue his other desires while there. What would you have preferred? That he fly to Montana twice to get his quad? Or to meet friends? That he leave you alone even more often? And do you really think he wants your nagging while he's trying to unwind?
Okay well first, humans are supposed to eat meat. You very clearly are going against evolution and societal standards by choosing to not, and barring that I'm sure you can at least agree that at a restaurant serving standard fair, meat would not be outside the realm of normalcy. I'm not sure at all what the baby's choice in diet has to do with this discussion.  At this point I think you're incapable of an objective point of view and it's not worth further discussion when you reply solely based on emotion. Good luck with your vegetarianism and keep fighting the good fight.
Uh, repeatedly raping a girl for months straight and she kept dating him?  How can that be rape?  If a woman continues dating a man for months while accepting his sexual behavior, one could argue that it's no longer rape.  The man could be excused for thinking she merely prefers assertive advances.
Well you know, I someone is beautiful, and their appearance, for whatever reason, facial structure, hairstyle, combination of clothes, anything really, is what floats my boat, I sometimes just want to tell them. For no reason. Maybe its because I'm in a good mood, or maybe because I want to see them smile, or, idk its hard to explain. Also the way you look is something..weird, its what you present to others, but have not choice in presenting, apart from wearing a cardboard box with two holes for the eyes. Also you can decide what your style is supposed to look like, in the boundaries of your budget, but you cant choose the way your body is built, but you can work out. But I feel that still giving an opinion, positive one, can be quite nice. So Im wondering if its just me that thinks "hey, your hair totally rocks, and also the pink color of it and the red of your lipstick make your face look very good, have a nice day" or something else which I wouldnt need to make up and which would be honest and just straight forward..would be something that makes me happy. If the other person then smiles, I say thanks, and we both go our ways again I'd be totally happy, on both sides. Is this too confusing, because I just got up 10 minutes ago, or does that make enough sense to enable you to help me? :)
I used to really hate being short, too. I'm 5'0" and stopped growing taller when I was around 15. Friends used to rag on me about it all the time and my younger brother never let me hear the end of it when he surpassed my height (in fact, he still teases me for being short sometimes...siblings, man).   But once I got out of that awkward teenage phase and started learning to accept myself, I got over it. This is just how I was made. I learned what to wear to make my legs look longer and splurged on a couple pairs of nice heels for those days when I want to feel taller. I worked on my posture, voice, and body language to ensure that I'll always be taken seriously when I need to be. And most importantly, I committed myself fully to loving my body, as pint-sized as it may be, because in all the world there's not another body like it - it's mine, and it deserves love and care.   Still, I know it can be a frustrating journey. I hope you start feeling better about your height soon. &lt;3
[deleted]
[deleted]
It is your body.  In a free country, however, you do not get to dictate what others think about your display of your body.    
[deleted]
I had noticed but thought I might give it the benefit of the doubt. Thankfully very few women subscribe to its more ridiculous tenets.
&gt;peer between legs while stuck in crowds  I'm even shorter than you and I can't do this... I think you have to be a little kid/toddler to do that  
You are supposed to downvote post that don't add anything to the conversation so you being at -15 seems fine to me.
[deleted]
That does seem young but you're right it is for the best. I always new I could talk to my doctor about anything. I remember when I went on birth control at 18, he recommended it for my acne but reminded me again that our conversations were private and he wasn't going to discuss anything with my mom. 
This was my thought as well. This is like 10-20 minutes a piece done by amateurs; it's clearly not related to the nation the artist is from.
[deleted]
It doesn't really matter here though because only 1% of women are still breastfeeding by 6 months though :(.
The only thing that OP is responsible for changing is OP.  The reason OP's tone is criticized is because OP's tone is narcissistic, which can hinder OP's ability to be successful.
Um, innocent until proven guilty isn't a standard of evidence.  Individuals in college hearings still have the presumption of innocence.  The traditional standard of (criminal) evidence is *beyond a reasonable doubt*.  The standard for civil evidence is beyond the preponderance of the evidence.
I hope you also realize that next time you *can* make a big stink about this. I think this guy has done this before and knows that he can get away with ass grabbing without any problems. 
No, because many of them who need abortions for medical reasons end up having to quit and come back to the US.   This isn't entirely about how many are dying, it's about the morality of making them pay for it themselves when it's a medically necessary procedure. If you need any other life-saving procedure, the PC pays for it--why should an abortion be any different?
An anecdote that goes against what they said, and shows an experience contrary to their point.   Edit: Because I felt like it. 
And it what way is THAT sexual??   Get your mind out of the gutter!!
Yeah so paranoid, they probably lock their doors at  night too! Nutjobs.
[deleted]
You'd assume they have a better knowledge of the target market of the specific country though.
At this point in this person's life I doubt that just because you didn't set him straight you caused or allowed him to think this was ok for him to continue doing to other people. Most likely he has been this way or had this problem for a while. Don't feel bad for not setting him straight. It was a traumatic event. 
[deleted]
Why does that have to be awkward? My partner is your height (not as skinny though) and I weight the same as him if not 5 lbs more because I'm 6'. There's nothing awkward about that. 
&gt; It worries me that he may now think this is acceptable behavior and may do it to other guys, guys more timid and who couldn't brush off groping like I can.  The reality is that he probably already thought it was acceptable behavior and will continue to think it is acceptable behavior. Or at least, something he can and will get away with. Nothing in your story led me to believe that he hasn't tried this stunt on someone else. That man is a predator. No two ways about it. 
&gt; People have different standards, and if his paranoia is restricted to this then it's probably harmless.  I'll agree with the rest, but that's a huge if.  Paranoia's rarely constrained to so isolated a circumstance.
I actually voted you both up for this because you both made valid points.  Nevertheless, I think it's willfully ignorant to pretend that people (men in particular) are going to start looking at female breasts as akin to udders simply because a woman has a baby. It just doesn't work like that. It's not something that can be turned off.   As long as breasts are in any way sexualized then it's unfair to say that they're "overly" sexualized. Nothing changes for the men just because a woman has a baby.   Now, I'm not disagreeing with your fundamental point which is that breasts serve a biological function. On the other hand it's also something of a dual function because we're pretty sure that we've evolved to a greater or lesser degree to consider breasts as something of a measure of a woman's fertility. And woman are more than happy to play along with this so it's not like it's an unfair double-standard : Women want to make their breasts appear bigger and rounder and firmer just as much as the men want to see them bigger, rounder, and firmer-appearing.  All I'm really saying is that it's like a deal we've all signed up for and you've got to take the good with the bad.
Your parents wouldn't consent to birth control (or would pitch a fit) but you believe they would consent to having your uterus removed when you're still a child? Come on. It's clear to me you're not thinking straight. You could benefit from some counseling to try and discover where all this hatred for your uterus comes from. It sounds very unhealthy and not at all normal. Something is certainly up but imo it has little, if anything, to do with your uterus. No, you won't find a doctor to take it out. Seek out some professional help to get to the bottom of what is *really* causing these issues. 
But I get to call you an asshole if you choose to stare, let alone look down my shirt. Because that's asshole behaviour.
Damn now i'm going to have to double major in cs and philosophy! FUCK!
Cat. Cat. Cat. Cat. Cat.
As a guy who's been in the "when the subway car empties" situation, I always feel like it comes across as "I don't want to sit next to you", rather than "I think we both want privacy", especially if there are only a few open double-seats.  But yeah, the guy sitting next to OP was either 1) Japanese or 2) Weirdo.
I'm sure there must be, since they can diagnose you with it officially. There are also ways to test it for yourself informally, such as going on an exclusion diet where you avoid all foods that feed candida (don't worry, you can do it and stay healthy nutritionally) and see if things improve. I am going to have to wait a month for my testing, but I'm going in to test a variety of possible causes for my issues, and I fit the criteria for one in many ways. 
5% sounds low but 20% does sound high. 
It could be a blocked hair follicle which has encysted.
I've been on Implanon for over a year. Sometimes the first few months when you're switching methods can be wonky. I eventually settled into having regular but really frequent periods.  Keep an eye on it, be kind to yourself. Remember that it's always possible to switch methods! Trial and error is, unfortunately, what has to happen sometimes. Good luck!
If there was only one person on the bus I wouldn't have sat beside them. I just sat near the front where I got on and sat beside somebody even though there were empty seats near the back. 
I'm amused that as a mathematician and computer scientist, I graphically average out to a philosopher.  Which makes sense, symbolic logic and the three laws of thought are the very foundation of any formal science, which math and CS are.  One thing I will say about IQ tests is that they are only useful insofar as you understand what they are assessing.  It would seem likely that many of the quantitative fields provide training in the areas that an IQ test assesses.  Critical thinking, strict logic, problem solving, and spatial reasoning are all things highly emphasized in all of those high IQ fields. In my experience taking IQ tests as part of a grad students research those skills seem important to many of those tests, so it would make sense that people that are (hopefully) rigorously trained in those aspects of thought perform better.  The authors analysis is also interesting, noting that quantitative performance is a good indicator as to what type of major a student will choose.  It certainly seems compelling that programs to entice students to understand and appreciate quantitative subjects and lines of reasoning would help with STEM enrollment, and maybe help with gender representation.  The US school systems certainly do us no favors in that regard, at least form what I've experienced, so it would be nice to see such programs gain traction.
It would clear it up a lot more if you just edited that part out of your original post. 
This doesn't make sense.  There is no brig for civil suits for non military federal employees.   What are they being sued for if it is civil?  You do not get jail time for civil lawsuits (baring obstruction or contempt.).    I feel like you are confusing your terms.   Civil vs criminal as well as military vs non military.
It's not fucked up. It's what's healthiest for your body. I understand that your period is really stressing you out right now, and I get that you're frustrated. What you need to understand is that your uterus isn't just an incubator for a fetus. It's also part of the whole system that regulates sex hormones and in turn regulates bone growth and epiphyseal plate fusion and bone turnover and nutrient absorption and use and general metabolism. Yes, your ovaries are the big players in this, but your uterus is important, too, and removing it now could cause all kinds of problems including premature osteoporosis and other musculoskeletal problems. And then there's the risk of pelvic organ prolapse, which can require additional surgeries or a fun little device called a vaginal pessary to support your falling organs.  It also sounds like your problem isn't that you have a uterus. It's that you have no way to control your uterus, and that's a much more manageable problem with way better and less risky methods than a hysterectomy. Your problem is with your dad, and your best bet is to talk to your pediatrician without your dad in the room so you can explain all of your issues and then enlist their help getting your dad on board to help you control this. It carries a lot more weight when a doctor says that something is a valid medical treatment and option and is something you should do than when a lay person says it, especially a very young lay person. And once you're able to get to a clinic by yourself and save up the money for it, you could get something a little more permanent like an IUD or an implant to bide your time til you naturally reach menopause.
That's a pretty weird/poor way to get information.  Depending on the work it might be important to make sure that everyone is aware that something particular is going on, power being cut or water being turned off.  But that is an unsettling way to convey that.  Did you ever figure out why they asked?  **Edit**:  I always find it funny that my most controversial comments are the ones that I find most benign, but given the typographical dagger and the fact that I've watched this post go from -2 to 6, and back to 1, clearly it struck a nerve with someone.  Rather than reply to both people expressing incredulity at my statements I'll just put my rationale here.  I've had to do a lot of home visits before as part of volunteer work, and as a largish man I'm always conscious that my presence can be intimidating to some, especially smaller women.  While the plumber who asked OP that question point blank shouldn't feel bad or anything, that doesn't mean there aren't ways to get the information he needs while being mindful of how his request is being received.  A simple:  &gt;  If anyone else is home let them know I'm here and working on X.  or  &gt; For my safety, is anyone else home that I need to let know that I'm here?  This really isn't a huge deal either way, but I can certainly see how someone at home alone would be disquieted by a visitor asking them that point blank, without knowledge of the larger context of why that is relevant.  So downvote away if you disagree that there were better ways to phrase it or disagree with the benefit of different phrasing, but realize that you are just as much putting your head in the sand at how the world is as the people who are on the other side of the spectrum and feel like they are in constant danger by anyone around them in all situations and make crazy accusations towards men.  But I guess nuance gets lost in the frantic search for bombastic sound bites.  Congrats.
To be fair,  I'm not staring down anyone's shirts, or making anyone uncomfortable.  When I check out my guy friends,  it's just a quick glance when no one's looking.    I can't help it that they're ridiculously good looking.  :(
And the right to safety. Abortion clinic violence since 1977: 8 murders, 17 attempted murders, 42 bombings, 181 arsons.
You're going to hate me... I'm 99% satisfied with the first pill I tried. It's made my periods more predictable, shortened the duration of cramps, and has also made my skin slightly clearer. I occasionally get nausea and it's slightly annoying that I do still get periods (I get spotting if I skip them for more than 4 months) - those are the only imperfections.  Have you tried any progesterone-only methods? An implant (e.g. nexplanon) might work for you with fewer side effects than a combined pill. Or a mini-pill would be another option if you don't want something implanted in you right away... just remember you have to be strict with taking it at the same time every day.
This! Every time I compliment a child I know, I try to applaud how much effort they've obviously put into a thing and how much better they've gotten at it since the last time they showed me. It's like, visibly obvious on their kid-faces that it sinks in better and means more than "Oh aren't you pretty/strong?"  Plus, I get subjected to more magic tricks and art shows and cool stuff they built in minecraft, so I actually get to observe that process. It's wicked inspiring.   
[deleted]
I'm happily married and I'd stick up for you because I have daughters. PLUS my mother instilled chivalry in me. 
 Haha, that is the conclusion that most rational humans would come to... I would feel so awkward asking someone to do that for me on a regular basis! Also sometimes I just type random stuff onto a document so that I look too busy to look at him. 
It's interesting to me how some of the bad artists' results ended up looked like paintings by famous masters. Like, they didn't look like photographs anymore, but like the quirks of individual artistic style. 
bad wax. typical brazilian should be everything, including bootyhole, unless specifically requested to leave something there.
Although your story is inspiring, is it wise to post this? I am unfamiliar with Canadian court rules,  but in the USA, this post would actually harm your case quite a bit.  Here's why:  If this post were referenced, the quote "Ie, it is law that in a case like my own, the defense cannot bring up any of my sexual history (which I was terrified of happening, as is anyone)" Would indicate to a jury that you were hiding something, and possibly instill reasonable doubt in the jury.  Again, I wish you well on your journey, but be careful when talking about this.  Letting a jury know that you are attempting to prevent the defense from stating something, even if that something is actually irrelevant, will raise huge red flags.
[deleted]
That's the point. This law made it so police had an easier time protecting those going in and out of the clinic from the violent ones. It's easier to keep someone intent on violating the law from reaching someone in a 35 ft buffer zone than an 8 ft moving bubble. That's why this law was enacted in the first place. The article explicitly said that. 
Seems to me more harming of workers than the actual women which wouldn't be prevented by restricting these zones. If you can show some incidents where a buffer zone could have prevented any of these murders or bombings you may start to form a logical argument 
Breastfeeding is not easy and the NHS doesn't offer the kind of support I got from my private health insurance in the US  That said, I think the difference is primarily cultural. The rise of breastfeeding in the US was primarily due to a grassroots effort from women who demanded more lactation support in hospital and also spread the word about health and emotional benefits. At least where I live (Berkshire) I haven't encountered any mums who breastfeed at children's centres, for instance.
Sudden changes in your body are generally worth seeing a doctor for. 
[deleted]
100% this. We don't want freedom of speech to be limited to "speech that doesn't annoy me or piss me off." 
Yeah, I did the same. But as soon as it would calm down, I'd lessen the amount of make up. I also used pressed mineral powder instead of my MAC studio FX powder which was heavier. I think once you hit your 30s you go through a huge hormonal shift, and it just throws everything off. But it will get better. Make sure you're drinking lots of water and getting plenty of sleep too. It really makes a difference.
[deleted]
&gt; Hypothetically, can he legally get away with recording sex with out me knowing?  Probably not.  Now IANAL (I Am Not A Lawyer), but:  North Carolina is a single party consent state as far as recording goes, but the expectation of privacy would undoubtedly matter in any legal proceedings.  [NC GS 15A-287](http://www.ncga.state.nc.us/EnactedLegislation/Statutes/HTML/BySection/Chapter_15A/GS_15A-287.html) governs the laws regarding recordings of conversations/interactions.  Now obviously if his defense is to use GS 15A-287 as a guideline, some questions come to mind:  1) Does sex count as "communication".  If my read of 15A-286 is correct, then no, as "oral communication" is specified as "[...] any oral communication uttered by a person exhibiting an expectation that such communication is not subject to interception under circumstances justifying such expectation [...]"  Obviously including all of sex in this is a bit of a stretch.  2) The expectation of privacy matters when it comes to eavesdropping.  Recording an interaction between two parties on a busy city street is different than recording their same interaction by peeping over a fence into their lawn.  Likewise, I would suspect that any privacy laws covering recording of sex would make the same distinction.  *That said* since obviously the person doing the recording is one of the parties, I suspect that wouldn't matter.  3) Intent of recording matters.  Is he doing it for surveillance?  Are the recordings to be used for sexual purposes?  Are they to remain solely in his possession, or would they be distributed?  The answers to those questions will *definitely* matter.  If it's for sexual purposes, voyeurism laws come into play.  Surveillance?  Not so much.  If he's planning on distributing them, what is the intent behind the distribution?  Again, if it's distributed with a wink and a nod that it "might be fun" or something like that, then it's hard to argue its for surveillance purposes only.  4) Would it be his home?  It's easier to argue surveillance usage if he owns/manages the property.  If he doesn't, and if the camera records *any* communication to which he's not a party he's screwed.  Again, I am not a lawyer... but I do have a big interest in privacy, so I have some knowledge about NC's laws on this.  Still, if you need legal advice **ASK A LAWYER.**  Personally, I think it sounds like a sleazy thing to do regardless of why.  But that's just me.
TIL Germany digs the vampire look?
You just totally proved my point. 
Hopefully.  It's pretty easy to ignore a text or just not bother with someone anymore...  not so much if you work with them.
Nope, pretty sure it's the men's fault. Also, please quit following me around, it's creepy.
No category for the humanities?
That's fair. This was pipes, but could apply.
&gt; If it was meaningless I would think you be able to prove that.  If it was meaningful, you'd be able to explain why "unmarried women between 20-30 who live in large metropolitan areas" are the most important category, more so than any other particular group and more than "women" in general and why that distinction matters.   I'm interested in facts, not carving up demographic categories until you get something that appeals to your biases. Taking anything together shows unequivocally the same data.
[deleted]
Have you ever been in a group project with shitty teammates? Have you ever been in a WoW raid with a bunch of people who don't know what they're doing? A lot of oppressive people have been raised and conditioned to be the way they are. Having anger towards them isn't an emotional exchange that will have a net effect for you, just like getting angry when in a frustrating situation does not tend to help. It is just exhausting without any benefits. Be the best person that you can be, and try to respectfully call people out when they are being problematic. Evolving out of oppression can take a long time.
IQ doesn't have to measure intelligence to be useful. It measures what it measures, and that strongly correlates with a bunch of other useful things. As long as you aren't using the results to make tight classifications, then it's valuable.
I hope you are successful. But I gotta ask, legally speaking, do you have a case against him, i.e can you prove the accusation in court?   Sorry if i've missed that information somewhere. It'd be shame if he managed to get away with it.       edit: why downvote? am I missing something?
[deleted]
How does his comment differ from any of the other comments here from women? He says it's uncomfortable because it's uncommon to see, but that it's nice to see a mother caring for her child. That's exactly the same as I feel, and I don't own a penis. He's not offering a different opinion "as a man". 
[deleted]
This is absolutely horrifying. I am so disappointed with the state. The buffer zone wasn't an unreasonable size. All that bufferzone did was give  women and men a chance to be safe. I am genuinely afraid of possible assaults on both doctors and patients taking place because of this ruling. 
Yeah let's just start popping up protest free zones. That can't backfire 
[deleted]
The word is 8 assassinations, not random murders of abortion doctors.  Those statistics do not include other murders of abortion staff that are random (e.g. jilted lover).  What bothers me is we make laws to stop assassinations, those laws work, and idiots then say "well we don't need those laws that are working anymore."   Yes we do.  They worked, keep them.
Fuckem cut ties. exercise, do yoga, get a lab or husky and enjoy your life. You need a decent job of course one that can at least allow you to afford your own place. Than find yourself a good man who will love you. You sound like you have a good head on your shoulders and a kind heart.
Your absolutely right and logically I know this but like u said this situation has thrown me into the emotional maturity of a child!   There has been other instances, 5 year as ago when we started dating, and that's where it stems from. Habitually me feeling abandoned by him for his family. And him telling me he'll never love me as much as his mom, at which point I had to explain the love is different for mom and wife. His mom tried to make it the same. She started the competition, she even used to call me his other wife implying she was his first.   5 years has passed and he has grown and realized he said that when he was 18 and realized how his mom may have been overbearing, so he has distanced and his mom has stopped the nonsense. However the pain is still In there deep down and it doesn't take much for me to feel threatened and he pls wounds to resurface.  Just having someone tell me in acting immature makes it feel better because I realize it's just my insecurity based on old fears  it's not real so thank you.  
I wanted to upvote nearly every statement in that post, but in particular:  * Don't let things build up. Address them early. The more it builds up the harder it may feel to bring it up. * Be direct. "Why?" There really is no answer. * You don't have to have a compelling reason why not. "Because there is absolutely no need." * Don't escalate to management without first bringing it up to the other person involved. The first question your manager will ask is "did you bring it up with &lt;weird guy&gt;"? You want to be able to answer yes to that question. Also, "he keeps doing this after I've asked him to stop" removes any kind of "but i didn't know it was weird" defense he might think he has.
[deleted]
Read /u/ostertagpa 's comment.  If a male CEO said in an interview that "My number one priority is being a great Dad", then I'm sure he'd be asked if he thought he could actually do both.
MORE UP VOTES ..this is a very inspiring add!! No joke when I say this, GIRL POWER!!!!
The World Bank has more money to purchase a buffer zone and to purchase armed monkeys.
"meaningful to a degree" is not the same thing as using an SAT score to guess a corresponding IQ and then presenting the evidence as interchangeable. 
After my brother died, my mother and I never talked about him again. I'd be fine talking about him, but it seems like she doesn't want me to bring it up (I could be wrong about that). I guess I don't want to upset her any more than she already is upset. It was an abrupt death. He wasn't "dying", he had health issues and substance abuse issues, but nobody knew the details (he didn't talk to anybody in the family anymore). He was living like 5 hours away from where my other lived, his friends found him dead in his apartment, the cops somehow got my mother's info and she came home from work one day with cops waiting at her house, to tell her all this.  I had a dream last night that my husband died suddenly, and everybody around me refused to mention his name or acknowledge that I was ever married, or he existed. I woke up really, really upset.
I might document with an email after the convo, but I wouldn't open with an email (looks too much like "I'm documenting this for a lawsuit."  Just IMO.  
[deleted]
Can't watch it in Canada. Does anyone have an alternate link or transcript?
Yeah I don't really take advice from 11 minute old accounts sorry.
I certainly hope you're able to fix the same critical eye to men. Examples abound everywhere. Assholishness is equal opportunity.
Yea seriously. I don't want to generalise here, but I am deeply disturbed when stuff like this comes from a lady. I mean it does not make any sense .. at least to me.
I think that's totally reasonable. Obviously entering into a lifelong partnership is a lot about balancing your needs and desires with those of your SO. If the last name thing is something they prioritize and you don't, it would seem silly to cause problems in your relationship over what other people think you should and should not do.
...I don't see how that proves the point that women are biologically inclined for non-STEM fields?   I mean, I could use the same argument to say that nurture changes women's biology to make them more biologically-inclined to not enter STEM fields, meaning that we still need to solve the problem of society pushing women away from STEM?   
Yeah I love the changing-the-sex-in-a-context test that you describe in your last sentence. I learned it a long time ago in a Psychology and Women course and I think about it often. I even asked myself the question before I posted, but then I told myself, "If a male CEO had said in a prior interview that his kids were going to hold him accountable to one job only--that of being a father--then I would expect Matt to ask the same question to that male CEO."  I didn't see the interview and don't know the context, but I just learned that she's the first female CEO of GM. I began wondering, "Is Matt simply asking the questions a lot of people are already wondering?" If he is, is that wrong? (Thinking out loud there.) I'm also reminded that the media not only reflects a culture's attitudes, but can also reinforce them. In this instance, the fact that his interview involved asking questions surrounding her gender may reinforce to viewers that her gender is the most important thing about her.
Not really. Besides, your remark really over simplifies a bigger problem with society as a whole. 
Yeah, at some point you've just gotta laugh at the ridiculousness of it all to keep your sanity.
So right next to the abortion clinic is ok but if you protest anywhere near the entrance to congress or the FBI building or any number of other Gov buildings you go strait to jail.  I'm almost glad(in the context that they shot may have shot themselves in the foot)they did this because its sets predicted to remove the boundaries near where politicians and gov officials work... this one  https://www.aclu.org/blog/free-speech/how-big-deal-hr-347-criminalizing-protest-bill
Well, there are solid arguments for it, though. It does annoy me when I see a funding opportunity title that looks perfect for, say, East Los Angeles, and it turns out that it's only for Pakistan or Uganda... but population control in the third world has HUGE global benefits at relatively low investment.
I've been dealing with breakouts for awhile and it's only been in the last few years that I've gotten them under control.  Bliss has a really good acne line called No Zit Sherlock, it comes in a "trail" package with all three steps.  Also, Clinique has a great line for acne treatment.  Those are the two I always suggest.  I've never gone to a dermatologist (I probably should) but those have both really worked well for my face.  I would suggest to stay away from Murad, that made my face worse and actually made my best friend start breaking out (and she never did in the past).  If you're looking for something to cover it up but also help fight it I would suggest Clinique again or Neutrogena foundations or spot cover-ups.  
[deleted]
I've personally prevented so many rapes by just watching the drinks of girls I didn't even know a table over/seat over at the bar. OH MAN do the ruffie dropping pricks hate that! I've been called every version of angry cockblocking lesbian possible.  All anyone of either gender has to do to employ this method is watch and pass a note. Seriously I'd just scribble "I saw a guy put something in your drink" and hand it to them. Bars are fucking loud. Drunks are fucking stupid and usually a roofie dropper is already 2 out of 3 sheets to the wind by the time he ratchets up the courage to do it. 
It's not "taking away" anyone's right, same as restrictions on gun ownership aren't "taking away" the 2nd amendment.   Nobody is being prevented from protesting, just not in a way that would constitute a threat because of their distance. Same as banning ownership of fully-automatic weapons is not the same as banning gun ownership.   Abuses do justify creating new laws to protect people.  
And when men getting raped is as endemic a problem as women being raped, then it will deserve as much consideration and discussion. Until then, be grateful that we don't have to worry about shit like that.
http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/comments/28ytt6/my_birth_control_woes_are_over_i_love_the/
Their distance isn't a threat, a violent action would be a threat. If they have done nothing and are simply protesting on public property you are restricting their right to free speech and right to assemble  
/u/glimmery 
It may not be a "high danger" but it is one that exists in some amount (pretty much every girl I know has a friend who's been roofied, or has themselves been roofied). The bigger issue is that women have to self-police, and instead of society saying "don't roofy people" it says, much more loudly and openly, "women, always watch your drink." The onus is on the victim and while women are told to constantly think about these things, men rarely have to. That's the whole point of this bit.
Read the article.  Still sexist.
Wrong. Rape is a category of violent crime. Men are still more often the victims overall. 
America is a nation of contradictions--capable of both great acts and great injustices--and always has been. The Declaration of Independence stated that "all men are created equal" and the Constitution had provisions supporting slavery.
Thank you, I'll try and call them in the morning. (midnight-ish here)
Read a comment about someone who claimed to stop countless assualt attempts just by watching guys drop drugs into drinks and warning the  victim. I didnt believe them so I read this article and found it relevent.
That depends entirely on where in the ME she is, unless her father is the CEO of Shell they're not going to prosecute anyone if she's in, say, Saudi-Arabia.  Rape aside her being with an unrelated male unsupervised is illegal.
[deleted]
I would only caution that you probably want to chart for a few months to get a good idea of your fertility schedule. You can get pregnant from sex several days before ovulation, and temperature and cervical mucus alone will not tell you what day you WILL ovulate. Temperature tells you that you have (and what part if your cycle you are on), while CM can help determine whether you are in your fertile window (the several days before and 24-48 hours after ovulation). But you can only know which day in your cycle you ovulated AFTER it happens, which is why for FAM to work you need to be reasonably familiar with your cycle so that you have a clue which cycle days are probably dangerous for sex and know to avoid them ahead of time. Then you can confirm when ovulation has passed and you're in the clear until some time after your period. I'm not sure at all how effective it is as birth control - I've heard good and bad things. Good luck!  Source: I temped and tracked CM to help me get pregnant. It was really frustrating the first month when I thought I ovulate on day 14 and found out it's closer to day 11. I timed sex so wrong that month!
I think it's not so much that as young women we WANT to be BOYS, but that we recognize our experience as less privileged, and we want that privilege. That said, I see my sons resent what they see as female privilege. I try to minimize this by emphasizing that it's not about don't hit girls (like their little sister), but more about don't HIT anyone EVER, but especially don't pick on those that are smaller\weaker than you. I want them to be protectors, not predators. That said, it's pretty damn hard to get big brothers to have empathy for little sisters. Any tips would be welcome.  
[deleted]
The hostility with which she said it and my experience living in nyc made me immediately assume that she was drawing on her own real experience when they wrote that line. It didn't even occur to me that it would be seen as silly until I read your comment! Haaah that's sad..
&gt; like how cross burning doesn't actually require any planned violence, but it is considered illegal if directed at anyone  You're misinterpreting this. The court didn't actually rule this to be illegal. They gave an example of something that is likely to be illegal to help make their argument. If someone was arrested for this it would still have to go to court, and the particular circumstance would be looked at. They would still have to prove an intent to intimidate.  
If you scream in someone's face (as is often the case) that they are a murderer who's going to hell for something they are legally allowed to do, you are harrassing them.  Plus, the "free speech" protection is only against the government, not everybody else.
&gt;they were very clear that it can be considered threatening and illegal as long as it can be shown there is a target.   And they were also clear that abortion protests *can* be threatening and illegal, but that there are constitutional issues in deeming *all* abortion protests threatening and illegal.
Honestly, I would teach all your kids.  Guys might get slipped something, either intended for a girl or intended for them either with malicious intent or a joke.  It's just smart.  
[deleted]
It is literally impossible for a private citizen to violate the 1st amendments rights of another citizen.
&gt; If you take the option of leaving off the table, the other party really has no reason to negotiate.   Agreed, even if this is your position you should not make that known otherwise you lose all your leverage. 
Thank you. 
&gt; Then why say that you've never seen it? You realize your limited scope of experience is nearly meaningless in terms of what goes on in the world, right?  Just establishing that I am a very aware person and have never seen it. That is very important in making decisions for people. Do you make decisions about how you feel about something without personal opinions? I know you are all hot to jump to the gender war here, but stop and think for a second.  "Women should call people out, too, but it doesn't always carry the same weight with the guilty parties as it does if men call them out, unfortunately. "  When the ten thousand shitty things that women do to men happen, do women "step up" and say something? Never seen it. In fact...  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=LlFAd4YdQks&amp;feature=kp  "I mean, if you're getting called out for disrespecting or harassing women, there's a good chance you don't think that highly of women as people."  Reaching...desperately reaching to build strawman, so you can rip into something, since your arguments are built on nothing, and you want to kill. I get it...I get it.
Nope, you are wrong once again. Care to make up any more stuff that I didn't say?  I'm just saying some barrier between protesters and those that they are protesting doesn't seem outrageous.  They are in no way being silenced, simply moved 10-30 feet back so people can pass freely. I find it funny that people are so up in arms about this.
It doesn't have to be advocating to be "normalizing" and desensitizing. 
While it definitely is a good idea to watch drinks, the studies I've seen on cases of suspected drink spiking have indicated that it is very infrequent.  Overuse of alcohol is a much larger contributor to suspected drugging.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Date_rape_drug#General_statistics_of_predator_drugs  http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pubmed/19527282  
Thanks, im asking her now if she has thought about talking about it to someone (other than me), i dont think she wants people to know and feel sorry for her or make it define her, so convincing her to go to the police might be hard. I have at least convinced her to save any of those messages and told her she could try to tell the guy she has proof and will contact the police if he doesn't stop. i guess that's the next best thing. Thanks for the advice.
[deleted]
I was drugged at a party once, though I doubt I was the intended target. I felt it coming on and knew something was wrong. I handed my keys to my trusted male friend and said, "we need to leave now." They got me home and they took turns watching over me while I lay paralyzed, completely aware. It was awful. 
Am I missing something? I cannot for the life of me figure out why you wouldn't just say no. I would do it with my eyebrows raised and a laugh, but ymmv. 
[deleted]
Don't you just wish you had this True Women ™ following *you* around, telling you how to "woman" better?
LOL keep thinking that's what you are doing. This isn't attacking the first amendment. If you want to keep telling yourself that I'm saying they shouldn't have the right to protest, then go ahead, but you aren't addressing what i'm saying.  I fully believe that they have every right to spew their hate. I just think they need to back up a few feet. Hardly the picture you are painting.
That's not what the user is interested in. They want legal *precedent* (I think they used the wrong word) that home surveillance can be used this way.
[deleted]
[deleted]
If you [search this subreddit](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/search?q=menstrual+cup&amp;restrict_sr=on), you'll find a lot of threads talking about menstrual cups.    I've been using one for about a year.  It took a little while to get used to, but I really feel happy about not producing any waste.  I also love being able to go on long hikes without having to worry about changing anything.  If it turns out menstrual cups aren't your thing, you could also check out washable/reusable menstrual pads.  
Hell, that would be better.  I'd rather sit in the fucking server room at this point. Also, if interns and fresh-out-of-school pukes get offices, then that is fucked up.
It doesn't matter.  If I was the only person in a movie theater and some dude tried to sit right next to me I'd tell him that seat is taken.  Rude is rude.  If he insisted, I wouldn't let him have power over me like that I'd physically block him and call the usher.  I'm fairly sure they would take your side if a guy wants to be in your bubble in an empty theater.  That's nothing but a power play.
It is extremely common for people to find their own genitals unattractive. The more they try to hide them the worse it gets. Don't WAIT to feel good enough to go to a gynecologist, because you are waiting for something that is probably going to go the opposite direction. Take the step now.  Secondly as a guy I find puffy mounds very sexy. It is a sign of arousal. If your mound is fat and big, I'm pretty sure it's not going to turn people off. Just like how men use penile pumps to make their penises big and hard, women will often use pussy pumps to achieve this same effect.  Long labias are hit and miss. Some guys love them, some guys hate them. Admittedly less experienced guys tend  to find less attractive, so you will find them less often in porn. The infamous playboy pussy usually has no inner labia. That said many men, including myself claim that long labias tend to feel better during sex. Some couples I know attempt to stretch their labia using weights to recreate this effect. You will find with the exception of some very inexperienced men, this will either be a benefit to you, or will have little to no impact on how attractive men find your vagina.  As far as the white perineum, I'm not certain what exactly you are describing, but I wouldn't worry about that either. This honestly sound like you are knit picking there. I doubt very much any guy is going to care about that.  For some context. I am a guy who LOVES vaginas. I am not talking about like normal guys love pussy. I mean I could stare at them all day, aroused or not. I vastly prefer them to boobs. I used to work in porn, I have seem my fair share of vaginas. I have even seen a few I really would consider ugly, sorry ladies I am being honest. I am not like your typical twoxchromosome poster who will tell you what you want to hear. If you check my post history, you will see I have my fair share of posts on here that get hated on for being brutally honest or counter to the typical circle-shlick this sub can be. But, the features you are describing are not among those that I think would be considered ugly by anyone but
I don't know when the last time it happened was, she only told me he sometimes will get a message from him say stuff like that.
haha. You acted exactly how the protestor would have imagined.
Just wondering, how long have you two been married? Support him when he wants to do nice things for his parents. Suggest nice things. If he actually does ever put her "before" you, draw the line.
:D
I'm not trying to be contrarian or difficult. I'd really like to see your perspective.   What does not accepting this living arrangement entail? Explain to me how that's supposed to compel the kind of behavior you want.   I have a special interest in this because my dad is a lazy shit and my mom wants him to do things but she doesn't bring anything to the table. She gets all mad at him and he continues to not do stuff. He's perfectly happy and my mom gets herself all worked up for nothing.   &gt;  Why would you need to threaten to leave just to demand change?  It doesn't need to be a threat but where is your leverage to get the man to do something he doesn't want to do? What are you trading for? Or (like my mom) do you feel entitled to his labor?
[deleted]
This was a unanimous decision by the Supreme Court. It's a pretty extreme claim to say that it's somehow lacking in an understanding of the constitution.
Nope. I absolutely believe in discussing a career move with ones spouse, male or female. I had in fact already discussed with the possibility with my husband, who had said 'Go for it!' without hesitation. But I think that's my business, not my company's. And even then, once I told my boss that my husband was in fact supportive, that should have been that. Not 'Well, okay, but go home and talk to him tonight about it anyway.'
http://www.aic.gov.au/documents/7/8/D/%7B78D26268-98C6-4508-8A9A-AA6BD2E34108%7D2004-11-drinkspiking.pdf  
Yes I call him a rapist.  The ethics of two drunk people having sex is a different conversation, but if *anyone* intentionally gets *anyone* drunk to sleep with them, or pursues someone who is drunk because they know it will be easier to sleep with them, they are a rapist.  I would absolutely stop being friends with any of my friends who did that to anyone. I have in the past (accompanied by very firm rebuke) and I will in the future.  Doesn't matter guy/girl, girl/guy, girl/girl, guy/guy.  
Honest question: If you don't have any evidence or a description, what *could* they have done if you had filed a report?
You would really benefit from seeing a therapist.
I grew up in a fairly conservative/old-fashioned household, where nearly all the men happened to have died. It was... Interesting.
Do you know anyone with kids? Babysit them.
Yeah, I know. That's why I stopped.
This is a supportive community. Telling a woman all they can offer is sex is not what we do here. If you want to say things like that go somewhere else.
http://badassdigest.com/2014/04/29/can-hulk-complain-about-game-of-thrones-rape-scene-yet/
Honestly, if you feel pretty enough, are clean and well presented, the amount of make up and jewellery shouldn't affect your sale potential. In a sale position, it's your attitude and natural charm that draws in customers and gets a sale, not a pretty face.   Unless they want you to become part of the window dressing, or you really want this job, just keep doing what you're doing and be yourself.   The fact that they were being quite general about how you present yourself seems strange to me. If it was me, I'd have told them to shove it for making me look like a barbie doll, but I don't know your situation so I can't advise you to do that ^_^'
All love involves sex. Not all sex involves love.
Sounds like somebody slipped some alcohol into his drink.
That's probably true.  Call it top 5, then.
In my experience, feminism has become difficult to distinguish from being offended by absolutely everything.
Or a person with narcissist traits. 
Holy hyperbole batman!
At least that annoying rattle will be gone.
I've never worked for a company like this, but I know places like MAC...well we all know they have a pretty obvious and strict image for their sales team. Though, you would also probably know that was their image when training. I think it seems pretty odd and I'd probably call human resources for a clarification of their policies regarding dress code, image, brand representation, etc.
It matters that he isn't being malicious, but that doesn't mean he's being totally fair and kind, either. I would personally be upset if I told my SO I wanted to do something and he decided to do it with other people instead and didn't even invite me to join. I'm sure he didn't purposefully go about things that way, but it's still what happened.   There's definitely work you can do to feel more comfortable about his having fun without you. You can ask yourself if you feel secure in your relationship and why or why not, and work on improving those conditions. You can make a bigger effort to find the time for friends or socialize. You can go to therapy and discuss what's holding you back from feeling confident and possibly discover deeper reasons for your jealousy. Jealousy usually comes from a problem people have with themselves.
Vaginal sex when not prepared hurts just as much as anal sex when not prepared.  If you think vaginas just ooze lubrication 24/7, you're going to be in a world of surprise when you finally have sex with a woman (assuming you're straight based on your lack of interest in anal).   Besides, even if rape felt wonderful and you came rainbows and unicorns from it, the fact of the matter is that it is not something you wanted. That is why it's a big deal.
Those buttons are a placebo. They aren't connected to anything.
Yes, men are naturally stronger, but being capable with your body has nothing to do with gender. Girls don't run crookedly with their hands flailing, it's jsut an insult.
Absolutely not! She shouldn't let it happen. But she also shouldn't stoop so low as to throw hate back at them. That's just child's play. Point and case.
Maybe it's time to tell her how what she's doing is upsetting you?      My sister is 2 years my senior. I'll be 30 in September, she'll be 32 in October. We could *not* be more different. I'm married with a son and a permanent full-time job (I'm on mat leave), while she's in a secure relationship and freelances as an editor and is adamantly childfree (she's a good Aunty, though :D).      If she was pulling that kind of shit on me, I'd be telling her (OK, knowing me, I'd be yelling at her while crying...).
Not sure if there's a way to block ads on mobile devices using chrome. Google blocked ad blockers on android for chrome. Pretty sure you have to use Firefox to block ads, but since I don't really like mobile Firefox I have to root my device to block ads. I don't want to root my device so that puts me in a pickle.
No, *most* people don't lie for imaginary points. Some maybe, but most of us don't care about karma or whether or not everything is true, because the Internet is much more enjoyable with a little less cynicism. 
If this guy loves you, he should end his other relationship regardless. (Unless they have some kind of open relationship that allows for emotional affairs with coworkers--but it doesn't sound like it.)  If he loves you, he won't put you in a situation that makes you feel guilty all the time.   I get a sketchy vibe from the situation as described, honestly. But people do fall in love at inconvenient times. If I'm giving him the benefit of the doubt, and this were me...I would do both. Tell him my feelings, but insist on limiting contact until he figures shit out.
I think it'd be more fitting to stand protesting "crisis pregnancy centers."
"Like a girl" is insulting to both genders. "Like a man" is only insulting to women.    Edit: You almost never hear "like a woman", but implications are the same. Society just likes to infantilize women.
on two different occasions. not at the same time. nothing wrong with free drugs, but when they are unasked for, and unsuspected, it is a bad time.
Surely it would be more apt for her to try to *talk* with her boyfriend first before starting to doubt their entire relationship, considering going to a therapist  or something?   It's really not an issue as of yet. I can imagine him forgetting it being mentioned and many other reasons why he went with them and why they haven't gone yet. She could have just as easily mentioned something like "Oh, you're going there with your work-mates? We should go there too one day!"   Anyhow. Communication, that's what I'm trying to get at here. It's so easy to fear the worst when  you don't talk or express it first. 
&gt;If these buffer zones aren't constitutional, then why are officials allowed to shovel people into "protest pens", and why is the Supreme Court itself granted a buffer zone when it comes to protests? Total hypocrisy there, and a bad decision.  In the "name" of their personal safety.  In reality its more about keeping counter opinions out of sight out of mind.  Tho while I am sure most people would think it always is, they sometimes do actually do it for the persons safety. As when Palin came to my work to speak no protesting was allowed on property, and police were patrolling the block the whole time she was there. Compared to when we had Romney all 15 protesters were allowed on property, and no one gave a dam.  
[deleted]
This is the problem with being an atheist, theist, feminist or any other kind of "ist". The ignorant people that are doing it wrong are always the ones doing it the loudest. So you end up in a situation where the WBC is the main "Christian" organization that people hear from and start thinking that is what Christianity has come to. Just look at /r/atheism for example. By far the loudest group of non theist on this site, but they do not represent the atheist crowd any better than this one woman represents feminist. Regardless though, these will be the people upon whom others develop their perception of the groups. Not because they represent the majority, simply because they are most vocal.
True, but you always hear about people having intense crushes that they mistake for love when they've been in a relationship for so long. God, I just don't know.    &gt; Tell him my feelings, but insist on limiting contact until he figures shit out.  That would probably be best. Hope working together won't be too awkward though.  Thanks for your reaction! Means a lot. 
Does the study not seem reasonable? It makes sense to me, especially in college or similar environments where *everyone* overdrinks sometimes. I've definitely blacked out way before I thought I would. I am a male.
Its 35 feet. I walk by it everyday. If they wanted to harass, sorry, "talk to" women they still could.
[deleted]
I also get what you're saying, and, again, I'm not attributing any malevolence to you, or saying you're anything short of reasonable.  What I am saying is that younger women are some of the more vulnerable people on public transit, so this is one instance where you might want to think about prioritizing their comfort over your own. As in, taking a sprawled leg seatmate for the team.
Most of the many, many qualities about myself have never been used as an insult.   "Ha ha! You have a nose! What a loser!" ...said no one ever.
Don't hang around those subs. They'd only make you lose faith in humaity. 
You are average height in my country and same as me. Practice taking up room, speaking loudly and directly, and looking people in the eye. Hopefully if you've got those mastered, the only people calling you "little girl" are random creepos on the street (that's the only ones I get these days). 
My partner had a similar issue with a housemate in an off-campus apartment. Recently the law has changed in our state, but at the time it took until a magistrate could deal with it to issue a restraining order so she had to spend several days living out of her own home because her stalker with violent tendencies couldn't be issued a restraining order until office hours.  In this situation we had to deal with police rather than education personnel, but that was difficult enough, and they weren't active working against us.
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
What an awful situation. I'm so sorry you're going through it, but I'm so glad you're not in an abusive situation.  Food shelves are made for situations like this! If you want to PM me your location in Florida, I can do some research on a local food shelf. You should do your best to an emergency cash assistance application going tomorrow.  What sort of health problems were you fired for? Depending on how many employees your employer had, you might be covered under the ADA.  That's a longer term issue that I'd be happy to help you research. For now you need food and help with your bills - http://www.needhelppayingbills.com/html/florida_assistance_programs.html  I hope that website can be of some help. 
I would call corporate if you have that option. 
It is one thing for men to question the severity because they've never encountered it and have a complete lack of knowledge. It is entirely different for them to read #notjusthello, see the disgusting, global, infinite responses, and still claim hysterical, dramatic harpies and nice guys just being prosecuted by feminazis. wtf dudes? How can you be so irrational, have so much bias, be so cluelessly obtuse to have that much dissonance? 
You should be angry, the way they treated you is humiliating.   I remember once being ask to wear more lipstick and I'm still mad about it. I have more than 15 years experience in sales and customer service: My advice is to do your best, those people will never be happy anyway.  I don't understand those kinds of Boss that are putting so much stress on their employees.  Shame on them for treating you the way they did.   I have the gut feeling that their store is not doing too well, that's why they are looking at every little details.
You're absolutely right.  I need to buck up no matter what I do in the future.  Thanks.
I was thinking that aren't Matt Lauer's children effected by his job. I mean he has to travel and I would think that in the end he would actually spend less time than her.
I feel as if I'm missing out on some kind of inside joke?
All unwanted touching is unwanted. Male or female - no one should touch your ass/crotch/tits without your consent. Doing so is an act of sexual dominance by either a male or female aggressor. Some other touches are indicative of a lack of boundaries and respect, but many are just an expression of affection- but those of us who are very affectionate should still consider the boundaries others may need to maintain. Triggers are a fact- innocent people can trigger a reaction to past sexual or physical trauma without ever meaning to.   EDIT: I wanted to add- this woman grabbed a guy's ass and didn't have his permission - she was absolutely wrong and should face a charge of sexual harassment or assault. She should get sensitivity training and probation as a result - because maybe she can be educated about the rights of every individual being equally important- and your body autonomy is foremost among those. Keep your damn hands to yourselves, ladies and gents.
First off, it's a power play.  Second off, telling him to give you space is what I said.  Why would you make that response without reading my words?  And FTR, by law you have a right to a "bubble" even in public.  It's not a crime per se to violate someone's personal space, but the law says you have a right to your own personal space.  There are reasons people have a RIGHT to violate your bubble (walking by on the sidewalk, crowded bus, etc.).  But on an EMPTY bus, someone doesn't have a RIGHT to violate your bubble anymore.  A person does not have a right to every seat on the bus, people are allowed to claim their personal space within reason (which changes by the definition, and makes this a grey area).  Ditto an EMPTY movie theater....if that was public.  This isn't public space this is private space.  99% of ushers will tell you that if a woman is in a theater alone and some creepy guy who she doesn't know comes over to sit next to her and she asks him to give her space, that usher will ask him to give her space as well.  You really don't have the right to violate people's space that you think.  So legally, if you're in public and someone violates your personal space after you ask them not to, that's probably legally harassment.  The following is an example of a state law dealing with harassment:  "S 240.25 Harassment in the first degree.  A person is guilty of harassment in the first degree when he or she intentionally and repeatedly harasses another person by following such person in or about a public place or places or by engaging in a course of conduct or by repeatedly committing acts which places such person in reasonable fear of physical injury. This section shall not apply to activities regulated by the national labor relations act, as amended, the railway labor act, as amended, or the federal employment labor management act, as amended.  Harassment in the first degree is a class B misdemeanor.  S 240.26 Harassment in the second degree.  A person is guilty of harassment in the second degree when, with intent to harass, annoy or alarm another person:  He or she strikes, shoves, kicks or otherwise subjects such other person to physical contact, or attempts or threatens to do the same; or  **He or she follows a person in or about a public place or places; or**  **He or she engages in a course of conduct or repeatedly commits acts which alarm or seriously annoy such other person and which serve no legitimate purpose.**  Subdivisions two and three of this section shall not apply to activities regulated by the national labor relations act, as amended, the railway labor act, as amended, or the federal employment labor management act, as amended.  Harassment in the second degree is a violation.  - - - - -  So basically, if someone says they don't want you in their personal space in public and you get in their space anyway on an empty bus, that's harassment.  The cops might do nothing about it, but they could give him a ticket and tell him to piss off.
[Here you go igtfy](http://www.extendfertility.com/downloads/documents/NEJM_AdvancedMaternalAge_HowOldIsTooOld.pdf)
Some sort of vigilante beating then?  And most of the other stories in this thread took place at bars.
My girlfriend can't orgasm through PnV. She can barely orgasm through oral as in rarely. Only thing that gets her off is a vibrator. She never had a bf actually talk to her about sex and likes and dislikes. We decided to incorporate toys into our sex and things are amazing. You might give it a try. 
This! Thank you!
[deleted]
I feel bad for you.  That's just wrong.  Dress code is one thing, but "wear more makeup"?  Why didn't you say "You could lose about 10 pounds yourself because you look like you are eating more chocolate than you are selling".  Seems to me they are prettying you up for themselves.  You should consider recording any future conversations you have with those people.
[deleted]
&gt;Purposefully excluding an entire group of people from discussions of issues that involve them is evil.  lol sure bro...  "Alright class, let's talk about math, specifically, fractions!"  "But teacher, we gotta include Science, math can be used in science you know!"  "Yeah but we're just gonna talk about fractions today-"  "WOAH WHAT HAVE YOU GOT AGAINST SCIENCE?!"  = your logic.
I had a tampon in when I was drugged and raped. Took about 45 minutes to get it out the next morning once I remembered that I had put one in before going out.
I understand that your issue is with social rules. However, I meant it more in the spirit that the whole second paragraph I responded to was bemoaning a man's fate to leave the house looking bad on a bad day. My issue was more for with the accepting the double standard that women are to spend more time and money on their appearance, but then use it talk about how men are just "stuck" looking a certain way. If you think it's unfair, take it down. There are plenty of things men can do to improve their appearance; buying and learning makeup is one of them. The only reason dudes "can't" is because of the same double standard that inspired my initial reply. 
Me too! I got the hell out of there, believe me. Screw the university.
[deleted]
&gt;This is a message board. Hundreds, or thousands of conversations are happening right now in this thread.  Yeah, and most of them are on topic and the ones that aren't are downvoted or removed.  &gt;Also, there is no benefit to specializing the subject to only include women  This subject is about women, since it's an epidemic and the victims are mostly women.   &gt;You aren't gaining anything by excluding male victims.  TIL not making the men the topic of a subject = excluding them.   
[deleted]
Playing Devil's Advocate here a bit, would you not say that white people are constantly feeling like we should be ashamed to be white, or we have to carry the shame of our ancestors?  I feel like we carry the burden of having to be extremely PC and walk on eggshells not to offend other races, but if we're called honkeys or crackers or someone says white people are nerdy or can't dance or whatever it's no big deal and we should laugh it off.  I get what you're saying about being proud of being a race that has historically been oppressed and has risen from that, that makes sense.  But I wouldn't say white people aren't made to feel ashamed of being white.
I think it's lovely and suitable.
 thank you for supporting your boyfriend, that's really noble and loving of you. 
Where I live the best chocolate is found at Sees, and honestly the sales associates are just a blur in the corner of my eye as soon as I walk in and the smell hits me.  I don't care if Chewbacca is working at the counter as long as I get my free sample and my pound of Assorted Milk Chocolates.  A note about managers and trainers:  sometimes they feel that they're not doing their jobs if they're not offering enough "constructive criticism."  You might have been the day's random target and nothing more will happen.  
Thank you so very much for your kind words, and I'm so happy for you that you found someone like your friend. I wish you the best of luck!
[deleted]
[deleted]
You're welcome. Good luck.
Why are you even in this thread, do you not see that you are exactly the kind of sick bastard that these girls need protection from?
Unfortunately, there may be other colours, but there weren't other colours on the sale rack at tk max. Price was rather a factor in dress choice. If I added bright blue accessories, would that help?
Maybe a blue belt? Color on the actual dress will help the most. 
A very indirect way of admitting you've lost and your initial position was wrong, but I accept. Nice talking to you.
Yeah, it's like they know nothing about me and they're judging me, essentially saying I cannot have any guy friends.  As I replied to another user, I've faced sexual harassment and all sorts of crap in my life.  Sure, I could be wrong sometimes, but at this point I know who I can trust.  And I'm not going to give out all the details, but I know I can trust these people.  It's like guys aren't people, with morals and feelings.  I'm really shocked that TwoX of all places is being like this.  Feminism IMO is about equality, and part of equality is recognizing that people are people regardless of gender.
School police do handle real crimes. My school's will handle all crimes except for homicide. 
I was (and still am) inclined to call bullshit on this story, too, but ambien HAS been known to cause cardiac arrest: http://www.ehealthme.com/ds/ambien/cardiac+arrest
[deleted]
reddit, where you argue semantics exclusively but shit on english majors.
I'm 5'5 and it can suck sometimes, I have the same issue with guys treating me like a kid when I'm shorter than they are. I've found that a lot of people think I should be really tall when they've only seen my face online and they're always shocked when I'm not 5'10 or taller which is also fucking weird. Maybe it's a little 90's goth, but I have a pair of [these](http://media-cache-ec0.pinimg.com/736x/43/98/24/4398247317fcc208f05c600db1e47d6f.jpg) that I love to wear. Not only do I get tons of compliments on them from other girls, but they're comfy as hell and add like 5 inches to my height. I've never had any dude try to baby me while I had them on because I'm usually just as tall as they are!
If I were you, I would refuse to sleep anywhere near it. Hate to break it to your boyfriend, but dream catchers have never worked. He should hold onto it because it has sentimental value for him, but to subject you to a constant trigger is heartless. 
&gt; to your 'I have a feeling you dislike the need to have to discuss with a spouse at all.'  Except that's not what I said, so "thanks for playing".  I specifically said you don't like the practice of your boss telling you to discuss with your spouse.
This should be mandatory in high school by now. What's up OP? Miss that day?
&gt; The results show there is no single global standard of beauty.   Actually, the results show that there are plenty of incompetent photoshoppers. To extrapolate the tastes of one photoshopper to an entire country is ludicrous. 
Not the point bro but thanks for playing.
A heart attack is not cardiac arrest. A heart attack is when blood flow to your heart gets blocked, and part of the heart muscle is damaged. Cardiac arrest is when the heart stops completely. 
No. She should be in jail. Sensitivity training won't do shit. Would you say that about a rapist?
[deleted]
[deleted]
I grew up in a small town with a big family that started at the top with my great grandmother, then there were her twin daughters (my grandma and great aunt) and all their progeny.  Our family has always been full of very strong minded and capable women who were the heads of their families.
I met this guy in jail who was bat shit crazy. He would smear shit all over the walls and collect trash in his cell. He was so crazy I thought he was faking it at times. Apparently he used to be a smart guy and well respected in the community until one day someone sliped a mickey in his drink in the club. Apparently it fucked up his brain and hes been insane ever since.
It's not actually that weird when you think about it.   How would you act when you walk into the room and see two people having sex? You would excuse yourself and leave. You wouldn't stick around to see how old they were, or their consent being given, just "sorry bro" and leave. This is the normal human reaction.  What's messed up is that he reported it to his boss but not the police - that's the bit that goes from normal human reaction to messed up attitude.
To my knowledge and xp- docs only cut the strings if you request it.  Call PP and say you had an IUD inserted- your gyno only visits one and month, and your strings were uncut but are so long you fear you are expelling. Then ask how much it would cost (w/o insurance) for them to check and ensure that isn't happening. If they clear you and say they are just long strings, you can wait to book a cut with the gyno that inserted. If it is expelling, they'll pull it out for you so you don't risk anything while waiting for your gyno.   As to why your strings are sticking out so low--you could have a shallow uterus(when they did that excruciating 'sound'- did they mention the length?) or your cervix could just drop quite low during your period (as they usually do). Better to go get it check out than worry and possibly risk injury or infection. 
I think this does bring up a good point. I read another sociological study that says that girls are more likely to think of themselves as "tipsy" than "tanked" or "smashed", whereas guys are much more likely to use words that indicated a higher degree of drunkenness (and therefore have more awareness of intoxication levels).  That said, GHB is out of the blood in 5 hours, so if you test after that point (which is likely), it wouldn't show up anyway.  Now, for a personal antidote to take with a grain of salt:  I never worried about roofies until it happened to my aunt. As she was in her 40s, she knew what being drunk felt like. She was at the bar with clients, and therefore being careful about consumption; she'd only had a drink and a half (which her husband verified). It got her completely plastered, awful hangover, memory problem for the week(s) following.   Now, my aunt is 6'2" and could have been "fitsporation" for just about anyone -- she was an Amazonian goddess (she looked damn good for her age). I never thought anything bad like that could happen to her. I figured she'd intimidate anyone who tried. But when it happened to her, it really scared me. She was supposed to be invincible. 
Are you into military history, video games, and science--- or fashion, makeup, flowers, and chocolate?  laaaame.   I'm a little appalled women don't know what a humvee, claymore, kevlar, or paladin are, and men don't know what floucy, marscarpone, progesterone, and peony are. Vocab people. 
No, the funny part is that it's all true. 
I'm definitely aware of this. But the alternative is either no advertising, which is antithetical to capitalism, or advertising that reinforces the status quo. By that standard - this is revolutionary. 
"Well, there are no fingerprints or forced entry, so do you really want to report that your house was broken into and your stuff stolen?"  You're gonna say yes. For one, it's now on record. Two, the neighborhood now knows there's a burglar. Three, if they catch the guy in another house using the same MO, or he has some of your stuff in his place, the cops can bring additional charges than that one house and maybe get some of your stuff back.  All of this has analogs to sexual assault, but victims are coached that they somehow don't apply.
Well, that's the exact right attitude to have. It's 100% ok to not be attracted to it! I expect that. I just don't care for the unsolicited opinions, which I can get from both strangers and people I know. The long hair comparison is a pretty good one!
[deleted]
Let's say the desire to rape is a predisposition in some guy. He has the potential, but because of his healthy relationships with women around him, this desire never blooms.  Now take the same guy, but put him in a position of isolation from women, and make him feel bad about himself everytime he is alone with a woman.  Which of these two do you think will be more likely to rape?
[deleted]
I wouldn't say that my household was matriarchal, exactly, but my mother has always pretty much been quietly in control of our household for as long as I can remember. Her and my dad make the major household decisions together and such, but she'll always be the one to do more research so it's pretty much like she makes all the decisions and my dad just agrees with them. My dad also did a lot of chores - he ironed, cleaned the bathroom, cooked most weeknights, and I'm pretty sure this a rule my mother enforced.   Throughout my life, she's always worked, mostly full time. She certainly doesn't earn more than my dad, but she's very driven and often talks to me about how she couldn't just be a housewife like some of my friends mothers, or some of my aunts. She never had the opportunity to study after she left school as well, so she's always pushed me to do the best I can in school, and later in university. As well, she waited until she had a decent, well-paying job in a sector she wanted to work in before she had me, despite continued pressure from her family. My aunts all had children very young - 18, 19, 21 - and my mother was under societal pressure to do the same, but nope. She waited. If other people underestimate me based on my gender, she will just tell me to prove them wrong by being successful. I have a very strong, independent spirit that I can see she's helped to reinforce over the years.  At the same time, she's more traditional in other ways. She does expect me to have children at some point in the near future, and she's forever talking about how I really need to find a boyfriend, or even a husband. Half of it's teasing, but there's a sincere sentiment behind it. She was also very eager that I be very feminine - I went through quite a tomboyish phase during my final years of school, which she hated. Now that I've moved out of that, and I dress in a more feminine manner she's much happier with me.  So, yeah. At the same time as I've been raised with a lot of tradition values, my mother has also been a very strong female figure in my life. I've always seen her as the person in charge, and I've never questioned the idea that women shouldn't be able to do whatever they want, possibly because of that. As a kid, I was forever getting into arguments with people who told me I couldn't or shouldn't do x, y, or z because it was a 'boys' thing.
Yeah, there's overserving...pressuring others to "keep up" with the drinks.  Many hits to the head, as well.
I'm sorry to say it seems like he doesn't care about your feelings. :(
No that's not what I am saying, no doubt in my mind these things occur just I personally don't believe they do at the frequency that everyone seems to say they do. And when asked to cite a source or provide proof that they seem to be happening at an alarming rate to the point where it has either happened to everyone or a close personal friend should be easy, as in this day and age everything is documented and we have all of the worlds information at our fingertips. But basically no I don't just take everything for face value and believe it, I like to have multiple sources and try to stay away from anecdotal evidence to form my own opinions when I can.   I don't quite get what you mean by what is the point of being here, can you explain further?
[deleted]
There are steps universities can take to make the campus safer.  It's like a place of business being a hostile work environment.  Employees and students should be vetted, to a point.  
Lol, tell them that it'd be less entertaining if they were doing their fucking job too! Best come back I can think of. "Maybe if you were doing your job, you'd have less time to laugh."
That's so terrible.  Very sorry to hear it. I don't think suicide is necessarily about people wanting to die, but more about them wanting the pain to stop.  And they might feel trapped and have no other options.  It sounds like you're beating yourself up about B's passing.  I could say try not to, but what normal human wouldn't?  I hope eventually you can come to realize though that this isn't your fault.  If anything, B's final meeting with you just makes it clear how much she loved you.  Wish I could give you a hug.  Don't be afraid to look for support groups or just people to talk to.
Have an upvote!   The numbers vary but false rape accusations are reported to make up &gt;1% to about 8% (I've found sources claiming both) and that comes with an [asterisk](http://freethoughtblogs.com/almostdiamonds/2013/08/23/i-am-a-false-rape-allegation-statistic/) because it doesn't factor in reports where the cops badger victims into saying they made a false claim and the number of unreported rapes from women, men, trans and anyone who falls outside of those terms. I hate when people bring up false accusations to make it seem that rape isn't as real as it is reported. They aren't practically significant for the issues being discussed.   /rant
[deleted]
This is what I originally [posted](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/comments/27447k/dads_who_do_the_housework_will_have_more/) when a very similar article was posted last month:  &gt;Our results suggest that when fathers espouse and enact a more equal distribution of domestic work, their daughters more easily envision balancing work with family and having a less gender-stereotypic career  I think the study is missing something important. The issue this study brings up isn't "father's who do more housework" but "father's who do housework usually seen as women's jobs."  My father rarely ever does laundry, never cleans the dishes or dusts, and will only vacuum if my mother asks him to. However, he is the one who mows the lawn, hangs the christmas lights every year, fixes stuff when they break- chores usually seen as "being male."   Maybe I missed it in the study, as I quickly skimmed it since I'm at work, but the "sample" at the end of the paper compares a father helping with dishes/raising kids vs. going to work to a woman doing the same. The issue of the chore being socially accepted as "the woman's job" still remains and **I** think skews the results. I think having a strong, independent mother who is willing to do "male chores" can be just as important as fathers who does "female chores."
A club I used to frequent was notorious for all the xtc and coke used there. What happened several times: people would put pills into other people's drinks to "test" them and see how the effects would be on the other person. Pretty sickening. That's how a classmate of mine got a really bad trip.
Oh lord. Lol.   First off, of course it was over dramatized. If it was a psa it wouldn't have been on a fucking COMEDY SHOW. Did you also take to heart that America has a two headed government figure named Cochangel?   I mean, really?   And I'm gonna give you the chance to defend and back peddle here because we all know you're going to anyway. Did you really just say that men have as much to fear as women when they go out?  Did you really mean to compare getting beat up at a frat party to being raped?  Did you really just tell me that people who go out and drink too much deserve rape and assault?  What about the people it happens to that aren't drunk? Or get drugged?   Because here's the long and short of it : on all of these points, you're wrong. If you want proof, just use Google to look up some statistics or articles on anything you just said. Go ahead. Because I'm not gonna take your coach's word or your two anecdotal stories as gospel.   And you tell me to stop acting entitled?  Is it entitlement to want to not have to worry about someone sexually assaulting you and getting away with it because people think that if you're drunk you deserve it?  Is it entitlement to not want to be bullied and harassed because people refuse to admit that they're creating an uncomfortable and unsafe environment?  Or is it entitlement to be frustrated because no matter what you do, short of becoming a hermit and never going outside, all it takes is one selfish, stupid person to come along and victimize you ? And to know that people will always question what more you could have done to prevent it, and half the population around you seem to still fight that the problem isn't real and "can be prevented."   Or is it entitlement to expect everyone to change around you because you're uncomfortable with reality, you have unrealistic expectations, and snide one liner "answers" that will fix, in your mind, a huge social problem that's been going on for... What... As long as humans have been around?  You really think "be safe of gtfo" is really gonna keep rape down?   You are absolutely ridiculous. 
I guess the best way to frame the question would be instead to say:  "Could you tell anyone else in the house that I'm working on X?"
Gotcha! I wasn't entirely sure - my mistake. :)
It is my belief that many jobs entail a kind of "trial by fire" initiation period. Keep doing what you do, be firm in declining help, then one day soon stash an empty container and ask the Biggest Boy to lift it for you. The initiation period usually ends with a joke and a laugh.  Hang in there! Think what shape you'll be in!
I have the same issue with overalls.   I was molested by my third grade teacher for a year, and my friends (who were also victims) used to have "meetings" during lunch to try and figure out what to do to stop it. We figured out that it happened almost every time we wore overalls. I can't look at them without having a panic attack.  I'd suggest really explaining to him in detail why it bothers you so much. Sexual abuse is very hard to understand, and he needs to realize that this isn't just a pet peeve. It induces nightmares, and it's not something you can compromise on. 
You're absolutely right about not wanting it to be a dirty little secret. As someone who has struggled with depression and a suicide attempt, it frustrates me to no end when people make suicide a taboo topic. Yeah it's sad. It's scary. It's ugly. It needs to be talked about, because if someone who's struggling feels like they can't talk about it they just end up feeling more isolated and useless than before, and to me that's heart breaking.
&gt; Then again I suppose you don't need very many of such people for a huge number of women to be influenced.  Ding ding ding!
Sounds more like you attacked him, forcebly trying to restrain him is domestic violence....period.
It's amazing seeing/hearing that disconnect in so many places. The number of times I've had friends saying something like "Man women are awful... obviously not you [female friend]"   Even seeing stories here of people's relationships where someones boyfriend thinks women can't do X profession, or feminists are [some negative word] except for their girlfriend, or their mother or their sister.   It's like they just don't realize that women are unique individuals or even people unless they have a direct connection to them. It makes me sad. 
You know, for all the 'awareness' Komen and ACS raise, this is the first time I've seen something like this. 
Don't rape people is pretty well taught actually, you know by it being one of the most revolted crimes in civilised society. The reason how not to get raped is taught is because that's something you actually have control over, your own actions. The world will always have psycho's that rape, murder and steal, you can't change that, but you can take responsibility for protecting yourself. That's just part of being a person.
Meh, honestly. If a guy had issues with hair in my armpits I'd be very unattracted to him. Win-win!
Can he hang it somewhere above that bed that's a more outside your direct vision? Maybe he could put it inside a big frame so when you're laying in bed you just see a frame instead of the dream catcher? Or even just putting something between your vision and the dream catcher?  None of those are ideal solutions but if he's completely unwilling to take it down those are the only things I can think of to hopefully try and mitigate the pain it causes you. Personally I don't know if I could date someone that seems so uncaring about something that could be a big trigger for me. Especially if he says it's something you need to "just work through". 
Sexism isn't an entire personality. It's a behavior. A person who speaks or acts in a sexist manner can also be a good, decent person in other aspects. This complicates things because it's a lot easier to just write people off as sexist ignoramus assholes, rather than try to understand how it is that such behavior has been normalized in their lives. It certainly doesn't justify the sexism, of course, but I think it helps with the anger if you channel your energies into unravelling the processes that have made sexism so ubiquitous. 
that's very very true. sadly he doesn't understand that you shouldn't feel like crap in work, I'll quote him 'is not about being happy, is about providing for your family'.   but as i said, this are his last two days, he found a job in a great place, that will certainly cheer him up a little. :)
Dear Brokenmom447, maybe on days you don't want to get out of bed, you can invite your daughter to join you with a book and snuggle and read together.    See if you can find a support group for single parents in your area.  I am curious why are you admitting her to the hospital multiple times?
Matt Lauer has in the past, displayed very sexist behavior in his interviews. Remember his insanely creepy interview with Anne Hathaway? The dude's a prick.   [Link if you're curious](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=yruIL5lVGE4&amp;feature=kp)
I just saw someone post that they're not wearing underwear anymore for breast cancer awareness? Shit's getting crazy.  This is great. It's actually informative, and tells what to look for instead of just saying to check for breast cancer.
It isn't about nursing, it is about showing a private part in public. It is common courtesy to help people be less uncomfortable. There is a middle line here which we need to find. People need to get over nursing in public, but nursing mothers also should be discreet about their breasts (all people should be discreet about their breasts). If we all meet halfway, then there should be no problem.   Sure, some folks are fine with topless women in public, but many are not. We should be accommodating  enough to respect them without stopping what we are doing. A simple cover-up would handle both.   
I replied to this in another post, but I'm not telling anyone else, and my conversation with his aunt is to ask for help for his depression, not for what happened last night. He cares a lot for him, and I don't know anyone in this city that could give me advice/don't know what to do on my own, so I think she is the best person to help!  Also, I'm not pretending to be a victim, far from that, I'm aware that I started things, and it has been, although painful, great to read some of these replies. I know now that we have a lot to work on, and I'm starting now!
[deleted]
Harassment and personal space is universal in the US.  I can't imagine it's not universal in pretty much every western country.  Where are you that you don't think you have harassment laws?  You really don't have a right to get in someone's personal space **without legitimate reason**.
Ugh.  I leave them unattended all the time at family parties.  Don't think I can do that anymore...
Anita Sarkeesian does not play video games. 
It's not just seeing a dick, it's receiving a text message from a stranger and opening it to find something extremely vulgar and uncalled for. Having kids and being a man doesn't change the fact that he can be shaken up. I would feel violated and probably creeped out for a couple hours!
&gt;I was not he most sensitive too him  I don't blame you. If i received a dick pick off a stranger i'd just be abit confused not have a nervous break down. Hell, i might even send a reply and take the piss out of him. 
It doesn't matter what your reasoning is. If he asked you not touch him and let go, that's what you do. Immediately.   Quite frankly I think it's a bad habit for you to want to touch and hug people when they're angry. The last thing my SO or I want is to be physically cornered when we feel emotionally cornered. That's just us though, and people are different. 
I'm very cautious but I've noticed a person's (female) drink get spiked by another female who was chatting her up. After the "victim" came back I ended up going upto her and talking to her too, she tried to take a sip from her drink and I ended up taking it off her and saying something like "oo what drink is this? Can I try some?". She looked at me weird but said "yeah, sure thing" so I took a sip and spat it out and said it tasted awful so she wouldn't drink from that again. The look on the other woman's face was priceless but seeing as I was by myself at that point (friends were out smoking) I didn't want the other woman to know that I knew she spiked the drink in case she did a runner but she figured it out, made an excuse and left in a hurry.  I explained to the girl who's drink got spiked what I saw and why I ruined her drink and she was pretty distraught so I ended up driving her home. That's when I realised you cannont trust anyone. Male or female. 
Wednesday I had a procedure known as a Hysterosalpingogram. They insert a catheter into your cervix and fill your uterus with an ink that can be seen during an xray. This is to determine if you have blockages in your Fallopian tubes that would prevent pregnancy.   The procedure hurt like a sudden onset of really bad cramps, even though I had taken 1000mg of Ibuprofen. In my case she pushed harder to see if she could pop out whatever was blocking my right tube. She couldn't and I may require surgery to fix or remove the defective tube.  
[deleted]
Alternately you might send a polite email as other suggested which says "unless there is a reason u cant turn on your own computer please be advised i will no longer be doing  it for you. Keep in mind one never knows when a colleague will be promoted and become someone you must answer to. Documentation is good. Getting along with fellow workers is good too. 
The worst catcalling experience I had was a couple years ago when I was on my bike, at night and another cyclist came near near me and started making very sexual comments and heavy breathing sounds, by the time the light turned green I cycled as fast as I could and managed to lost him.   It scares me to think that while I could easily avoid someone on foot (since the bike is faster) and probably someone on a car (going into the sidewalk, entering a store or going thw wrong way in a street as last resource) someone on another bike would be very difficult to avoid if they can match my pace.
I'm sorry that happened to you and I get that one has nothing to do with the other.  That was my whole point.   When people think of assault or rape,  they tend to think only of strangers in alleys or frat boys at parties when the reality is that sexual predators could be anyone and that's why it's ludicrous to only tell female rape victims all the things they should've or could've done to prevent their own assault.  And even if you are at a party having a couple drinks,  it's still not your fault just for being at the party if someone slips something in your drink or physically overpowers you.
You have your priorities right now, there's absolutely nothing wrong with that. Honestly, you're doing exactly what you want to do, you're focusing on your major and once you achieve that, you'll have more time for dating. It's college, dating is fun but you'll find that there's a much bigger world out there once you graduate and you'll have many more opportunities. It sounds stupid right now but your grades are much more important for your future than dating. Trust me, I was more focused on dating than grades in college (I’m a guy), now that I look back I would do it the other way around.  That, and I only know a couple people that met in college and actually married that person. The guys that ask you out and are rejected, if mature enough, should be able to accept that rejection without making things weird or ruining your friendship. If they’re not mature enough to accept that then well, imagine how they’d act if you actually dated them, would you want to date someone that immature?  I have a 3 year old now and I hope she’s a focused as you are when she’s in school! Don't feel bad and don’t feel guilty, you’re doing nothing wrong!  EDIT: Spelling
Thank you so much for your kind, thoughtful, and helpful response. J is already in counseling. This will probably be their topic of discussion for his next few visits.  I love him very much. I would do anything to protect him. He's going to talk to his management today, and if they come up with anything, I'll see if he wants to go to the police. As much as I want to file a report myself, I know that I should have his (and probably his parents') agreement that that's the right thing to do.
Thank, I didn't know that sub, just subscribed =)  The bear spray idea is cool, we do have a nearby forest which have very popular biking trails (I never seen a bear there) but I don't know if it's legal to carry or not.
some people are sheding doubts on the strength of ambien in this thread. All I know is he was out cold after about 5 minutes, and he suffered cardiac arrest after he got to the hospital.   Two weeks later when he had enough rest and came out of his coma, he was notified that they found date rape in his system, and it likely caused his heart to stop. 
With a good vibe, you can always reach down and help yourself get there during sex. Most women need clitoral stimulation to get off, and not all of us can get there fast enough with manual stimulation only.  If he doesn't mind bringing toys into the mix, maybe it's something to try. I know I wouldn't be enthusiastic about sex if I knew I wasn't going to O - maybe it will help you enjoy and look forward to sex a bit more.
&gt;1 in 3 women is sexually assaulted and 1 in 5 are raped in their lifetime  This is so horribly false. Even the studies which assume that no woman ever lies(despite this being an issue women are known to lie about) say 1/5 women are raped in their lifetime. That number *also* includes people who had sex while drunk. Not raped while drunk. *Had sex* while drunk. And lifetime stats are notoriously inaccurate already.   Regardless, the lifetime numbers don't make sense. Men get raped just as much as women if you look on a yearly basis. But when you look on the lifetime scale, women magically become raped 3x as much. Where do these invisible rapes come from? Could it be pressure to view regretted sex as rape, while men are encouraged to do the opposite? Memory is a fickle thing.  &gt; The focus needs to be on educating EVERYONE.  And this I can agree with heartily. Even if the risk is as low as I think it is, knowing simple tricks to keep yourself safe are a very good thing. Unfortunately, articles like this one encourage men to think that they are invincible, and to focus on protecting women instead of keeping themselves safe.   Teaching people that women are the victims and men are the protectors helps no-one except people who don't deserve help of any kind. 
This was actually very intersting, I had no idea of the various symptoms.  "Invisible lump" sounds scary.  
You say that you don't know what to do.  It seems to me that you can do a couple of different things.  You can go on the way you are going and continue not liking yourself, or you can do something about it.  Sexual preferences and attitudes are very psychological; it's our brains that tell us what we are or aren't attracted to.  For that reason, I would suggest trying out some therapy.  You can feel comfortable knowing that your personal life is covered by a confidentiality agreement, and start exploring your feelings in a structured manner.  If you decide to try this, I personally (if I were in your place) would talk to my therapist *before* bringing it up to your SO.  You could get some advice on how to discuss such a sensitive topic without hurting anyone's feelings, and hopefully even learn how to start looking forward to sex, as opposed to the "I can take it or leave it" attitude which seems to be bothering you so much.  Anyway, whether or not you decide to try counseling, I personally think you don't need to be beating yourself up so much.  Sex is great, it's true, but when you've been in love with someone for awhile, even those of us who really, *really* enjoy it begin to realize that sex is just the icing on the cake.  It's obvious to me that you love him very much, and that's the cake itself.  Love is *the* reason.  So, while I can understand wanting to share the experience of sex on the same level of intensity as your partner,  I don't think you need to 'feel like a giant phony' or that you are lying to him.  You love him, and that's the truth; the only truth that really matters in this circumstance.  Everything else is really about making your partner happy, and there's nothing wrong with that.  I myself am a "quiet" lover;  I've never been much for making noise.  But when I'm with my wife I'll get a little more noisy...some moaning, or whispering her name in her ear.  I know that it makes the experience more pleasurable for her,  so even though I might prefer just staying silent, I speak up anyway; and I don't consider that as lying.  I don't think you should either...but if these things are really bothering you, then I strongly suggest seeking some help.  It's very sad that you feel ashamed of yourself after sex...that, in my opinion, is not a healthy mindset; and you don't need or deserve to feel that way.
The point of the clip was to illustrate the heavy burden of blame weirdly placed on female victims for their own sexual assault and rape.   And actually, no, most victims of rape and assault are neither dressed nor behaving provocatively but thank you for bringing up that common, harmful misconception about sexual crime against women.  Also who is determining what is "provocative?"  The point is that bad people commit crimes and victims should never be blamed.   
&gt;But you sound a lot like my gf says she was with men before she came out.   Actually, this was my first thought. Sex is fun, sex feels good, sex is exciting and awesome. And sex with someone who isn't the gender you're usually attracted to can still feel nice. Being touched, being physically intimate with someone, is emotionally comforting and wonderful. But that often isn't enough to get you to orgasm.   &gt;he makes me incredibly comfortable and secure  makes it sound like he's her big brother. Like she is in a relationship with someone who gives her emotional comfort and security, but not someone she views as a romantic, sexual partner.   OP, you owe it to yourself and to your partner to just open up about your feelings. Not so much that you've been faking it, but that you feel like you're not quite getting it, would like him to help you, and would like to explore more.   Ask him if he would play with your body and get you to cum, trying different things and playing around. I am willing to bet he won't say no.
These aren't your local charity organizations. These are massive companies, and are just as difficult to run as a Fortune 500 company, and employees should be fairly compensated. If you aren't willing to pay your CEO a ton, someone else will, and you are losing out on a great opportunity. I don't understand why people expect them to work for pennies. 
You don't. You just can't ask people to justify not shaving either.
I guess same goes for the interview, then. I can't imagine they could just ignore I flew 2500 miles away.
It sounds like you've gotten the point that you are the one that pushed it to physical. It's absolutely not a good idea to restrain someone who is upset and doesn't want to be touched. You got off easy here. The fact that he aimed for the couch shows a remarkable level of caring and restraint on his part.   He does need to get help for his depression but you also need to get in counseling both individually and as a couple. It sounds like your boundaries and needs matter a lot to you but his boundaries and needs don't matter much at all. Everyone deals with being angry and upset differently and quite frankly if your first instinct is to hug and touch someone who is upset and angry you are very, very lucky none of your friends have PTSD. Some people react very badly to being touched when they don't want to be and it would be your fault for ignoring their wishes.   As far as the ultimatum you have given him, in his shoes I may very well have walked out permanently at that point. No more drinking for awhile is a good thing but he is not the only one that needs help. You have some serious self reflection to do and I hope you are mature enough to actually do it.   Edit: autocorrect hates me
Thank you for this,  I think you have a very good point. Also, I've said it somewhere else, but this whole thread made me realise that I was treating his depression as if it was about me, when it is actually (and obviously) about him.  
Well... it sort of seemed like you were talking about something that you didn't have any experience with.  That might be why it's not going well.  On the upside, your comment made me laugh really hard.  Welcome to 2X!
I feel your pain, I just starting using softcups and that shit is fucking messy. I haven't had to change it un public yet but I don't think I could do it without a shit-ton of baby wipes. 
Why?
[deleted]
You're very near me. Welp, see ya later.
"Not at risk for another ten years" ???  I'm 26 and I was diagnosed with breast cancer last month.  You're less likely to get cancer at a younger age, but there's still most definitely risk--especially with your family history.  My oncologist told me he's treated around ten other younger women like me just this year.  It does happen, and it's bullshit that doctors aren't taking you seriously.  I'd keep trying around till you find a doctor who will actually listen to you.   (Also I'm very sorry about your mom.)
Don't give her a letter. You should talk to her face to face. Emotions and all. Maybe it will help her realize how much you really care. Just keep on reminding her that you're not trying to scold her, but that you just want to be there to support her. It's a difficult thing to be pregnant without any proper guidance....or any guidance, for that matter. She could really use a friend like you whether she realizes it now or not.  If you give her a letter, it doesn't give her a chance to really respond. it's kind of like "here's my advice. Take it or leave it." If anything, that would seem more like a lecture than a face to face conversation.
&gt; The red pill is misogynistic drivel.  So is MRA. You can't blame people for confusing the two. Plus there is significant overlap in ideology and membership.  But I'm glad that 2X has its priorities straight and votes to the top a comment about the poor maligned MRAs when the real story is that a member of a misogynistic movement assaulted a woman not giving him attention. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
Get it girl!  You look great.  Thanks for being brave and sharing your story.
The Civil Rights Act of 1964 also took freedoms away from people, because now it's illegal for private businesses to discriminate based on race.
"High tide"... Lol! Very succinctly put! That's is why I'm scared to try it. I don't want a flash flood of lady blood everywhere. 
Genuine question, is there any legal action she can take here to prevent this from happening to someone else? 
[Yes, they did.]( http://www.marketplace.org/topics/your-money/susan-g-komen-fights-trademark) 
Haha that is genius! Does anyone know if this actually fully gets around the laws, or can you still be hassled for this? Reminds me a bit of [these](http://picture-cdn.wheretoget.it/85aer0-l-610x610-underwear-italian-underwear-green-white-red-italian-michelangelo-men-underwear.jpg), which I saw being sold all over Italy when I was there a few summers ago (NSFW, btw.) Less realistic though, and more of a pure joke than a statement/protest.
I guess they just aren't plausible for me. Maybe because of my lack of situational happenings I'm just being narrow minded. Idk. I've spent many a nights at bars with friends and I cannot recall a time when I've left my drink unattended. I bring it to the bathroom, set it down right next to me when it's my turn at pool, bring it outside with me. I guess I could see someone else having a reason to sit theirs down, but I really can think of many more ways to not leave a drink unattended during this circumstances. Even when I'm drinking at home my drink stays with me. I'm paranoid about flys or random debris flying into it. 
I'm so sorry &lt;3 sending hugs your way! What beautiful memories to cherish! 
I'm so sorry about your mom!  I would definitely express your concern and request a BRCA test or find a new doctor to preform one, especially since you have a family risk.  Check out the Facing Our Risk of Cancer Empowered (FORCE)'s page on [hereditary cancer risk](http://www.facingourrisk.org/information_research/index.php) for more information and resources.  
There is also a lot of overlap between the westboro baptist church and your standard abortion having woman who happens to go to church on sundays.  There is a lot of overlap between the terrorists on 9/11 and the muslims that have worked to show that Islam is not an entirely radical religion.  Not being able to distinguish the difference is just ignorance.
Agreed.
Well, you're in luck, because working a physical job with a bunch of guys is an excellent way to develop a backbone! I used to be a pushover too. It's SO FREEING to be able to stand up for yourself. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
It's a complicated issue, but this is, so far, my favorite blog post on the topic:  http://www.sciencebasedmedicine.org/the-mammography-wars-heat-up-again-2012-edition/  It's long, but worth a read as the author delves into a number of the issues with screening mammograms.
I would suggest finding a breast specialist and going for a consultation. It's unconscionable to me that a doctor wouldn't even consider screening you to see if you are eligible for the BRCA test. I have a few factors that increase my chances of carrying BRCA so I was pre-screened by my breast specialist. The factor that seems to really change their attitude in regards to if somebody might be a carrier, is the age when a relative was diagnosed with breast cancer. I got the impression that anything pre-menopausal was a red flag for them. Call anyone and everyone until you can find a doctor who is willing to listen to your concerns, they are real.  
well, she could get a restraining order. The flood of texts could be proof of harassment. I don't know if the scratches alone are enough evidence to prove assault.
Yeah but, if you have no other reason to suspect it, a good doctor will be really hesitant to order tests. 
That's why below, I compared it to other non profit CEO salaries as well. Comparing it to surgeons was more of s "what are you actually doing for society" thing. I can understand why specialists make so much- have to pay back those loans somehow. 
There you go... until she's ready to move forward and be your friend too, you just have to do the best you can.   I'm so lucky my sister is so cool! (like really! )   
I lost a friend in March of 2004 to suicide, 5 days after my 27th birthday. He was the friend who joked with me that we'd get married if we got to 40 and still weren't married. I'm almost there and I still think of that - and of all the joy and sunshine he brought into the world. I hope you are able to hold onto the good stuff with your brother (like this picture!) and carry him with you. I can only imagine how hard this is for you. Hang in there. 
What a cutie horse! I used to pole bend and jump--both come highly recommended when you're up to it. ; )
Hahaha, definitely not. The worst that can happen is that they take your blood pressure! 
You'd think maybe that's her doctor's responsibility to find out what happened. She wasn't asking for anybody here to find out what happened.
has that been challenged on constitutional grounds? I can't see it holding up if it were.
how do you know you can trust someone after that??
I just feel like he wants something easy. Our friendship is easy. He has see how I am as a girlfriend and even when I was engaged in the past. I am dedicated and would never do the things she did to him. And he feels like that means we would be good. At one point He had thrown his ring across the room and I put it on so that it wouldn't get lost and he goes looks at it on me then at me and grabbed my hand and says "why don't we just get married? Will you marry me?" And I laughed it off and just said "sorry boo someone else already holds that title for you"  I don't know. I don't feel that way about him anymore. And I don't want to be someone's second choice. 
Hitting is not okay. Its not about the physical damage nearly as much as the emotional toll of having your personal boundaries disrespected. It is easy for strong people to say things like "it did not really hurt me, so I can let this go and everything goes back to normal." My experience is that this is the wrong, because they're not being square with themselves. Better to defend your boundaries and make it clear that hitting is not okay under any circumstances. If you'd feel like shit right now if you were the one who did the slapping, then somebody done fucked up, mkay? I'm saying this because I've got a guy friend who stayed and blew off the slap and that did not work out well for anybody involved. That shit is corrosive to your mental health.  Its possible that your wife has some rage that she needs to work out in therapy. I'm a cast-iron bitch, not ashamed of that title, I earned it I promise, and I've NEVER slapped a dude*. Not once in 43 years. After Shawna agrees to lay off the fisticuffs and hopefully seek therapy, you can and should promise not to spit in any more food. Thats gross. I wouldn't slap you for it, but I'd probably put you on blast.  When you two are done with that, I suggest you pick a program for weight loss that you can do together without the drama. Weight watchers online is a fun one to do as a couple, my husband liked the recipes I swiped from there. You cannot be in charge of each other's shit, in my opinion. Shawna giving you the chips and making you the chip master and then calling you controlling is a really good example of why that sort of shit does not work well. You need something that makes you a team and unites you if you want to do weight loss as a married couple. Or boxing gloves, take your pick.  *I did once throw out an insult so strong that a dude stopped the argument to compliment me on it.  Edit because formatting 
lovely picture! I haven't been to Scotland in years but I loved the grey/green/purple color palette. I would love to go back.
That's awesome! do you have pics?
Shame is a weird thing.. it can be horribly crippling, and at the same time it can be a strange intoxicant.  For instance the Catholic Church (among most other religions) attaches a fair amount of shame to consensual (unmarried) sex, and the repression of sexual energies leads to many odd results.  The energy is released as "kink", oftentimes, or other so-called-paraphilias; including abusing altar boys/girls as is prevalent among the Catholic clergy.  Finding a safe/good place to put "that energy" will probably be important to you in the future, as well.  Convincing guys to help you "re-live" your rape is more normal than you would think.  Others may express judgements, but I don't think that this is inherently unhealthy (as long as you use protection / find a sane "partner in crime.")         I was raped by my first girlfriend.  The details aren't particularly important, although it wasn't nearly as bad/scary as your situation, from your description.  I didn't get her in trouble for many reasons; I blamed myself for not being able to stop her, I guessed nobody would believe me, and I didn't want to embarrass myself (what kind of guy gets raped by a girl?), but mostly I cared alot for her and didn't want one stupid drunken decision of hers to effect the rest of her life.  I'm sure she has forgotten about it, by now, or at least I hope so. (She is a doctor now, married with kids- left me in the dust.)   In the aftermath of the rape, I felt that "complete silence" and pretending it didn't happen / dissociating myself from my sexuality in general was the best possible avenue of protecting myself.  That seemed to work for a bit, but eventually I found myself fantasizing about somewhat similar experiences.  I wasn't very happy about that, either.  Eventually, I experimented a bit in the realm of BDSM with subsequent partners, both in "taking control" and giving it away.  Would I have been a "switch" if I didn't go through that initial experience?  I have no idea.  Your therapist, hopefully, is seasoned enough that they could understand why you "reenacted" the rape, and may even be able to provide some valuable perspective if you share that with them.  Regardless, you should be able to get documentation from your therapist or the police that will support a petition to get that class removed from your record, or some such.  If you want to see justice done, you should talk to the "investigator in charge" of your case- they will hopefully be able to give you a timeline or some feedback as to why your rapist is still at large.           
[deleted]
[deleted]
&gt;the act of conception only requires a male orgasm  To be a pedant, given this thread is about sexual disconnect/dysfunction; conception requires a male ejaculation. He doesn't have to orgasm either.
Don't worry, real expressions are always good.  Even embarrassment.  Anything that connects you to the person playing makes the song more fun for those watching.  At least to me.
I'd have said something like "Oh sorry i didn't realise you were SICK. I don't work in the drug department but if you just ask one of the nice lady's in the blue coats to point out where the incest pills are I'm sure she can help."   Who the hell wants to share with there dad/son???? That's seriously fucked up!
[deleted]
Your social life will be somewhat consumed by your grad school work, but it won't be nonexistant. Are there women-based clubs at the school? Are there other clubs that have women in them? They don't have to be in your field (though there might be some in your classes!) for you to be friends with them. It's also definitely possible to be just friends with men, so you've got them as options for friends too.  It'll be okay. Might be rough at first but once you get settled in, it should become easier.
He doesn't look happy in this picture either
Good idea!
What'd you think this thread was going to be about? Diana Ross?  
[deleted]
I taught myself to make websites when I was 11 (I'm 29 now). People made fun of me. Not just because I was a girl, but because the internet wasn't really mainstream back then. I was really good at it, but I was kind off put off learning CS at school/Uni because I was a 'geek'.  I wouldn't describe myself as a 'coder' now and I don't work in the industry at all. However, I am responsible for marketing in a small company, nobody else is technical at all and I can certainly do things that other people at my work can't do, so there's no backlash now and it's been really useful. Even if it's just coding a pretty mailchimp email and segmenting my mailing lists. I'd like to improve my HTML/CSS skills, and learn SQL. Codacademy is great, and if there's a Girl Develop It group near you definitely check them out too.
That's what I meant by a full cycle.  Meanwhile the Divacup you can continue to use for several years, so it makes up for the investment in the long term.
I want this to make him stronger, but I'm terrified that it will only drag him lower. I have faith in his resiliency
Now that I have read the whole thread I vote complete troll. The OP claims to be a psychotherapist as well who cannot gain isnght into the relationship.The butter on this one is just too thick.
[deleted]
Wow! I mean this as a compliment really, but if I looked at the picture without the story I would think that was shop bought. It is just so perfect! And its great that you painted it quite plain because now you can change it around to suit any future homes you have.  I think /r/somethingimade would love this too, especially since it is your first piece.
if one of your patients asked you whether to stay or leave a relationship where:  1. the patient was 100% financially supporting the partner, and partner just simply doesn't want to work.  EDIT:  Change this to 75-80% support since OP said he buys his own clothes and food)  2. the partner demands free reign to snoop on the patient, and threatens to leave if patient does not take responsibility for and satisfy partner's insecurities.  3. partner demands "right" to sleep with other women and threatens to dump patient if she does not agree.  4. partner pressuring patient to do sexual things she does not want to do and threatens to leave patient if she fails to satisfy him sexually.  Really, would your advice be anything besides "honey, please treat yourself better than this." 
And that is the point, she does not credit other peoples work. I don't know a lot about filmmaking, but I understand that youtube has some sort of fair use clause.    &gt;unless there is a blog out there claiming she ripped them off, but I haven't seen that anywhere.  [LMGTFY] (http://lmgtfy.com/?q=anita+sarkeesian+stolen+footage)
I realize that, thank you. I'm only saying that yes, I had the joyful thank goodness it's here days too, but there is another side to that. You may decide later in life that you DO want it, and it is disappointing for those of us who want it and can't have it. 
As a guy, I hope to get asked this question one day... after I have children or get married. I often wonder what it would be like working in any demanding stressful position and also having a family. I don't really see a problem with Matt's question... other than that I think everyone should be asked it. Also I don't think I would go so far (as some here have) and say that no man ever gets asked this question. Seems like a somewhat aggressive and disrespectful assumption..... However, I do understand that women probably get asked this more (and that there are plenty of sexist reasons behind that).  But that doesn't change that I think it's a relevant question for all parents. I think the solution would be to ask this of everyone, not label it sexist and remove it from the commentary. Perhaps what I find most troubling about this, is that it seems to feed this idea that men should be or prefer to be removed from questions like this... and that women would like that to. That notion feeds all types of stereotypes about provider/nurturer and male/female dichotomies. IMO I think questions like this should turn on the best interest of the child. Which I think is usually a stable family unit where both parties play a role. Given this, we shouldn't be glorifying that a CEO or a man or a professional doesn't get asked this question. We should glorify the parent-child relationship that leads to a question like that getting asked. And ask it of everyone so we can support gender equality on both a professional and a parental front. Just my 2 cents.  
One time I was checking everything and felt a lump near my armpit.  Panic ensued.  All this fear that I was going to die, when suddenly I realized it was a lymph node.  Another time I was checking the round part when I felt this weird line of hard tissue when I pressed down.  Panic ensued.  Then I realized I was feeling a rib.  I guess the moral of the story is that when you're young and your breasts are still developing it's easy to panic over unimportant things.  Now that they're done growing I know them much better.  Get to know your body, but also figure out exactly what you are feeling and whether it should be there.
Aw, thanks :) 
If anyone, regardless of gender, ever said those phrases in a meeting I think I would lose all respect for them.
I was not discussing depression, but people who are in a little bit of a rut. Dealing with depression is a whole other beast.  I would never refer to someone is 'sad' or 'feeling low' if they show behavioural traits of depression.    I do think that many people say they are 'depressed' when merely having a rough patch.  Like hearing people say they were "really depressed for a few days, over such and such".  Unless they have bi-polar, they weren't clinically depressed.
Why has nothing happened to him? If you feel strong enough to pursue the charges, do it as it could benefit others and save somebody else from suffering from his violence. Be persistent if you can. He deserves to be locked up for a long time.  If you're therapist is helpful, try to overcome your embarrassment and work through it. The situation at and after the club you described is not uncommon, but can be dangerous and you do not want it to be a pattern.  Finally, don't be so hard on yourself. You've done nothing wrong.
&gt;including abusing altar boys/girls as is prevalent among the Catholic clergy.  Actually no more frequent than the general population. The scandal here is that church officials try to cover it up. The actual numbers are consistent with the population at large. 
[deleted]
Got drugged on my 28th birthday.  Fucker. Thankfully was surrounded by friends who got me home safe.
Really? You think restraining orders are that easily got? Dude, you're clueless.
Yes, there is a better way to say what they meant.
[deleted]
I'm 31 and I still haven't told my mother.  At the time I was afraid she'd never let me leave the house again, and now I'm afraid she would hunt him down.  I'm sorry that happened to you.  
&gt;It sounds to me like this is your personal problem.  No, I just told you it's a problem with the federal government ignoring the 10th Amendment.  Besides, from where do you derive the moral authority to tell people that they can't do something simply because you personally disapprove of it?  &gt;The government won't let us enslave people anymore either, do you consider it an infringement on your personal freedom that you can't own slaves?  No.  I don't have the freedom to infringe on the rights of others.  &gt;At least you can take solace that you have enough freedom to be openly racist, which you are.  That is a dishonest mischaracterization of my position. That's like saying that anybody who supports the freedom of people to voice negative opinions about gays must be homophobic.  Are you finished slandering me?
Yep, my cat too.  I got Oscar when I was 23 years old, so I had him my entire adult life.  The hits just keep on comin'!
Yeah, the guy friend who tried to find me never really talked to me about that night, even though I know he knows what happened and I know he has done things to keep the guy away from me. But I appreciate it so much that he was and is there for me, but he has never brought it up to me. To him it's just something any decent person would do, but to me it means a lot.
My sister completed suicide on Black Friday last year.  It hasn't gotten easier yet.  I hope you find some healing.  I hear looking into survivors groups can help.    I really don't know what to say...  but give my sympathies and strength.  If you want to talk to someone who's there, feel free to PM me.
&gt;People are complaining that the universities can't/won't do that much but if they have a lower burden of proof shouldn't they have less power to punish people who are potentially innocent?   They do have less pwoer to punish, but they usually punish, way, way, way, lower than even than power, even when they've investigated and concluded that the accused is guilty.
It was the Kite Runner.  Can you please elaborate on rape culture?
I've already looked into the shelter option and have decided that I want the experience of raising my own puppy, thank you though. It's something everyone looking into getting a dog should take into consideration, and maybe after I have this experience the next one will be from a shelter instead.
All of the recent changes in cancer screening is a little confusing, and I'm not sure if I'm doing more harm than good. It's especially confusing when my doctor tells me one thing, but then I go to places like the National Cancer Institute (I'm in the US) and they tell me something else. Should I simply be placing more emphasis on being familiar with the way my breasts are, as opposed to doing an "exam," so that it is easier to spot one of the conditions as shown in the image? And for Paps, man, that has become a heated argument. I started seeing a gyno at around 12 when I got my first period. I've been getting a Pap annually ever since. Now the recommendation is to not get them until you're 21, and to only get them every 3 years until 30, and then to get them every 5 years after that.  These recommendations just fly in the face of everything that I've been told for so long, and with the encouragement to be proactive about my health and to go for early screening, etc. it just doesn't seem like the current recommendations are enough. Maybe I've just bought into a culture of fear surrounding cancer? It's hard to reconcile that though when I currently have two family members and a friend going through chemo. My mom has had a few growths removed from her breasts and uterus (thankfully no cancer) and other ladies in my family have had different kinds of surgery for cancer removal, and this the second friend to have colon cancer. I'm only 28! My friends all had this crap happen before turning 30!  It just sucks feeling like there isn't really a lot I can do to ensure that I'm staying healthy.
If you can just try it out (while also trying to drop all of the preconceived negative notions you have about it) I think you may find success. Or maybe not... But you won't know until you try.  I can't get off without clitoral stimulation. Yes, being penetrated feels good, but on its own I know I probably won't go very far. In the beginning of my current relationship I would fake it, but I hated faking it more than the fact that I couldn't just orgasm from penetration alone. But I learned to just own it instead of feeling ashamed by it. I admitted to my SO that I would fake sometimes. But penetration feels good and masturbating can make me cum, why not add them together and intensify it? I would gladly rub my clit (or he'd do it for me) during sex - even while he was just fingering me, I would do it. Doggystyle became our favorite - it would feel deep which was great, I had easy access to touch myself to get off, he would be able to get off, and he could make me actually come, which made him happy. :) Compared to other ones, we might be in that position for a long while, sure, but the extra work is worth it to the both of us because we both love eachother. Another alternative is me laying down with my hips propped up on top of pillows while he's kneeling upright while entering. Also easy access, and I can touch his chest and he can touch mine and we can look at eachother.  I don't use a vibrator, but if I did I would still own it. The fact of the matter is that I can't get off from just the thrusting alone - but I understand that not a lot of other women do, either. And that's okay. Just because I have to do a little work on myself in order to orgasm doesn't exclude my SO from the act, nor does it make the act pointless. Sex with the person I love is about both intimacy and pleasure. Maybe to some it doesn't sound intimate, but the only thing that matters is you personally - and it will be as long as you make it to be.  Sorry for rambling. I just think it's worth a shot or two. 
Wow, that's a crazy article. We assign gender based on sex because until our children are older, we have no other way of knowing.
Saying that getting drunk with strangers doesn't cause rape doesn't mean I'm advocating getting drunk with strangers.  That's a bad idea for several reasons that aren't "might get raped."  Rape isn't an "accident."  There's no rape insurance.   Rape is an act of control and power that has nothing to do with anything but a rapist being a sick person who doesn't belong in society.  You can keep personally attacking me and being randomly dismissive of feminism all you want, but I'm going to keep responding calmly and politely with my views on this subject based on what I've read and experienced.  Edit: added something I forgot   
Speaking as someone who has spent over half their life with depression, if a friend or loved one tries to make me feel happier, it is alienating and causes me to be irritable. I guess it's that word, "happy", which still escapes myself and so many others with depression. I understand you might mean only the part of lessening the suffering, but depression and happiness are completely foreign to one another. Distraction helps a bit more, and validation of feelings. 
Can I marry you?
You took that opportunity to soap box and ran wild with it holy shit. Undo the calamity that is your mammaries, sis or bro or neither, all I'm saying is that 2%* of the population isn't small by any measure and god damnit I'm so sick of reddit's pathological need to add nuance to every statement ever.  e:typo.
At first glance I thought...oh , geez but, when I enlarged it I was really impressed and really feel like this should be handed out  to all women.   Women are educated on looking for lumps but some don't realize breast cancer can manifest itself in many different ways.  I may print it up and post it at work.  I work with a lot of women.  On a side note, I have had many women in my family and a few friends who have had breast cancer and not one of them ever though those I ♡ BOOBIES bracelets were the least bit cute or funny or educational.  I thank god I dont see them anymore.  
Image Fest Friday. When I first came to reddit, I thought it stood for "it's Finally Finished!" 
Thank you so much.
I can't understand it for you. You know they say the truth hurts. In your case, it seems to also make you say nonsensical things.
Nah, it's just free speech. Don't like it? Feel free to share your thoughts, as well.
You aren't his girlfriend, you're his provider. He doesn't even try to hide the fact that he doesn't love or trust you. He expects you to give more without giving you what you need in return.  What you need to do is give him a move-out date. Give it to him in writing, preferably with a witness. After that date, change the locks and all of your passwords.
Wtf?  "Faking"?  That's horrible.  I'm so sorry that happened.  Thank you for your kind words.
"insulted girls, but not my sister." His sister is a man. 
Beards, is the major one.   There's also a pretty credible argument that human penis length is a display trait. (Humans have unusually long and visible penises for a primate of our body size, and it doesn't seem to have any impact at all on ability to inseminate, so it may be a display trait. Can't be sure though).
Yeah, I'm trying to.  I actually mentioned a tattoo I got today representing that, elsewhere in this thread.  Thank you.
Thank you very much.
I guess.  I had to kind of stab as to the year of the picture.  I figured he looked about 5, so I said 1979.  
I hope you feel better soon! Your kitties are so cute!!
First thing I noticed was the S thing that pretty much every middle schooler on the planet has drawn. Sup Man, indeed. I'm too lazy to find the youtube video where this guy tries to find out the origin or what it means.
SMH right back. There is no shaming in my comment. Just a statement of my own experience. I have happily been a clinic escort for many years. I'm all about choice. And I have every right to talk about my experience, as do you. 
Call the TOWN or STATE police--depending on the school, their campus security/police force is not equipped to handle it. And if you go to a school like mine (the one Stewart mentions, #awkward) our campus police is famous for screwing it up and trying to brush cases under the rug.   I've been told by members of my school's rape crisis hotline and by advisors that I should forget about my university helping me and go straight to the cops/hospital and let things play out that way. Considering how many schools are being investigated for improperly handling sexual assault cases I wouldn't advise placing your trust/faith in your school since it's not in their best interest to help. 
Unless it was a woman asking.....then its fine for here.    
If you live in the US, touch base with a cancer genetic counselor to see what newer testing is available. One lab I know, offers a 13-28 gene panel currently. The lab I prefer to use is offering their update panel expected this September or October.   Usually genetic counselors are the first to know of newer testing since it's all we do, day in and day out we are typically up to date  on the latest and greatest. 
No worries.  :)
Kristen Stewart is a terrible actress. Snow White and the Huntsman suffered for it, given what it had going for it otherwise. 
The scratch marks on her arm looked fake, so incredibly fake its hard to take her story seriously. That and when she wrote "My phone beeped as I sped home –- it was him, asking why I was playing hard to get." How would a man that got punched in the chest by a woman who after she got released and ran to her car in a panic be playing hard to get?
St. Andrews, Sewanee, by chance? 
&gt;Drives me nuts that they get away with the argument "oh you don't support the MRM, so you must hate men?"  Good heavens, the irony.
I'm pretty sure wishing isn't going to make a difference either way. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
Wow.  I invest a lot in finding good books to read!  
You know Red, I like you.  I think you are a fairly reasonable person.   Sadly you and moderators like you really fail to do anything about the misandrist firebrands in your midst.  You know which ones I am talking about.   It really stinks because of the HIGH level of subjectivity, a post is appropriate or not depending upon which mods are on, what their mood is, whether they had a good breakfast that day....etc. etc. etc. 
It kept falling off during the ceremony! I just sort of balanced it there for the most part.
Nope there has been no interrogation (and I hope it stays that way)
[deleted]
Yep, selection bias is a hell of a thing. The people who experience awful side effects with things like medication are far more likely to be vocal about it. Not many people are going to talk about their average, run-of-the-mill BC experience.  There really aren't many ways to tell if you will react badly, unfortunately. If after 3 months you are still experiencing problems, definitely talk to your gyno about switching.
Just don't start acting like a girlfriend to any of them. If you start hanging out with one of the guys all the time and talk on the phone with him every day and get really emotionally close with him when you know he likes you and you don't like him back, then that's kinda fucked up. But if you just hang out like normal friends then there isn't really a problem. 
Wow, that's so sad.  I'm really sorry.  
Might sound kinda dumb; do you ever wish you had married him?
My ex girlfriend, a woman I lived with for five years, shot herself in March.  Weirdly enough, I had called my doctor to get back on meds two days before her body was found.  We were both in the same bad place.  Must have been the hard winter.  I wish I hadn't done so many things that cause me to wonder if one of the things I did or said was the grain of sand that became the pearl of her death.  I wish I had been a better man.    I spent seven days memorializing her on Facebook, and I wish I had said half those things to her when she could still hear it.  Suicide fucking sucks.  Edit: also, I wanted to add a picture of her.  You probably know someone with obsessive thoughts of self harm... those people smile just like everyone else.  They just happen to also generally be extremely talented fakers. http://imgur.com/uxHx82V
Oh wow, I had no idea!  How interesting!
That's an excellent idea.  In addition, we asked that, in lieu of flowers, people donate to K9s for Warriors, which is a group that provides service dogs to veterans who are suffering from PTSD.
[deleted]
Aw, thanks, sweetie.  I don't think of anyone as hijacking, though, actually.  I think we're just all sharing together.  Big hug back!
I told him to go to counseling with me or divorce. He has agreed to counseling for now.
I think the universe might be showing you that you can overcome anything, or if it is saying "fuck you" at least you guys know you can overcome anything. I feel really lucky to not have lost anyone close to me as of yet and I'm 20 years old so I think I've done okay. It will happen though, all part of life. Hopefully you can find some peace about the decision your brother has made. As you mentioned about your tattoo, he isn't suffering anymore.
Whoa, that's really creepy and unsettling.  I'm sorry you had to experience that.
yeah, you know I'm always torn between complete rage that women are being denied the legal right to medical care &amp; complete rage that the people that are most rabidly anti-choice seem to not give any shits about actual babies. Oh, and then the rage about gee, maybe if you want fewer unplanned pregnancies, you shouldn't deny people basic sexual education &amp; access to contraceptives. Then obviously the kind of overarching thematic rage that this all seems to have a lot less to do with how much we care about babies, and a lot more to do with certain people being really obsessed with making safe &amp; non-reproductive sex for women impossible.  So basically, I have a lot of rage.  And so much empathy for my sisters around this country &amp; world who face this bullshit everyday.    I'm a practicing Irish Catholic, by the way - just to slow the roll of whoever is getting ready to yell at me about dead babies.  
[deleted]
That's awesome! We all have an anchor that keeps us going in life, gives us something to wake up for every morning. I'm really glad you found yours :)
Whatever image host that is doesn't play nicely with reddit... I highly recommend giving [imgur](http://www.imgur.com) a shot.  It's been really good to me.    I rehosted [your image](http://i.imgur.com/2C3qI2o.gif) and [an alt.](http://i.imgur.com/nztI9v1.gif)
Thank you so much.  That's so horrible that you discovered your dad.  You should be proud of yourself for making it through that.  Someone further up in the thread recommended a book that I ended up ordering on Amazon.  It sounded helpful, so we'll see!
[deleted]
Did you at least get fuel points? That's 10 cents off your gas every four or five periods lol. That does seem expensive but I've just defaulted to cardboard ones for now.
[deleted]
:D thank you! \m/
I am so sorry about your mother.  That's so sad.  :(
I teeter drunkenly between wishing I could Eternal Sunshine her out of my head and being desperately, achingly thankful I still have those memories.
I'm sure it's still worth it, though. It's something I'll have to look into and perhaps just keep an arsenal of softcups on hand. The last time my dog had a bathroom trash festival was not pretty. Ugh. 
I think that's part of why we're pissed at him.  Why did he throw this at us and run off?  Now we're stuck dealing with it for the rest of our lives.  I do have compassion for him, because I know he must have been suffering terribly to have taken that step and he did what he considered necessary to escape the pain.  But I wish he had known (or believed) that I would much rather have shouldered the pain with him, rather than have it foisted on me unwillingly.
I am very sad to hear that OP, I do wish there was enough help for men like that.  Do you think now, that there is a validity in the claims of the MRM, that there isn't enough help for men and boys?
[deleted]
Good lord!  You certainly have been through a lot.  I'm so sorry you've had to deal with it all.    Things have been going on with me since November:  My cat developed congestive heart failure, some jerk T-boned me at an intersection and totaled my car, I got really sick with the flu, there was a screwup with the insurance company in getting my totaled car paid off, I fell down half a flight of stairs and fucked up my knee, my brother killed himself, and my cat died.  I would give my left arm for a heaping helping of "boring" right about now!
I would take this new lead aside in an attempt to mentor him into being more of a team player.  Guiding him by letting him know that while you appreciate his enthusiasm, you need the team to function as a unit with each member taking care of their assigned responsibilities and you are counting on him to help make that happen.  Require him to give you a status of his own assigned tasks on a regular basis and if you find him trying to take over someone else's work, asking him for the a status on his own assignments is a good way to remind him you are interested in his ability to do his own work and not that of others.  You may have to give him extra work so that he is so busy he does not have time to do anything else.  If he tries to take over your meeting, the suggestions about tabling his new thoughts until later are great, but some people will just keep talking until they burn themselves out.    A tactic I've seen used successfully is to let him keep rambling, but don't respond until he stops talking.  If someone else in the meeting starts to respond to him, ask them to let him finish. Once he stops talking, you can table his ideas, and move on with your agenda.  Later, you can take him aside and let him know that, while you love hearing his perspective, he needs to let you know in advance if he has any items he'd like to see on the agenda.  I had one boss who would send out the meeting agenda in advance, ask everyone if they wanted to add anything and then put those items at the bottom of the agenda.  If the meeting went quickly, those extra items would be discussed.  If it didn't, he would say that we needed to table the additional items until a later time.
Oh wow, you sure are dealing with a whole hell of a lot right now.  At the risk of sounding simplistic, have you thought about professional help?  I was at a really, really low point myself back in 2006. I ended up getting fired from my job because I couldn't get out of bed and stop crying. The only thing that kept me from killing myself was the thought that I didn't know what would happen to my pets if I died.  I somehow summoned enough strength to go to a doctor and get put on medication, and started seeing a counselor.  It took a while, but bit by bit I felt my burden lifting, until eventually I felt whole again.
Document EVERYTHING and be very wary. Be safe dear.
I'm working on setting it up. I had issues verifying my identity (same problem I had when signing up for Google wallet). Waiting on verification but then it'll be up and running. Would you want the same colors or something different? 
I go for option 2. "Ice Queen" is not so much fun, per se, but the 'less rapey option'.   I genuinely am a nice person, and I enjoy being nice to other people. Unless I'm disrespected. Then all bets are off. In this particular, narrow, isolated situation, it just benefited me more to not be quite so inviting.
I've worked in a similar situation doing heavy work in a men's team. Just do your work, use a trolley if you need one, and protect your back at all costs, don't lift more than you comfortably can. The guys on your team will get used to you. I remember after a year at my job a visiting tech said, to one of my crew "holy crap, she's pretty strong" when he saw me walking by with two huge drape bags. My crew buddy said "yep, I know plenty of blokes who won't carry two of those". They'll get used to you. 
[deleted]
 Misread first word of the title as "sexiest" instead of "sexist."  When I realized, the meaning of the post totally changed...
[deleted]
Sorry I did not see this right away! I also don't know why you were downvoted, I would be worried too.   My father was actually pretty athletic in his school years: multiple varsity sports. My mother on the other hand was pretty much sedentary. As adults, my dad liked outdoor things like camping and hiking but didn't really maintain his active lifestyle as much. My mom pretty much stayed sedentary except for a brief period she tried to exercise each week. Pretty much ate Filipino food a lot (being our nationality) which isn't exactly healthy, and mom ended up pre-diabetic for a bit. Both aspects combined affected their physical health now.   However, I'm also surprised how fast the mind goes! Can't really help how fast the brain ages... And the loss of memory... But man it is something to concern me when you notice all these things together. I end up worrying for both their physical and mental health even more so. 
[deleted]
The worst long term bleeding I've gotten has been very light and sporadic spotting but it hasn't been permanent, and I skip my periods. The results are different for lots of people so it's hard to know what will happen for you. 
The Hallowed Constitution gave them the power to interpret it however they wanted. And succeeding Supreme Courts have agreed with them.
Just some advice! don't get to worried if swelling gets worse! The first day the swelling isn't so bad but it will get worse for about 3 days post op then from there it's all smooooth sailing. Just a reference this is me 3 days post op with Dr. Jeffrey Spiegel in Boston... I describe it has getting hit by the Spiegel Bus. http://i.imgur.com/c85oyQn.jpg Then a year later after 99.9% of the healing was done.  http://i.imgur.com/v7BgOPQ.jpg   Heal fast! you're already gorgeous and it only gets better! &lt;3
Fair enough.    That sounds much more frustrating than the "sex just isn't interesting to me" version of asexuality.  How do you deal with it?
I have a bachelor's in CS and have been working at my first programming job for two years. I did experience some frustration and difficulty while I was in school, but no overt harassment, most likely because I'm not conventionally attractive. My work has been great, and I attribute a lot of that to my amazing female manager.   I would say that micro-agressions will be the thing you run into most. I have another boss who is kind of sexist in that trying for chivalry way who often goes out of his way to point out that I'm the only woman in the dev office. I think he's trying to make sure I don't feel left out when he calls us guys, Idk.  I also find that my coworkers expect me to do any necessary handwriting tasks and I'm the one who answers the phone most when our receptionist is not available, but really these are small frustrations. The college boys and the male professors were much more sexist, especially the professors.  I think the most important takeaway I have is that if you don't feel comfortable in the work environment, get out. It's really hard to change company culture and it's probably not worth trying. Do what makes you happy.
Rights are like the base minimum of being part of a society. Of course anyone has the right to say anything to me in a public space, but I thought that there were higher standards of decency and civility at play so that I may be in public without being harassed for infringing on a random stranger's personal belief. 
It doesn't have any names or places, so there's not really any specific details. The wounds don't look self inflicted to me, but I'm not a forensics expert, maybe you are and can explain more specifically what's wrong from the pictures? The site doesn't seem to have a reputation problem either, most of the articles don't seem like they'd be fake (it's a lot of advice and strange stories and whatnot). 
SCOTUS doesn't have a problem with buffer zones, which they have previously declared constitutional in other cases. They had a problem with the way this one was implemented, which was far more restrictive than deemed necessary.
Good luck! It's always great to have a job where you can make a difference. Sounds like you'll be much happier at the new gig.
&gt;This woman is an anonymous reader of xojane who submitted a story. Everything else you've said about her is speculation. According to her story, she works at a clothing store.  That's fair enough, but how do we really know this is an "anonymous" reader and not one of their regular writers? Also, my guess is if they were a regular reader of xojane and interested in the brand of "feminism" xojane is known for, they are aware of red pillers.   &gt;There is no correlation between how you say a red piller should behave and what is actually possible in the continuum of human behavior. You can't actually predict how people will act.  This is also true, but at the same time I'd be extremely skeptical if an anonymous user submitted a story to an MRA website about how he got his ass beat by a feminazi he went on a date with who used terms like "patriarchy" and "rape culture" while they were on their date. It's just a little too convenient that this person made their TRP status known so easily to a new romantic interest. And to get into specific semantics, how often do you think people use the bathroom at the beginning of a first date? And if they do, how long does it take a dude to piss to where this woman has time to search her smartphone and become immediately aware that the phrase "red pill" = misogynist asshole on specific subreddit?  &gt;If the picture was taken within a few hours of the attack, (like so she could present them when she files for her restraining order), there would not yet be visible bruising. The marks depicted in the picture are not cat scratches, cat scratches are long, straight, and very narrow. These marks are curved, and where they have scratched the skin, they are wide and short. That's what it looks like when someone grips their fingernails into your skin and then you pull yourself free.  I don't agree with any of that. Perhaps I'm wrong about cat scratches, but they look nothing like the type of injury I'd suspect from a man trying to restrain a woman. "They are wide and short." The guy would have literally had to open his hand as wide as possible and dig his claws into this woman like an animal for the marks to happen. Even an asshole who is trying to sexually assault someone would simply wrap his hand tightly around her arm not using his fingernails, and even if she tried to rip away immediately, those scratch marks would not have occurred in that fashion. 
It's funny, really. These 'nice guys' are getting upset at the girls leading them on and/or leaving them and then wanting to date 'assholes'.  Completely ignoring the fact that them focusing on a girl who has lead them on is *them wanting to date an asshole too*.   It's bad when women go off and date assholes. Men want to date an asshole who leads them on or has rejected them in a cruel way? lets completely ignore that part, and only focus on the *women* who are dating/wanting to date assholes.  Hey, guys.. maybe YOUR love life might be better if **you** stop wasting your time on assholes? How bout that?   Of course, a woman might not be an asshole at all and just might not like the nice guy, but these men seem to be pretty sure these women are just evil 'bitches' - and when you start talking about 'she keeps trying to push me away then she likes me again and I feel lead on!' then - sorry - you should know she's an asshole too and you're just as stupid for trying to keep dating her/focusing on her.. just as stupid as you consider her to be for trying to date and 'change' an asshole guy.  
/r/suicidewatch may be a better place for this post.   Please see a doctor about your health  problems, and you may benefit from speaking to a therapist.
[deleted]
I said report it- and mentioned possible consequences, just thought jail for an ass grab was going over-board, despite having had my ass grabbed by strangers more than once. I think we need to collectively respond when we see anyone cat-calling and other shitty behaviors too. We need to raise children who know to keep their hands to themselves and that others are not to be dehumanized, humiliated, and taunted for sport. But there will never be a jail big enough to put away people for every emotional harm we do each other. A surprisingly large number of otherwise useful humans would be in that jail rotting away. Most of us would do time there. Everyone of us harms someone emotionally. 
I loved that book! I had the ones for Josefina and Kit too, they were so nice to take in the car when I was travelling. 
It would definitely depend on the OP, however it sounded like she was in control of the situation. It says she never hesitated to speak, yet they kept looking at the intern throughout the meeting and one man never met her eyes. In some cases it might be blamed on assertiveness, but I (personally) do not feel that this particular case fits that idea.
How is it not disturbing the peace outside a clinic?
[deleted]
I can't believe you're getting downvoted. Just goes to show, *"the truth is the truth even if nobody believes it, and a lie is a lie even if everybody believes it."*  Indeed, abortion-on-demand *solely* for the purposes of birth control is morally indefensible. Abortion is a medical procedure that ought to be limited to cases of rape, incest, or when the health of the mother is in jeopardy (as in this particular instance.)
Woah. She's not just being a jerk as an (ex?) friend, she's affecting your career and bringing down your entire reputation.  Girl, this is workplace bullying. I honestly encourage you to look up your company's definition of bullying...if it's anything like my company's (and I bet it is!), then she fits the description to a tee. You should talk to HR...you don't need to file a report or take it up a level, but you do need to get on record that your reputation is being mashed up not because of *you*, but because of gossip and defamation. If this vile gossip runs unchecked, other departments may not want you...  I had this happen to me once. I didn't realize it was bullying until too late. 
Eh, it doesn't really matter. Tumblr has bad enough stuff for the entire internet.
Softcups are designed for it, but my boyfriend can sometimes feel the purple ring and it causes chafing so he makes me take it out. He doesn't get grossed out by the female body and its functions; I generally just put it in to make cleanup minimal.  As far as regular cups... once I forgot I had mine in until the next morning (we'd had sex the night before) and my bf said he had no idea it was in there either; he couldn't feel it. We were also tipsy on champagne and wine after a wedding so I'm sure that may have factored into it.
&gt;Potential sentience is not actual sentience.  Nobody said it is.  &gt;Anyways, since the science is in that fetuses are not sentient, that whole debate is a red herring, and distracts from the real issue, which is that women should have full control over what they do with their bodies.  The science says no such thing.  There is no scientific test that can prove or disprove the existence of sentience.  You are claiming to know something which can inherently not be known through any objective methods we know of.  &gt;I, for one, don't really care much about some abstract debate on personhood that gets used as an excuse to take away women's rights. Fuck that shit.  Then why are you participating in it?
Humans are just animals in fancy clothes. 
I can see where you're coming from.  I still think beauty is subjective and all that, but if you feel good about yourself, then I think that's what matters most.
My ex FWB used to just say "can't, my uterus is made of hate right now." Why avoid the topic? If he's unaware that women get periods, then it kinda makes sense, but if he knows it happens he should know it happens to you.
Glad it didn't fall flat. A project of such a major scale should be duly noted. You look sharp in it.
It's an issue that's gone all the way up to the Supreme Court for starters. Gay marriage is a public issue even though it is about a private union between two people. The government does not legislate the sexual habits of the mothers of school children if you were not aware.
Uh yeah but that's a problem isn't it? That the government has to be involved in private matters such as gay marriage and abortions. What I meant was that it isn't right to say that of course a woman's sexual habits are private and should stay private, but suddenly if she decides to remove a bunch of cells from her uterus, the whole world is allowed to get involved. 
No way; mine's in November, too!  Scorpios, represent!
[deleted]
Thank you so much.
[deleted]
Yes, students elect to go to MIT and it's an incredible opportunity. But most 17 year old kids aren't going to consider objectively the risk on their mental health.   I see where you're coming from, but you say "She didn't take time to work on herself." I think half the point of the article is that MIT doesn't allow you that time. There is no "me time" at a place like that. Combined with the insane academic pressures, it's basically a recipe for severe mental health issues in some students.
This is a copy and paste of my own comment   **TL;DR: Specialization happens everywhere. Look at any cause, business, issue, whatever and you will find people focused much more on one part than another. Only feminists (and MRAs) get criticized for their specialization**  If you think about it this way, you'll realize why.  Do people make that same criticism of movements outside of gender equality?  Do charities working to feed starving children in Africa get shit for not helping the starving children in other continents?  Did people who raised money for Katrina victims get shit for not helping other hurricane/natural disaster victims?  Does the It Gets Better campaign get shit for focusing on helping LGBT teens and young adults and not helping fully grown LGBT adults?  Does Susan G. Komen get shit for only focusing on breast cancer and not any other type of cancer (even the other lady specific ones?)   There is nothing inherently wrong with focusing on a particular type of issue. Just because in this particular instance its about *equality* doesn't mean its inherently hypocritical to have a focus on a particular group that is often treated unequally. All equality issues, whether it be about women, or men, or children, or GSMs, or Latinos, or blacks, or Muslims, or Jews, every single one of those groups have different problems that, while often overlapping and similar, are all still very different from one another in a lot of aspects. All of those groups are treated poorly in some fashion, but the hows, whats, whos, whys, and so on, are different enough that each is totally justified in having themselves and other people focus particularly on their issues. Each one has tons of literature detailing their philosophies and issues.  Look at it another way. Lets take a video game company. This company has a few different departments like most companies of their size do. Everyone has the same goal, to help the company grow and make money through its creation and distribution of video games. It is well known that those who actually create the games (artists, programmers, designers) often clash with Marketing, whos job it is to sell those games. They both have the same goal (make a successful game) but both have been brought up and trained to see the path to that goal very very differently. And it often makes it harder for the other group to do their job the way they see fit or think is best, or to even do it at all in some cases. It doesn't *have* to be that way, many of the problems are easily solveable, but it definitely happens.  Equality is a business. Feminists, MRA's, the NAACP, the HRC, everyone who belongs in each of those groups are their own departments within that company, with workers who are specialized in their fields. They may disagree on how to handle particular issues that effect the entire company because they see things from a different perspective but at the end of the day they all have the same goals and should be able to work together to achieve them. Feminists and MRAs are the marketing and game creators in this instance. They are the most closely linked of any of the departments but just different enough to make it relatively easy for them to derail the other. Once again it doesn't *have* to be that way. Many of the issues both sides want to address can be worked on together because of how they are linked, but oftentimes isn't for whatever reasons.
Yes! That's what I thought! I mean I don't know much about it at all, but I did first year psychology which talked about eating disorders a little and said something like "in all eating disorders there's an overwhelming desire to be thin or fear of gaining weight" and I don't have either of those. I love my food and I just can't seem to eat anymore.  I really hope you're right about them not being able to force me to go back for this. 
Right but they can claim they are protesting the government's decision on the legality of abortion. It's difficult to prove that they are there to solely prevent women from getting abortions and not to protest Roe v Wade. An assembly to hurl insults at school children and their mothers (which is what this ridiculous thread is about) cannot reasonably claim to be protesting any issue so they would be arrested.
&gt; I can't taste food at all, I mean I can tell when something is sweet or spicy but beyond that I can't pick out different flavours at all,  &gt;Also yeah I'm constantly dizzy.    I would suggest that you see a neurologist. This sounds like something other than an eating disorder..I know not what.
That would be protesting overpopulation. It's a serious problem. Seems like parents are the ones populating. Schools are where to find them, with their progeny. Why can't we castigate these people for their reproductive choices? Loudly? Angrily? From less than 35 feet away? 
[deleted]
I will be honest. I am at a top 20 STEM schools... not top 10... and shit is pretty bad. Honestly, people who are here to blame the student, do not realize how much emotional energy it takes dealing with this shit. It is not fun. Nobody has fun. Everyone suffers. And it definitely brings out the worst in people. This is not education. This is nightmare. Honestly, the competition that is encouraged for limited resources is making academia into a nuthouse. The system is fucked up. There needs to be a change.   Here's a reason why it is related to 2x. Being a woman in high pressure male dominated, hostile environment ends up making it much worse for the student. On top of the cut throat competition you have to put up with mild sexism, mild sexual harassment, expectation that you will fail, people looking down on you... Going to MIT is like playing on hard mode. Going to MIT as a woman is like playing on insanely hard mode.
I'm not an expert on eating disorders or anything, but I do know that legally they cannot institutionalize you without your consent unless you're an immediate threat to yourself or others. And based on your other answers to people, it definitely sounds like there's something more physical going on. Not being able to taste your food is either a secondary psychological symptom, like say a symptom of depression, or it's a symptom of something physical. Your doctor is an idiot if they aren't concerned about unexplained weight loss and if they think it's only a real eating disorder if you're already under weight. Definitely go talk to a different doctor and see what they have to say.
[deleted]
That is so sad about your sister.  I'm so sorry.
'grats! love your hair
I'm a public health nutritionist. I love that I get to work with community members to help them learn more about healthy eating and gain food skills, e.g. lead collective kitchens, support community gardens, and put on health education workshops. I also advocate for improved access to affordable, nutritious foods in the remote communities I serve. In our neck of the woods, healthy foods are often hard to come by, yet, junk foods are readily available and very cheap. Food is a basic human right, and I think everyone should be able to access and afford healthy foods.
I'm in between undergrad and grad school (psychology) working a grant-funded position at a large university. I am a data manager, so I don't work with research participants, but the project I'm working on is one-of-a-kind and offers a lot of insight into a prevalent social problem. I love the statistical side of research so I'm glad to be gaining skills while being part of significant work. During (hopefully!) and after my PhD program my focus will be on women's psychology, which was also my focus in undergrad.   I find this work meaningful because as an activist I understand how important data is to explaining social issues. While anecdotes are useful, lawmakers and others also need to know that women and minorities face quantifiable problems in society. My undergrad research included topics of intimate partner violence, trauma and objectification, rape fear and avoidance behaviors, and slut-shaming. My hope is that some of my work can create change, even if it just opens some people's eyes to some of the difficulties faced by groups in our society.
As someone who had and rode horses for a long time, I appreciate you (even if my horse wasn't always happy about it)!
That clears it up very nicely. Thank you! 
Your hair is absolutely gorgeous. How do you get it that way, and keep it like that?
Trying to be vague to not out myself, but I do advocacy work/member communications in the mental health field. We work to ensure access to mental health services. I love what I do - we were instrumental in the passage of the mental health parity law which means people can get mental health services on par with physical health services. 
Seems like a personal needs vending machine could be an answer. Pregnancy tests, condoms, medicines for the more private of maladies, plus generic stuff like headache medicine, cold medicine, band-aids, etc. I'd use it.
Nothing has mitigated my pain.  If I could talk to him, I would tell him "Please don't do it. Get help."
Beauty is important in attracting a mate. If you want to attract a mate, it is advantageous to be beautiful. So depending on your goals in life, it may or may not be okay to be ugly.
You sound familiar... :)
No, they are not claiming to protest the legality when they harass the women using the clinics. They are trying to guilt and shame those women out of having abortions. Ironically, sometimes the protestors need abortions themselves and will sneak in through the back so their fellows don't see them. They see themselves as the exception to the rule, of course. [Here's an article](http://mypage.direct.ca/w/writer/anti-tales.html) I like on the subject and an exert from it:  &gt;"We have anti-choice women in for abortions all the time. Many of them are just naive and ignorant until they find themselves with an unwanted pregnancy. Many of them are not malicious. They just haven't given it the proper amount of thought until it completely affects them. They can be judgmental about their friends, family, and other women. Then suddenly they become pregnant. Suddenly they see the truth. That it should only be their own choice. Unfortunately, many also think that somehow they are different than everyone else and they deserve to have an abortion, while no one else does." (Physician, Washington State)
Lol. That was hilarious. 
I am a web designer and developer. I work with a lot of small business owners who don't realize at first how important it is to have a web presence. I spend a lot of time giving them advice about content management, social media and the possibility of selling their goods online. I often find myself helping old-school business owners start looking to modernize. I never realized how much you could help someone fulfill their business goals if you have design and/or development skills. I love my job!
Shhh, it's a secret ! 
You should go visit r/curlyhair. Your hair is beautiful!!
Ugh. I had periods which would RANDOMLY last up to three weeks in a row. Now thanks to my own birth control, they're MUCH lighter and last only a few days!
Maybe if stores made an effort to be sensitive to customers' privacy and ring up such items in a more discreet and respectful way, people would be less likely to steal them. Especially if the argument is that people steal them to avoid embarrassment, wouldn't the most logical course of action be to make the process less embarrassing rather than adding complications that may actually keep the customers from buying such important things at all?
I manage group homes for kids and teens with developmental disabilities.
It's absolutely the case that the consensus view in modern neuroscience is that consciousness exists and that it emerges from brain activity and brain activity alone.  * "Any scientific study of consciousness is based on the premise that phenomenal experience is entailed by neuronal activity in the brain." ([Seth et al. 2006](http://www.pnas.org/content/103/28/10799.full?sid=f57f4e25-18f9-48f6-a641-166ff420f261))  * "Any account of consciousness must reject extraphysical tenets such as dualism, and thus be physically based as well as evolutionarily sound." ([Edelman 2003](http://www.pnas.org/content/100/9/5520.full?sid=f57f4e25-18f9-48f6-a641-166ff420f261))  In philosophy, this might not be the case, but in science, it can be the *only* way to approach consciousness:  &gt; "In our view, scientific questions are by their very nature directed at the physical, observable world, and therefore their scope should be limited to this domain.... However, as a matter of procedural course, we believe the scientific community can agree about what is and is not observable and that, by definition, the elusive twin in the dualist view--the ghost in the machine--is neither physical nor observable. The challenge for us is to see how far we can get in our understanding of consciousness without invoking dualism." ([Cohen and Schooler 1997: 8](http://books.google.com/books?id=QehHAwAAQBAJ&amp;lpg=PP1&amp;ots=RXtQyiuDoN&amp;dq=consciousness&amp;lr&amp;pg=PA8#v=onepage&amp;q&amp;f=false))  For those not familiar, or needing a brush-up on ideas of dualism in terms of theory of mind, [this is a good overview](http://plato.stanford.edu/entries/dualism/).
Loved the Dear Americas as well--I think I read every one of them when I was in elementary school.
When my mother was pregnant with my youngest brother the docs said he was going to have Down syndrome and suggested termination as an option.  My father almost lost it.  Terminate their baby?! I could hear the love and respect my mother felt for my father as she told me this after their appointment.  My brother was born completely healthy (no ds).  He's now a 15 yr old of exceptional character.  It really sucks that these people lost their child.  And I'm not implying their child was healthy.  But I'm a little at a loss as to how an abortion clinic helped.  Especially since their docs (the ones they're making decisions from) had dreamed the mother in no immediate health risk.  Maybe someone can explains it to me.
I'm a physician.  I absolutely love what I do.  On the rare occasion when I get a heartfelt "thank you", it makes up for all the stress and bullshit that goes with the job.
Most local health departments also offer free and/or low cost testing.
Indeed! I remember reading about her in textbooks (specifically her film Harlan County, USA) long before ever meeting her. She's a pioneer.
I don't think defining the "bubble" in terms of length is a good approach, but I can't think of a better one.
[deleted]
No problem!  Hopefully it helps you find a good mechanic that you can trust!
What I am saying is you are fullfiling the stereotype.  I know plenty of MIT grads who don't, sadly you are not one of them.
It's tough!! I straight up feel like something is missing, yet I have no idea about how to fix it. I can barely talk to my female roommates that I've known for two months. 
I want to, but I know I don't have the constitution to bear the protesters and their insults for very long. Especially if they touched me, which I've heard happens often.  Then again, I can't imagine what I would do if I actually need an abortion...
[deleted]
I'm pretty sure you've nailed it. It's the constant pressure to ensure there's low crime in their area that they can't manage (staffing, socioeconomic pressures in the area etc), often due to funding constraints, that probably ends up making them feel like they have to fudge the numbers.
yeah okay, I could list a bunch of random shit from yard work to cleaning a toilet but I really don't care too...its just the way our society is ( like how you most likley put on makeup to look "good" before going out together ) when honestly he probably doesn't give a flying fuck fyi.... I agree with you he should lend a hand but am almost positive he does more than you tend to realize  edit: truth hurts sometimes :P down votes galore
I hope you will allow a comment from a male perspective. A person may have an appearance that the majority would call plain or even ugly but to their partner if they have kind words and actions they will be the most beautiful person alive.
I am a Special Ed teacher for elementary age children who have either genetic disorders or birth trauma.  They range in age from 5-11 &amp; function academically K-2.  We focus on basic life skills that will allow them to interact acceptably socially &amp; take care of their own basic needs without a parent/guardian/keeper.  I love it because they are awesome when they start at "I can't without help" &amp; you get to watch "before your very eyes" a kid learn to put his own jacket on or poke his own straw into the Capri-Sun pouch without help!  
[deleted]
I don't see why so many people are congratulating you on confronting the guy so overtly. It's brave, sure but is is a regrettable thing to do. You should have called the cops quietly. I personally would worry about this guy coming back to get me. I hope they catch him. I try to go about my life invisible to those who could harm me. I see people all the time who I could call out on things like this but I never say anything because I want to remain safe, invisible to them and not a target. Remaining anonymous to the criminals in this situation is always reassuring.
Nice job, very clean lines.  Consider posting on r/frugal.  Always nice to see someone willing to take the time to sew in this day/age.  Sewing machine is one of the best investments we ever made.
Parents suing because "inappropriate" items were made easily available to children.
Thanks.
[deleted]
It was on Reddit - it was OP's (dontchangepassword) account... well, the person who posted it hijacked the account. Sometimes social experiments don't work as planned.
I am not sure of your age or experience with this so don't be offended.  Are you sure you are properly inserting it? You have to get the angle of insertion right. There are YouTube and other internet videos that can guide you in the right direction. If in doubt, it is better to have a light tampon with a good fit than a regular that doesn't fit. I have heard tampax pearl lights recommended in the past. 
Hear, hear. Both of my folks worked for the government for a while, then eventually my dad went to IT, and eventually became a part-time community college professor and ultimately unemployed. Meanwhile, my mom remained employed in DC, waking up at 4am to get to work by 6am, often worked until 5 or 6pm, combatted rush-hour traffic, and then came home to cook dinner for my dad, brother, and me. My dad's occasional contribution was making a salad, having us kids set the table and do dishes, and then make fun of my mom because she would later fall asleep sitting up on the couch.   Fortunately, my mom is amazing and loved me hard, and I'm plenty ambitious. Luck of the draw.
[deleted]
I work as an academic librarian, and I love it. I get a lot of satisfaction from helping students learn how to research and use all of the resources at their disposal. Also, it's a public university so I help community members continue learning, build resumes, and find open access information. Almost everyone know how to use the internet but few really understand advanced searching. 
I'd say it also depends on cleaning standard. If one person wants things to a way higher standard, they shouldn't be surprised if they have to do more to get it to that standard.
There's a theme on this thread of female engineers saying, "this career is a very fulfilling and meaningful uphill struggle".  That's pretty much how I feel about it; the sporadic discrimination and isolation is a trade-off for all the good parts: getting to create things, high pay, daily mental engagement, and being regarded as intelligent and an expert (don't believe anyone who say they don't care about that part).
[deleted]
To afraid.
Oh goddamit. You're missing the point so hard it's almost funny.  No, my partner's kind words do not make them beautiful. It makes them *attractive to me*, and a *wonderful, good person*, but it does *not* change their appearance.   And that's ok! They *can* be a wonderful person and also kinda ugly. To claim that their good nature actually makes them beautiful is bringing the focus back to their appearance, and reinforces the beauty = good and good = beautiful thing that way too many people assume is correct.   Can we please stop making everything, especially positive personality traits, about her appearance? Being a good person is not actually a form of physical beauty, no matter how attractive you find it to be. And it doesn't have to be! 
moderate these people out of derailing discussions please.
[deleted]
That is fucking awful, I'm so sorry. Any dude who feels the need to yell vulgar shit at a girl is a predatory, aggro piece of shit in my books. I hope yr doing alright. &lt;3
This seems more about your idea of big boobs are the only kind of good boobs which is wrong.  As a man, and someone passionate about boobs, let me say that small boobs have a lot going for them too.   From your post all I see is "small perky pointy boobs" and think "awesome".  Not to take away from how you feel but I want you to know that this is not some kind of fatal flaw you have and not everyone shares your feelings about small boobs.   My ex-wife had small boobs and I can say the best part for me was the shape.  While small, they were perky and over the 20 years we were together, they remained that way.  So you can look forward to many years of awesome perkiness at least.  She is nearly 50 now and still rocking a perfect set of tits any girl in her 20s would be proud of.  If you are worried about how other people see you, then you should ask other girls with small boobs how they dress.  Dressing for your size can make all the difference and looking good can do wonders for how we see ourselves.    One of my friends with a small breasted girlfriend told me about how she went to the shop one weekend and bought a white t-shirt 3 sizes too small and wore it around all weekend.  She did it so her boobs looked awesome and it worked.  He wasnt the kind of guy to mention that stuff really but it made such an impression on him he couldnt stop talking about it.      
Absolutely!
No man, you won't get arrested. I've counter protested [these](http://abolishhumanabortion.com/) guys at middle and high schools. They have protested at elementary schools as well. The counter protesting signs were "Ignore them and Have a Nice Day" with pictures of puppies, and "They Spread Hate and We Spread Cute".   We were also met with hostility from the campus police officers...even though we found out that 2 of the members of that group were arrested and found guilty as domestic terrorists for attempting to blow up a church.   We had that as a sign too.
Thanks for quoting this jerk who deleted his/her comments. Next time post the name as well so we can remember said person for the tool s/he is.
Oh god. That happened the first time I got pregnant.  I was pretty sure I was but wanted the free test. I peed in a cup and then had to spend the next 45 minutes watching those old 70s anti abortion propaganda videos. You know, where they show 5 gallon buckets of babies and baby parts behind a cinder block building.  Finally I was like "Hey I'm not getting an abortion.  I never planned to. But I am 30 minutes late to pick up my bf from work (I was too. And in the days before cellphones were a thing most people had). Am I pregnant or not?"   Finally they said I was and let me go. But they called me every month to make sure I was still pregnant.  But some good did come of it. They gave me a ton of free baby stuff. Car seat, diapers, clothes. I didn't even feel bad because of them sticking me in s room and having me watch that stupid video.
[deleted]
I'm sorry you have to deal with that in your life, specially coming from someone so close to you. The bad news is she is never going to change, the good, it is in your hands to remove such toxic elements from your life.   Good luck, and don't let anyone treat you badly, you deserve better.  
[deleted]
I definitely don't throw them out. I wear them whenever I want! Mind you I have "sexy" underwear for special occasions that I would not wear when I'm on my period. 
Oh of course, because *that* happens *all the time*.    
I train animals! I have a degree in biology, and I use it to help people's pets live good lives without annoying their owners too much. Check us out in /r/dogtraining if you're interested (although I train horses and birds too, not just dogs).
At the same time, it sucks that sometimes people need a really unfortunate situation to happen first :/
While I befriend and date guys who are activists for men's issues, none of them identify as MRAs and several of them identify as feminists.  I've never met a self-identified MRA that I'd want to date.
Congrats on the decision!  A month ago I took the plunge and quit my miserable customer service job and I've never been so happy - it's like I'm a different person now that I changed jobs!
Why is your daughter learning how to fold towels and make dinner, and your hypothetical son changing tires and fixing lightbulbs? You're perpetuating exactly the same dynamic people are complaining about.  Teach your daughter to change tires and teach your son to make dinner. They're both going to be eating and driving, are they not? 
I went the route of becoming a Registered Dietitian, so did my bachelors in nutrition, completed a dietetic internship, and passed a national exam. My journey prepared me very well for the community work I do, but I can see why it wasn't for everyone.   I'm from Canada, so I'm not very familiar with the situation in the U.S., sorry. Around here, non R.D.'s who work for food security nonprofits often have some post secondary in relevant topic e.g. courses in community development, social work, or health promotion.   What you suggested sounds like a good plan to me. I do know that community experience helps a lot when applying for jobs in the food security field. Many skills that are important for these kind of jobs (like being able to establish rapport, be a good communicator, and manage projects) are built through hands-on experience, not through reading a book.
[deleted]
[I'm ugly and I'm proud!] (https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-N0yXGVWS1Y)  In all seriousness you have a great point. It is what it is. 
My dad doesn't cook or clean either. He does however cut the grass, fix the cars, shovel the snow, ect.
[deleted]
Tried to trade back scratching. It hasn't worked... YET!
Hmmm, above and beyond the call of SO duty unless he is keen on learning. Let him be. 
Yeah I completely agree. It is very fucking important.  But for any child. Male, female, black, white, Asian. Because sandwiches are the best, everyone should have that knowledge.  Especially women.
Happy birthday! That's not petty at all! Is your facebook set to remind them of your birthday? It can be difficult for people to remember birthdays without that fb reminder, unless you remind them like three times in the days leading up to it. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
I'm severely chronically ill and disabled. My most recent ex (together 5 years) and my husband (1 year wedding anniversary tomorrow) have had to learn skills usually reserved for RNs, not even LPNs, and care for me on top of taking over 99% of household chores. I don't think that this comes naturally to either of them, per se. But they have been absolutely upstanding and steadfast in their dedication to learning a new way of being to fulfill the needs of our household as they evolved and changed with the progression of my illness. I find it hard to fault someone for the way they were raised, the times they grew up in, the mistaken notions they got from society *particularly when their actions show that they are capable of change for the better*. Where does being harsh and judgmental as you suggest you might be really get you with that person? There's something to be said for getting along with people; you can't help change people's minds if you come at it from an attacking point of view.
Oh boy, I was bored when I was reading this and I just had to try it myself too. Half an hour and 3 guys were ready to make me a whore. One guy even started conversation with "will you give me some pussy?" But didnt get any of those venomous responses (yet). 
Wow, that sucks :/ It sounds like you at least got some wishes, I hope?   I have had a similar problem in the past, it's the main reason I just stopped trying to celebrate my birthday. I don't mention it and usually just pass it quietly with family. I decided the stress of trying to get enough friends together to celebrate was not worth it. 
[deleted]
Wow. I love him already.
No problem, it is how I got three job interviews recently! Starting a new job working with foster children soon! 
Thanks I try. I've been drinking so this is the best I could muster up. I like the cut of your jib anyhow.
Only if it's important to him. For example, if I like my SO's hair cut a very particular way, I could offer to cut it for him. Or if I really preferred all of his clothes wrinkle-free and he couldn't care less, I could iron them for him. 
Is there a study on how this impacts sons? My cousin has two little boys, and his wife does most of the cooking and cleaning. 
Yeah, this is, at the very least teaching me if I ever use one, it will be at home only, and I'll remove it in the shower, just in case.
Probably a lot of lame jokes though.
It's strange, horses used to be transportation and now they're pets.
Someone with a wellspring of power within themselves, apparently.
Thank you for a well reasoned and informative post.  To me the long-term solution to this problem is improving access such that there are many more places for a woman to have an abortion. If all or most women of conscience used Planned Parenthood or similar places for checkups and so forth, it would soon became impossible to distinguish who where or when somebody was having an abortion. 
We had all bamboo floors. We just dry mopped most of the time. 
Huh I didn't edit anything other than the edit I listed..
The kids being toruble makers was meant as a lighthearted joke about kids in general, and it wasn't targeted at Hispanic (not Mexican) kids; It was targeted as one part of a "traditional family role."  Reading comprehension fail is why people might think I am saying Hispanic/Mexican kids are trouble makers. I did not say these were "traditional Mexican family roles" anywhere.  As I said before, I think anyone who sees that as racist is either overly sensitive or didn't comprehend the context.
Yeah, just looked at it. Took me a moment to realize it was all guys, hah. 
Deleted
[deleted]
[deleted]
&gt;That's the point dude: it isn't contradicting the 10 amendment until the Supreme Court or Congress decides that it is. If they find that the Civil Rights Act does not violate the 10th amendment then the Civil Rights Act does not violate the Constitution.  That's only in the Supreme Court's opinion.  That doesn't make it factual; their opinion only determines if the law gets overturned or stays.
[deleted]
Maybe that's what's needed for them to not make comments like that? 
This would allow men to get away without cleaning up after themselves or their children all because they earned more and were able to do some basic DIY every now and again - it's a get out of jail free card.   This isn't really about money. It's about being in it together and doing your fair share towards the day to day maintenance of the life you've built together 
THIS!
What? I don't think your question helps identify those sort of deep rooted psychological feelings.
I have almost no boobs but I've grown to be okay with that! If I need bigger boobs for a dress or to fill out a sweater, I have my bra that makes me go from AA -&gt; C in two seconds flat.   I'm glad because I *can * have them when I want them but I don't get any of the bad things that busty girls often complain of; back and neck pain, having to buy sizes up because of bust:waist differences.    Don't get me wrong, I envy the girls naturally endowed with a Katy Perry rack but I've just had to make do and I've found that maybe that's a good thing!
I am sorry to say, but it doesn't look like Jake is the person that you would want to spend your life with. You say that you fight so much. That doesn't sound like the two of you are compatible to create a good life together. If he doesn't want to break up with you, then you have to find the courage and strength to break up with him and move on.   That is OK. I think and believe that young people like you have to grow and learn about relationships and love. Many young people have to try multiple relationships to understand better what they themselves need, and what kind of relationship they want to have in the end.   I hope your parents and/or your teachers have taught you about how to protect yourself during sex: protect yourself from pregnancy and protect yourself (and your partner) from sexually transmitted diseases. If not, please also visit [Planned Parenthood's website](http://www.plannedparenthood.org/), a website that can teach you about safe sex.   You are slowly becoming an adult, and you have to learn a lot of things before you truly are one. Good and healthy relationships is one thing that you have to learn about. (Just as is going to school etc). 
Ooh, I missed it! What did they say, I gotta know. 
You have to navigate and negotiate that stuff, and it's different for every couple. If the other person likes a tidy house and truly doesn't mind putting in the work, then it's OK for things to be lopsided.  BUT if the clean person resents doing so much work to get the house to their own standard, then some compromise has to happen. They gotta relax the standard a bit and you gotta step up and clean up after yourself a bit.  Source: I have a happy marriage even though I am a mess who doesn't care about chaos and clutter, and my husband prefers a clean house. He cleans the kitchen several times a week, does most of the laundry etc. And I in turn try to remember to put my garbage in a can.
I was going to say... sounds like things worked out for the best all around. :-)
Indeed!
[deleted]
I live in Northern England, I wouldn't say it's particularly either way. Anyway it was good to know you guys are out there :)
Agreed about the resentment bit. My fiancé makes quite a bit more than I do and works more than I do, though my job is more physically demanding, yet never once has he nor I brought up "well you owe me". For anything.    We're both goddamn grown adults and clean after our own messes. He takes out the trash and kitty litter, I'm generally the own who sweeps and vacuums. We both help out in the kitchen- be it putting dishes away or cooking. We both work on the car. We both do laundry.   People have this false notion in their head that their relationship is a competition or something. It's not, it's a partnership. There's give and take. It's not a business agreement, or shouldn't be anyways. 
Agree with Brotkrumen both about the takeaway messages and the fuzziness of the implications of the research.  Things like this have tons of moving pieces involved that they're trying to pull apart with a reasonably small sample.  It is worth pointing out that the effect is basically the opposite (or negligible) in all categories for boys:  * As mothers' "explicit self-stereotyping" increases, so do the female children (0 to ~22), but the male children goes down (10 to 5). * As fathers' "explicit gender role beliefs" increases, girls go from 5 to 30, boys go from 5 to -1 in their explicit gender role beliefs.   * The stereotypicality of boys' occupation stays roughly the same as the fathers' explicit and implicit gender role beliefs/associations go up, and as the fathers' domestic contribution goes up.  
Exactly! She is not beautiful. She's not even pretty. Not even quirkily pretty. On physical features alone she's not worth a second look.
Not damaged goods, just different goods. People who survive rape come away from it a very different person, They are neither a better person nor a lesser person, but they are very different. They have a range of new experiences, memories, coping mechanisms and outlooks on life that they didn't have before the rape. It doesn't damage them, it just changes them, and often in relationships when one person changes, the other person finds it hard to deal with that change.
In no way does he seem mentally handicapped. He was trying to coax someone for nudes. That's it. When he got rejected he back lashed. 
[deleted]
Just the one source though? Could it have been propaganda?  It sounds fairy nonsensical.  
There is nothing better it has always been amazing. 
What about sexism out side the household? At school at work or on a walk into town? Where those also taken into consideration in the study?  Even if a household is perfect please remember that theres many things and people outside the household which can warp ambitious minds.      
[deleted]
[deleted]
Yes, exactly. 
I really like this post, it's so important. In my family, my mom is the one who does the laundry, who cleans, who cooks and who looks after our grandparents (they can't move, she can't leave the house for more than 30 minutes, she's a full time caregiver).   It has always been like this. I've always seen this as a normal dynamics. However, as I grew older, I started to think this was unfair. But I tried to convince myself that this is normal, my dad works longer shifts in a very physical job. He's tired. It's fine.   3 years ago he lost his job. My mom still did everything for him even though she had less time and was more tired. It continued to be like this for two years while he was unemployed. Now he works again.. It's all the same.   I'm living on my own with my boyfriend for one year now and I always feel much more responsibility for house chores than he does. We're working on it. Yet I can't stop thinking this is my fault. I'm all for equality but I can't help to be such a 'mom' for him sometimes. I hate it. 
It's pretty amazing how people can make another person's trauma 100% about themselves. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
Yep, this. It's our household, our mess, we clean it up, &amp; each person works to their strengths. Divisions of labour can be really useful when they're based on complementary skill-sets e.g. if I fixed the electrics we'd die, if he did the finances we'd go broke. IMO a family is a team &amp; that means everyone contributes and everyone helps out everyone else when necessary (this is what I tell the kiddo when he starts moaning about how they're not his dishes).
I think they're relatively few and far between but they're out there
[deleted]
What feminist agenda? Is it the similar to the gay agenda and the colored agenda?  By the way: When your post gets deleted, it won't because the mods are trying to cover anything up. It will be because you're a fucking idiot. 
[deleted]
Which is why I think it's a scumbag thing to do, but taking advantage of people sadly isn't illegal most of the time. Unless you trick them into drinking, they should be responsible for their own decisions while drunk. And like many, many others have said, all any scumbag has to do is get as drunk themselves first to avoid legal trouble.   
I think in that case it would reasonable for you to bring the house up to the standards of an average person.   So at the end of the day, dishes would be washed, counters would be wiped down. Kitchen floors would be swept at least every couple days. Bathroom would be cleaned at least every couple weeks.  Part of cohabitation is compromise.
So then who decides if its "factual"? The people? Well they have clearly chosen. How about the Founders? Well they left that to Congress and the Supreme Court. So then I ask you who decides that a law is factual? 
Honestly, if you're discussing a long term relationship, the expectations of each individual matter less than the expectations of the couple.  If you aren't already both making small sacrifices (like cleaning) to make sure that everything is how you BOTH like it and you're BOTH happy with your home, it's bad news.  Person A expects the place to be clean so it's more fair for person A to do more work =/= relationship paradigm.  Person A gets stressed out when the place isn't clean, so you both divide the labor equally to make sure Person A is happy (and then the same is done for you in return)--*that's* the way it works.   To make a relationship work, you gotta operate in a relationship paradigm.  If you're not willing to do the quid pro quo, that is to say if you're not willing to try and make the other person happy at sacrifice to yourself, the relationship just ain't gonna last.  You might like one another, but... when your whole world is brightened by the other person's smile, the "I ain't gonna suffer for their needs" attitude never even comes up.
It's the "help" thing that's the problem - that she was the default, and he was just the helper that would pitch in when he could. 
If the alarm went off and my partner jumped, I might joke about it and explain that "I've just been turning it off". And yes, I would turn it off if it went off in the middle of the night, and then we would fix it sometime soon. I frankly wouldn't think of it as any different than I would a smoke alarm going off (which are also technically for safety).  I think this is being overly-sensitive. I wouldn't say he's laughing at you (which, by the way, does not always warrant getting super pissed- people in healthy relationships bust each other's chops all the time), he's laughing at the situation. It had happened to him several times while you were gone, and he forgot to tell you. If you think he was doing it to upset or humiliate you, you are *definitely* being overly sensitive.  That being said, that rape comment he made is *insanely* insensitive. I understand that PTSD is a burden on both people, but 1) it should be something you can get through, and 2) you simply don't tell your partner that you would abandon them if they had a severe trauma. Maybe he was just trying to make it easy for you to break up with him ahead of time...
Don't bring up a random comment from the past and try to judge this siutation with it. Its not fair to him or will it produce a reliable result. If you feel, outside of that comment, like he isn't respecting you that's all you need to say what's up. You don't need anything but how you feel to discuss stuff with your SO. But I know if someone brought up a comment I made instead of just being straight up, I'd be annoyed. It feels less like discussion than accusation and defense. 
Maybe this is a regional thing, but my family is big on both "my little boy/man" and "my little girl/lady". You raise some interesting points, though! Hadn't really thought about that.
I'm the youngest daughter and while I've never been treated like a princess, I know I'm my Dad's little girl and I'm always going to be. To me that's his love for me showing through. For him nothing is going to take away the memories of raising his daughter. To me it's not created any weird image issues. My parents have a strong, equal, healthy marriage. Sure my dad pampers my mum all the time - but they both do, to show how much they cherish each other. I guess what I'm trying to say is daughters grow up learning about relationships in many ways. How dads treat their daughters isn't worth more than what they try to teach them as they are raised. If good influences and intentions are there, I don't see your proposed implications. A father coddling his daughter is a father showering his daughter with the love she needs and deserves, it's not necessarily a gateway to what you are suggesting.
Not everybody is that fanatical that they are willing to show up somewhere just to shout at people they don't like. I'm pretty sure that's the kind of behavior most of us look down upon. An unwillingness to do what you suggest is a good thing.  Fighting fire with fire is not how a society should be expected to be run.
Diva cup! Not that I use one because I'm afraid of dislodging my IUD, but reusable definitely lowers your costs.
Obviously my family's rule won't work for everyone. But it is nice for when one does the majority of the cooking. If we didn't have our arrangement, I'd never get to relax around mealtime. Though my parents both cook pretty elaborate meals, so the cook/clean rule ends up being pretty equal for them.  I also always saw it as a little extra way of saying, "Thanks for the meal."
I enjoyed it, but I didn't have an orgasm. 
Not "sexual hang-ups" but still "hang-ups about sex". The fantasy is that you don't have to be responsible for your actions. You don't have to justify why you let that guy have sex with you. You don't have to feel any guilt afterwards (since in America, sex is often portrayed by culture crusaders as very dirty and unnatural). It's also know that you are so sexually attractive that your partner couldn't resist you. Some women may even get off on the powerlessness of the whole ordeal. But I would be willing to wager that women's rape fantasies and men's "I wish some hot chick would just wander into my room and start blowing me for no good reason" fantasies are born out of the same place, psychologically.
[deleted]
Yep. I didn't know it was "supposed" to hurt. My first time was painless and boring.
Except once again I'm not victim blaming because there was no victim because it's arguing that it isn't a crime, no crime, no victim. So you can't use that argument here because that's the equivalent of already assuming you are right.   I'm sorry but until taking advantage of people is a crime just saying they took advantage does not make it rape. People get taken advantage of every day. But it's okay to "victim blame" those people because it's not sex.  You basically have an opinion you aren't even considering might be wrong. I can at least admit it's in a moral grey area and it's not fine and dandy to take advantage of people who make poor decisions.   
Excellent points. Thank you mentioning that.
Just out of curiosity, would you feel the same if it were your mother calling you "my little girl"? I'm 24 and my mother still does it, she also calls my brother "my little boy." I think it's just something that parents do.
[deleted]
I like her idea of starting the letter with a positive. "look at all the shit I did. I'm agreeing to the rules! I cleaned, vacated, etc" You can even say that you fixed all of the problems that you created and add in, later, that she created those holes. The way your letter reads is an outright attack. This way, if you have to go to court, and this letter is read, it has a list of everything you did to keep the peace. You're the reasonable one.   Edit to add: not that it shouldn't be an attack, just that you should seriously consider using this letter to list how you did follow all of the rules except for those holes. 
Is there a dog park near you? You could take your pups out for a run around off-leash, and perhaps meet some other dog lovers. 
This was his response last night, eventually: "Fine, we'll just buy an expensive alarm system." "Perfect."   This really isn't reflective of our overall communication style. Really not our finest moments.
Yeah, the alarm thing isn't a big deal, but wow, that rape comment. I just can't comprehend the thought process behind that.
I know exactly two phone numbers. My cell and my home. I can't remember any others at all. I don't even have my parent's memorized. I don't think it's a big deal. 
"No" means "no." "Stop" means "stop."   There are some women who like to assume a submissive role, but it makes me feel sick that you would assume that we all do, that our words are meaningless, that we want it regardless of what we're telling you. "It was painful enough that I begged him to stop," in this sub especially, is not an invitation for you to condescendingly explain why she is wrong in her recounting of her own experience.
This is an excellent point. I'm not going to be a father for a few more years at least but I am really glad you brought this up. I already sort of had this sort of thinking in my head..
I will say if you do feel like using adjectives like cute just use them consistently and they won't only associate it with girls looks. If a boy is cute I would say it... Or a bird or an adult. I also use cute as a form of I love you. If I exclaim about how cute someone is I'm saying that the way they act is pleasing to me. And I let them know that is the sentiment behind my phrase. Just explain things clearly and let them know exactly what qualities you appreciate about them (responsibility, hard work, ability, creativity, kindness, patience, virtue, and maybe even adorable ness) and they'll see your respect for them.  I often tell the people in my life how cite they are regardless of gender... You should see how the guys react at first but quickly they learn that it means I love you. And since I tell them in plain words all the other reasons they are awesome they like it.
Or, you know, just not harass people.  This is, however, a clear case of sexual harassment on a large scale.
I would agree if we were talking about people who had something to say. But we've all already heard their message, and we're perfectly aware of what they think. At this point, the protests are nothing more than spewing hate.  You have a right to be heard, not a right to monopolize the stage. And buffer zones are just there to ensure they don't do that.
I am in a very similar situation since I moved. I have met some people at the gym, but since I use mainly free weights, most of the people I meet are men.   Feel free to PM me if you want an Internet friend! 
I know so many people because of my dog. The dog isn't a human replacement. They are just a way to get random people to talk to you. I'm out of the house because of the dog and people stop to say hello and chat.   
I started jujitsu when I was accepted into a university in London. I'm from a small town and I figured that if anything bad were to happen, I was ill equipped to deal with it. The first thing we were taught was to go for the eyes! I think that you should stress the practical nature of what they are learning, and that it needs to be second nature.   As for motivating, I found that I was more motivated when I'd had a bad day at school. Maybe tell them to try to channel their stress and frustrations into the classes? It worked wonders for me =)
You might consider Meetup.org and looking at your local library's programming.  Volunteering is also a good way to meet people, though I find there's more bonding if the activity is related to physical labor.  
This is so true! I once had an argument with him about a hypothetical baby. It was about 7 minutes of insane before I realized our mistake.
I think most people tend to forget, or don't realize, that Planned Parenthood (and many other women clinics) are not abortion factories. They do more than just abortions. I have known people who went to PP for abortions. They make sure you know all of your options and their consequences. They are also really big on preventing stds and unwanted pregnancies before they happen.   If she wants to have a meaningful and *consensual* conversation, then it needs to be done before they day of the abortion. I like the other person's idea of getting in touch with PP and offering to be a resource. Maybe even gain their trust by helping to combat the protestors.
It's literally in the acronym. If you've spent any time in the BDSM community you'd know it's about power exchange. I feel like your idea of BDSM isn't exactly what most people who are in the lifestyle consider it.  The word domination implies power exchange.
Um. Why the fuck are you attacking me? Your comment isn't appropriate for this particular comment thread at all. 
I've actually made a few friends of both genders from meetme.com, but this is very regional.  Some regions use meetme as NOTHING more than a hookup/fuckbuddy central, some are primarily 20-something chatrooms, but others are good places to meet people your age.
There is a difference between men and teenage boys on hormone overdrive.  Other than that, I think I agree with what you are trying to say.
The closest clinic to my area is a state away (a good 3 hours one way) which means abortion becomes a commodity the poor cannot afford. This is especially distressing as statistically lower income communities are more likely to have[ less sex education](http://www.siecus.org/index.cfm?fuseaction=Feature.showFeature&amp;featureID=1041) and as a result more unwanted or unplanned pregnancies. More kids at a younger age means the cycle of poverty continues.
Is she interested in journaling or anything? I started doing that sort of thing around her age actually, filling unlined pages with diary entries and drawings and taped in concert ticket stubs. I always compared it to therapeutic scrapbooking.  This isn't a blank notebook, but I think she may enjoy it: http://www.amazon.com/Wreck-This-Journal-Black-Expanded/dp/0399161945
That is the most ironic thing I've ever heard in my entire life. "These girls are murderers! Let's kill everyone involved" The fuck? Who thinks like that? And no, I don't think abortion is murder.
I'm sorry, maybe I should have clarified. I wasn't saying PP should explain the reasons why some people think abortion is wrong (there's about a snowball's chance in hell of that happening, anyway). I just meant that, if they were telling patients in advance about the people outside, they might explain that some of them might want discuss the morality of abortion and that the woman could do so if she wanted to. Plenty of women have moral concerns they might want to discuss (assuming they don't feel threatened by the other person).  You termed pregnancy a "private issue," but the thing is, many people don't consider it to be, any more than killing a born child or depriving them of nutrients and oxygen. I think that an unborn human being has the same fundamental rights as a newborn, just as a newborn has the same fundamental rights as a 10 or 20 year old, despite huge differences in their level of development and mental/physical abilities. But human rights aren't subjective; your rights don't hinge on whether or not other people decide you have them. Either abortion kills a human person with full human rights, or it doesn't. It's not just a matter of opinion.   But anyway-a lot of informed consent involves giving accurate information about fetal development, which I don't consider in the least invasive or wrong. I understand the beef with waiting periods, but it IS a difficult decision that should be thought through after getting that information. I don't consider abortion to be justified unless analogous circumstances would also justify killing a human of any other age (a newborn, for instance), but if that does happen and a woman is made to feel even more horrible, then that is incredibly unfortunate and I am honestly so sorry for what she goes through. In defense of the counselors who might inadvertently make a woman in that situation feel worse, the VAST majority of abortions do not fall into such a category, and there's no way to screen mothers walking into a clinic before you start talking to them.   I know of many instances of PP (and other abortion clinics) giving misleading or one-sided information, pressuring or coercing women, etc. Not saying that always happens, but it certainly can.   For instance this woman who didn't get to see her ultrasound http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=k_b17lo5AtA   Or this video where the clinic counselor tells a 23 week pregnant woman that her unborn child "doesn't even look like a baby." (Never mind that babies have survived birth before 23 weeks.)  http://www.liveaction.org/inhuman/what-is-human-video/
The results mean absolutely nothing in real life. If the study went on fifteen years and showed where those girls are then, this study would carry some weight. As it stands now it is merely hypothesis. Or like I said- a study of what adolescents think about their dad doing the dishes.
[deleted]
I speak anecdotally as a male who has helped fulfill many domination/rape fantasies for women over the years. Admittedly, I am a sadist and enjoy the act. I also put a lot of time into the arrangement, setup, location, scenery and discuss things beforehand at great length. I would agree that about 50% of women have a rape/domination fantasy they will speak about with someone they trust deeply. It is amazing how it actually comes in up casual conversation, when discussing regular matters about relationships, and you start to peer into issues like control, pain and guilt. Many women have very specific fantasies involving rape or gang rape that they do not actually want to be a part of, but the mind tends to run to an extreme in these situations. What I prefer to do, is really understand a woman at her core, figure out where her fantasies are heading, figure out where the extreme is and then scale it back a bit. The most depraved thing women conjure in their minds is often not something they wish to be a part of, but it likely has some basis in a less extreme activity that they would enjoy.   Most noticeably, there is a spectrum. I see the desire to be dominated/raped as a spectrum of desires and I continue to use the dual moniker to describe it for that reason. For some women, simple domination techniques are enough to take them out of their comfort zone. Restraints, light whipping, body manipulation, hair pulling, etc. For others, it is more extreme activities that they are looking for. Lengthy sessions, suspension by wrists and ankles, paddling, caning, clamps, sensory deprivation and humiliation. Often times none of this is related to sex in any way. Many times, acts that some may think are not sexual in nature are in fact very erotic and add just the right element to the scenario to take it over the edge of, "Something I've done before", to "I've never done anything like that and did not think it would turn me on, but damn it did." Humiliation tends to fit this category. The most turned on I've ever seen a partner was when she was locked in a large dog cage being urinated on from outside the cage. Still, in what could be described only as the most submissive role she may have ever encountered, she is in control, and that is the duality of the situation that I find is so often overlooked.  The person with the whip, is not the person in control. They are the slave. When I have someone hanging from my ceiling, I am not in control. They are. If they do not believe that, then they are factually being raped. They must have the trust and faith in me, that at a split second, I will make it end, at their command. They are the ultimate arbiter of what goes on, and how far it goes. With a specific rape fantasy, the fantasy is mostly planned out. Methodical with a few surprises. It has to be because the act is not going to stop once it starts going. But still, in that scenario, the women are aware that the scenario will have its limits. No one is going to die at the end. No one is going to be left out in a field to starve while bound by the wrist for the next week. There is a safety in saying, "No, I am not in control, but it is still all an act and this will be over soon and we will lay next to one another and cuddle at the end." A real rape is a unknown. Variables are not controlled. In fantasy situations, all things are controlled, and usually predetermined, or they should be.   Still, the most important aspect is convincing the woman that she is the one who is actually in control. I'll ask her if she wants to push her limits or test her tolerances. I will remind her that she can make this stop at any time. In a rape scenario, the language is brutal and I don't ask questions, because the questions have already been answered beforehand. This may all sound very clinical but in the setting, the discussion is the most sensual experience. Probably because it seeds the imagination with possibility and we can start to look at the real fantasies and thoughts they might have. Often times I hear religious overtones, father or parental issues, or work issues brought up. Feelings of wanting to be used and tossed around, dismissed as a person, humiliated, have all come up many times during my pre-encounter discussions. None of these fantasies surprise or disturb me, and my attitude towards it is that allowing women to live their fantasies without fear or reprisal, without judgment, without shame or embarrassment, makes them stronger, once they understand that they are the one who is factually in control. I've seen first hand, the liberating effect giving a woman her ability to control her own sexuality back, can do. It not only affects her private life, but her public life as well. They are legitimately more confident around men, more confident at work. More confident as a mother or wife. It is because of the change in perspective as to who is actually in control. It allows them to take back something they may feel had been taking away from them. Choice. 
I agree...being submissive doesn't mean you don't have the power.  Communication is key...but if your partner doesn't listen, then he isn't right for you
I recently discovered BB cream, and my life changed. Before I was struggling with getting an even base with moisturiser and then foundation and concealer. Now I just dot on one product and mash it around my face.   Then take a little blush and grin, circling it onto the biggest points of your cheeks. Smear the now-empty brush into your eye sockets, and wipe it along the sides of your nose and face. If you're feeling brave swoosh some mascara on.   Makeup in under 3 minutes, and it looks totally natural.   I have no idea on clothes. My boyfriend started buying them for me, I'm that bad. But apparently try to make a slim waist and wider hips and shoulders, cover anything that could be deemed sexual (cleavage, bra straps, knees, anything in between) and you're good to go. 
[deleted]
Goes to show that context is important. I'm sorry you don't understand that.
Yeah, I'm not a fan of promoting anyone's company or product, but I had to share this. I'm going to ask my sisters and brother [2 teens and a kid] to "run like a girl" and then show them the video. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
it happens to me too. Lately i'm putting a lot of effort on looking always great and grown up.. i'm 23 years old and I cringe thinking about how childish I looked last year... but it's hard, and it takes time.   but to get good on using make up is not that hard, you can get a basic look in five minutes and you don't many things. the most important things are foundation, concelear, liquid eyeliner, mascara and the easiest eyeshadow to use is brown, have a palette with different tones of brown and you can get a very nice look in which is hard to fuck up because is so natural. Even if you put the wrong colour in the wrong place almost nobody will notice. and practice makes perfect :D
Those are all good ideas, and a lot of people do just that. I don't actually sidewalk counsel, I just know people who do. I'm in a pro-life group that does community baby showers to raise supplies for local parents, offers a scholarship to a student mother, etc. We do some advertising for local resource centers and want to do more large scale stuff, but haven't gotten there yet. (We're poor and have been pretty busy.)  But, as I've said elsewhere, many women have testified that they were hoping for other options even when they were walking into the clinic (and practical support choosing them, not just "oh and by the way you could try parenting or adoption. Good luck."), or that that were happy to be offered help outside the clinic and walk away from their appointment.   I really don't consider abortion a private decision though, as it ends the life of another human being.   And unfortunately, I don't think reasonable or helpful people leaving the sidewalks would do anything to discourage the lunatics. It would just leave them behind, and solidify the "anti-choicers on the sidewalk are vicious misogynists" idea. And the presence on the sidewalk would be more intimidating and less loving, and abortions would go up because the women wouldn't be being offered help there.
I am answering your question along with your context.  Your question is not "what is universally and objectively fair" (that doesn't exist).  You are asking "how do I respond if my partner is taking me for granted?"     That is a personal response question, not a question about labor quotas that you can apply to other people.  You can only control yourself.  You can give other people the option of including your perspective by sharing it with them, but you can't _force_ someone to consider your needs in their decision-making.  If they're not considering your needs and sacrifices... it ain't gonna be happily ever after.   Love isn't about fair.  Partnership isn't even about fair.  You just decide whether or not what's required of you is worth what you're getting in return.  If you're unhappy, it isn't getting better, and you stay, **that's your choice.**  It's a conscious decision you're making to make a life with someone that doesn't prioritize your happiness; you can try to shift the responsibility for that choice elsewhere, but it isn't sustainable long-term.   If you want a happy relationship, some universal "fair" is not what it will be based around.  It might be based upon the "fair" that you and your partner agree upon, but that is not an answer you can receive from anyone here.  If being taken for granted is a recurring problem for you, don't spend your effort trying to "correct" it in other people.  Spend your effort learning to better vocalize your sacrifices and needs, and to identify the behavior in other people early on, so that you can always make a conscious choice about exactly how unhappy you want to be. ;)
Thank you so much for your insight.  I watched the video, very well explained.  I think I realize where my father and I separated on issues exactly.  While I agree that full coverings come from a dark place, I can't generalize the female population as choosing out of fear, only because I'm not a part of the community and I am not exposed often enough to be able to make that sort of statement.  
Sure.    A typical genetic counseling session usually entails:  1) reviewing a person's risk factors,   2) personal and/or family history of cancer,   3) basics of genetics &amp; how cancers can run in families,   4) genes being considered to test and associated cancer risks and what the screening options may be if someone carries a cancer gene mutation  5) if testing is appropriate  6) what tests are available  7) explanation of testing process (insurance authorization process),  8) possible results (positive, negative, inconclusive), as well as   9) benefits, risks, and limitations of testing.    Typically the appointments take 30-90 minutes, depending on the set-up of the clinic.     Some patients expect for me to tell them whether or not to have testing, but the truth is that I am there to provide the information to help patients decide whether or not testing is appropriate for them, when medically necessary. We make no commission on how many tests we order.    Examples of family history forms and/or what to expect:    [MD Anderson](http://www.mdanderson.org/publications/focused-on-health/issues/2010-november/ccg-genriskassqx-eng.pdf)  [Emory](http://genetics.emory.edu/docs/Womens%20Health%20Fam%20Hx%20Questionnaire.pdf)  [Cleveland Clinic](http://my.clevelandclinic.org/genomics-genetics/subspecialties/cancer-genetics.aspx)  [Memorial Sloan-Kettering](http://www.mskcc.org/cancer-care/hereditary-genetics/genetic-testing-counseling-msk)
Best of luck, whichever your path may be!
I think there probably are some issues with him not understanding your bisexuality here. A good friend of mine who's bi said she often had issues with guys she would date saying, "Yeah, I don't care if you cheat on me with another girl, that's hot! Hur dur." It always ticked her off. Basically it sounds to me like he's one of those: Dating a bisexual chick means we can check out boobs together and it's all good!  But he's wrong. You've told him how you feel about this and he isn't regarding your feelings. If he can't respect you enough to take seriously an issue that is important to you, then he's not worth your time.  Personally, I would explain it to him in those terms (i.e. it's about respecting you and your feelings, and those are separate from your sexuality); if he is just being naive rather than malicious, he deserves a chance to learn from his mistakes. But if he gets the point and still can't get his act together then, "Welcome to Dumpsville. Population, you."
This might be a bit off topic, but I highly recommend [The Guide to Getting It On](http://www.amazon.com/Guide-Getting-Book-About-Wonders/dp/1885535759/ref=pd_sim_b_2?ie=UTF8&amp;refRID=0YABV5HHNQVKJ1BT0TCK) as the best sex instructional book.  It covers everything from anatomy to losing your virginity to sex in ususual circumstances like disabilities.  Very matter-of-fact.  Line drawings, no photographs.  I plan to leave my copy in just conspicuous enough locations that my kids will find it and read it if they want to (and what puberty ridden kid doesn't want to read about sex?)  I had a good friend who would buy this book and just leave it on the family bookshelf.  When she was raising her three boys through the teenage years she had 7 copies of the book stolen while they had friends over.  She considered it a public service.    [Here are some free chapters](http://www.goofyfootpress.com/book/Chapters/)
That's ridiculous!  The first amendment guarantees the right to free speech, not the right to an audience.   You done fucked up SCOTUS.  
It really isn't your business, though. Unless someone voluntarily reaches out to you, then it isn't. I think anti-choice people would get a lot further if they understood that. 
You do have a right to not be harassed, otherwise harassment would not be illegal.  
You know, you already proved that you're incapable of actually having a conversation about these issues when you made a joke belittling the historical beating of women. If I had done something similar, directed at men, you would surely have run off crying to some men's support group about all those scary castrating feminists. You can't even recognize your own hypocrisy.  So, I'll leave you with this.  If you don't want to pay for your ex-wife and the kids you made with her, don't get married, and don't have kids.
Freedom of speech does not entail a right to an audience. 
Safety is endangered upon assault or battery, for which the law already provides sufficient recourse.    But by all means, let's create another protected class in this country.  Just let me out. 
Really good point. And while it was purposeful (he told me he hated the alarms and thought they were dumb), I don't think he understood exactly the message he was sending. Hard to rationalize with an angry scared wife though.
I don't see the connection, but then again I know a fair number of women who really like watching sports (I just don't get the appeal myself is all) so maybe I'm just sitting on the end of a bell curve.
If you don't mind me asking, could I see some of your work? 
Yes! This is an excellent book. If I ever have children, I will do exactly that.
[deleted]
I don't agree if anything the buffer zone weeded out the polite, caring protesters and left the hateful, shouting ones. The people who pass out pamphlets and have kind words lie McCullen herself couldn't do so anymore. While the assholes with pictures of dead fetuses, that shout "whore" still could. It was a terrible law and most pro-choice people are glad to see its gone.
[deleted]
Most of them are just complaints about how other people are douchebags, atleast in their eyes.
Someone who thinks that they are more intelligent than they actually are. 
Mmhm. I hear yah. I went through very similar things when I was dumped by my ex. But even when you're not in a defined "relationship", and are not technicaly "dumped", the feelings are the same. It's an acute depression where you're essentially mourning the loss of a person. Not just that, but you're mourning an *ideal*, mourning all that was and could have been.  I'm sorry, this is always such a shitty situation. And it's even worse since it's your first, so you have no metric or basis for comparison! All I have to say is, it gets better. And experiencing the extremes of sad emotions actually makes you a stronger, more thoughtful person in the end.   It gets better. 
Fyi, go for the tutorial at MAC. BUT!! If the MAC rep tells you you're required to purchase X number of products, politely inform them that this is illegal in most US states.  If its really great, by all means, buy the items you want, but don't get trapped by MACs strongarm sales tactics.  Sephora is really amazing about providing you free samples a m d technique lessons. Since you're new, get a few light foundation samples and try out each for a whole day in different lighting. Makeup stores have emgineered lighting to make everyone look amazing. However, your lighting changes in your daily life all the time. So take your new look for a meaningful spin before committing serious $$.
[deleted]
This is very true. Guys do tend to have the instict to protect and fight more cultivated. I am a lot less willing to fight. If physical violence can be avoided, I will do my best to avoid it. I do worry about my husband in a violent situation. I would very much want to protect him, and not the other way around. 
The comment is definitely something that's appropriate to discuss with him, I didn't mean it like that, just that here in this short post it may be distracting. He also should have told you about the problems with the alarms, though that's probably just a small communication issue, I'm just saying now that you know, don't keep them and if he doesn't want to put them back up there are some good reasons why.
See now THAT is a good message to kids!  I like your name.
Not a lot of replies, shocking.
Most definitely "too hot to handle". My bad. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
No, it does not... you're exactly right.
If you have time and transportation and believe in it, you can be a driver.  If you don't and have money, you can contribute. But for most this isn't a thing until it happens to them or someone they care about, so for now looks like the vocal minority will be king for some time.
Laundry basket(s), hangers, shower curtain and hooks, garbage can for your bathroom, dishcloths/rags, flashlight and batteries and/or candles for emergencies, extension cords, curtains/blinds, and the all important coffee maker. These are the things off the top of my head that I forgot when I first moved out. Enjoy your new home, making a space your own is super exciting and rewarding! 
First of these are your own implications. Secondly "healing" implies a wound i.e damage that you heal from, which also implies less value by *your* standards. Objectification/dehuminization? Depends on how you look at it, but it's interesting that you are so quick to decry the former and not the latter considering how thin and semantic the distinction is. In any case, you seem to be missing the point that I was not characterizing the rape victim but that *view* of the rape victim. You are defending that view not the victim.
[deleted]
This study was posted here last week, and 5 minutes ago.
That is the common connotation in damaged goods, trying to deny that is a little absurd. Having a wound does not imply less value. Please stop.  &gt;In any case, you seem to be missing the point that I was not characterizing the rape victim but that view of the rape victim.  "Difficult healing process" is not a view of the rape victim, it is a fact. "Damaged goods" is a view. You are the one attempting to conflate the two.
[deleted]
I am not trying to deny "damaged goods" has negative connotations. You are trying to deny that leaving someone because they were raped has negative connotations.   You are also disingenuously presenting this as  "difficult healing process". Difficult healing process for whom? The one who was actually raped, or the partner who can't deal with it?   
Oil changes on a Jetta aren't as cheap as your average Honda or Toyota. Always costs my SO $60 unless we have a groupon. 
Go to marshalls/tj maxx and get the good stuff. I got a big nonstick T-fal skillet for 12 bucks. It works just as wonderfully as the day I bought it 4 years ago.
Awesome, way to go! 
Other than personal hygiene items, basic pots, pans and dishes, cleaning supplies (something to clean your dishes, clothing, floors and to dust with), powerstrips (no such things as too many), and a plunger, acquire things as you need them. Bug and mouse preventatives might be a good idea too.  It'll keep you from carting around things you never use. My best friend has been moving with an ironing board for 10 years, it's been across country twice, still in the wrapping. The fewer things you have, the fewer things you have to clean and move the next time. 
I'm sorry if I reposted. I never saw it. Could you give a link?
If women have an idea that only unattractive and unsociable geeky women study STEM, then it's not simply a lack of interest in those fields that keep women from entering them, it's the social and cultural stigma. And when people in positions of authority (professors, employers, etc.) hold those same biases, then it's not surprising that women feel disenfranchised when their appearance is being counted against them. Attractive women often have their contributions and insights minimized because of the belief that one can't be attractive and intelligent. Unattractive women often are ignored because they are unattractive. Neither of those things are lack of interest, but being subjected to scrutiny because of subjective notions of attractiveness certainly turn women away from STEM fields.
You're wrong that having a successful women's soccer team means that the US cares about soccer. Because the sad truth is that so few people care about women's soccer that a professional women's soccer league didn't last for more than 3 seasons. This is something that I truly hope changes (and I think that both men and women's soccer is getting a lot more attention in the US, which is awesome), because I had season passes for all 3 seasons and absolutely loved watching them play, but just because our women are great at soccer doesn't mean that the US cares about women's soccer.
No one would care if they fought this hard to save children in Africa. If they really cared about saving children, they could go save children, and not harass women seeking abortions. What do they think they're going to do anyway? 
[deleted]
A.) Don't tell me I'm wrong for not handling situations in the same awful way you would.  B.) Refer to A.
&gt;"you should wear this instead because what you wear normally isn't good enough."  Is it ok to admit that this is probably true and I trust her judgement? I mean, she trusts my judgement on many things and snappy dressing isn't the only thing I seek her counsel for. I sort of think of it like she's got my back for this particular thin and many others.  After all, she's the one appreciating my looks, so I don't mind when she picks out things that she thinks I'll look good in. I suppose this might be more of a problem if I was the sort of person who expresses his individuality through his choices of clothing but I'm not.  As long as I don't look embarassing I'm happy, and I'm glad for the help :).
&gt;Don't fathers realize the PROFOUND role they have in forming women's view of men and how comfortable they are with their own sexuality? Do they consider how the message they're sending is actually received by young women?   No. 
Definitely see a pro. I have had a few waxes done at European Wax centers and never had a bad experience. The estheticians were very clean and professional and took time to explain things like why I needed to hike a leg up a certain way and aftercare thoroughly. The wax hurt a lot less than I expected. I've never had a wax elsewhere, so I can't really vouch for it being due to the type of wax they use.   Anecdotally, it hurts more if you wax the week or so before your period. The esthetician I had at that session mentioned she'd noticed the same trend--several of her customers had noticed the same trend. Good luck!
some of those frustrate me.   one of hte few problems we've had in our marriage is my wife having difficulty exploring her sexuality or helping me to help her get off--because her mother taught her from a young age that  such things were dirty. Ugh.  I like sex. I want my awesome spouse to like sex as much as possible (for both selfish and altruistic reasons).    6 was fucking spot on and it pisses me off royally    9 is off though; most guys I knew in HS didn't *ever* talk about jacking it and would deny it if asked.
1. Many hospitals are religious. 20% of U.S. hospital beds are religiously-affiliated.  2. Strongarming by religious groups in the form of legal threats. Most likely protest threats as well. Hospitals don't want any controversy, and having people shoving giant, gruesome color posters of gore in everyone's face as they walk to the front door would be bad for business.  3. Strongarming by religious groups in the form of bribery/blackmail. Combined with greedy hospital admins. See the 1974 agreement of one hospital to stop teaching or performing abortions forever in exchange for renovation funding in my post history. 
Maybe because you in particular are really harping on this person? You think it's a weird word, you think it's weird that the kids might be able to talk to their parents about sex.  We get it.  You must have like 10 comments in this thread basically repeating those things.  Gee I wonder why he's maybe getting annoyed with you. 
Of course not, I support men's services. Im just noting why people in general seem more concerned about violence against women, it tends to be more severe and therefore garners more attention. 
I'm currently waiting for my BRCA test results. My father has the defective gene.  My follow-up appointment is on Thursday, but if it were a negative test, would they call me to tell me and cancel the appointment? Or will they have me go in either way? What do you do?  Anyway, no worries if you can't answer that one. Should the test be positive, what kind of implications should I be expecting? I'm 23, and trying to be prepared for whatever I hear.  Also, is there any link between the type of cancer (triple negative, for example) and the BRCA defect?  Why or why not?  Thanks for doing this AMA, it certainly caught me at the right time. 
[deleted]
i have to second this, but there are other ways to go about opening a can.   found out my fiance didn't have a can opener when i first moved in. you can rub the edge of a can on a rough brick (most any brick) and then pry it open with a blunt knife or a flat head screwdriver.   
1) Admittedly, I am a nerd and have been fascinated by genetics since I was 10 years old.  2) I grew up around many people with different types of genetic syndromes, so it just seemed normal to me.   3) I thought that I wanted to work in a lab, but I really like interacting with people. This is one area of genetics where I feel that I can directly impact patient lives.  Favorite: helping families, being treated as an equally important healthcare provider, cutting-edge field  Least favorite: dealing with health insurance policies whose criteria are sub-standard and/or not up to date, and other hospital politics
I do, but I guess just not quite to the same extent. On reddit for one, abeit biased to begin with, you see post after post about the "white girl uniform" as if guys aren't wearing the *same* north face and jeans.   On a much a greater scale though there is just simply a larger societal influence on how a woman *should* look or *should* dress, that men aren't faced with to the same level.  
Power bar.
I feel like the attitudes OP is mentioning have a lot to do with the equation of sex=love that is so ingrained in our culture.  I can't speak for male role models, as I only have a mother, but from a young age she made concerted efforts to show my younger brother and I that bodies and sexuality were nothing to be ashamed of so that by the time we were old enough to start dating we would be conscious of our own and other people's worth and be less prone to falling into the mentality of stereotyping.  What that did not prepare us for was the constant application of 'if you won't lay me, you don't love me' guilt line.  Personally I was pretty horrified. I never expected such tripe to come out of the mouth of someone who claimed to respect my very clearly and pre-established boundaries. I would much rather have been treated to the decency of an honest 'I'm really horny and I think you're really hot - let's have sex' than something inherently designed to invalidate someone's boundaries.  My point is that I believe that society's inhibitions towards accounting for lust with anything other than shame are damaging to everyone. Sex is almost never about love to begin with - that's not something people should be shamed for.
[deleted]
This might sound silly, but if you don't have a fridge/freezer already, try to choose  something with a decent amount of freezer space... When it's just me I found I end up with lots of leftovers and I don't eat them fast enough so they go bad and get thrown out. Now I freeze meal sized portions of leftovers for when I just can't be bothered to cook. Depends how much you cook though I guess.  Also a torch/flashlight. I have a really heavy Maglite next to my bed, i figure I can use it to hit an intruder if I ever need to, because the thing is like a club.  
I don't understand the one about clothes. I rarely see or hear a guy go "Oh my god dude look at her shoes." I don't think the guy cares. When clothing shopping I'm told we know nothing about fashion and here its like we're being blamed for pressuring women for something I have no idea about or even give much thought into.
Or, you know, a savings account?
Please tell me where anything is said about freedom of speech being equated to "effective discourse". Last time I checked the point was that you should be able to say what you like but *not* that you were guaranteed an audience.   People are all for the sweet innocent little old lady and miss that she was picked for this exact reason. She's the sweet covering hiding the garbage underneath. Nothing of value was lost with the buffer. They could still say what they liked, they just couldn't get up close and do their dirty manipulations. I don't know why people like you are so blind to the fact that this case was presented in the most sympathetic light possible by the same people who lead to the death of Doctor Tiller. 
America I'm assuming?  
[deleted]
See my comments further down about doing exactly this.
&gt;  I get so sick of seeing couples out, obviously on dates, where the girl has made so much effort, wearing fancy clothes, makeup, hair did, and the guy is just in shorts, t shirt and thongs or something.  So do you get mad that the guy hasn't made an effort to look nice for his date, or do you get mad that the woman has been forced by society to spend a huge amount of time and money on her appearance just to be accepted as normal?
I'm done with you.
Well the good news is he isn't singling you out. Is this guy religious? If so I'd speak with his local leader, they are more likely to act than the police unfortunately. 
That's fine with me. I really wasn't trying to drive anyone away or offend anybody though. 
If he's not around I will totally take care of it myself... by driving it straight to a Valvoline.
The point of my post was not to bring a smack down on the protected speech of anti-choice advocates. I'd sooner cut out my tongue.   However, you are absolutely incorrect that you can say anything you want to anyone at any time. There are many ways you may not legally speak to another person and many ways that your words can be found to be assault. Here are some examples:  Go send a letter to the Prez giving him your plan for his demise. Go find a woman in a supermarket, publically tell her she's a whore. Offer to rape your bus driver. Do any of those things in any combination, offer to rape the President, the Mayor, your rich neighbor, anyone who could afford to sue you. Let me know how it goes?   For extra credit: Go into a theater and shout FIRE
Didn't downvote you, but free speech also cannot be harassment:  &gt; harassment (either harris-meant or huh-rass-meant) n. the act of systematic and/or continued unwanted and annoying actions of one party or a group, including threats and demands
Yep. Which tube? Which gizmo? Which type of oil? What a mess!  It's just easier to learn about geodesics and covectors. You know, the fundamentals.
This would have a lot more meaning if the movies weren't spread out over time so much.  I mean...  &gt;Chicken Little, Aladdin, The Fox and the Hound, Pocahontas, Beauty and the Beast, The Emperor’s New Groove, The Great Mouse Detective, Ratatouille, Barnyard, Despicable Me, Cloudy With a Chance of Meatballs, and, this year, Mr. Peabody and Sherman. So many animated movies. Not a mother in sight.  That list alone takes you back to 1981.  If you include Snow White and Bambi like they did in the illustration, that's all the way to the 1930s.  And in some of those (Aladdin, Despicable Me, maybe a few others) the characters don't have *fathers* either.  This entire article seems like a stretch.
[deleted]
[deleted]
&gt; You've told him how you feel about this and he isn't regarding your feelings. If he can't respect you enough to take seriously an issue that is important to you, then he's not worth your time.  This. The 'why' doesn't matter. I'd give him one more good talking to about it and if it doesn't stop, I'd hit the road. He's not worth it. 
*like ew, a girl pleasuring themselves? that's so gross*  Said no straight man ever.
&gt;. I apologized, he apologized, we're buying an alarm system today.  You're overreacting. I think you have a miscommunication about the rape comment too. While not the most eloquent way Of putting it, he's not saying he'd be disgusted by you. He's trying to be sweet in his own way by saying he's always be worried about you in a way to affect his ability to feel sexual arousal (note: this opinion based solely on what you have said).   It sounds like you guys have vastly different senses of humor...  
[Secret Outlast Clear Unscented](http://www.amazon.com/Secret-Outlast-Antiperspirant-Deodorant-Unscented/dp/B00EP5F0EW/ref=sr_1_14?ie=UTF8&amp;qid=1404098545&amp;sr=8-14&amp;keywords=secret+deodorant+outlast)
I'm not comparing an unbolith to a hangnail, because OP didn't see an umbolith, she doesn't even know if she *did* see something to begin with. 
The extra cost only gets to be worth it if you literally won't have time to do it yourself.  If you have to wait weeks to do it yourself, it might be worth the extra money to get it done sooner 
[deleted]
abdominal bloating and pelvic floor pressure increasing to pain. that's it. it truly is a silent disease. early detection is key and ovarian cancer is very treatable in multiple stages. any doctor would be able to feel if there is a mass --similar to fundus during pregnancy.
[deleted]
Name calling? Is that really the best you can do? How sad for you.  You were asked for a citation and you gave out a crazy easily disproved statement. Don't be so sloppy next time, you wont get called out.  I'm happy with ALL my choices, thanks all the same.
I don't really have a "side" here, I honestly don't know what she's arguing against. Does the word "girl" instead of "boy" mean fragile? My little girl and my little boy are both awesome people- I don't see a difference except now she is taller than me so "my little girl" doesn't work as anything other than an affectionate joke.
[deleted]
Jesus. 15 bucks? It's like 40 here in canada
She has a decent amount of evidence, if she can find the rape kit that was done on her.   Regardless, keeping future victims safe is extremely important. In my opinion the emotional trauma from going through this isn't really on the same level as the amount of good she could do by reporting. This is especially true because of the time that has passed since the event. If anything, it is likely to give her a sense of closure, since she has done all that she could to bring the guy to justice.  I feel that too many women are encouraged to not report their cases because of the trauma. Would you encourage someone to leave a parent's murder case because of the trauma? That is arguably worse trauma, yet I never hear anyone talk about how *they* should consider the trauma.   Anyone who damages lives needs to be removed from the public. The people who know who it is have a responsibility to help everyone else.  Encouraging otherwise is encouraging the viewpoint of women as helpless victims. Women, just like any other person, can and should defend themselves, and defend others from the people that harm them.
What's the solution? As a man, I'm deeply troubled about this issue.  I understand "yes all women" logically, and while I can't empathize, I sympathize. I think that weekend was very troubling for everyone who heard about it.  My trouble is that the conversation that weekend taught me that "not all men" is an unacceptable mindset. I *think*, or maybe *hope*, that the backlash against "not all men" was because it was an inappropriate time to attempt to spread that message.  The comment above this one is a good example. The "yes all men" message casts an entire gender as villains, and creates a self-fulfilling prophecy that perpetuates acceptance of shitty behavior. The "not all men" message trivializes the experiences of women who feel endangered in our society.   So how do we fix it? Which message is appropriate? It's semantically binary.
I think you should look into forgiveness--but not the kind you're probably thinking. Forgiveness does NOT mean excusing that person for what they did, but rather accepting the past and not letting it hold any power over your emotions. [Here's a better explanation than I can give you.](http://www.mayoclinic.org/healthy-living/adult-health/in-depth/forgiveness/art-20047692)  I don't think there's a right or wrong way to approach this. You should do what you feel is right. I knew someone in a similar situation, but her grandfather died before she grew old enough to confront him. The last time we spoke about it, she wished she had been able to. That doesn't necessarily mean you need to feel the same way, of course...  For what it's worth, I'm sorry that you're forced to think about the past, and that the abuse happened in the first place. It wasn't your fault, and you didn't deserve it. I hope you're surrounded by people that tell you this often.
No doubt, unlike me and my lovely california climate I probably don't see too much of the benefits of syntheic; you get all that viscosity consistently goodness of synthetic.  
[deleted]
He's not telling you to keep it out of selflessness because a baby is an eighteen + year commitment. If he doesn't see himself having kids, then an accidental pregnancy is really going to change life as he knows it... he's not just having a kid early, he's having a kid that he doesn't want.   I think it's good of him to be honest in this situation, instead of pretending he'd be okay with keeping it and then becoming bitter and twisted and resenting you... the possible kid.   I've been on the pill since before I met my SO. Once we were 100% committed to each other we stopped using condoms as an extra safety measure and I told him point blank "if I accidentally get pregnant, I'm 90% sure I couldn't bring myself to get an abortion." and he was okay with that. (He's 30, I'm 23, we're planning on kids in the next few years anyway)   It's not very nice of him, but I think you should try to appreciate his honesty.
[deleted]
Here's a $10 coupon on the website http://www.planbonestep.com/coupon.aspx  in the meantime, borrow some money from your boyfriend. It's just as much his responsibility as it is yours.   As another comment said, plan B is WAY cheaper than pregnancy and a baby (or an abortion).
[deleted]
You want a response? Here's your response.  Every single one of these is based on experiences that there girls went through. Most of them are not made up, or jokes, but let's go through a couple of your points and see what we can point out.  4: really? So a song that was on the top 40s list for months is only for insecure girls ears? No. Everyone hears it.   12: you personally find female body hair unattractive? Well tough shit. If I don't shave my hooha or my legs for a week or two or a month or never, its not your decision because its not your fucking body. If I want to trim up or shave up to look nice, I will do it for myself, and whenever I damn well please. A girl is not your object, and you are not there to force on her how you want her to look.  24: ah, this is my favorite. The point is not about the first part of this comment. Read the second part. Have you EVER felt uncomfortable because someone was looking at you, getting closer to you, leering at you, and it made you feel weak and defenseless? Even though you have a knife in your pocket and over a decade of martial arts training? Get back to me on that one when you feel that way almost daily.  I just hit some of your points, but you should think about your responses just a bit...  Edit: formatting
Hey!  Look at you /u/bex1018!  You ARE 12 feet tall!    Look at what you can do!  You faced your fear, gathered up your wits, and straight up overcame it!  What are you gonna do next?!    Keep it up.  Your story made me smile.  
[deleted]
I think you need to reread my post because that's obviously not what's it's about.
I've heard similar decision were made with respect to perceived IQ when trying to be a police officer. High IQ means more questioning instead of following, more options outside of the typical work, etc.  You often hear about how affirmative action hires are less qualified than their ....ehem... "more qualified" counter parts. But when it comes to filling the janitor or receptionist position, do you hire the single guy with more options or do you go with the G.E.D. with two kids?   Though, in all probability the low number is less due to hiring issues than there simply being a low number to choose from to begin with.
A plea to all those posting in this thread.  A majority of these right to lifers, politicians and those who pressure the providers of these legal services (including birth control and sex education), belong to a political party other than democrat.  Please make sure you vote in the next election and get these people out of office and don't put more in.  PUT MORE WOMEN in office.  I have worked for these reproductive rights since the 1970s and to see that work eroded, is simply frightening.  And young women (I myself am menopausal), you MUST CARRY THE TORCH or you will find yourselves back to times such as before the 1970s and prior.  I didn't even know until recently that women's birth control was made LEGAL (not available, not insured) BUT LEGAL in the 1970s.  It was even covered by insurance until well after that.  Please please fight for women's rights, particularly pro-choice.  And important to note, where are these pro-lifers' outcry when child murderers are on trial (like Casey Anthony) and the pit of dead children at the Catholic establishment in Ireland was unearthed.  That's all I have to say for now.
I wouldn't say mine are jerks but they are a little self absorbed maybe. My grandpa just had eye surgery and my grandma is wheelchair bound so I've been taking care of both of them the best I can, so it kinda sucks that they're still being judgmental over someone who's done nothing but help them. It doesn't bother me too much I guess, it just seems a little unfair. I love them and respect that to some extent we're from different worlds, but it doesn't mean that it's not gonna aggravate me, even if it's just a little. 
I lost it at 20. That was perfect.
Helping my grandparents never makes them nicer.   me - hey pawpaw. let me help you out of your chair.  pawpaw - don't touch me! why don't you go do something useful like put another hole in your face.  me - Well I do have 50 bucks and I'm not doing anything important here.    Kodak Moments!
It seems to me that you don't have much support against your brother.   Who sounds like an excellent bully, who knows how to manipulate the family.  It's time to get creative and plan an exit strategy.    Is it possible to go to school part time and to find a job on campus?  I took a semester off in my third year of university.  I need the break to refresh myself mentally and I have never regretted it.  Perhaps you can do the same?  It's ok to put something on hold for a bit.  Especially if you find yourself getting overwhelmed.  Take some time to plan a move.  Either find a shared apartment with one person or a room on campus.  I don't know what room mate issue you had, but an older grad student or a working person might be a better fit?  Even see if you can find a place on your own you can afford.     Your mom really has no reason to be upset young people leave home it's just natural.  With your brother acting like an arsehole she may understand as well.  I wish you the best! 
Nobody is forcing you to read this, let alone upvote or comment. Please leave.
As distinct from "Trans", is the salient point.
Wow. That wounded me real deep.
Maybe cuz traditionally women aren't taught that skill (routine maintenance of vehicles)? Luckily I grew up with a father who wanted me to succeed in life and not rely on a man to do something I could do myself.  
[deleted]
I think a lot of parents aren't very good at conveying to kids that they should do something when they are *alone*, so they just say 'don't do that' without any explanation. So I can see where the shame comments are coming in. That and there are definitely parents who aren't religious fundamentalists who don't approve of masturbation.
[deleted]
I agree with everything you said except for the part where if she thinks he's cute then she likes him. It really depends on the context but I've had plenty of friends who just called me cute and neither of us were actually romantically attracted to the other. However that compliment generally can be a cue to start flirting to test the waters. You just gotta be careful when a girl calls you cute, had a lot of friends who over thought that compliment lol.
Also less significantly, that line in the Taylor Swift song is meant to be self-deprecating, not intolerant of other girls.
You're right, I haven't. Well, not really, anyway. However, I'd like you to consider a couple of things.  First, I have a mindset that does not allow me to become fat in the first place. I've been to over 100kg and back to 88kg now. Nothing to speak of, but I did put a stop to my bad habits and taken on a few good ones long before things got out of hand. Maybe people that have a mindset that allows them to get fat in the first place - whether they have lost it afterwards or not - are not the ones to look to for advice. In other words: circlejerking about 'fat haters' is not going to get you anywhere.  Second, people's individual stories do not contradict the general principle: most fat people are fat when there's no real reason to be. I'd think accidentally fat people would be even more hostile towards the careless ones, since they are the root of the problem: they changed the public's attitude toward fat people from "that's unfortunate for that person" to "they deserve to be mocked for being lazy fucks".  Third, ignoring the rules for many years - to stay with that simplification - is not forgotten the moment they show up at the gym. The disregard for the rules is proportionate to the severity of the problem. You got to pay your dues and lose all of it before you're accepted back into society again. And as I said, it takes much longer to become really fat, than to lose it again, if you put you mind to it.
nobody said high tech
For cooking, a few pots and pans and plates are good.  bottle and can openers are always great.  But if you want to cook really good meals quickly and easily, nothing beats a small food processor.  You can pick up a mini one for about 40 bucks at Target and it makes food prep for salads, soups, salsas, and any other cooking that demands lots of prep super fast and easy.  You will not regret it if you really plan to cook at home.
You also have to remember that there's a difference between fantasising about something and doing it! In a fantasy you still control everything despite the "illusion" that you don't. 
Whether they're legally people doesn't change whether or not they are people in actuality. Numerous groups of human beings have been declared non-persons throughout history, but that didn't change the fact that they were still people. When a group is inconvenient, different, hard to empathize with, or easily exploitable, we have a bad habit of assuming that they are morally inferior, so that we can justify killing or enslaving or exploiting them. Each time we were absolutely convinced that we were right. So far, we never have been.   "...just that you should be respectful of others when offering it." I totally agree! And I apologize on behalf of those who are not.
I wear a lot if black for work and I find that when I put this on, then let it dry, then out my clothes on, there are white marks... Like the clear dries to a powder or something and rubs off on my clothes.
&gt; our take home is well worth the work.  Screw that. I work to live, I don't live to work. I want time out to see friends and family, to spend time with my horse and generally do all the stupid little projects I want to do.  I pity people who see a large wage as the most important thing in life. I have enough to get by, so I'm happy.
Try and talk to people in your classes.  You already have something to chat about, and if you get along you can start talking about other stuff.  There's also likely to be several groups on campus that are related to your interests.  My freshman year I joined the Pirate club, which was less a club about pirates and more a way for people who'd think joining a club about pirates would be fun to meet each other.  If you go, even if you're too shy to initiate contact, chances are someone else will initiate it for you.  If you're going to be living in a dorm with a roommate, here are a couple tips.  First, make sure you have a wine key.  Second, try and let as much go as possible.  No matter how accommodating, your roommate will do things that bug you, or inconvenience you, and it sucks.  I'm not saying lie back and think of England, but just to ask yourself whether or not a particular annoyance is worth bringing up.  Is your roommate's part of the room messy while you like things tidy?  Maybe let that one go.  Is it messy with moldy, rotten food?  Probably say something.  Roommate stays up late and you don't?  You'll adjust.  Roommate listens to loud music into the night?  Ask them to use headphones.  If there's a problem that needs addressing, though, address it.  Don't let it fester.  I find the best way to go about these kind of things is to open with "Hey, could you...", and be prepared to compromise rather than getting everything you want.  Dorm living is tough, especially for the first few weeks, but once you adjust (and you will), it can be great.
&gt; Imagine trying to walk into a building, trying to get a medical treatment – and someone screams at you. Someone is two inches from your face – two feet from the front door – and that someone is videotaping you, calling you a whore.  You're talking about a convention that happens once every four years, and not always in Minneapolis.  These women are trying to get medical treatment near their homes, where they live, and this happens any time they go there, not just once every four years. I think there's a slight difference.
Basic tools, basic cleaning equipment, basic kitchen equipment, towels, linen, etc!
Because this subreddit is all about female having their own space to share WHATEVER. So I'm not sure where you are trying to go with this?  There have been posts about overcoming loss, accomplishing something, being able to give up something. Similar to losing weight or gaining weight posts you see all the time on the front page. This is simply being able to do something you haven't been able to do before and feeling proud  So what's your problem now? Are you bitter because you have nothing to feel good about? 
Thanks for the wealth of info here! I've always wanted to change my own oil, but have been hesitant even after watching friends do it for me as I'm not super confident about doing any kind of work on my car.
[deleted]
&gt;I am saying wage is an arbitrary measurement of hard work  No it's not. It's a measurement of the scarcity of the work you provide. There are a ton of day laborers because anyone with a functioning body can do it. Yes it's harder to do, but there are a ton of them so you don't have to pay them as much. An engineer on the other hand has to have (for the most part) gone through and gotten their BS, which some people are too dumb or unwilling to do.   Have you ever wondered why those neat coffee shops are so cute? Because people with arts degrees work there, as they are not needed anywhere else in the workforce.
In all honesty, your family sounds emotionally abusive and toxic. This in turn makes you have bad choices, like staying with your stalker ex. He makes you feel loved even though he treats you badly. Your best move is to better yourself, get a good job, save money and move far away from all of them. Once you are in a healthy environment you can look for partners who treat you well and respectfully. 
Why should an unintelligent comment be validated by intelligent responses? 
Honestly, I have no hope for countries like these. If they ever do change it'll take decades.
But there's no such thing as closure for something like that. Best case scenario, he takes all responsibility and apologizes profusely. What then? Invite him to Thanksgiving? It still opens an awful can of worms. Most likely he will try to minimize what happened, avoid talking about it. Maybe he'll even deny everything.  If there is such a thing as closure to be had, wouldn't it be better to come to closure on one's own terms than talk to this guy and have "closure" riding on him?
The average person today wouldn't know shit about changing their own oil. Fuck off with your butthurt comments.
I am with you 100% on 1 and 2, but I am curious what what the fact that it is a 250 cc has to do with anything? If you are implying that a 250cc is a womans bike since it is small, you are using the same sexist logic that he is assuming that a motorcycle must be for your husband etc. 
[deleted]
I noticed this while i was in school, but I also noticed that it depended a lot on major.   I had a lot of firsthand experiences with different fields of study.  Film - less judgmental, unless of course it's about movies  Psychology - less judgmental and for the most part super nice. Also very diverse because it's a popular major.  Engineering - Kind of snobby towards people in other fields, but overall not judgmental and so much fun to be around (I worked in a company where I was the only non-engineer)  Advertising and PR (this is what I graduated with) - With some exceptions everyone was incredibly superficial and judgmental. I was shocked, as I had all of these completely different experiences with other students. I did not fit in at all and did not make a single friend in my classes in that department. 
[deleted]
Well, as a woman studying aerospace engineering and astrophysics, I can tell you I see more women dropping out each semester as the course work gets harder. It takes hard work, diligence, and to be honest, intelligence. It is a scientific fact that men tend to have higher IQ's than women, which leads to a higher male to female ration in such fields of study. Its just the truth. To change this, I believe that maybe making interactive groups (for both sexes) at a young age would help young men AND women get interested early!
Amazon sells oil and filters. This eliminates the trip to the auto parts store and often saves quite a bit of money. 
On it's own I would say no big deal. Guys are often curious about these sorts of things. However, it seems like the relationship has turned sour anyway, so this is just an additional warning flag on top of the red flag of lack of trust.   Good luck!
You can be somebody's "that girl". The most important thing is to be your own girl first.
I find that Freshers Week in any town/city is an excuse for the whole place to get wankered
[deleted]
Oh, but, y'all, this is ONLY for birth control. It's totally never going to be for anything else that they can claim religious exemption from. They would NEVER force their religious beliefs down anyone's throat and you're stifling their freedom of religion if you say they can't discriminate against women and their health care. /s  This is just infuriating. 
Why did you go straight for the employer? Did you talk to the kid? In my experience people are pretty tough being computers but when you really speak to them they are much more human. Lastly, how is loosing his job going to remedy the situation... I would guess he'll just have more time than ever to waste on this page.   I don't think it was a mistake to call but I also don't think anyone is any better off not to mention the kid could probably use some honest words from a kind person like yourself. 
This won't help with your frustration at the situation, but if you're curious, here's some data:  http://www.huffingtonpost.com/2013/05/16/changing-your-last-name_n_3287883.html  For woman in their 60's today, 80% of them changed their last name when they got married, and its a reasonable assumption that the vast majority of those changes were to the husband's last name.  That percentage falls with younger groups.  This data is from Facebook names so I'd take it with a grain of salt.  So not surprising that especially with older people they would just make that assumption.
I'm actually already in the psychology major. I was pursuing a BS in psych before and I've already talked to my (amazing) advisor about pursuing a BA instead and she was really supportive. I also decided to minor in French.
[deleted]
If I wasn't so in love with my school and made great friends here I would consider transferring, but unfortunately I really love my school. They do everything here to help you succeed, it's really just me that is the general problem. 
What do you think you should do? 
I'm trying to be optimistic…could he maybe be helping a friend? I've been with my SO for almost four years and I know he's always wing manning for his single friends. 
I think "run like a girl" comes from PE in highschool when girls have developed breasts but still don't bother with sports bras (and why would they, it's just PE) so they run in a more "condensed" manner.  I saw the video and they have very young girls running, of course a girl that age will run "normally", boys and girls have the same body type.  A girl any age could also run normally but not without the proper attire.   
I work in healthcare in the EMR field. Many hospitals/clinics have to associate diagnoses with an order (medicine, lab work etc) for them to get reimbursed (hospital) or paid (in a clinic setting). Insurance companies are trying to figure out ways to cut costs, so they're carefully reviewing charts. Doctors have to justify all orders with their documentation or risk not getting paid. So to answer your question, yes, you can code it with insurance that "this" diagnosis is associated with "this" medication.   For example: Doctors in some settings are trying to bloat charts and get paid when they really shouldn't. Should someone receive narcotics because they had a headache? Probably not, but if that person had a broken bone? 
You sounded pretty blunt and yes a bit of an ass. I appreciate your story and am sorry about what your friend went through but we are not the same people and things may play out differently for me than it did her, and it may not. I may be bitter and upset later on in life but I do not know what is going to happen until it happens. He may leave me, he may not. It's just infuriating when other people dictate how you should live your life to make them and society more comfortable. Lets just leave behind what and how things were said and agree to disagree?
You have two problems here: your family relationship and your ex.   If your ex is on the roof, call the police. You already know your family won't come running, and to be honest, I wouldn't have either. Get a restraining order, if you must.   The one thing my own family taught me is that the only person who is ever going to look out for me is me. Once I realized that, I felt free to make decisions that were in my own best interest and to take complete responsibility for those decisions. Your family is telling you, "Don't count on us." So who do you count on? How about yourself? You can make your own good choices. Your family did not *make* you go back to your shitty ex, so stop blaming them for your bad choices. Only you can control your future.
But this can't be right, can it? The government surely can't force a corporation to buy anything for its employees that its employees could buy with their salary. Could the government make your business buy every employee a bible? No. But the employees can still buy a bible with their salary.  Edit: Ah, I see what you're saying. This isn't like requiring the employer to buy bibles for its employees; it's like requiring the employer to provide a gift card to a store that happens to sell bibles.
It's not hard to prove who was actually writing the comments because he admitted it to his boss when presented with the evidence and was promptly fired. When he worked for my company, he was constantly being written up for similar offences (being hostile towards women, mainly). It is a long term pattern of behaviour that has no place in any functional workforce. I would not just jump in and contact anyone's employer unless I was 100% certain there was guilt. 
Are you on drugs?
Which part(s) of the Constitution, exactly? Just wondering
&gt;the awkwardness of a bare morning wood against your back.  Pardon me? What part of this is awkward?   Other then that this person needs an air conditioner... Not PJ's. 
I don't think what you did was right. Frankly I don't see how what this man does on the internet has anything to do with his job, unless he has been braking the law you shouldn't involve his employer. You could've at the very least told him to stop or you were going to show his employer.
As long as that is made clear to the employee when their benefits are renewed, I dont have a problem with that. However I would imagine that because this is a life saving issue, read medical necessity, that it would not apply.
&gt;Plan B and IUD prevent implantation into the wall of a fertalized egg.  No they don't. This is what opponents claim they do and say the fertilised egg is a human since conception is the starting point.   In reality Plan B is a high dose of progestins which inhibit ovulation, and copper IUD's function by making the environment in the womb hostile to sperms, thus preventing fertilization. Progestin based IUDs function just like pills, but because they are placed inside the womb the necessary hormone dose is lower.  There's no licensed form of contraceptive which functions by preventing implantation. 
How does changing one's oil compare to coping with loss? It's not something to be that proud of. 
What about all their other beliefs like helping the poor and whatnot? Why aren't they trying to legally impose those beliefs? 
[deleted]
Why do we even have doctors? We should just let judges and employers make all the medical decisions.
He doesn't seem to be. Just a good ol' Texas boy who thinks companies are literally the best thing since Jesus.
Of course I don't agree either that it shouldn't be portrayed because of guys, I just think that's one reason why it *isn't* portrayed.  Apologies for the assuming-everyone's-American thing, but it's correct more often than incorrect except on regional subreddits. I should have guessed from your spelling of *Tonnes*.  Amusingly, I went to a weird primary school that used English curricula instead of Irish curricula, and the sex ed they had there was bizarre (but still had more hours devoted to it than in my Irish secondary school). They taught, for example, that all men have exactly the same size penis when erect. Given that the showers were communal, I thought it was really weird that such different-sized things somehow all became the same on arousal. It wasn't until my first gay experience that I found out that wasn't true (I'd suspected for a while, I suppose).  I moved to Germany about three days after finishing my Leaving Cert exams, and it turns out that was a great idea in terms of sex-positivity. Choosing a university where I didn't speak the language (yet) was maybe a bit silly, but at least I was exposed to the notion that sex could be for mutual pleasure and wasn't necessarily evil.  The main lasting effect of all this, now that I'm in my thirties and happily married, is that I never could be attracted to Irish women. The very idea of being with an Irishwoman feels incesty and wrong, and I find it really weird when anyone Irish discusses sex in a sex-positive way.  I'd sort-of assumed that England had many of the same hangups about sex that Ireland did, since we're generally so culturally similar (apart from Catholicism). I am very happy to find out it's not as bad there.
I want to thank you for not lumping this guy in with every other man.  I also want to commend you for showing some empathy for this man, as toxic as his behavior is.  That being said, he is a grown man that needs to see the consequences of his actions.
I don't think that code is including in the ruling. /u/courtiebabe420, can you confirm? 
I don't disagree. The fact is, in this case, the defendant's did not demonstrate why, if it was such a vital issue dealing with the health of employees, was anyone granted a waiver in the first place.       I don't like the ruling, I'm just laying it out there. 
&gt;The Federal Government is not prohibiting racial discrimination.   Yes it is. &gt;They are controling interstate commerce as I said earlier.   Show me where in the Constitution the federal government is authorized to control interstate commerce.  &gt;We are allowed flexibility when interpreting and applying the Constitution.   That's dangerous thinking that could be used to justify the government doing just about anything.  &gt;You can eay that its illegal all you want that's your right but just because you feel that way doesn't make it so. The arbiters of this country decide what's legal and not.  Irrelevant to the point.
If only UN mandates meant something in this country without being ratified by congress. 
The plot grows thicker, then. ACA is fairly new, we will have to see how subsequent court cases involving its requirements and implementations will evolve.
[deleted]
This seems true until you look at the lyrics in their entirety. The word insecure is used but the songs describes someone who is "shy." The rest of the song questions why.  There's no problem with that. And the insinuation that liking someone for having demure qualities automatically makes a confident person less desirable is merely projection.  
When I'm concerned about my partner I talk to him. It doesn't have to be an accusation, a simple "Hey honey, I've been noticing you do x. I've never done x before, could you explain how that works for you?" should be fine if you're really open to there being a perfectly solid explanation. Then if she doesn't answer you or behaves strangely you basically have  confirmation that she has a disorder.
I agree with most of what you say, but...  &gt;False reports occur no more frequently for rape cases than for any other crime, and if you take into account that rape cases are vastly under-reported to begin with, it's actually much, much lower. But people cling to "that one time" some girl accused a professor because he was going to fail her or some stupid ass shit as "proof" that this happens a lot.  First of all, there are studies that go from 5-50%. No real consensus that I could find. Hell, according to wikipedia, one study got a result of 90% false cases(it wasn't a very good study though).   But even assuming only 5% of rape accusations are false, that is one lying woman for every twenty cases. That is still a massive number in my book, and it completely validates having "beyond a reasonable doubt" stay in there. Better twenty guilty people go free than one innocent be convicted.   As for this:  &gt;but I didn't because I just never tried? How would I feel if I found out that he did this again later?  Thank you so much for doing so. Too many people worry way too much about the emotional impact on themselves. Unknown numbers of people are in danger because of the rapist, but because it might make them feel bad, they aren't speaking out.  
[deleted]
[deleted]
http://31.media.tumblr.com/tumblr_m7j37s8f7G1r9vhggo1_400.jpg
I hate sleeping naked. It is as uncomfortable as hell. Nothing beats the feel of soft pajamas against my skin. 
Because if you read the case, it's a two part test. Birth control wasn't a substantial public interest to outweigh the burden.  The ruling is extremely narrow. (Even though I hate it).
I'm all for religious freedom, but not when it tramples upon the freedom of others. I'm stunned that this was ruled okay.
[deleted]
No, it isn't. Which is why just talking about it rather than assuming anything up front is a good idea. By itself, the internet activity isn't quite a red flag, but the fights as described by the OP might suggest that in context of the overall relationship, it is a red flag.
Unless you want a bazillion babies, contraception is highly necessary to prevent unwanted children. Especially considering that abortion is being restricted across the US as well. It's a standard part of healthcare for women and should be treated as such. 
Either you were going to do it, or someone else was going to do it, or eventually whoever manages the company's SEO/social media would find it and he'd be fired anyway.
&gt; To me, the red flag is betraying his trust by digging through his internet search history. Maybe he is just curious?  It wasn't his search history but posts he has saved on Reddit.  That's more akin to bookmarks than search history.
Those religions aren't Real Christian (tm) religions, so their wackjob opinions on health don't count like Real Christian (tm) religious opinions count.
Is there some way you can ask her subtly, or is the surprise that important? Personally, were I your wife (which I'm not, and you know her better than I!), I'd rather have some input into the perfect day, and ruin the surprise, than a huge surprise doing something I was less keen on.   Of course, I'm sure you can use your imagination to find some way of asking her without telling her!
[deleted]
Because in many parts of the country it's not readily available nor affordable.  The Affordable Care Act isn't about groceries, it's about health care.  And birth control is a key element of women's health care.   The law requires employers (under certain conditions, like size) to provide health care for their employees. If you're saying the law is unjust, you're entitled to your opinion.  But it's the law.  
[deleted]
He's 22. He's interested in other women. Just as you should be interested in other men. You are crazy young and in my opinion, relationships should only last as long as you're both learning about each other, and life together. You should be completely content, and if one party is not then the relationship has run it's natural course. The younger you are the shorter relationships should be as you are both still deciding who you actually want to become. I'm not saying break up with him, but have an honest talk with him about it. Don't attack him, just ask politely if he is at this point or it's a misread. 
But OP, don't do this. This is a bit creepy and manipulative, and it's really better for the relationship to end and for both people to find something better.
Welcome to the plutocratic theocracy.  I understand the ruling is narrow, but it is far far too much.   The entire reason churches and religious organizations do not pay taxes is that they have no say in government. Part of being so-called "secular".  The US is a sham.
Hobby says God intends you to die from uterine cancer.  You wouldn't want to cross God, would you?
I also grew up in Brookline and I have to say I'm torn over the buffer zone ruling (although the hobby lobby one is ridiculous for sure). Free speech is such an important right, and those protesters do have a right to peacefully assemble anywhere they like. When they cross the line of "peaceful" assembly they should be dealt with accordingly on an individual basis. I totally disagree with their view point but I think they should have the right to express it. Limiting that right is a slippery slope, in my opinion. 
[deleted]
Not sure why you needed to point at that you're a dude on this post, as it does not matter either way. 
Because it's the employer that is giving the woman a job and those benefits. It's the employer's money, not the individual's, that buys that coverage. If I fundamentally disagreed with eating meat (cruelty etc.), should I be forced, as an employer, to give all my employees steak for lunch on the job, on my dime?  The employer has no right to step in and say what you can do with your own money.  That isn't the issue here. This is about the employer paying for health coverage they fundamentally disagree with. The woman is free to pay for extra coverage herself, or find another company to work for that covers it.
&gt; the administration gave exemptions to churches and other religious organizations  Lesson learned. Never give religious organisations ANY concessions whatsoever or they will use it to argue further ones. 
The way I see it is: if there are many sick people unable to pay for healthcare or treatment how is that good for the work force and the nation as a whole? A bacterial sinus infection without antibiotics can leave you out of work for a good bit of time and well as anything that requires preventative treatment or doctor visits. You can't have a country with it's biggest tier of workers being sick, massively in debt and crippled and unable to support themselves or pay taxes.  In that case we are aren't doing any better than a third world country that can't support itself because the people are living in poverty, debt and sickness.
Hey so I'm just wondering really, but I'm not so sure that solves any problem, but just gets back at him.  As an honest question, how is that forum now? Any better?
[deleted]
Meanwhile, Hobby Lobby has huge investments in companies that produce emergency contraceptive pills, intrauterine devices and drugs used in medical abortions via their employee's 401k plan.  Just think about that for a minute.
That's assuming you actually know what *"the problem"* is..  *Taking action* doesn't have to be getting revenge on an attacker.  It can just be letting go, moving on...  So long as you continue to *"deal"* with the bad experience, you're just keeping it alive.  This happened over 5 years ago, the attacker could be dead for all we know, but the victim stays attached to the traumatic situation, keeping it alive through remembering, and a desire to punish them.
missed opportunity to send dick pics?  I would have.  
[deleted]
BOYCOTT
I have read the decision and I have a JD so I know how to read a Supreme Court decision. And ultimately the Court dismisses the concerns regarding objections to other medical treatments because there was no provided evidence. That does not mean that the challenges will not come in the future - especially in light of the win they had today.
I agree. I was just being pedantic.
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
Why is violating peoples religious belief a "better" solution?  Wouldn't a "better" solution involve these women getting birth control from another source, like how they already have the freedom to just go buy it themselves?  Ill even go one step further, why doesnt the government just directly provide free birth control to anyone who wants it??? That would be better still dont you think?
I think you did the right thing, man. Who knows what he could have been doing to people in the work place (customers or co-workers) and been getting away with. Or things that had happened that the manager didn't mention to you? 
I'll believe it when Texas executes one.
technically you already are. 
1: If you need a job then you should act professionally to ensure that you keep that job, and not name your place of business while insulting people and telling them to kill themselves on a public forum.   2: She did confront him before she called his store.
If he had attended a rally against young mothers, holding a sign that said "I work for [toy store] and you are whores", would this be any different? On Facebook, your name and face are clearly visible; it is fair to assume that your words and actions represent you as a person.  Though I would not have taken the steps OP did, I can see why she did it. Accountability is a thing in this world. If I were the store owner, I would appreciate the call and email in regards to someone representing my company.  I don't know why you are so worried about false calls to get people fired. The store owner required screenshots be emailed to him/her, which OP was able to provide. Without that proof, who knows whether OP's complaint would have gone anywhere.  Finally, OP did indeed contact him directly before she went to the employer. He never responded.
We don't have to wear them but I do most days. 
Yes! But Women are second class citizens...thanks Hobby Lobby. -_-
I agree, but they don't really work; too many women will keep shopping there.  ugh.  Better yet, get out the vote. In the mid-term elections and in 2016, women need to run the republicans out of office, and out of town.  Then things would really change in this country for women.   The GOP has become so anti-women that it's a no-brainer. 
The slippery slope is a fallacy, by definition.  
&gt; With mental illnesses/stress-related disorders on the rise it at least seems that would be a safe job market  Have you looked at the job market for people with a bachelors in psychology? Because in my area, it's pretty bleak. If you're interested in psychology, have you considered psychiatric nursing? Enrolling in a community college nursing program will take you more like 2-3 years including pre-requisites and waiting time (depending on where you live), and you'll earn a decent wage as a psychiatric nurse. Around here at least, it's not a specialty that most nurses want to get into so if you do want it, you'll be able to break into it fairly easily and have some great job security for the rest of your working years. If you want to continue on with school for a bachelor's or masters in nursing, or even a Nurse Practitioner in psychiatric nursing, health care facilities tend to offer employees some tuition reimbursement, free money you don't have to pay back. Depending on where you live and the need for psychiatric nurses you may be able to get your initial tuition partially or completely covered, if you find a hospital offering a contract where you commit to psychiatric nursing at their facility for X number of years after graduation.  You're far from alone in starting a second college career and professional life. I did it too, I went back for round 2 at age 30 and started working as a nurse at age 32. It was very well worth it, and I found that the second time around college was a much better experience. I was more mature and focused, and was far more successful at school.
&gt;Now continue to flood my inbox with your invalid retorts-- I guarantee I won't take them seriously, because there's no way a serious person could agree with OP and not have some kind of issue. please don't fire me  "Lalalala, hands pressed firmly over my ears I just want my opinion to be heard but if you disagree with me you're wrong and I don't want my beliefs to be in any way, shape or form to be shaken because I have to be right always!"  You sound like my step brother back home, thanks for the nostalgia!
&gt;I'm still fuming over the buffer zone ruling (as someone who lived a block away from a Brookline PP it's personal and generally terrifying).   Yet SCOTUS has a buffer zone of 98 feet.
[deleted]
Sorry, is that sarcasm? I have a tough time on text and am very tired.  You are correct in any case though.  The least restrictive means is likely going to be the government paying for it directly. 
First of all, it's not *free*. I pay my insurance premiums just like everyone does. It should be covered because it's one of the most widely used medical treatments by 51% of the population and has an enormous impact on a woman's ability to live a functional and productive life. It should be covered because that's the point of insurance, to cover the cost of medical treatments. It should be covered like diabetes is covered, like pregnancy is covered, like Viagra is covered. It should be covered because there's an enormous demand and need for it.  All corporations do is contribute to an insurance policy as part of their salary package for employees. They are not providing me with jack squat, they are *paying* me for the job I do for them. By dictating what my insurance is allowed to cover, they are dictating essentially how I spend my money and a pretty goddamn significant part of my life.
The point the justices came away with is if it was such a necessity then why was anyone exempted? 
Diva Cup is not the only menstrual cup. There are a ton of options. I have a Sckoon Cup.  If you aren't afraid of getting a little bit of blood on your hands occasionally, and sometimes a lot when you're first learning, you shouldn't get it. Once you learn how to use it, it's surprisingly clean. I love mine. It's super comfortable. I actually look forward to my period a little bit now.
It would appear that the owner of the toy store in question does not agree with you.
Where did you read these details?
While stress can exacerbate an ED, for many people, it becomes an obsession at a certain point, and even a waning of stress won't make it go away. Since this seems to have been going on for at least a year, it seems unlikely it'll go away even with a reduction in stress.  I think you're right that some kind of therapy is needed.
I will learn to knit/crochet/cross-stitch/whatever just to do this.  
You'd need to ask that question of those that run that blog, not us.  The blog itself isn't allowed here as we're not comfortable with images of people that aren't aware being posted here.  If you want an answer to your question from women in general try /r/askwomen or /r/askfeminists instead.
Disclaimer: I 100% think this decision is terrible, and I don't think Plan B/IUD's cause abortion. I'm just trying to keep the argument on track.  HL covers forms of birth control that prevent eggs from being fertilized (including the pill). So it's consistent for them to cover vasectomies and tubal ligations.
businesses are forced to do a lot of things by the government.  unless you're promoting anarchism, not sure why birth control is any worse than all the other shit you have to deal with.
This would be more appropriate for /r/oney, /r/relationship_advice, or /r/needadvice.  thanks!
Mine doesn't seem to be bloating, but yes constantly. It's incredibly frustrating and I hate it. There is a bit of fat (which I also hate), but also the firm part underneath still sticks out further than my upper stomach area.  I'd say yes it's genetics, so yes it's normal.  Also in response to someone else, I personally do not have pelvic tilt so that's not it.  When I eat it gets bigger due to my organs waay underneath being filled. There is no winning. It's always there.
IUDs are also not allowed. Both of those not being covered could be pretty problematic for people who don't have a lot of money and have an accident or don't react well to hormonal contraception.
My issue is that even if they WANTED to give an exception for abortifacients, Plan B (and related drugs) are NOT abortifacients. Science does not support that claim but the Supreme Court just ruled that it doesn't matter, Hobby Lobby (the corporation that cannot possibly have an opinion because it isn't a person) thinks that they are.
On a surface level, I agree.  Good thing those aren't the only two solutions.
Insurance CAN cover those. They don't HAVE to. Huge difference
Just because a mod decides to delete a comment based on their on biased opinion, does not make my comment 'trolling' . I expressed my true feelings and my insight into what happened.  All you know how to do is ride the circlejerk. 
I think this is a weak argument.  Yes, you absolutely should obey the law unless you find it morally objectionable.  For example, during the Nuremberg trials, the attorneys for the Nazi war criminals attempted to use the defense that their clients were only following the direct orders of the government and therefore could not be held responsible for their actions. However, one of the judges dismissed their argument with the simple question: “But gentlemen, is there not a law above our laws?”  Believing that somehow the law of this land is "right" means that you agree with everything that Washington is doing... which no one does.    Christians should resist a government that commands or compels evil and should work nonviolently within the laws of the land to change a government that permits evil. Civil disobedience is permitted when the government’s laws or commands are in direct violation of God’s laws and commands.  In this case, Christians believe this to be in direct violation of God's laws and commands.  Whether you agree with them or not does not invalidate this belief.  You are entitled to your opinion as well.      
Thanks! :)
&gt; What would you think in this scenario?  That he sounds like an excellent doctor.
You're right, it's always worth it to discuss the entire picture, &amp; since obviously Citizens United is what brought us here, let's discuss that.  Corporations are not "groups of people pooling their resources to achieve common goals." They are companies dedicating to making a profit, that is their entire reason for existence.    These "groups of people" you mention already have constitutional rights, b/c they are indeed, people. Putting them all on one Board of Directors does not change the fundamental nature of biology, or our constitution.  The Citizen's United ruling was a clustfuck of epic proportion, as we've seen it decay our rights, &amp; our democracy ever since it was handed down.  The Supreme Court gets it's wrong sometimes, which is why our founding fathers wrote in checks &amp; balances to allow for mistakes such as this one.  That's why there's a strong congressional movement to amend our constitution to overturn that ruling.    And to imply that the employees of corporations like Hobby Lobby are working there b/c they want the owners &amp; shareholders to "achieve *their* common goal" of lining their pockets with our money is disingenuous at best, ludicrous at worst.  Employees of corporations are working to put food on the table &amp; keep a roof over their heads, and maybe, just maybe, enjoy their **full rights as citizens of this great nation.** 
[deleted]
It isn't that girl means fragile, it's that the prefix "little" is more frequently applied to girls, and in particular it is more frequently applied to teenage and grown daughters. "My little girl" is a possession who is fragile and must be protected, and the phrase gets part of its tone from these overprotective (and frankly creepy) fathers.
That's my point.  Those things were justified by misinterpreting the general Welfare clause.
You're welcome.
I guess if you are destined for transactional relationships you want to be good at bargaining, but maybe it would be better to avoid transactional relationships...
&gt;he'll eventually see that.  What I'm worried about is that he's not going to see it as a result of his misguided behavior, but rather more evidence of his beliefs.  Think of it like punishing your kid.  Context is key to correcting behavior.  
Why does he have to try to get other women to express sexual interest in him in order to feel "confident"? Is confidence exclusively tied to sexual marketability? He is in a relationship. Any activity that involves trying to get other women to be sexually interested in him is completely inappropriate in a monogamous relationship.
You didn't use "modern civilization" anywhere in your comment; however, even if you had, I still would have been well within my boundaries to bring up my grandmother, as modern civilization refers to the period following the middle ages at about the sixteenth century. Perhaps you meant modern society? That would be slightly better, but what we call modern society definitely still includes the last century.   It wasn't an argument, it was an answer to your question. So, no I will not be bringing up my great grandmother (I don't need to go back more than two generations to find a female family member who didn't have the right to vote, that's how recent this was), I was simply answering a question. 
Getting wasted with a group of liberal lawyer friends.  God help the bar that hosts us.
Don't feel bad that he's jobless.  Feel good that you've created a job for someone else who probably isn't a shithead.
Good to hear.  I applaud your activism. Here is a short list:   If you are eligible, vote.   Work a voter registration drive (especially in places that are highly democratic- certain ethnic demographics, college campuses, etc.)  Contribute to the campaign of a liberal candidate who's views are feminist or who is openly for equality  Talk to your friends and neighbors and co-workers about the importance of the mid-term elections and 2016.  Volunteer on a campaign.  Sign a petition.  Put campaign signs in your yard and a bumper sticker on your car.  Work a phone-athon right before a key election. Use social media. Put posts on your Facebook page and tweet about election issues.  Engage in cocktail and dinner party and neighborhood barbecue conversations that turn political to make your views known. Write a letter to the editor. Talk to your kids. And your kid's friends. Reach out to your friends and family who are "undecided" to help them understand your take on the issues that matter to you.  Read, read, read... on-line and in print- keep yourself informed so you can make logical and compelling arguments and cite facts. Participate in boycotts. Join a protest parade or march (esp. for instances like Hobby Lobby.)   Most of all, vote.  
you're welcome :)
It sounds like you should spend more time reading up on MRA issues, because I'm pretty sure anti-gay, anti-choice, and anti-birth control aren't the general opinions of the mens rights movement.
No, my first job with PP was as a surgical nurse. I work with a lot of other individuals that we call health care assistants. They are very busy people but seem to like the work they do.
Of course, but the precedent is there now, making it far harder to challenge such exemptions.
We MRA's are not some evil Free Masons out to wreck lives. We just want Rights:  50-50 parenting End to affirmative action End to MGM Rape shield laws applied to accused aswell as accusers. 
[deleted]
Right, I mentioned there are exceptions.  Those are the exceptions. Honest question, what percentage women are on birth control for those reasons? 
[deleted]
I think you're on to something here.  "I feel that if you're a sinner God gives you cancer.  I don't want to cover cancer in my healthcare anymore"  Brilliant!
&gt; He knows I engage in same-sex activities to, and never said anything about it. I remember when I told him "sometimes I have sex with women" and he replied normally without missing a beat.  What does this have to do with mens rights?  Since when is MR anti homosexual?  If you look you will find that there are a considerable number of gay men who are MRAs.  They also are Pro choice and pro birth control (they just want men to have more options like women do).  It sounds like you don't really understand MR much and are just going on information you can find from tumblr.
Hey, thank you for those kind words! I just know things that would make me happy would most-likely help others in their time of need.
[deleted]
No shit. Will that fly with the employer though?  I can guarantee my doc would prescribe for "cramps" if I was caught in a situation where my employer would specifically not allow it for preventing pregnancy.
[deleted]
No, you're right, don't work for Hobby Lobby.  While you're at it, you may as well tell any women working at family-owned candy giant Mars Inc., with 72,000 employees and $33 billion in revenue, and Cargill Inc., with 140,000 employees and $136 billion in revenue, you should also suggest that any woman working at closely held, private firm Koch Industries, with 60,000 employees and $115 billion in revenue.  This is bigger than Hobby Lobby.  Don't be silly.  This affects -all- women, and is a bad deal for all of us. 
you don't have any friends of the opposite sex? My SO and I both do, and I would have no problem with him going to lunch with one of his woman friends. I trust him.
I don't think this is "say your opinion, lose your job". It's more like "aggressively lash out against random people, lose your job". 
A dish rack.  Oh my gosh, it was annoying as heck not having one.  Dish towels too.  
If he's like most guys, he's only asking for tips how to make his girlfriend happier. They are probably planning your birthday party.
If he didn't have her consent prior to the event, then it is assault.  
I apologize, I know it's not helpful to devolve into incivility.  I see he just...deleted the part where he just gave up &amp; called me a sexist pig (or maybe was reported, don't know), but you are of course correct: the high &amp; right road is always the best one to take. I fail constantly, but I'll keep trying! :) 
[deleted]
It also established that a Corporation is a "person".
You don't have to be directly affected by wrong doing to stand up to it. He was probably costing that toy store business, hurting the owners and other employees.
I think they forgot about Lucian's True History, and Ibn al-Nafis' Theologus Autodidactus. 
[deleted]
How do you fix this?  Stop gossiping and act like adults.  Stephanie might have a thing for James, or maybe James really *does* have a girlfriend.  Who knows?  Either way it's not her place to tell you who to hang out with.  If you're out of high school then you're too old for this.
I have granted several times that there are times where oral birth control is necessary. This should certainly be covered by health insurance.    Again, I don't think Viagra is necessary to be covered.  I can see how one might argue how Viagra is *different* then The Pill.  Namely viagra is necessary for someone with ED to have sex, whereas the Pill is *not* necessary to have safe sex, as there are other options available.  But, should a company be morally opposed to viagra, I'm completely okay with them not including it in their health care coverage.  The Supreme Court is, too, it seems.    Why should it not be covered? Because it's, as you say in two of your four descriptions, cheap, and incredibly widely used.  Technically, legislators are *not* making it harder to get--the ACA passed by legislators requires insurance plans to provide it and requires everyone have an insurance plan.  The Supreme Court ruled, however, that an entity morally opposed to birth control need not bear the burden of providing it.  You're still free to get it in the same way you always have OR you can opt into a plan that provides it.  That plan just won't be Hobby Lobby's insurance plan.    And I still don't understand--barring the exceptions we've discussed--why the pill is "vital to a woman's health and reproductive planning."  For a woman who does not need the Pill for hormone regulation for specific medical reasons, why is the pill 'vital?' Condoms are useful for reproductive planning as well.  The Pill is a convenience, one that people should have the option to purchase, one that people should have the choice to include in their health insurance plans, but it's NOT an inalienable right or something an employer should HAVE to provide.   edit: I don't want this to sound like a gender thing. If men acted like employers HAD to provide viagra, I'd take the exact same course I am here.   
could you have provided a better exhibit A?
Pregnancy is.
Or find clip-art icons or pics from Google Images, if you have horrendous drawing skills like me.
Unfortunately, in this day and age the boycott will be offset by people who purposely go out and spend money in support of Hobby Lobby. But still, I agree and I intend not to purchase anything at HL again.
I find the fact that they hold those beliefs and act on them objectionable.  If one's beliefs include denying people important medical care, those beliefs are wrong.
[deleted]
Because the context it was used in was pertaining to a ruling that directly affects a woman's ability to have contraception covered by her health insurance. And, I mean, good on you for fighting the good fight and being a humanist, but this particular post and issue is about a ruling that affects women to a far greater extent than men. 
Call the police anyway. You can't threaten or beat people at any age. 
&gt;A hormone pill isn't dangerous just because females are the ones using them.           Not what I said. Certainly not what I meant. I guess my doctor was just shining me on about about my risk of stroke so I could talk him into tying my tubes.   
[deleted]
Letters at least cost companies money to deal with. So not only are you not giving them your money, you're helping drive up their costs too. It's one of the reasons massive letter writing campaigns worked so well in the past.  The problem is getting lots of people to write letters anymore.
Just like a true dictator would do!
lol definitely not committing to another year!
Um, there's only one party responsible for nominating the 5 conservative justices that ruled in favor of Hobby Lobby. Saying that both parties are bad just muddies up the conversation. You have only republican presidents to blame for this.
Why are you holding these women in this thread responsible for the behavior of all other close women in their life? They can't control their behavior. Even if that were possible, why are you positing that women are collectively responsible for each others behavior?  Were I to ask the same of men, I don't think it would go over well....
Just to clarify, I don't question the validity of "beyond a reasonable doubt" as a *legal* standard (accepting the premise that we live in a country in which we prefer guilty people to go free than innocent people to be jailed, which is not necessarily true globally).  What makes me angry is people casually commenting on the validity of someone's allegation because they have this impression that false reports happen all the time.  If someone reports a robbery or really any other crime, the first thought is probably something like, "Oh, that sucks," or "Holy shit, that's terrible."  Not even a single person would think to say, "Oh, the victim probably just made it up," barring some extremely obvious motive for doing so or a known history of lying about things like this.  (And that's not even getting into, "Well, she was asking for it" shit.  If men started getting anally penetrated when passed out drunk at the rate that women get raped, I bet people would stop saying that and suddenly understand the various precautions women take, but shouldn't have to, just to stay safe.  I mean, hell, OP can't even break up at her boyfriend's house safely?  What the fuck.  I digress.  And obviously I don't actually hope that men start getting raped more, I just wish there were better understanding of what it means when people say that.)  The people who are immediately skeptical are the people who think, "Well I remember this one time in college when this girl lied about being assaulted" and just apply that to every rape case they ever hear about.  But you'd never think, "Oh, well some rando once committed insurance fraud, so I bet this completely unrelated other guy is just pretending his car got stolen."  (Again, unless you actually had information about this specific person to base that belief on.)  It's one thing for the courts and the defense attorneys to play their roles, but it's another when you can expect perfect strangers to be thinking, "Well she might just be a horrible liar who is accusing this poor, innocent man of a terrible crime" when that thought would rarely ever cross their minds in other criminal contexts.  The whole attitude around reacting to a rape allegation heavily contributes to people not reporting it, because who wants to report rape only to be told it was their fault, or that they're lying (and not telling just any lie, but a very egregious one)?  I'm not even saying that people should automatically vilify the alleged rapist, but just to take it on face value.  A victim is alleging an individual committed a crime.  Don't casually opine that she's lying just because some random person has done so before.  It not only perpetuates that such an opinion is acceptable, but anyone hearing it who is a victim will be discouraged from ever coming forward.  If even strangers with no basis to think they're lying aren't going to believe them, why bother going to court?  (This, again, distorts the false reports number, because real rapes go under-reported.  For those that are actually reported, I believe there is a consensus around 2-8% for studies that were vetted for methodology.  See [this](http://www.ndaa.org/pdf/the_voice_vol_3_no_1_2009.pdf).  High enough for courts to be skeptical, sure, but low enough that laypeople shouldn't be so quick to judge.)
[deleted]
No need to apologize. As for disagreeing with government forcing the company to act, I disagree with that as well. Despite legislation to the contrary,  corporations are not people and don't have first amendment rights. There were (and sadly, still are) people who believe interracial marriage is morally wrong. A company still shouldn't be allowed to deny spousal benefits to the black spouse of a white employee either. As racial discrimination is prohibited by law, I feel that the latter should be as well.
Please don't be mad at yourself for struggling so much.   I get that you want to date causally and there is not judgement here when I say, maybe causal sex just isn't a good idea right now. I was similar after I was raped. For years I'd have panic attacks during or after sex. I was trying to reclaim sex by proving to myself i wasn't scared to sleep with people, but I was. And accepting that I was scared and saying to guys "Hey, I like you but i'm a bit nervous at sex, can we take it slow and at my pace?" was the best thing I ever did. You don't need ot tell them why straight away. Learning to  say "Its notthing you've done but  I want to stop now"  was so much better than gritting my teeth until he was done. No guy has ever told me it would be a problem.   Try dating casually but going on actual dates, build up some trust, tell them at your own pace without the pressure of sex.  A big achievement for me is both than I can tell people about the rape but also that I don't have too. I still struggle with mine which was a one off inicdent almost 9 years ago, so please don't feel bad that you're still struggling! x
I know, because it's pretty obvious women are expected to remove more body hair. 
[deleted]
Get your downvotes ready folks: This is not a women's rights issue, nor is it a christian conservative issue.  Read the decision.  I can tell most in this thread did not.  The issue here is whether the government has a right to force people to engage in behaviour they find morally objectionable in a private (i.e. non-government) setting.  It should come as no surprise that this is outside the bounds of government.  On a tangentially related note, I find it amusing that people are worried about the slippery slope in this thread, when the implications of SCOTUS' obamacare decision aren't even on the radar.  I don't care how much you like the current administration, giving congress the power to tax for failure to participate in private economic transactions is a terrifying development.  [edit] Nice downvotes, keep em coming.  
Interesting - this was super helpful and in-depth, thank you! I've never been good at tampons either, and I think that's what the anxiety is about. I have always used pads, and they are disgusting and I work with babies and feel very at home with them, since I feel like I'm wearing a diaper 100% of the time when I'm on my period. Lol.   I think I will give it a shot! 
They're so freeing, aren't they? I bought one recently after years of self consciousness and one pieces and I couldn't be happier that I did.
[deleted]
Let's just send lots of used condoms.
I feel like I really should, but the whole company is run by rough and tough guys who kind of just "let the boys be boys". It's really disheartening because I feel like my complaint will either be mostly ignored or will turn into a huge fucking deal. I just don't want to be hated by my coworkers because it's a really social job and a lot of people out here are friends.
I wouldn't describe the piece as sensational.  They reported on the outcome of an experiment, took pains to discuss the experiment's limitations, and the interviewee went out of her way to contain the conclusions, especially as it pertains to women. 
I can't wait for the whole, "my religion is against gay marriage and therefore my company won't be covering your same-sex partner lol sorry not sorry."
My point was that people seem surprised that a woman can change oil on a car - when in fact they are just as capable as men. "The average person" probably can't but that includes men and women!
Right, but in this case there's a percentage of the population that *need* them. And even if they don't get them, there's always condoms. (Note: I don't personally support this view. Ah yes, you can get it outside of your job with 1+ months wages, totally accessible for all. But it is prevailing). Transfusions, however... every single person that needs a transfusion needs it. End of discussion. There are no alternatives, no abstinence, literally nothing you can do will change it. 
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Consciousness  Even wikipedia disagrees with you. Consciousness isn't the capacity for experience, it is the self-awareness and experience itself. That's a nontrivial difference. According to the definition that you used, we are conscious when we are asleep, which makes your definition invalid.  I'm done with you. It's obvious that you do not care about facts, reason, or an honest discussion.
observe now the rarest of creatures in the wild: a human who has never been randomly perturbed even when logic dictates it is not something worthy of perturbing! fascinating, let's take a closer look
Now, he at least knows he can't be abusive like that without any consequences.
[deleted]
I agree they can have a positive effect. And a woman can choose to take them for contraceptive purposes - but forcing someone else to provide them when they find them morally reprehensible is wrong. I should not have to take part in that even at arms length if I so choose. Having contraceptives is not a Constitutionally guaranteed right. Can contraceptives be covered as a drug for cysts and hormone issues vs for birth control?
All three of those are only available with prescription for medically necessary reasons. And not all insurance covers them. The same situation that exists for women. The only exception to female health coverage, per this ruling, is birth control for non medical use and morning after pills and other 'abortion' agents.   If you need birth control pill for a medical condition you can still get them prescribed, and your insurance will cover them. Even at Hobby Lobby.   Edit: And with the exception of a vasectomy, no men's birth control is covered.    
&gt; /u/ohdatsrite:  Sex is an integral part of who we are. I liken abstinence to fasting. Eventually most people give in.  &gt; /u/PseudoSomethingYT: I **agree with your point about abstinence,** 100%. We are humans and that is apart of who we are. ... there are other types other than those 4 out there, **including abstinence.**  ???  does not compute
[deleted]
I kind of agree. Hobby Lobby isn't a government run entity, so it needs to have it's freedoms right? Separation of church and state. Keep the government out of a religiously run company. Let them do what they want.  On a different topic, I feel like me voicing any opinion is going to get downvotes and hate, and that is SAD. This is because in every day life, I may have opinions that differ from most people I know, and I'm terrified to voice my opinion. If I do, ever, I get berated and belittled because I think differently. It hurts.  EDIT: By the way, Hobby Lobby only does NOT cover: Plan B/Ella pills, and IUDS. Covers 16 contraceptives.
It's a sad day for America, regardless of gender, political party, or religion.  Edit: Added religion to that list. Because you choose your religion or lack thereof, and it shouldn't be about imposing it on others.
Um, telling someone to stop and them complying doesn't negate assault.  The fact he did it at all is assault. Plain and simple. 
Most retirement funds invest in mostly S&amp;P Funds, they are probably also investing in their competitors. I bet if you look at your 401K holdings, you are invested in many companies you despise.  
&gt;I'm sorry, but what does Congress have to do with the Supreme Court's decision?  well, I kind of explained that by saying "democratic congressional push for a constitutional amendment to repeal Citizen's United, which has led to our trouble today."  That's *actually* how checks &amp; balances work.  If you honestly believe that a congressional push to amend the constitution to overturn a Supreme Court decision isn't  **literally checks &amp; balances in action,** I can't imagine what else I could say.  I guess this:    You are aware of the many, many, many other times this has happened, right? **Of the twenty‐six amendments to the Constitution, as many as seven can be interpreted as overturning Supreme Court decisions. The first such amendment was the Eleventh, adopted in 1795, which overturned Chisholm v. Georgia (1793) by restating the immunity of states from lawsuits in federal court. The Thirteenth Amendment (1865), which prohibited slavery, and the Fourteenth (1868), which ensured that blacks had the right of citizenship, in effect overturned the Court's most infamous decision, Scott v. Sandford (1857). The Sixteenth Amendment (1913) gave Congress the power to levy an income tax and therefore negated Pollock v. Farmers' Loan and Trust Co. (1895). In the most recent instance, the Twenty‐sixth Amendment, adopted in 1971, overturned the portion of Oregon v. Mitchell (1970) that held that Congress could not require the states to set the voting age at eighteen in elections to state offices: the amendment itself lowered the voting age to eighteen. The Nineteenth Amendment (1920), which prohibited the denial of the vote to women, and the Twenty‐fourth Amendment (1964), which prohibited the imposition of a poll tax as a requirement to vote in federal elections, superseded decisions that had upheld these practices under the Constitution.**  Come correct if you're going to come for GoGo.  I know what I'm talking about.    Edit: Just had to say, b/c honestly, I went soooooooooooooooooooo easy on you here (like, seriously: you actually thought that checks &amp; balances were tantamount to an overthrow of one branch of another.  then **lectured me** on how checks  &amp; balances work.  sorry, I digress), but my fiance saw this &amp; we literally just spent a good five minutes laughing our asses off at you.  I'm not trying to be cruel to look cool, or even to make you feel badly, I hope you'll use it as an opportunity &amp; think about your views (I'm not saying you should change them, but certainly be able to defend them), maybe read a book now &amp; then.  There's no security in ignorance. 
Yes, yes, yes. Totally on board.   Let's watch some PBS Makers specials and get fired up. Totally serious. We need a 1970s-esque women's rights revolution.
[deleted]
Wait, it's been a while since I learned about healthcare in the US, but isn't the free market what put us in this situation to begin with? Other companies have the government regulate prices for healthcare; we don't. 
&gt;  Please correct me if I'm misunderstanding something.  You're misunderstanding many things, possibly out of ignorance, possibly willfully. But it's not up to me or anybody else in particular to fix your ignorance.  Have a nice day.
[deleted]
Before you downvote, can you at least provide evidence contrary to what I've posted here? I'm just trying to get people to realize what the ruling today actually was.  Thanks!  EDIT: JSYK, this is not a troll attempt, that's why I linked the court documents, so everyone can see for themselves.
Duuuude, a Tesla? A fucking Tesla? Who cares what she said, drive off in your spacemachine! I am so jealous.
It's so sad that you actually went through her comment history to find something to hold against her. A spelling mistake that she corrected herself, *10 months ago*, too.
that made me me laugh
Right! Just penis pumps and Viagra! /s
two pots minimum.   and a steamer insert for one (or get the combo rice cooker/steamer)...steamed veggies FTW! 
Things kicking his ass won't do:  * Make the past okay * Allow you to keep moving on  Things kicking his as will do:  * Force you to continue thinking about the assault when you don't want to * Give you new memories of this guy (gag) * Possibly get your boyfriend and father of your child arrested  I understand being upset, but wanting to hurt him, while good intentioned, is selfish at this point. I would just explain that to him. You're the one who was hurt, you should be able to nicely tell him to stop dragging this into your life. All he has done is make you worry more, he needs to know that.   I'm sorry this happened to you.
Those types do not cause abortion; they may impede implantation of a fertilized egg. They are only "known" to cause abortions by religious maniacs, not by scientists.
holy shit livejournal is still around
No, its not. It was equal to driving like an asshole while wearing his work uniform, inside his vehicle.   I think OP is delusional, and this subreddit simply enforces the "Get the bad guy at any cost" mentality. Every single post that calls out OP on their bad behavior is downvoted into oblivion. Any post that uses reason to tell her how she reacted was bad gets downvoted. Fuck this sub, might as well put /r/jailbait on the default list.
This is from my Dad's perspective.  I was sexually molested by my third grade teacher for a year. When summer came, and I felt safe, I told my Dad. He's a retired Navy SEAL, commercial diver, and underwater welder. I'm the youngest and only daughter.   He had to be physically restrained from the courtroom from attempting to end my abuser's life, and I thank God for it. NOTHING WILL COME OUT OF IT.  Hug your man, smooch him, and tell him you'd rather him be here with you than locked up for acting on anger. You'll both be thankful for it. 
[deleted]
Thank you for this! I've heard that fact bandied around today and couldn't find the specific literature to support it. While I'm not happy about the decision, it was a very narrow ruling and it's not the end of the world, just a step in a very frusterating direction.
Spot on, I think we really have seen the best of the best here. 
Well said; if the government follows through with covering that which is not being covered by insurance, it just shifts the costs to taxpayers anyway.
&gt;Hobby Lobby providing you with 16 different FDA approved contraceptives, but not wanting to pay for the 4 options that potentially prevent a fertilized egg from implanting?  Ah, you're missing some details there. I don't know if that's willful or if you didn't do as much research as you claim and are berating others for not doing.  Many women cannot use hormonal forms of BC and would like a reliable method. IUDs are typically they're only options. They can use condoms or sponges, which are less effective, true, but if one of those fail, there's a good chance they'll need Plan B, which they cannot use their insurance for now. That can be a problem if you're not rolling in the disposable income.  And they're reasoning is based shared secondary mechanisms of contraception that even The Pill has been hypothesized to utilize on occasion. Normally it stops ovulation, but if that mechanism fails, an egg can be fertilized, and the secondary effect of thickening the uterine lining can help prevent implantation. Based on their reasoning, they should cover all forms or none if they truly have an objection to even the possibility of a fertilized egg not becoming a pregnancy.  Also how is any of what you listed relevant to all of the other companies that don't do that, who can now refuse to cover any contraception for their employees?  
&gt; What's ridiculous is that any employer should be nosing about in any of their employees' health matters.  you are amazingly ignorant as to how employer provided health care works...yet you still have an opinion on it...why do you have an opinion on something you know nothing about?
I blame a declining middle class due to an unmoving minimum wage, which has in turn amassed a great deal of money in the hands of a very few, which has stagnated the economy. This is only further being exasperated by problems like declaring Corporations as people with religious freedoms.  But yeah, lets blame "trophy mentality" for it.
You're attempting to trivialize the issue. Its not because people "don't like them" its simply that they are not forced to pay for something that they religiously object to. Big difference between religious objection and not liking something. As to your other points: You can die from infections, depression, anxiety, and high blood pressure. As to acne if someone had a real religious objection to the treatment then it shouldn't be covered, however I find this highly unlikely. I had bad acne and never took meds and I turned out just fine.   Edit: I misread your post slightly. You make an interesting point about overeating, except high blood pressure is very possible even in otherwise healthy individuals.
Back before it was a phrase, I think it was just "unrequited love" - the "zone" aspect really separates the people involved cos it creates an almost physical sense of space, which in turn creates a bigger sort of mental divide. If it keeps happening to you over and over and over, you probably will start to feel so alienated that you bond with people who are also in the "zone". Un-requited love is much more personal and singular sounding, something that sounds like it has an ending rather than some weird perpetual place.   I never used the term, it was around but I was a teen in the 00's, but I was definitely turned down by guys I liked. I got over it, stayed friends if it was all good, found a new guy to bat my lashes at. 
What is difficult about removing a bolt from the bottom of the engine. Changing a tire is jacking up the corner of the car and removing 5 bolts.
If anyone ever tells you that the two parties are the same and it doesn't matter who you vote for, remind them how Supreme Court judges are appointed and what an effect they can have over decades.
When you break up, try to negotiate like adults and figure out what you want your compromise to be. You are both legally responsible for the remaining rent, and also both legally entitled to things like the leftover security deposit. It would be good if you have a proposal for him ready to go.   Options:  * You both move out and sublet the apartment. * One of you moves out and still is responsible for a portion of the rent (probably less than half, since you're the one incurring the expense of moving) * Try to co-habitate until the lease is up. Not pleasant but people do it. * Speak to the landlord and try to negotiate another arrangement. * Deal with the financial penalty of ending the lease early and split it down the middle.  You can also speak with your landlord. Sometimes they are willing to rework leases in the light of these types of situations.  
I just want to say, thank you PP for the contraceptives and sex education during my broke horny college years (still broke..). Going to a conservative school in a conservative area I didnt expect to see a PP, much less one that was so welcoming, friendly and non judgemental.   Youre awesome. Keep going OP!
Just so you know, what makes intelligent and informed people nervous is NOT what it stops. Its the precedent it sets. Lets say my religion dictates that cancer treatments violate my beliefs in that I am suppose to will and pray my employees better. So now I have the right to refuse coverage for cancer to my employees? This is the exact same thing. An employer should have NOTHING to do with any medical decisions of any of their employees. It is NONE of their dam business. They are NOT providing "free birth control" to their employees, it is just covered under their insurance. 
[deleted]
You act like he is a representative of the company.  She only found out he works there because she actively looked for it.
That's a slippery slope. You may have a thousand different beliefs that others may find wrong or offensive. What you are in favor of is a system where everyone would be so terrified of giving their personal opinion because they might get fired and the world would be a boring place.  I think what she did was wrong and it honestly offends me that she would declare herself to be the moral judge, jury and executioner to possibly ruin another persons life. Should I start Doxxing her and find her employer to let them know that she finds people on the internet that she doesn't like and gets them fired possibly causing them and their children to go homeless and starving? People can go to great lengths to be offended, to see how deep this can go I recommend you spend time looking at the SJW crowd on tumblr. Who is to say your not next?
Yay, this makes me happy :)  I wore a bikini for the first time this summer, and I just decided that I was going to be confident about it. I was sick and tired of feeling self conscious and covering up, and I thought, "if people have a hard time with my appearance, that's their problem, not mine"  You rock that bathing suit, and you're absolutely right, who cares what you look like as long as you're happy?
&gt; Even if they do, the money being placed into the investment is meant for the **employee**.  Fixed your typo there :) Don't want people getting confused! 
Lower courts are going to be applying this ruling as well.  So you will be OK as long as your beliefs line up with whatever judge you happen to be in front of.
The fundamental piece of the debate is that our health care system is already so regulated, managed, controlled, and monopolized that there's really nothing like a free market or interactions between free agents to be had there in the first place. Thus, a ruling like this isn't really shrinking government involvement or giving more freedom, because the whole system is still completely controlled; it's just adding another religious regulation on top of all the others.     There are lot of things SCOTUS could do to create more freedom/less government intervention in the healthcare system, but they don't look like this.  A ruling like this implicitly accepts and supports the fully-controlled system we have now.
Probably. But people don't want the facts now days. They want a quick headline and something that will make them 'feel' like they're making a difference. But I digress 
It's a term that was picked up on quickly, and is now entirely abused. It's very rare to see it being used correctly. The majority of times I've seen it used, it just means "a man said something to me I don't agree with", or even "a man said something to me". Both of which are just lazy, catch-all, gendered insults.
[deleted]
I'm not in favor of them covering viagra or vasectomies either. These things may be medical but they are also elective. If something is elective it should be paid for by the individual. It's stupid to make the whole insured group pay a higher premium so that some individuals can take boner pills or get their dicktubes cut. Or for that matter to cover anti-baby pills.  As for maternity leave I thought that was covered under contract with the company and not related to insurance. I could be wrong there but maternity leave from my understanding doesn't increase premiums.
[deleted]
Sure, you might buy products from japan, and you might not agree completely with all of their policies. But if you take an issue so seriously that you file a Supreme Court case regarding certain contraceptives that are related to abortion, that should permeate all your business practices, in my opinion.   They stand on their convictions regarding contraception that loosely related to abortion (by preventing fertilized eggs from implanting), but they violate their own convictions as well: 1. Their retirement plan invests millions in the pharmaceuticals that manufacture these drugs and 2. A large amount of their products come from china, a very bad  country for abortions.   My point: if you're going to infringe on people's rights, you should be very consistent in the way you practice your beliefs within your company. 
But this isn't accurate. It's not one in ten businesses. It's only 'closely owned privately held businesses.' And secondly she didn't do her research because they still offer 16 different types of birth control. Please educate yourself.
&gt;giving corporations certain rights because they are property owned by people.   OHhhhhh!!! *Property* has rights. I must have missed that point at university.
Most health insurance products offered by the insurer that I work for don't cover products or services to treat male sexual dysfunction at all - let alone at zero cost sharing to the member. Remember the issue here is whether a group should have to provide contraceptive products and services at no cost to the member. Almost all health insurance products already cover contraceptive products and services to some degree, while many don't cover treatment for male sexual dysfunction at all.   I'm actually not comfortable with the ruling (on legal grounds), but I have trouble with the claim that the decision was part of a "war on women". Just my opinion. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
Thank you for everything you do. Planned Parenthood kept me child free when I wanted to be child free and caught my cervical cancer before it turned into anything major. You guys are angels. :)
How is preventing pregnancy not a medical reason anyway?
The oil leaks out fast and the driver's see the low oil light and figure it's ok to drive a little bit farther until they're home.   I can't tell a performance difference between clean and dirty oil or 3 or 5 quarts full.  Brake jobs might seem challenging at first but once you've done it a understand how the pieces work and fit together, the time it takes to do the job will significantly decrease.  To get access to the pads and rotors you support the car and remove a tire.  It gets easier and faster with practice.
The science now suggests that they [prevent fertilization or ovulation, not implantation](http://ec.princeton.edu/questions/ecwork.html). Since fertilization is what counts as conception/beginning of life, these forms of BC are not actually causing the alleged "abortions" at all.
I'm sure it's only something you overlooked in your how-tos minute breakdown, but you forgot to mention the part where you put the oil plug back in. :)  /needlessly pedantic.
[deleted]
Yeah, I certainly understand this is a crazy thing that might totally blow up. I don't intend to sound patronizing - he's someone I can read well, and when I see him, it seems that way.   
Those might be worth looking into, at least for wearing under non-jeans. Thanks! Too bad K-Marts are dropping like flies around me. Maybe I'll order online. Do they fit true-to-size?
Oh I am well aware and not envious of anyone who feels they are in the friend zone. But my question is more that perhaps girls less often feel "friend zoned" because they are not even given an opportunity for close friendship, and guys feel it more often because women more frequently befriend people that they have no romantic interest in? 
[deleted]
[deleted]
You started off rude. It undermines your point, which was good.
Which reiterates my point-health insurance should not be employer based.  It is stupid the way they choose to offer coverage, I don't disagree, I just don't think it should be illegal.  They are offering it as a form of compensation, if you don't like it, choose a more competitive employer.
After seeing the title I thought I could contribute and say something like "yeah they always think I'm too weak to handle things" but yours is totally different. It doesn't just seem to be about being treated differently as being treated shitty. Know that you deserve to be happy. I wish I could offer better advice other than keep looking for someone to treat you well whether it be a boyfriend or just a friend. Good luck :)
I mainly sew, and Hobby Lobby has crap material to choose from.  I can/will boycott gladly.
[deleted]
"But a feminist is just someone who wants equal rights for men and women.  I wish the word feminist was embraced more than it is.  I am a feminist..."  Me too.  Classy post.  Thanks for writing. 
Oh have i been there.  I was never that girl either.  I had a lot of guy friends growing up and all through school....some of them I was totally in love with, but they never saw me....and I'd watch them ride off into the sunset with their "that girls" and just cry myself to sleep wondering 'why not me?'.   i know in the online world its REALLY EASY to get caught up in the flirting....you really can get to know someone really well before you even physically meet them.  sometimes it works out great....sometimes not so much.  i've been on both sides of that coin.  but know this:  you're only someone's distraction if you let yourself be.  now you know that particular guy's a creep, you cut him out of your life and move on.  you can tell from the way they talk that they're just playing.  guys aren't THAT smart, lol........but don't give up hope....there really are some great guys out there that are looking for their 'that girl'.....and someday it will be you.  
&gt;The good news in that regard is that interested individuals can have much more influence over local and state-level races.  Tell me how, please. I emailed my state rep both before and after his last vote, but I might as well have been talking to myself. He knows that he has votes without my measly one, and he clearly doesn't give a hoot about the national platform.
Look I already went over that. As I said im fully aware its not an abortion its just the legal wording and definition that was used.  you can say thats fact then add a link with proof to your statement. Otherwise you can say anything you want.  
[deleted]
http://www.patheos.com/blogs/lovejoyfeminism/2012/10/zygotes-lost-with-birth-control-v-without-birth-control.html This is blog with a lot of opinions, but it provides some pretty good sourced information. Turns out your body already rejects zygotes using the same method on the regular. 
Plan B isn't an "abortion" type of birth control. Dum-dums think it's an abortion pill because they don't bother to find out how it works.  And I think you misunderstand what a boycott is.
[deleted]
I just bought an easel from hobby lobby cause I support them
[like this](http://i.imgur.com/1r7Lxrr.gif)
So we both agree that insurance shouldn't be employer based.  Why would/should we spend energy on fixing a symptom of a problem instead of the problem itself?  
I think part of it is that they all still respect one another. I hate a lot of what Scalia writes, personally, but I love some of what he writes too, like his recent dissent in the Aero case, or his opinion in the City of Arlington case (I can't remember the other party for the life of me, but it came out last year). I think the majority of the justices respect that everybody there is pretty much a great legal scholar, regardless of if they disagree.
Do you know what a Christian scientist is? 
It does hurt. It was very painful for me and I have a child. However, it just takes a minute, they give you a painkiller, and once its done all that you'll have is cramping. 
Next level protip: those microfibre seamless thongs. Underwear heaven. No visible panty line ever, and comfy as sin.
Cough what??? SCOTUS has never, ever epically failed once in our history regarding discrimination?!?!   This isn't just about birth control. This states that the perceived religious beliefs of an employer trumps their employees' healthcare and privacy, whether that belief actually exists in reality or not. Whether you draw the line at "life saving drugs" doesn't matter. The line in the sand isn't what matters. What truly matters is that the line now exists in the first place. Now it can be used as precedent for whatever a company "wants to provide in health insurance" and what they want to omit.   Either the line exists or it does not. 
You're welcome! :)
I'm just shocked that you were the first one to call them.
Fuck HR, call the police. HR will want to sweep it under the rugs since she is in a lower position than her assaulter.
So in your mind because he has numerous unrelated privileges he could never possibly experience being rejected or have anything of value to say about it?
I agreed with this hardcore until webmd suggested I had a disease, and like always I was all "oh WedMD, so dramatic!" Except I actually did have it and should have gone to the doctor WAY sooner.   On another note - as a woman, I swear if you sneeze strangely someone is likely to suggest you're pregnant. I called my PCP last winter because I thought I had strep throat and he immediately asked if I was "sure I wasn't just pregnant?" Ummmm, yeah - it was just strep. It's kinda bizarre actually.    Edit: you're.
You'd have to ask them, I suppose.   But it's not simply Christian organizations. The ruling stated "privately held organizations."
Really? Because when I called them, I was offered one for $75. I suppose that if I had to resort to shoving things that were lying around into my uterus, I would make my uterus a priority and claim accountability for it since it was mine, instead of standing on a soapbox and crowing as loudly as possible that it was society's responsibility to take care of it. 
Australia is very similar. Went in, had a general check up, had everything explained to me and we selected a pill based around what I wanted to avoid (some pills are known for things like acne) and the prescription was written for three months. If I'm happy after that, I simply call for a one year script. 
Please see my comment below about the other things that he has said. He is not aggressive toward my father or other brother. He also believes that women should not be in leadership positions as 'their hormones affect their decision making' and he has said he will not respect any female bosses that he has. I feel pretty comfortable calling him a misogynist, but I have not done so to his face so I don't know I could be 'making things worse'  
&gt; they've ruled in favor of a company (casino, IIRC) that fired a woman for not wearing make-up  That's because she was in an industry where your presentation is directly related to your job. The primary purpose of a worker at HL is to help people buy goods. The primary purpose of a stripper/dancer is to look good. So if the stripper/dancer doesn't look good anymore, they aren't doing their job.  The cocktail waitress at a casino is pretty close to a dancer, so they made the argument that wearing makeup and having a certain look was part of her job. That's why *they* ruled in the casino's favor.
Thanks for the reply! I am a huge fan of Planned Parenthood and I think we need more people like you in the world. I hope I can one day do something similar.
pregnancy is a medical condition, and birth control is preventative care.  birth control is also used to treat a wide array of hormonal and medical issues. not that it's any business of anyone what a woman is using contraception for, let alone her employer.
Again, the precedent has been set. Either they carry through it as they did before blowing out more people's rights to access health care and medical privacy, OR they create a situation of "separate, but equal."   Both scenarios suck.    I'm also well aware that there are two other branches of government. 
If you really want to restore reproductive rights of women in the US, what women should do as a population is to bring back feminism to when they were staging protests and what not. I'm not talking about the Slutwalk, which in the best light is a demonstration for public information. I'm not talking about discussing the finer points of latent social discrimination. I'm not talking about getting women into traditionally male dominated fields.   I'm talking about drawing up something that is **actionable**, and staging organizations and protests to bring this issue up to the table. Call your representatives and inform them of what you want. Stop getting bogged down in things that are not actionable, and really focus on what you can put down on paper and in law. 
Michaels is owned by the Koch brothers.  Can't say it's much of an improvement over Hobby Lobby. 
what pro-choice means is just that. I'm pro-whatever choice the woman decides to make with her body, be it keeping the child, adopting it out, or having an abortion.   It means it is not my choice to make but the woman's.   Pro-life means exactly that. You're pro-keeping the fetus alive regardless of what the woman chooses. You are putting YOUR choice on their body. 
Had to butt in, banker your an ass, even if I somewhat agree with the general argument you are crudely making. Secondly cerulean, check what they actually do and DONT cover, there are really very few items they are not wanting to cover, and it primarily focuses on "emergency" contraceptives. While I certainly can not speak to your specific circumstance, it is highly unlikely your sister would be on a medication that hobby lobby is attempting to argue against the purchase of.  Unfortunately few really care about the details, oh well.
Additionally, if they go out of business that is also fine with me.  Either way it's a win.
I agree. I never shopped there anyway. I see the grounds for the ruling, and I understand. Workers should know ahead of time how their employers stand anyway. But, needless to say, Hobby Lobby will never see a dollar from me. 
No, the argument is that they reject contraception as being against the will of God.  You can't do business with those businesses responsible for the creation of this evil.
I live in the Bible Belt. It's fairly conservative here.
&gt; Everyone agreed that the Catholic Church would not be forced to pay for birth control for their employees, e.g. the Janitor at your local Cathedral.  Actually theres several religious institutions that are run by off shoots of the catholic church. Schools, and non profits that are run by catholic nuns that could be forced to provide insurance that pays for birth control. As of right now I will say most of those cases are in limbo as their legal arguments go through the courts. Their fate has not been decided yet. Granted their arguments cover more then just the methods  on debate today.   While thats the definition of Religious discrimination against individual people. Forcing someone or a company to do something against its published and well know beliefs was exactly what was up for debate which is a form of discrimination that the judges ruled is protected and allowed to an exception.     Im pretty sure w're on the same page here i just didnt word it as well as I should have.
[deleted]
Thanks, although I'm not in a position of power myself I just did what the boss lady told me to do.
&gt; that you don't find attractive enough to date for whatever your reasons are  Which are perfectly valid reasons and not up for debate.  Being attracted to someone and being "nice" isn't grounds for dictating who they should be attracted to.  For every "friendzoned" guy there are women he's not attracted to.  Should he be pushed into dating them for reasons?  
Write to your local representative in congress, and join a women's action group near you. There's only so much you can accomplish acting alone - reach out to others to make change.
I don't think your last point is correct. I was talking to my gyno about Mirena-- it does NOT stop ovulation, but for many women it DOES stop your period. I think you've gotten those mixed up?
[deleted]
Cause clearly birth control would never be used for a purely medical reason.  I hate these morons who see everything as black and white.
[deleted]
Imodium.  Drink a LOT of fluids too as you will be very dehydrated. 
I was kinda thinking the same thing. You don't want to encourage it by making her think she's more attractive this way, but you also don't want to say nothing about appearance because it could drive her deeper into the disorder.
This is a priority. This is a constitutional precedent. Employers can no exempt themselves from compensating their employees according to the law because they "believe" something. Think about think implications of that for a minute. 
This only applies if you're a female who works full time for a privately owned company with over 50 employees, with religious owners who object to birth control, and you get health care from them and you have no insurance that covers birth control from your husband.  Then, it's only really bad if you want birth control that they object to and can't afford it.  In the grand scheme of things there's probably bigger issues out there than this.
I'd assume every company who objects to certain birth controls will follow this same practice then? It seems like the most reasonable course.
I don't think that's entirely true. I've got lots of male friends (more than female friends), and we hang out because we've got common interests that don't involve putting Tab A into Slot B. We've got an anime group, a D&amp;D campaign, a board gaming night - the stuff that friends do. None of them have ever flirted or shown romantic interest when I was single, and neither did I. I think men deserve more credit than to assume that every social interaction they have is working towards the end goal of sex.  
They won... but they lost my business.
As a girl who cut off 8 inches on a gamble, it worked out well. Walk in and say you want short hair. Trust the stylist,and tell them you want to look strong and farce. They will take care of you 
Glad to help in any way. Good luck and take care
This just looks like rambling nonsense with some talking points thrown in. A company is founded on its religious beliefs and NEVER covered birth control starting from the time of the company's creation. Obamacare comes along and says YOU HAVE TO DO IT OR ELSE (even though they weren't forced to before BECAUSE of those religious beliefs.) Then woman, WHOM DONT EVEN WORK FOR THE FREAKING COMPANY, decide to bad mouth a company they know nothing about because they wont PAY FOR YOUR ABORTIONS AND DAY AFTER PILL? are you kidding me? Why the fuck should they have to?!?!?! this is nonsense that people are up in arms about his.
Then stop buying the products sold at Hobby Lobby.  There is a ton of overlap in products sold at Hobby Lobby and other craft stores.  If you need yarn, don't buy the same brands sold at Hobby Lobby if they are sold at Michael's.  Write THAT company and tell them why.  If enough people boycott actual brands, the vendors will get the hint and stop selling to HL.  
[deleted]
You are a peaceful beautiful mermaid! :P   But really go you! That's really awesome, and i'm super happy for you/proud of you. Everyone really does have a bikini body, all you have to do is put one on 
Hooked on phonics much? It is spelled privilege. 
From a guy's point of view, that's what it feels like. But it's simply that she just isn't attracted to him. At least not yet. Easiest way to leave the zone is to just leave her alone.
I had actually typed out a long, well written reply to this, but accidentally hit the back button before posting. Coming back though, i realize it is not worth it to type it all out again. You assume that the extent of my experience comes from a single example I gave. You pay no attention to anything else I have said, Nor the fact that i prefaced that statement with a broader statement. You assume that because I am a guy, I experience no pressure from society when it comes to personal grooming, or appearance, and in doing so, you also assume that i could never understand the victimization of women on this issue. There is no point to typing this out anymore, this isn't open discussion. You have simply stated that the flaw lies not withing my argument, but the fact that you feel I lack the knowledge or experience to make that argument. This sort of straw-man argument you are presenting does not open the path for healthy discussion. 
Do people not review benefits when choosing a job? No one is forcing employees to work for a company that doesn't provide what they need. If it is a medical necessity to have something besides one of the 16 out of 20 birth control options that HL does cover, then find an insurance provider/discount card that will help you. It is what people do with other types of medical expenses- especially dental and optical coverage. 
&gt; Its based on their religious beliefs you know the ones protected in the constitution.  I'm sorry, where exactly in the constitution does it say that a business gets its religious freedom as a higher priority than a human being's right to receive medication?  Businesses don't need religious freedom. People do.
The very funny thing is that the further away you get from saying that corporations are people, the stronger you have to look to the controlling interests behind it as the "real" rights-bearing subject, and they are people with rights. 
Yeah i touched on that in other comments i just never edited the main post about it. However it still falls under the same category as what I mentioned
[deleted]
Pressuring women to quit, and boycotting their stores are both pretty terrible solutions. The whole point is that we don't want to put the women who work there into dire straits.  The ruling cannot be overturned unless the actual law changes. All that the courts did is make this part of the law unenforceable.  A public option is the only way to go. As long as Obamacare stands, there is now no way to ensure that health costs for women are kept in check if their employer doesn't want to help.
I agree, it's not ok. But it's not helpful to misconstrue their position and attack a strawman. So I'm trying to help people be clearer, so that we can form better arguments against them. 
You remember hearing about those stories about the dad leaving his wife down the road for a dude, your waiting for this to happen to you.
That's fair and I completely agree that people should always seek out the objective truth to better inform their decisions and stances on issues.  But the OP never mentioned the supreme court decision, and I'm not seeing a whole lot of chatter in the thread about it.  A lot of what I see is a discussion about the best way to get their message across.  You're bringing the supreme court issue in yourself, and then aggressively arguing against it.  Even though you say "yell and scream all you want as its your constitutional right", the tone of your post makes it come across as less than genuine.
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
I don't want to judge anyone else's lifestyle choices, but this makes me *really* uncomfortable.  It's so entrenched in traditional gender roles in a really mercenary, really icky way.  I can see why it might appeal to someone on both sides, but ... I'm really uncomfortable with the idea.
Guess what?  It takes two to get pregnant - of course men are affected by contraception decisions.   It drives me crazy when people think this is only a women's problem.  
I think that's how the 'privilege' conversation usually goes, yes.
Women looking for "Sugar Daddies" will only validate men who have archaic ideas about women being the inferior sex.
Removed
Zygote, not embryo
It's Plan-B and all IUD's, as either type can stop implantation of a fertilized egg.  It says that a for-profit company can refuse to cover any type of birth control that prevents fertilization, and that non-profits can refuse to cover all birth control methods.
Preventing implantation with an IUD is not abortion. A blastocyst is not "a human life" that removes a woman's right to control her own pregnancy.
The plan B pill is only advertised as being effective within 72 hours of intercourse. As far as I'm aware, it takes anywhere from one day to several days for the egg to become fertilized, and longer for it to attach to the uterus. If the egg isn't even fertilized by the time you take the pill, there was no potential baby in the first place.   Plus, my BCBS insurance doesn't cover IUDs  as far as I'm aware. I'm planning on dropping $600 soon for one at Planned Parenthood.
Incorrect.  They are indeed paying for condoms and birth control.  Why are all these people pissed off?  Good question. They don't know either.
A company has morals but its forming members don't have to have them at all... I see what you did there. 
It's unfair that you should get hate because of the right to voice your opinion. Don't let it get to you though. It seems that over sites like reddit and the like, anonymity breeds hostility. Some people are shitty and that is their problem to handle and not to attack others.
[deleted]
Tell that to incredibly low-paid women getting jobs in tiny little towns in the middle of nowhere. There's few reasons you would take that job unless you WERE financially forced. Poor women can't just fucking shop around for medical insurance any more than they can pay for Yoga classes.
I agree about the boycott. My only thought is, Christians believe (as stated in the new testament) that doing the right thing will cause you problems in this world, that doing the right thing will cause people to hate you, or the world to turn their backs on you- and that's a good thing. As a Christian you WANT all the pagan baby killers and immoral fornicators to turn their backs on you. So, I guess just keep that in mind if you do write letters; keep in mind that some things you write may just enforce some of the narrow mindedness rather than help to broaden it. Be tactful. Good luck ladies.  p.s. I would also like to mention, I don't take issue with the supreme court protecting the religious freedoms of business owners or the american people. I just wish that more Americans (especially religious ones) would get on board with educating and supporting women rather than trying to control them and condemning them when they refuse to be controlled. The fact that this is even an issue is frustrating.
To call this a brain-damaged analogy would be an insult to people with brain damage.
I second this. I keep them in the bathroom in case stuff like this happens 
So when I talk about my personal experience it's definitely not relevant to the subject, so why doesn't someone who has a PhD and never been where I have been explain to me what my experiences really mean, and how they actually impacted me.  I'm sure he knows better than I do.
so how is hobby lobby interfering with a women's right to birth control? I don't think they fired people for using birth control, and I'm also 99% sure they provide most types of birth control to their employees. They did not want to provide abortion inducing drugs for religious reasons, but they did provide birth control. Also I've seen a few people say that they have been boycotting hobby lobby since this started, and I'm sorry to be nit pickey but they have never offered these drugs on their health insurance. I know for a fact if hobby lobby fired an employee for having an abortion that employee would have a helluva law suit. I just do not understand why this is such a big issue for people. Hobby Lobby doesn't employee slave labor. A employee is free to change jobs if they don't agree with their policies. I hope I don't get down voted too much for this :D
[deleted]
Thanks. Yeah is it that bad? I have no perspective. 
I don't like it. That's mostly because I first became aware of the term when some random internet asshole accused me of doing it. It don't think it's even possible to talk over someone on the internet (it's not like you can interrupt them). And I don't explain things to make people feel stupid,  but I do like to explain the things I've said to make myself more clear. When I asked the RIA to explain how the term was applicable, they just told me to look it up. That wasn't very helpful and it's left a very negative association for me. I almost hate this woman just because she made the word up, as ridiculous as that sounds.
this is a naive over simplification. of course i don't think people should all go out and get cosmetic surgery - but you are deluded if you don't think physical appearance has an impact on self-esteem - both negatively and positively. 
I can understand why many women get abortions, and that for some it is heartbreaking, and I understand that, to many of those providing abortions or advocating for the "right" to them, they feel they are doing the right thing by helping women choose what is best for themselves.  But...The things you mentioned regarding having a baby with Downs (additional medical costs and care, etc.) are just as real for a woman who has a newborn with Down Syndrome. She might ask if she can emotionally handle it, if she's financially prepared, if adoption would be too emotionally difficult, etc.   And there are some (not many, but some, like Peter Singer, professor of bioethics at Princeton) who consider newborns to be less than full persons. There was actually an article published a couple years ago in the Journal of Medical Ethics regarding "after birth abortion." It reads like pro-life satire, but it's not. From the abstract:  "By showing that (1) both fetuses and newborns do not have the same moral status as actual persons, (2) the fact that both are potential persons is morally irrelevant and (3) adoption is not always in the best interest of actual people, the authors argue that what we call ‘after-birth abortion’ (killing a newborn) should be permissible in all the cases where abortion is, including cases where the newborn is not disabled.  Now if it were true that the newborn is not a person, I believe the mother would be perfectly justified in euthanize her newborn with Down Syndrome. Or, her newborn without Down Syndrome, it doesn't really matter. Would you agree?  And you could argue-easily-that opposing legal infanticide is imposing your beliefs on others. Because that's exactly what it is.  The thing is, not every belief about when the young human being gains the same rights and moral status as older humans, is equally valid and logical. Just as all the sets of discriminatory critera that sought to exclude blacks, women, the mentally handicapped, etc. from full moral personhood were not equally valid. We throw the faulty and unethical criteria away as our civilization advances, and our definition of personhood becomes more and more inclusive. But we're still leaving out the youngest members of our society.   Regarding the baby being an autonomous individual at viability...I think there's an important distinction to be made between "autonomous" and "self-sufficient." The baby is an individual human being whose development is directed from within, from the very earliest point. The level of dependency and helplessness of that human being is usually higher for human beings pre-viability, that's all. (Although some born humans are also highly dependent, e.g. those on respirators or feeding tubes, preemies in the NICU, etc.)  All living organisms need to be in a place where they can get adequate nutrition, oxygen, and energy to go on living and developing. The only difference between you and a 20 week fetus is that the fetus is more limited than you are in how he or she can get those things. So are preemies in the NICU or people on respirators. Someone who is acclimated to getting enough oxygen in high elevations is less limited than someone who's lived at sea level all their life, and so on. But everyone is equally alive, and equally an individual.  Plus, the point of viability hinges on current medical technology, and it’s getting earlier as time goes on. It also varies from place to place. Does it make any sense to say that the point at which human beings becomes individuals with rights is getting earlier as technology advances? Are 10 week fetuses currently non-persons, but if we develop artificial wombs, then they will be? Are 24 week fetuses babies now, but in 1700 they were just clumps of tissue? That's seems pretty nonsensical to me.  Anyway, sorry again for writing so much. I'm not very good at being concise. 
The science they used to present their case is off base, the products don't induce an abortion,  they prevent a fertilized egg from adhering to the uterine wall. That's not a D&amp;C, that's not stopping a heartbeat,  that's not abortion.   Edit: aca is making the mandate for a "everyone gets all options" so as I understand this, it forces HL to carry these on their existing plan from now on. 
That may very well be how you think but it isn't how I think. 
&gt;maybe people should take responsibility for their own actions and then we wouldnt need lots of kinds of insurance  I meant this, I wasn't talking about health insurance.  I was talking about the other kinds of insurance. 
Because I need birth control for my fucked up reproductive system to stop trying to turn my ovaries into hand grenades. A dude's bruised ego that he only gets a semi is vanity, not medically necessitated. Why do I have to fight for my health,  but prideism has yet to be questioned by the people running this ship? 
This submission was removed:  /r/askwomen would be a better venue for this post.    [2X FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/wiki/faq) | [2X Rules](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/wiki/rules) | [reddiquette](/wiki/reddiquette) | [reddit's rules](/wiki/rules)
If you think this ends with Birth control and Hobby lobby...   I hope you are right...   However, what's likely is that further down the line this decision is now that a corporate claim of "faith" is not a loophole to break any law  or get exemptions form any other requirements of law for doing business.   Accidentally (through negligence) dumped dangerous chemicals into the drinking water for parts of 3 states....claim religious exemption to responsibility for the damage done.   What happens down the road when a company decided they don't think they believe in Modern Medicine, and their employees  don't need ANY insurance (or even fair wages so they can purchase their  own) because "god will take care of the deserving..."   It's about MONEY,and breaking a piece of legislation that actually HELPS a lot of  people (not as much as Single Payer would though)...with forcing the business owner's claimed religious practice on their employees.  At the same time their retirement fund is heavily invested in the same exact drugs and medical devices. and some that clearly ARE abortion drugs when the now uncovered birth control was a much different thing entirely.)
If you want opinions from feminists, you could try [one of the feminist subreddits.](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/wiki/related_links_and_discussions) TwoXC does not want to become the number one place for men to ask women what they think, so I'm afraid I cannot approve your post. 
[deleted]
When I was 19 I cut off my hair (between my shoulder blades) for the short/wavy style that [Elizabeth Taylor](http://images.askmen.com/photos/elizabeth-taylor/elizabeth-taylor-19203.jpg) rocked for a while. I love it, EVERYONE was nuts over how cute it was, I was so happy. Then... Then my mother saw it and burst into tears, she then went on a rant about how stupid it looked. Everyone else (including teachers) would go on and on about how amazing it looked on me but for these types of mothers it's about having control, especially if it's something they don't have (pretty long curly hair).   I told her to shut her mouth but it still stuck with me and I let it grow out. 
A few of them.   If they're already dead when you box them.   Not all, mind you.
Do they take donations from overseas?   I'm in the UK but it makes me feel sick to my stomach the way women are treated in the US when it comes to reproductive health. We're lucky to have the options here but it's unfair that so many others don't.
Isn't this a really sexist term? 
[deleted]
I think it sets a dangerous precedent. When an employer's religious views are allowed to trump his employees' access to a complete range of medical services, the system has failed us. More exceptions are certain to follow.
That's because Viagra is used for both men and women as a blood pressure medication. Everyone always makes this argument without knowing the legitimate reasons why this medication may be prescribed besides erectile dysfunction. 
Thank you for the services you provide. I love everything your organization does for women. Thank you so much
I don't get the whole buzz around hobby lobby. The arguments against them are usually wrong (it is simply not true, that they forbid the morning after pill - they just don't want to pay for it). In Switzerland (you know: a country where everybody has health care) you have to pay for it yourself as well. It is like 60 USD.  You want to do with your body what you want? Fine! You want everybody to pay for it? Look: I am free to drink a bottle of Whiskey tonight. But I should not expect from the community that they pay for the Alka-Seltzer. So if you want to have sex without using contraception, that is your decision (unless we are talking about rape - which is not the case). But why should everybody else have to pay for it? And it is not even expensive: if you are careless, you have to face the consequences: 60 USD does seem a pretty low consequence.  So now you can have another view on the things. But getting a morning after pill payed is not a human right. I needed to pay for condoms as well and now I pay half of the costs for contraception for my girlfriend. I see no reason why others should have to pay for it! And even if you think everybody should pay for it: what hobby lobby is doing here is not outrages at all! There is so much stuff going wrong in the world and you guys/girls focus on this??!!  TL;DR: Please explain someone to me why it is outrages that a couple has to pay 60USD for a morning after pill!
I don't know the story but as a former business owner myself, I sure hope you got the story from the owner/founder and not a gotcha type journalist.
Yeeep. Some people drop their whole personalities to be a 'mom.' I bet the coolest moms are the ones who keep their independent lives while also being parents.  Also, ignore people who say 'you'll change once you're a mother!' those people were lame &amp; goalless to begin with
Hahahaha right? Shouldn't we take advantage of the fact that our lady parts are getting real medical attention too? We're not just diagnosed with hysteria and given quaaludes. 
As a queer woman: very possible. Would do something like this.
That doesn't make sense. Thats like saying if they are against abortions they should leave America.
Hey, it sucks that you feel that way. I totally know what its like to have self confidence issues. Fun stories about that but thats for another time haha :) We definitely grow into our looks. I have really squinty eyes and for me it was a matter of finding out about the right mascaras and such. You don't need make up to be beautiful but it definitely helps bring out your good features. On the dating aspect, you would be surprised about who gets dates. There is this girl and I'm going to sound like a bitch but shes got terrible skin, greasy hair and is quite large. Shes a teenager so that sort of stuff is expected but shes been in a relationship for years. I would consider myself a very plain sort of pretty and I've only ever had one non creepy guy interested in me. If you ever want to talk, pm me. You shouldn't feel disgusting as a person because your self worth isn't based on how attractive you are :) But seriously, pm me if you want to talk xoxox
Right in the genitals! 
&gt; What exactly that means I can't say, but it seems they focused on the 'least restrictive' part as there where other forms available.  It was either allow HL to not provide those 4 options, or they fail to meet the ACA standards and pay half a billion a year in fines for failure to comply.
I haven't actually, didnt know that was a sub. Ill check it out 
Do they all speak to each other in that way? Or just you? It doesn't make it OK if they do but some people get this idea it is somehow in the "culture" of a workplace to act like that. They need to be told very clearly, either directly by you or from HR that this is not to be tolerated. Stay strong as they may start instead with snide comments or call you "touchy". If so, you can tell them categorically that you do not appreciate that either.
Lots of people try and explain things, men do it to other men, women do it to other women. Sometimes it is useful or desired, other times not. Can men not give a woman advice without it being smeared as "mansplaining"? What if a woman tried to give advice to a man somewhere stereotypically they may not know their way around, like a ladies' section of a department store? Is that OK?
[deleted]
Not to nit-pick, but every corporation that isn't publicly traded is a privately held company.  Hobby Lobby is both a privately held company and a closely held corporation.  I'm not sure where you got the idea that "private company" can't be a corporation.
Planned Parenthood (at least where I'm from) does quite a lot, actually. Appointments can be made within a week and there is a sliding scale if you can't afford what's needed. (personally, I think the government should offer free IUDs and Implanon for people who are willing to get it. On an entirely different note - the idea that we shouldn't do something because "that's a lot more effort" is completely ridiculous. We SHOULD be doing the thing that will actually make a difference instead of taking shots at a group of people's stupid opinions.
Perhaps more matter of fact but just as indicting.  You can't really sugarcoat statements like that.  The joke about rape of young boys was also illuminating.
Call your insurance company.  Whenever I go to my local analog of PP, my **free** STD tests come back as bills simply because of *how* they're billed.  It's likely a billing issue and you can insist on it being fixed.
Folding bicycle, with a bag you can put it in, to take on the bus. 
[deleted]
Nope. Companies with more than 50 employees can either provide affordable insurance to their fulltime employees, or pay a fee equivalent to $2000 per year per employee.   The fee helps fund the financial assistance that makes private health insurance more affordable for those with lower incomes who don't have an employer-supplied plan. 
Oh never mind, I didn't realize viagra doesn't turn you on. It just affects the blood going to your penis, right?  I guess  that is comparable to lube then.  Does their insurance cover lubricants?  just kidding...
This is a poor comment. Really bad logic. By similar logic: If we are really against women's suffering, and are really serious about ending overwhelming obvious sexism, we shouldn't send aid to/buy goods from/talk to/associate with the UAE/India/Sierra Leone/any country that treats women poorly.   This is not even getting into the fact that not buying stuff from China is infeasible for a lot of companies.  There are better ways to take a stance against Hobby Lobby. 
&gt; A woman can have sex with any man of comparable physical attractiveness at any time she desires.   You actually believe this? That it's that easy for women? It's not.   And I can't speak for other women but I'm not the "spend money on me and maybe we'll have sex with you" type. Unless you're talking about women that want to get to know you first, but that's a little different from "requiring upfront costs". 
I'm poor and on Medicaid. Let me tell you it sucks. Imagine having health insurance going to the doctor and asking if they will run some blood tests to see if you have an auto-immune disorder, only to have the doctor refuse and lecture you about how someone has to pay for the tests and they can't just go testing things willy nilly. That happened to me last week, so despite having Medicaid I'm still in a position to have to pay for blood tests out of pocket if I want to know what is making me sick.   I can only imagine what I'd be going through right now if I were trying to get birth control. Having Medicaid rarely means that you'll receive even adequate treatment. 
&gt;...functionally retarded as well as arrogant in their ignorance.  Nice. 
The link in blue details them. I'm sure I can find you a Kaiser run-down, too, though. Kaiser's done some *amazing* ACA documentation work to help keep us informed.  Hold please.
As an HR professional, my first thought was "What is going to happen when all of their employees have to take their lawful 12 weeks leave of absence per FMLA after they all get pregnant?" haha I know silly thought but it's the first thing that popped into my head. 
Ok then, you tell us if there's anything else in the relationship. I'm sure there is...  You're letting your imagination run wild. Honestly, the person who is shaking the card tower is you. Just relax and have patience while you talk things through with him about your very legitimate issue.
Isn't it a bit selfish to force someone to endure pain (and countless other issues) because you believe in something written in a book 2000 years ago?  It is significantly more selfish force a women to bear the emotional and physical burden of giving birth to a child (not even to begin the potential financial and societal issues), when she might have elected to have it aborted at a much earlier date due to a book someone apparently wrote 2000 years ago.  Invoking any definition of "selfish" when you are removing the rights of another individual to make a decision about their own body is pretty much the most hypocritical argument I've ever seen.
I didn't. What's the point in responding to someone who's opinions come from the church?
Its my understanding that Plan B is a double dose of a hormone similar to the one used in BCPs.   Its use and dosage is only appropriate for *emergency contraception*. I think its use as a regular contraceptive is not favored. Its way expensive and it has some pretty harsh side effects. 
Well this is really depressing and makes me feel shitty. 
Only full-time employees.  You'd be hard-pressed to find a full time employee at a store like a Hobby Lobby, unless they're in management.  Even before the ACA, many businesses kept employees under 30 hours a week because there are already a handful of benefits that had to be offered to full-timers.  But they just want to pick on health care, so that's the one that they whine about having to fire employees for.  Yeesh.
[deleted]
[deleted]
If you had asked before you were mistreated I'd say go to the family. Family is important and the tradition that matters is getting together. But they mocked your son? No, that is not at all acceptable.  And your mom needs help.  
I think they meant maternity leave, not pregnancy.
[deleted]
Sure it adds up. The idea is that the sex is earned, that the male in question deserves it over other males. They want women to not only want them at a drop of a hat, but simultaneously not want other men. It's not really a paradox.  Also, obligatory sexist joke about women and math.
You can buy the morning after pill at Target, here in Michigan, it's about $40 and you just pick it up right off the shelf.  I don't think OTC stuff is generally covered by insurance anyway?  At least I've never had insurance that has such coverage.  
When did the paradigm shift occur roughly?
[deleted]
[deleted]
I love sex. I'd say about a quarter of my women friends(2/8) want more sex than their men. About half have found a balance. And the last quarter feels their men have a bigger sex drive. Small sample, but seems pretty even.  When it comes to having sex with new people, women have a lot of social stigma for having sex "too freely" which can limit their long-term dating options. On "the subreddit that must not be named," they commonly talk about how an overly sexual women is someone to have sex with, and never someone to actually date. At the same time, men are pressured to have sex from an early age and glorified for having as much casual sex as possible.   Until that stigma goes away for women, and men stop being socially conditioned to feel like their sexuality determines their manliness, it seems like apples and oranges to compare how women and men act in the dating scene towards sex.   In the Kama Sutra, women are supposedly the horny, insatiable gender. Someone else mentioned this was the case just a hundred years or so for women in England. It makes me wonder how much culture can affect how this plays out. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
&gt;Furthermore, I've often heard the adage "men have sex when they can. Women have sex when they want." As if we simply need to seductively point at a random man who will willingly and immediately fall to his knees and satiate our raging ladyboners.  Another variation on that adage is that "men think with their dicks". Both totally ignore the fact that the statements about men are simply not true.  I've been approached by women in ways that it was obvious that they wanted to have sex, and I have turned them down, many times, even when I've been single. If it were true, almost every guy would be cheating on their partners to have sex.  I think men who say that women only have sex "when they want" are delusional and themselves incapable of satisfying a woman, so they project that onto the entire gender.  That adage is really just sexist propaganda that perpetuates falsehoods about both sexes.  &gt;Or am I wrong?  No.
[deleted]
This. I wasn't able to orgasm from sex until I learned how to orgasm from masturbation. Makes sense when you think about it - practice makes perfect!
I like that cat comparison. Thank you for that.  I'm 18 but I'm in high school. I hope to get a job after I graduate and move out, appropriately.
What they provide and don't provide doesn't really matter.  What matters is that Hobby Lobby is forcing its religious views on its employees.  I think this is less a women issue (although it does effect mostly women in ways that have been previously stated) and more a freedom of religion issue.  Two people (the owners of the company) should not be able to effectively tell thousands of other people what to do by saying insurance can't cover it.
straight men try too hard. I'm gay and before I came out I found it easy to please a woman. I didn't have to manipulate her, I just had to treat her like a human being should be treated and like any other friend. I never liked sex with a female though. I have loved a woman, but never like a man should love a woman. biromantic homosexual.  sorry for posting here as a male :p found this on /r/all
[deleted]
Put yourself in the place of the small business owners. They have a few employees, only a couple of whom are full time. This guy was a full time employee at a local toy store who harassed parents on the Internet in his spare time, with his name and place of work easily accessible.   Yeah, if he were posting to a workout group and shitting on fat people, or posting to an art group and making fun of their work, that's unrelated to where he works. No one would care if they thought "who is this asshole" and clicked through his profile. However, parents would care that he works at a toy store where he interacts with kids and parents all the time. 
[deleted]
&gt;As if we simply need to seductively point at a random man who will willingly and immediately fall to his knees and satiate our raging ladyboners.  To be fair, there is *some* grain of truth in this. There was a study done on a college campus where strange women would approach strange men (and vice versa) and proposition them. The men were *far* more likely to accept the offer than the women were.  Women have to worry more about the consequences of sex (namely pregnancy), so I think it makes us less likely as a whole to jump in bed with a stranger (even if he's attactive).  But your post is pretty spot on. Yes, women actually DO want sex. It's almost as if we're human.
A perfect example of how *both* men and women vary in their sexual experience and desires.  Some women want a lot of sex, and some men do not.  The stereotype that men always want sex and women never do is just silly when you actually stop and think about everyone as a human being with unique and individual experiences. 
"I'm rejected by my wife for no good reason, but I don't believe a man could reject a woman for no good reason."  It sounds like your marriage has some issues you need to work on. They don't have anything to do with OP's issue, but they do need to be taken care of.
[deleted]
god damn hobby lobby is like dog shit ... its everywhere
And that's cool if you never say it. But I have heard it said, and I don't think it's a good idea to pass it off or ignore it as 'soothing the male ego' rather than pointing out just what a ridiculous thing it is to say in the first place.
This didn't happen.
you think the male ego is fragile? try turning a girl down. they go out of their fucking minds.
&gt; The women PAY FOR that insurance.  And women who don't use birth control and men. Women who use birth control pills only pay part of the money given to insurance companies. The law forces all women who don't use the pill and all men to contribute towards paying for birth control pills for the women that do use it. So the law is forcing other people to help pay for their birth control.   As far as the viagra thing, it's a red herring. It doesn't change the fact of the matter that the government is forcing those who don't use birth control pills to pay for them. It's not forcing insurance companies to cover viagra.  
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
It's ok, honey. Almost everybody has HPV. She could have been exposed years ago and it just now presented itself. Or If you had any previous partners before her (even one) she could have gotten it from you. It takes a long time to show up after a person is infected, so it's next to impossible that she cheated on you, contracted it and started showing symptom in the month you were gone.
Men do tend to turn almost anything into a competition.
Language is fluid, face it. If everyone is using the word wrong, it becomes right! Thats just how language works.
Legally they're supposed to. And it used to be that way. Now they get an exception because of a recent ruling by the Supreme Court.  According to the Supreme Court, a corporation doesn't have to provide IUDs and other contraception to their employees if they are morally against it, but they still get all the tax benefits of providing full health insurance. 
Hobby Lobby doesn't offer paid maternity leave anyway. 
What bandwagon? What women? And most importantly, why is it relevant to the discussion? It wasn't even coherent for the most part.
Yeah, you're completely wrong. You got it right with your last couple sentences when you came to terms with reality.    Edit: ok, how do you explain the millions of men in sexless relationships? The women want to have sex, just not with the man in their life? Where do you think the stereotypes about sex during marriage came from?
Okay.  Just try not to assume the worst.
In academic circles , yes. As I've said above , I've heared nobody use the word "satyriasis" outside of academic papers.
Okcupid did a great little report on this. Women are pickier than men. So unless a man is an 8/10 or above his average for success in the dating world is pretty poor. A small select group of men have greater access to sex. Women do not face this problem, its a fairly even distribution for attractiveness and access to relationships.  So I don't think men really think that women don't want to have sex. Men just know that if you're average you're at a disadvantage.
[deleted]
Thanks for the detailed answer.  Were either of you using any kind(s) of birth control around the time you got  married? That is, was the first pregnancy unplanned?  Also, did you two ever discuss what would happen if the birth control failed? How did those discussions go?
&gt;sorry ladies, it's how we're wired.  Oh how I would love to be able to crumple up and throw away this small-minded "my perspective is everybody's perspective" comment.
So when does someone have the right to say something outside of the scope of their employment as to not be detrimental to their well being? Never? That's bullshit. 
&gt; Some are like crepe paper. Some are firm like berries.  How poetic. I'm going to serenade my boyfriend tonight with this xD
Manipulate? Bitch please.
Well, it's a damn good thing that penises and vaginas are not keys and keyholes.
Who determines if it is reputable? United States courts appear to believe it is reputable and that is good enough for me. Language is fluid and you refuse to acknowledge that. Just because your favorite dictionary moves slow doesn't mean language keeps the same slow pace.
Where I live, you need written permission from everyone on the lease to be terminated from the lease. Unless there's reason for eviction, I'm pretty sure this is the only possible way to do it. Edit: Unless you both decide to move out and terminate your lease early.  My friend just had this issue with this with his ex-girlfriend. Their landlord was sympathetic but there was nothing he could legally do to help my friend out of the toxic living situation (which he's still in until their lease is up in November) and my friend didn't want to leave because he didn't want to be taken to court for any damages she's done or might do to the property while his name's still on the lease.   When is your lease up? Would he be willing to find another roommate to take your place/your half of rent?
[deleted]
That kind of comment makes me think you are the type of person that ONLY has sex for procreation purposes, right? And of course, you've never masturbated since that's a sin and also isn't serving the cause of procreation. Right? Right?
I HAV ballsak. can we go get a pie. in BEDROOM, i will show u my ballsacks. u like??
Why should a company you work for pay for your birth control pills? My company doesn't pay for my condoms. 
&gt; He had a low sex drive (I'm talking sex once every 2 weeks, despite the fact that we lived together)  Lol that's a *low* sex drive? My gf has been pissed off with me lately for my low libido. Normally I would be pretty happy with once a month, but for her sake I've been working at it and I've managed to get up to about once or twice every two weeks. I thought that was pretty decent...
It's healthcare, in general, that they don't want to pay for. Birth control was the low hanging fruit. The whole idea is to make Obamacare look like a failure.  It's a cycle that we see over-and-over throughout history. The government introduces a new program. Then every opposing body does everything they can to make it fail. If the latter group is successful, the legislation will be scrapped. If they're smart (which they are), then they'll push new legislation through (suiting their agenda) at the same time.
Two ways to not have a slut in idiot judgmental guy world.  1.  Girl sleeps with no one 2. Girl sleeps with you  Women judge too of course.
Agree with you 100%
Thanks that's very interesting! 
Really enjoyed this, sadly because I can relate so much.  Especially the bored part, it's the worst to be bored.
Preeeeetty sure that I'm gaining and losing karma for my posts here.
All you need to do is look at a dating site to see that their is a very large grain of truth in the idea that women can have sex when they want, and men can have sex when they can.  http://www.huffingtonpost.com/2012/06/29/okcupid-profile-picture-experiment_n_1638322.html  Just one of the many articles on this very topic. As soon as it is known a woman is available... if she is attractive she gets the hotdog effect. (insert the mildly funny gif now.)  An attractive male might get a few brave approaches... but culturally women still are trained to not initiate. Call it what you will (insert buzzword) but women on average are simply not as aggressive as men when it comes to finding that evenings booty call. (on average)  I mean look at advice #1 -&gt; 3  all basically say... be on a pedestal http://thoughtcatalog.com/kristina-zias/2014/02/6-things-about-dating-every-single-girl-needs-to-know/  Heaven forbid you are into the guy and want to talk to him and want to take him home because, getting laid is fun.  I actually took time trying to find articles about how to let guys know you are available to be talked to.... most articles ended up being PUA crap instead of female positive "Go talk to a guy and stop being so standoffish"  Best article I could find on "stop being so standoffish".... which is still full of PUA advice... only for women instead of men.  http://www.hookingupsmart.com/2011/10/05/relationshipstrategies/how-to-let-a-man-know-youre-interested/  Now... "wanting to fuck" does take in account your attractiveness... If you are a 3-4... your chances of nailing that 7-10 you have your eye on is... slim.  However the same goes for males.   The only person who can misrepresent your sexuality is.. you.    If you want to get laid, simply let it be known. Someone will take you up on the offer. If that person meets your "list" of requirements in a sexual partner is a different matter.  Don't believe me... make an online dating profile with your only information being "i want to get laid, no strings attached"  Prepare for creep factor 12... but you will get some messages from someone within your attractiveness range who you would probably enjoy a hay tumble with.  Just remember. They are responding to sex, not personality. They won't care who you are as a person... but if its just sex, why do you care who they are as a person? 
Ooooh, biotruths, fun.  Listen up mate, I crave sex too. I still wouldn't make an active choice to have bad sex. My sex drive is still extremely healthy. 
Language is a constantly changing thing. If you fail to see that people use old words differently and create new ones before the old dictionaries are updated, then there's nothing more for me to say. Its like you're trying to make 'fetch' catch on. Satyriasis is not going to happen.  http://www.google.com/trends/explore#q=nymphomaniac%2C%20satyriasis&amp;cmpt=q
Men and women are exactly alike.  There can be a super horny female (and not be a slut/whore, etc) and there can be a guy who doesn't want sex that often.  Chemical levels, personal experiences, and overall philosophies on life, love, and people are all influences on our libido.  Many view sex as the ultimate goal of physical delight with another and try to do what is necessary to make the other's pants drop.  And there are people who value this feeling to only allow it to be shared so often so they don't tarnish the feeling. This rant/question(s) really focuses more on why men and women are unnecessarily perceived as being different.  It is a typical story we see in magazines and TV shows/movies that teach the audience a very pigeonholed view of the opposite sex.  Then the audience starts to separate and define the opposite sex as having certain roles in society and relationships.  Women withhold sex to get what they want.  Guys have to ask girls out and work for it to get laid.  
It's hard to explain. I can understand why you can't understand this problem. Another topic and yet related: female genitale mutilation is done by mothers and female healers. They know best the damage that is done by that, and yet they do it, because ... well. It was always done like that, and what would the neighbours think? It's the same way of thinking. Only in this age of anonymous cities without supervision by elders, neighbours, family and religion can we start shedding the old ways of thinking and doing things. Only for the past 20 or 30 years there were mothers who wouldn't point to a, well, extravagantly dressed woman and hiss "slut" with their own children within earshot. That's where this bias comes from. It's not taught in schools, but in churches, side glances, actions.   Sorry if I can't clarify better, I struggle with both the vocabulary and the difficulty of explaining something that is more felt than realized.
As a man this thread really interests me. I have been in a relationship for a while but we haven't had sex in over 9 months. When I asked her about it she said that   "I just don't feel like I need it, has nothing to do with you I still love you and still want to be with you, I just feel like Liz Lemon"  She has said before that girls just inherently don't have the sex drives men do, and that it's hard for her to get worked up or turned on if she's not already in the mood. So it's insightful to read all of this. Thank you TwoX! 
[deleted]
&gt;Ok, so stop supporting the shitting employer-funded model. Not hard.  I don't.  I've been an opponent of the ACA for quite some time now.  But I'm also not so *foolish* to suggest that we are going to change it any time soon, so when matters such as this come up I do my part in pointing out how freaking stupid a decision this is.  &gt;Oh, like the SCOTUS ruling?  And mark my words, in a year or two there will be a challenge to this ruling by some non-majority religious group that wants to ignore the law because of some fringe belief that the five old men who dealt a blow to women's rights yesterday are going to fear would infringe upon *their* rights or beliefs, and when that times comes they're either going to have to overturn yesterday's ruling or apply it so broadly that no laws have any meaning anymore because they can be ignored by someone who professes a "sincere religious belief" (a term that doesn't actually mean anything, mind you).
Why are guys so complicated, too?  I mean, they want sex, but many of them will demean the person they might have a chance of having sex with, or shame someone who might be available.  They make it more risky, not less.    As for me -- I wish I knew.  If I could flip a switch and have my clit work like the manual says it should, I'd be having multiple orgasms all the way to the bank, right?  As it is, I'm not entirely sure I've ever had one.
I specifically said "if he is just being naive rather than malicious, he deserves a chance to learn from his mistakes."
Do women want sex?  I think this heavily heavily depends on the guy.  I know this comes off as being very one sided, as though women can't decide if they want sex without a guy.  But bear with me I have good explanation (or at least I think I do)  Guys by in large are wired to need sex.  Can we live without it? Yes of course.  But generally speaking we have an innate need for it.  The best way I can explain it is when you have a strong need to stretch.  You always do.  Can you go without stretching when you really feel the need to? Yes, but its soooooo much better when you do.  As for women, my experience has taught me that while they want and enjoy sex, they don't necessarily have that same level of need as men.    Ok enough talking, why do women depend on men to want sex?  Because if a man is exceedingly good at intimacy, affection, love, sensuality and sex, a woman will want it sometimes more than a guy.  If the guy is by in large terrible at all those things, a woman would gladly do without.   This is of course speaking of heterosexual relationships.  I can't offer much insight into female homosexual relationships.  But I imagine its not too far off for them too.  :)
Great.  Nobody should *legally* be able to stop you from accessing affordable healthcare.
I completely agree that FGM is detrimental to women. It's a horrible practice.  My point is that by realizing our culture isn't perfect maybe it will give us more sensitivity when talking to survivors of FGM.  Telling someone 'this is wrong, you're sick' isn't productive. Explain WHY it's inhumane. That's all I'm asking.  You're right you didn't say anything bad. A lot of comments in here are just slamming these poor women for undergoing FGM. They don't realize that it's so ingrained in their culture. It takes education and treating them like people to prove that they don't have to agree to FGM. I mean the women who have this done are coming from a culture where women aren't allowed to experience pleasure! You can't just scream at someone that they are horrible for doing this to their daughters. I think explaining why it's wrong and treating them like a human being is the only way to change their minds.
&gt;aims to help men manipulate women into having sex with them.  The horror.   /deadpan
Maybe show him some of these comments here? Not only will he be able to hear your thoughts in a different way, but he will see that you are by no means alone in the way that you feel.
[deleted]
All of those techniques are meant to give men who have felt out of control of their sex life the illusion of control and to bolster their confidence through the rejections that come with seeking romantic partnership.  This is especially true because men are typically expected to be the initiator. The backlash against it is overblown and misguided.  But remember, sex is dirty-icky-nasty-wrong to a large segment of the population, because of some of the common protestant beliefs about sexual morality, regardless of your gender. If you make the choice to indulge sexually, then it's likely that you are predestined for damnation anyway and there is nothing that anyone could do.
I take these for endometriosis. I think you should ask your doctor. I have hot flashes as a side effect, and I've only been taking one pill/day. Over time I think the effects will show themselves, so best to know before hand what you are getting into.
I had HPV 7 years ago (I was 20). I had no symptoms whatsoever. The Dr did tell me if it did not clear up on my next exam then I would need a cervical biopsy. Well, it did not clear up and had the biopsy. It came back negative and the HPV ended up clearing up. It's pretty scary I'll admit but as long as you follow up you should be fine. 
I agree. It's rough out there. But, this is not an imposition. You may have less choices as far as employment goes, but you are not being forced to take this job. That's what 'imposition' means. 
Holy crap, there's so much crazy in the Republican party.  But I think you have some misconceptions about unwanted pregnancies in the US vs UK.  We're pretty close.  http://statinfo.biz/Geomap.aspx?act=2021&amp;lang=2  Canada has 28 abortions per 100 births, UK has 28 abortions per 100 births, US has 29.
Woman here:   I'm pretty much always up for sex with an attractive person...  (given: he's not cheating, he's going to use a condom, std's aren't a factor, he's not going to hurt me, etc)  Heck, I've even had sex with semi-attractive people. 
It does say that they are in my post.
&lt;not sure if sarcasm...&gt;
sigh.... http://lmgtfy.com/?q=chick+fil+ceo+regret
I'd say it's always a gamble.  The type of man who would stop a young woman he sees on the street is either a creep or yes, a genuinely good person.  Most men who want to help wouldn't stop because they wouldn't want to be in the situation of appearing creepy, and would already assume you wouldn't take the help anyway.  Of course it's not right to assume all men aren't trustworthy, but in this type of situation, I think it's probably best to just walk that mile.
Sulu gets it. Why doesn't SCOTUS?
You gotta find where the problems are before you can fix them.
[deleted]
slut shamers...i wish i had gold to give you. 
&gt;Do you know what "impose" means?  Yes.  &gt;Their employees have the choice as to whether they work there or not.  Work at Hobby Lobby or starve is not my idea of "choice".  &gt;Where is this hypothetical land that you invented purely for this argument in which there are no jobs?  The United States of America. We have been in the largest depression that has ever existed on the face of the planet for five years. http://www.dol.gov/  &gt;That's well-written and all, but not reflective or reality in the slightest bit.  I was about to say the same to you. 
you're not. Thats objectifying 
Thank you so much for doing what you do! I've volunteered for PP and they are an awesome organization.
And it is true.    If you have full control over something, the meaning of it is lessened then if you need to ask some one else for that thing.  
calm the shit down. NOT EVERYTHING A GUY SAYS IS A PERSONAL ATTACK ON YOUR WOMAN-HOOD. My best friend is a girl and i refer to her as "hoe" or "bitch" or whatever the fuck and she does THE EXACT SAME THING. Neither of us give a shit what we are called because it doesnt mean anything. Get over it lmfao
My point is that everyone has standards, and the behavior of the "average" man or woman should have no bearing on how we treat individual men or women or expect to be treated by them. Acting as if men are slaves of their biology is harmful in a number of ways.
[deleted]
ACA already has requirements for no-copay, no deductible reproductive servies for women. https://www.healthcare.gov/what-are-my-birth-control-benefits/
Nope. Nope. Nope. I'd be out of there.
That's inhumane. Why should anyone have to pay for any medical treatment?
 Keep the insults out of your comments here.   thanks  
&gt; I'm a moderate with liberal leanings but I fully believe that late term abortions should be illegal except for health of the mother/catastrophically deformed baby exceptions.  They already are in the US.
Then some of us are lucky enough that both is and our significant others admit that we are fuck machines, and compatible ones at that, and it's pretty awesome.
No.
You do realize that birth control is used for other health issues besides becoming pregnant, right?
[deleted]
who said anything about doing nothing?
Yeah it's definitely not across the board.  I'm still shelling out $600/year for my birth control just because it's non-generic.   I wish I could take generic.  :( it'd only be $15 a month.   It's not fair that I'm punished for body chemistry that I have no control over. 
When people are desperate for ANY job.... worker rights should become MORE important, not LESS important. 
The sucky part is that many of my classmates are requires by our school to buy their insurance (or to get their own). What if my school suddenly decides "nope, not covering that?"  It's so easy to say "eh go to a different school" or "go buy your own insurance" but has anyone seen how expensive insurance is? Especially when you're a student?
So she was rude and that justifies you breaking rules? I was trying to read up this comment thread, but you keep sending me rude messages, interrupting.
 &gt;“Not to be sexist, but I don’t think women make very good leaders.”  There’s an example of something that someone isn’t intending to be sexist but it totally is. There’s also subconscious prejudices which can result in sexism without a person even realizing it; like subconsciously taking men’s opinions more seriously than women's. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
This is just my personal preference.  I prefer to have sex at least twice a week.  You and I wouldn't be sexually compatible at all, as I consider having similar sex drives a major part in a relationship.
Is there a reason you are unable to communicate with your man about sharing the cost?
It's not about what you claim it to be about. It's about hating Christianity and hating them for sticking up for their beliefs. Let's not get carried away here. 
[deleted]
Sometimes I want to go for a run. Other times I don't want to at all. I seldom enjoy running when I feel like I have to.  If I don't run I could become unhealthy. If I run too much I could get hurt. I can't run very well when I'm ill.   Some people take running very competitively. Some people run on very rare occasions.  It's very hard to know how often someone goes running, unless they say so.   It's even harder to know what makes someone want to run, or what they think of while running. 
I do have a lot of drama and really want to get away from it!
exactly! A condom is just too unreliable to be the only form of BC IMO. Would love it if men and women had tons of affordable birth control options available to them!
It's definitely true. As I said, the point of my post isn't to attack feminists, but rather to bring attention to how everyone- feminists included- talk about sexuality and gender roles in hurtful, harmful ways. I aimed it at feminists because I think it's important to recognize how *everyone* plays into the blame.
Thanks for the link, can't check right now but I assume it's a video that describes the concept with some level of accuracy.  I mean, regarding OP, of COURSE women want sex. Otherwise, our species would not be here. But women don't want sex ALL the time. (EDIT: SURPRISE, neither do men, which is funny when we get far too drunk to have sex and our manhood is called into question by our drunk partner! lmao) The idea of sexual currency/economics of sex reviews this and (as far as I remember) sort of changes the sexual exchanges as gifts between partners. You can see it as approval of, in addition to attraction to, the other party.  Some men might find this idea intriguing, and try to game the system a little in their favor. I'm not saying it's good or bad - as a matter of fact, it could probably be used for good (guy really likes the girl, tries to influence her to like him more so they can accelerate their relationship beyond his perceived location in the timeline of the relationship) as well as bad (guy just goes around tricking women into thinking he is genuinely interested in them by displaying pro-social cues, sleeps with them, and then never talks to them again, thereby betraying their trust).
Search the sub, there are plenty of women who have talked about their experiences with the implant. From what I've heard, some women who are bleeding constantly have had luck with a short but intense ibuprofen regimen. Others go on mini / low hormone pills to help control the bleeding. New birth control is always a little wacky for the first few months. 
[deleted]
You might be interested in this article: http://www.nytimes.com/2013/05/26/magazine/unexcited-there-may-be-a-pill-for-that.html
No, there is not a section in the application that states an employee cannot purchase contraceptives using their paycheck. There's no way that Hobby Lobby could govern how an employee spends a check.      They do, however, have the potential employee sign to show that they have been informed that HL is an arbitration (it's explained in the application), and that the employee can choose to quit at anytime. 
Lol I'm not saying all generalizations are wrong.  I just think it's amusing that you state in one breath that "all women are different" and "all women are alike."  It's a special level.
What we have here is only one side of a story.  If you think that someone suing another person will give both sides of a fair and balanced story....you need to come back to reality and get away from whatever la-la-land you're living in.
damn!  44% were repeat? 
&gt;Work at Hobby Lobby or starve is not my idea of "choice".  I did not know Hobby Lobby was the sole employer in all of America. You people truly live in dark times. 
I have to bribe my boyfriend to fuck. If I could id do it daily.
[deleted]
Don't dwell on what "you should have done".  You got out of there! You survived! He doesn't control you or your body.   
Ugh, you've made me tear up a bit. Thank you, very much, for your kind thoughts and well wishes. It's really encouraging to find someone truly non-judgmental and supportive. After my experiences, I really buried my memories. Last August, a classmate (in graduate school, for God's sake, does it ever get better?) told me by choosing to not wear a bra I was oversexualizing myself, then proclaimed by not respecting my body I couldn't be a feminist. It really spurned me. I just recently found a therapist, who's helping me deal with the anxiety. I have to learn to deal with the emotions.  Anyway, it sounds like you're talking sorta along the lines of bell hooks, is that right? I strongly identify with her work, and she's definitely one of the forces that's brought me back to thinking about feminism as a construct. If anything, she's the reason I've come back to studying the group, and am considering aligning myself with it again. I have some issues in how this plays out, since I wonder if it's possible for people to remove their own societal standards before interacting with another.   For instance-- and I admit this is not good so please don't attack me too brutally-- I cannot help but feel pity for a woman in a burka. I love that woman and I think I respect her choices, but yet I feel a need to save her. But that's me imposing MY cultural values on somebody. Me, attempting to love that woman, I end up actually oppressing her in a way she may not want. Ya know? I like the idea in theory, and do try to live my life that way, but I can't help but get caught up. Overall, though, I think it could certainly do much more good than harm!! It's an idea that gives me hope. 
[deleted]
I am reading your entire comment, but it would take me all afternoon to address your wrongheaded thinking, and I'm not willing to invest that kind of time.
Not everything that gets reported actually breaks any rules. Not all rule breakers get warnings, often the posts are just removed without notice. 
[deleted]
You accuse me of not arguing scientific fact, and then proceed to say that life begins when a sperm meets an egg?  Seriously?  Pregnancy begins not when a sperm meets an egg, but when a fertilized egg implants in the womb.  There is no pregnancy before that point, regardless of what anyone's belief is.  There is no abortion without a pregnancy, regardless of what anyone's belief is.  The problem with this ruling is that fact - abortion does not happen without actual pregnancy - is being side-stepped in favor of *belief*, which is absolutely insane.
So you don't understand the meaning of a precedent then....
I am currently in a dead bedroom situation with my S.O. We haven't had sex in almost two years. I love him, but this will likely be what breaks us. I wish I had the power to just point and him and *BAM* sex, but nothing is ever that easy, nor should it be.
I find masturbating by myself to be kind of boring, so I almost never do it (like a couple times a year, maybe) but I also really like sex. The result is that I've had a looooot of partners, which were almost all one-offs.  Masturbation isn't as fun or satisfying to me as sex. They're not really connected in my mind.
Skewed?  I don't necessarily think so.  It's whatever you're used to.  My GF and I work all the time, with differing schedules, so we may go a week or two without.  But if we have the day off together, it's like 2-4 times a day.  We both have very high sex drives, and she is considerably younger than me (9 years), but I started late in life.  I feel like I'm making up for lost time (lost my V-Card at 26).  She does typically want it (slightly) more than I do though, but I'm 33 now.  Worried I'm going to break a hip :)  If 5 times a year works for you, so be it.  Everyone's different.  Personally, I couldn't deal with that.  Sex is too much fun.
[deleted]
It's way easier for a man to find a man to have sex with than for a woman to find a man to have sex with. Men just need to lower their standards.
I think that it's fair to associate their actions with feminism is the shitty people are using feminism as an excuse to act shitty. I mean, the overall message in OP's post is that we need to watch out for sexism in the name of feminism. As crusaders against sexism, I think that we should be embracing this.
Yes CHOOSING to have sex is a luxury. It is not a NECESSITY. I guarantee if you are posting to Reddit you have enough money somewhere in your budget for the $30 or so a month it costs to cover the Pill on your own. Don't even try.   Essentially what you see in this comment chain is a heavy sense of entitlement, combined with a lack of self responsibility. "I am entitled to have OTHER people pay for an item that I can easily pay for myself, and that is in the vast majority of cases NOT a necessity...."  And the more militant of the commenters scream... "This is a war on women!!!!!"  *shakes head*
[deleted]
You're obviously missing the point of this entire thread. *People have sex in different quantities.* It doesn't make you strange, as a man, if you only have sex once a month or have sex everyday as a woman. *People are different.* The real world is not so simple; things aren't binary. Everything is a scale. Some people are on the edges, and some are in the middle.    Do what works best for you.
And I'd argue that if you look at the posts on this sub from women who say they are ugly, don't want to be patronized with people telling them they are beautiful, and know that they will always have a very hard time finding romance even if they have a good emotional and intellectual connection with someone, people in that situations *do* have a very, very difference experience of all of these things you talk about, and people who have advantages that open doors for them *are* privileged in comparison, and not capable of fully understanding/empathizing with those experiences.
[deleted]
As much as I like George Takei I find it ironic that he is weighing in on this issue.   &gt;Businesses must and should be required to comply with neutrally crafted laws of general applicability  Replace businesses with People and birth control with gay marriage and i bet he would feel differently   Not that I am taking a stand on either issue I just found it ironic. 
All closely held means is few owners with a large portions each, and is not necessarily even privately held-which is an extremely broad definition.
Just a sidebar here - libido (both male and female) is greatly affected by a wide range of both physical and emotional factors and can vary dramatically as those factors change.  A personal anecdote: I have always been a very healthy male with a strong libido, but tempered with an emotional awareness and desire for contextual intimacy.  (Here the stereotype also cuts both ways - I always find that sexual fun is magnified and most enjoyable when it happens in a "safe" emotionally intimate relationship.)  I recently began to have very vague and random (seemingly disconnected) symptoms that ranged from lethargy and fatigue to being short of breath at times.  Not continuous, and not severe (at least not initially).  And my libido started to go, as well.  For the first time in my life I was simply bored by, and uninterested in sex.  I went through the motions, for the sake of my partner, who is also a pretty sexual person.  But she could tell I wasn't really "into" it - and began worrying that I was beginning to find her unattractive sexually.  As it turns out, I was slowly becoming severely anemic due to a very slow bleed from undiagnosed peptic ulcers. It finally got severe enough that it became life-threatening and the doctors managed to figure it out. It took 5 days in the hospital, many units of blood, and IV infusions of iron, magnesium and other medications to get me back to equilibrium.  Once I had stabilized and I slowly started to get back to "normal" - my libido has returned as strongly as before.  Physical and emotional stress in both men and women can also result in diminished libido.  So my point is that each of us can have a range of interest in sex that might differ from one day/month/year to the next depending on what is going on in our lives.    Emotional stress can kill libido just as fast - but I think I sometimes try to start a sexual encounter with my SO to try to help restore intimacy when I sense something is out of whack, but often my SO wants to use other means - usually starting with meaningful conversation - to help improve the connection IN ORDER to be able to enjoy a sexual encounter more.  We are definitely wired differently!
I pay for my upper middle class co-workers kids every year when he gets a tax break.  I pay for some of his daycare when he claims that at the end of the year for both of his kids.  I'll pay for some of his kids schooling when they enter public school, and then I'll pay for some of their college if they go to a state school.  My point is that we pay for sexual "irresponsibility" AND sexual "responsibility".  The argument that you don't want to pay for birth control because of the "burden put on society" seems pretty weak if your concern is for how taxpayer dollars are spent.  The cost to taxpayers if a child is born is FAR higher than if we pay so that child isn't born.   
I agree, we should all help each other out. Nobody goes through life without needing some kind of medical attention at some point. Even if it's just an antihistamine for hay fever. Contraception shouldn't be any different.
[deleted]
Lol, no. It's about providing a crucial health service to women despite the neanderthal that want to terrorize you into not doing so. It's like saying our refusal to kowtow to AL Qaeda after 9/11 was a political statement and not important. 
I don't know if I would. I'm honestly not aware of genetic therapy, how it works and what the risks are.
Thanks!  Clusterfuck doesn't even begin to describe it. I also think my alcohol intake would sky rocket every evening too. 
I live in Canberra. Abortion law here is some of the best there is. I can't brain yet, sorry. I've tried about 4 times to explain how doctors can be really liberal about abortion referrals and failed every time. Doctors just have to explain that her reason meets one of the legal requirements, and she's set. [Wiki on abortion here](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Abortion_in_Australia).
Lets use HL as a specific example, they are a closely held corporation. This means they are not traded on the stock market. So you can go sit in the room with the owners. Does this mean that they loose their rights because they formed a corporation to do business? Does my corporation that consists of just me loose its rights? Does that mean that if I operate as a sole proprietor my business has more rights then an LLC? SCorp? 
I think the power in the book isn't that it was the perfect academic paper, but that it brought to light things that are overlooked and can't be accounted for in current models of human sexual behavior. 
Australian here. We still have to pay for contraception. It's subsidised, but we still pay. My last 4-month pack of pills cost me just $20.85, or a touch over $5/month.
Exactly.. and that is why portions of TRP focus solely on self improvement to make themselves more attractive.
You are so right! Thank you for that information! My doctor did not seem worried about Paragard, but I am using it because hormonal BC made me sick. 
It still is the same sexual drive that we choose to channel in different ways. The desire is the same. In a hypothetical situation where all available partners are desirable, a woman's sex drive would remain the same, it would just have more possibility of expression.  Animals want sex even when it is very painful for them. We are smarter so we curb and channel our desires, but that doesn't mean the desire doesn't exist. It is one of the most powerful vital forces we deal with. It is what eventually gets women to go through such extremely painful and risky conditions known as pregnancy and childbirth.  Be the kind of person someone wants to have sex with, and you'll have no need to wonder whether women actually want sex or not. That is my sincere response to those asking this question.
[deleted]
Ooh, I would be making a complaint to the water utility. Besides, what does it matter whose cash paid for the house? Even if one of you was a stay-at-home spouse, you would both legally be co-owners of the house. 
&gt;honestly, i don't think anyone - regardless of their gender - can have it all. how can you give 100% at work and at home as well? it's simply not possible. we each have to decide what works for us and for our individual family situations.      This was exactly my thought. It's why I am trying very hard to make sure I cut costs here at home. So I can stay home with my son, where I want to be.
I am not arguing anything about chivalry. I think being a good person has no gender.
I just assume most of these app companies have young leadership.
[deleted]
Which is also not what I'm doing. I'm simply saying if you are talking about UK law, you need to talk about *UK* law, not GB law. As seen in another comment, not everyone *knows* that there is a country in the UK where abortion is illegal. Said comment was even from someone in the UK.  I think pointing this out is relevant. It's not blaming anyone for it. Part of the UK does not have legal abortion access, and in threads where it's claimed otherwise, I will point it out because as an NI native, I won't have it overlooked.
Could you be my wife?
Only 2 years? You're cute.
Yeah that's why I wouldn't say his writing is feminist but Dany is OK in comparison to other fantasy female characters in terms of her growth and development. Most of the female characters are not just plot devices for male characters which I appreciate. 
We still have a ways to go here.
But the Hobby Lobby Owners are not the Corporation Hobby Lobby. Why does the Hobby Lobby Corporation get to have religious beliefs? It absolutely should not. It's not the Hobby Lobby Owners' money that's paying for this employee benefit, it's the corporation. The corporation has no feelings. The Corporation does not go to church. Corporations are legal entities designed to limit individual liability; the idea of legally granting them HUMAN rights, while an ongoing effort over a century old, does us as a people and society more harm than good.
I've always loved him for how open minded he is. His opinions are always well thought out and genuine. 
"..have sex on me.." Same for me, unfulfilled, but then I'm like, "thank you, sir, may I have another." I think I'm just holding out hope that, eventually, I'll feel like having sex on him simultaneously.
"I did not ask for special treatment"  actually you specifically asked for special treatment
I've destroyed multiple universes 
nobody is really sure what happens after symptoms resolve, some say its gone completely, some say it's dormant, some say that some hpv dna stays with you for life, but not enough to restart the life cycle, some say that all of these can happen to different people. so whether or not it is "cured" is difficult to say from a technical standpoint  practically, the result is the same: no symptoms or transmission
Congratulations!  And thanks for sharing your thoughts. I've been dating a girl now for almost two years that grew up in a fundamentalist cult. Every time I think I have a handle on the roots of her baggage, something new hits me out of nowhere that I really struggle to understand. I want to be her partner and support in working through untangling her family's toxicity, so similar views are a great help. It helps remind me that some of her issues aren't just routine body-issues that women (unfortunately) raised to have in spades. But that a lot of them are also rooted in something deeper and more insidious.
Like I care what Takei thinks about politics and social engineering. 
My side?    I'm not American, we don't divide our people into  "two sides".    &gt; You guys lost this one. How about you suck it up and lose with some fucking dignity    No, America is losing because of losers like you. I'll be here on the winning side, with healthcare that I pay less for and covers everybody.  
Wow. I had a boyfriend that was like a rabbit, we had sex just about every night and sometimes two or three times.  Then he got a job. It's funny how quickly his sex drive dropped once he had to actually, you know, earn a living. Fortunately for my sex life he had an allergy to work, so things got back to fun pretty quickly.
Go onto craigslist, go to casual encounters, offer no-strings-attached sex. If you actually fail to find anybody who want's to have sex, then you'll have proved your point. If you find someone who wants to have sex, but you decline, you'll have proven /u/Keefit correct. 
I don't think that's something most people would be proud of...
Was it sent during their relationship? Also, I'm assuming "inappropriate content" means "sexual content," but I guess it could refer to threats or something else?
..............blocking..... derp 
Well my opinion hasn't changed so I must have only explained it differently. I actually don't see the difference between my two statements that you do. Can you clarify? If you want to continue this course of discussion that is. No big deal.
congratulations on the new job!   The one you were supposed to start sounds like a nightmare - now that you mentioned that it's an education establishment, I'm not surprised (most of the education establishments put the systems improvement budget at the end of the list).   Do not feel dickish, it's them who tried to mess you around and make you do a job that would set you back heavily.
That was the point of the discussion in the first place, try to keep up. If you need to pull out a dictionary, you can open a new tab and go to Dictionary.com
I'm generalizing here but let's say there's a guy (maybe a bit less than average looking) in a room with some good looking woman who are dressed provocatively, out drinking and having a good time. The guy will hit on some, be turned down, and then blame the women...there must be something wrong with them, they're bitches, whatever.   Now turn the tables and there's a woman who is maybe less than average in a room with a bunch of good looking guys. She flirts, gets nowhere. She internalizes and thinks it's her fault, she's too fat, too skinny, whatever. She doesn't blame the man.   And we all know it happens, less than average looking women will lower their standards. Men don't think they should have to and that's why they have sexual strategies. They want what's out of their league.  And this is all superficial, this is not about meeting someone, getting to know them and all that. Looks aren't important to most of us but for those just out for a one nighter, it's a big deal.    
[deleted]
I drove a fucking minivan for 5 years. I'd still rev the engine when I pulled up on a biker, though. Gotta keep it real.
I have found that people often make "jokes" of what they'd really like to say.  "Your new haircut is awful!  Haha! Just kidding!"  "I think we should get naked!  Got you! I'm joking!"    It is an easy way to get a feel for how receptive someone is to something with an easy out of "joking" or to be passive aggressive.  This is NOT an appropriate "joke" to make with a potential employee and I expect that it will NOT be the last one she hears if she works there. 
It's the de-railing of the conversation that always got to me too. Suddenly the argument is about anything they want, and if you try to bring it back, it's utterly impossible, because the rules of the first argument are changed now to accommodate the *other* argument - my head is spinning just remembering it.  You will get out, as soon as you're done mourning it. Because I'm pretty sure that happens a lot with dysfunctional long term relationships - you grieve for the end of the relationship before it ends. Maybe it's the time/effort/pain invested, and the expectation of "it *will* get better if I just did X or Y, we'll be happy then". But that never comes around, and you just spend more of yourself in the mean time. When you're done grieving, and you feel nothing at all, that's when there' nothing left to lose. It takes a while, but for me it was a very clean break.   And jesus christ, shaking the table is just flat out mean. Why would you want to spoil someone's art if you love them? I'd feel so guilty. 
Appreciate your honesty and self awareness. There would be a lot less divorce if partners said this flat out in the beginning. But they pretend to be a "fuck machine" and eventually the act is dropped and its all downhill from there. 
[deleted]
Well, they can believe peanut butter causes abortion for all I care, that doesn't mean it terminates pregnancy. Their "belief" has no scriptural or dogmatic foundation and is therefore superstition at best, not a matter of belief.  Fact is, the "beliefs" of Hobby Lobby management has fuck all to do with the medical care of their employees. They're required to provide health coverage and they're electing to provide incomplete coverage on the basis that it's against their religious "belief" — it's none of their fucking business what type of contraception or procedures their employees have.  
This is not even remotely OK. How concerned and pissed off would you be if your mom (or other female you care about) were telling you this story about her boyfriend?  Physically HITTING someone is not acceptable regardless of the gender of either individual.  If you are REALLY opposed to ending the relationship, you should AT LEAST tell her that her hitting you needs to stop immediately. I wouldn't advise a woman to stay and try to work it out with a man who was hitting her, so my REAL advice to you is to end it.   I hope this works out for you in a good way.  
There are definitely extremists, but based on your stories, it seems more like those people were just assholes who were mistakenly calling themselves something they were not meeting the minimum criteria to be classified as.
Oh, I thought women were asexual. Thanks for clearing that up.  This retarded strawman circlejerk rhetorical question is pretty embarrassing for this sub.
It can, and at that point you should stop. But if you start the night intending to have sex while drunk, get drunk and have sex, so long as one party did not stop wanting to have sex while drunk it is fine. 
Can confirm: boyfriend has fragile balls. I rolled on to one cuddling this morning and got woken to a yelp. 
Frankly I'd be fine with the adoption of an easier to use set of gender neutral pronouns for referring to a singular person in English just because it'd make life easier than misgendering people you just meet.  EDIT: Plus a lot of languages have gender neutral pronouns so it's really less "special snowflake" and more just good sense, regardless what some parts of the internet would claim.
I do have a working knowledge of this particular lawsuit, the science presented was off base by a mile. The products they don't want to carry are not the abortifactants they claim they are. None of those products end an already implanted fertilized egg.   As it stands,  current HL employees DO have to pay for insurance that covers viagra. I get that the side effects of viagra had been used for pulmonary hypertension,  but that same permeable quirk given to a marketed erection pill apparently is way too much to ask the same consideration for IUDs, which ALSO have extralabel uses past pregnancy prevention.  You want to argue ignorance but cant be asked to recognize that there is more than greedy baby mommas wanting an easy out for their "oops." Thats just turning a blind eye to those outside your preferred target. 
[deleted]
Every friend I've had that uses tinder got it for that explicit purpose. It is a hookup app afterall
To be fair, we actually do get to look at some of them since they're being sold to our local police forces. :D
I doubt it since A) it's limited to closely held corporations and B) hobby lobby is actually losing money by doing this as the boycotts/bad publicity far outweigh whatever break their insurance company is giving them for not opting in to something that makes up .0000001% of that insurance companies expenses.
[deleted]
I didn't say I would.  I said men in general.  It is impossible to find a woman who can't get laid.
You know, did you ever think that you're just a few cells? Let's all weigh in on whether *you're* a person or not.
[deleted]
it depends... the report increased sales, but only for a week or two when it's 'hot news"  or a case of "we'll show THEM'...   but long term, the people who rather than rush to buy a chick-fil-et on a weekend during a flap, don't likely outnumber the people, who given a choice, will avoid that shop FOREVER....   
Fine with me. You pukes never went there anyway, and two, you won't put a dent in their profits. 
Sometimes, logic is not pertinent, instead, empathy is.
Congrats!!!
Actually, I was a frequent customer of Hobby Lobby. I'm just going to go to Michael's now.
Probably. I dunno, I just don't want to admit it's over. 
[deleted]
This post has been removed due to rule \# 2 in [our sidebar.](http://www.reddit.com/r/twoxchromosomes/about/sidebar) Thank you!  *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FTwoXChromosomes) if you have any questions or concerns.*
&gt; To be very blunt, I think many men grow up (or don't) with the idea that the vagina is heavenly   [Hence the relentlessly bizarre custom of purity balls.](http://www.huffingtonpost.com/2014/05/05/purity-ball-photos_n_5255904.html)
[deleted]
so far awayyyyyy
[deleted]
Well, no. They still provide contraception, just not types of contraception they believe (incorrectly by the way) to be abortifacients.  Viagra is a red herring that has nothing to do with this, and is in no way related or even tenuously related by any stretch of the imagination.
It's completely different between each woman.   Not every woman wants or even needs sex. Some have a seemingly insatiable appetite for fucking, getting fucked, having sex, whatever the hell you want to call it, and some don't even feel the need to masturbate, let alone have *sex*.   Now, this is just me personally...but I honestly don't even like sex as a whole. Sure, I masturbate, but my sex drive is actually fairly non-existent. I consider myself, personally, to be asexual or possibly demisexual, in that I might need some sort of bond with the person I'm going to sleep with (usually a deep emotional bond) before I would really feel my sex drive rev up. It just putters around pathetically instead.   And I've never really liked the thought of going out to a bar or club and going home with a stranger. It just doesn't appeal to me. I'm too monogamous for that anyways, I think, which...I guess is not a good thing. I would have to open myself up to letting my partner have an open relationship with me, so she could go out, guilt-free — on her part, most likely — and get the sex or anything that she needed that she might wind up otherwise not getting from me.   But I've been told I'm broken for not really giving much of a shit at all about whether or not I get laid. *I just don't need to!* ^^^or ^^^want ^^^to, ^^^in ^^^many ^^^cases My hand? My hand is my best friend when I do get horny or want to get off, sometimes with the help of toys or something. I don't need to go out, nor do I really want to, and find someone else to do it for me.   Maybe it's partially because I just don't have any sort of sexual confidence. I'm not a confident person to begin with, and I have (cliche as this is) social anxiety that, while not bad enough to keep me indoors, keeps me from being able to just go up to someone I don't know and have a conversation. If they come up to me, it's not so bad, but... And it certainly doesn't help that I have little to no self-esteem. I'm not sexually attractive and hardly physically attractive anymore.   So, even if I wanted to, I couldn't just go bang someone's brains out when I wanted. Sometimes, I wish I could, because it *does* feel like I'm "broken" when I really get to thinking about it. And it's hard being a lesbian with little to no real sex drive. My kind is apparently shunned more often than not in the community. And it's hard being a lesbian with little to no sex drive, because goddamn it, I fucking love ladybits. :(   Annnnnd I have got to learn to *stop fucking ranting* on Reddit... Jesus fucking Christ. Sorry, folks. 
I'm sorry about that. Thanks for taking charge :)
Exactly, someone sent me this article (http://thefederalist.com/2014/04/02/hobby-lobbys-critics-have-no-idea-how-investments-work/) which seems not to get it. It then goes on to talk about how "secular liberals" are hypocrites for having 401K investments in things like Oil ... because you know "secular liberals" think using fossil fuels will send you to hell. 
Then said employer needs to hike up the employees pay so that they have the means to afford to take care of their own medical expenses. Not all people have a choice where to work. A lot of Americans are limited by lack of transportation, for example. And if this expands outside of Hobby Lobby into the near 90% of eligible, closely held companies, then (worst case scenario) there may be stipulations to every health care plan they encounter.   Why is a law created to take certain health benefits away from women and not the vasectomy coverage from men? Why do they get to claim it's against their religion because in their eyes it's abortion, yet lack of access to AFFORDABLE BC can lead to a 75% increase in abortion rates, and at the very least can raise unplanned pregnancies where the women would also have to rely on welfare, food stamps, wic. So you have people who argue FOR a companies right to exclude certain benefits, but these are the same people who are going to be upset when its a necessity to raise the taxes to cover our countries welfare expenses. It's the beginning of a domino effect that's stomping on the rights of women employees and its foreshadowing what could happen to women across the country in other companies should they choose to adopt the same policy. 
I understand. That would be horrible. We may have found her a ride. Crossing my fingers.
Both of you need to chill out when commenting here. Please see rule #1 [in our sidebar](/r/twoxchromsomes/about/sidebar).   thanks
I remember reading about this... Wasn't there a belief in the Renaissance that a man had a certain amount of semen, and when it ran out, the man would die? (Essentially equating semen to "life force.") If people were operating on that premise, obviously men would be pretty sexually avoidant-- you don't want to die from one too many romps in the sack! Women did not suffer this risk and consequently were more sexually eager than men, in this model. I think this may also be why in French, an orgasm is a *petit mort*: literally a little/small death.   I couldn't find the link to a European version of this belief, despite my searching and consequently making my browser history all nasty and covered in spunk. I did find this to be true in [Taoist] (http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Taoist_sexual_practices#Male_control_of_ejaculation) Chinese philosophy, however-- if semen is life force, you don't want to spill it.
Hmmm... Because Jags are voraciously sexual and sensual, demanding, temperamental, hungry for fuel, and able to make any man feel like he's Magnum PI.  Whereas Hyundais are practical, quiet, conservative cars that run cheaply and are boring in every way.    I don't think they thought that metaphor through enough...
Never mind. We found her some help. Thanks anyway.
The court found in favor of your opinion "You do not have the freedom to force that belief on anyone else."  You can't force a Muslim to eat pigs even if the Affordable Pork Act passed mandating it. Even when food is typically a humanitarian right (not unalienable one, those are for rights that would exist in a total vacuum with just yourself)  The religious whack's don't want to pay for your "abortificent pills/iuds" (not agreeing with abortificent here) Then they shouldn't be forced to pay for them. They belief life is sacred, happens at conception, and these things interfere with Zygots (what is created after fertilization). They do still cover hormonal birth control and 16 OTHER kinds of birth control options. Just no morning after, you'll have to pay the 48$ OTC avg for that. Or the 2-3$ dollar over the counter box of condoms. Whichever you prefer.  You are free to purchase coverage outside of your employer for those drugs, in fact if enough people OPT out of employer's health insurance and buy their own it might spur actual reform and get us out of this employer provided shit-hole in which we currently reside.
I should've read your comment first, as we seem to feel exactly the same way. 
Per one of your moderators -  "A post may be automatically deleted if the downvote count becomes to high" So... if someone states something that's "unpopular", it could get deleted simply because others in the forum don't like what was being said, and were giving it down votes. Basically, the down vote system is being abused.  Again, according to the Reddit Guidelines, a downvote should be used only if the comment does not contribute to the conversation, NOT just because you don't like or agree with the other person.  I'm sure many of the deleted posts were offensive, trollish, or out of line.  However, quite a few were trying desperately to inform or share the unpopular view...and they were removed as well.  It just comes off somewhat weak or petty to delete those posts from the conversation.
baby showers tend to be women-events so I'm assuming your boyfriend wasn't going to be going anyways.  But for future family events, if she invites him he can make a stand that he is only going to go if you are his guest. He's building a new family with you. If his sister can't support that, he has no reason to go to those events himself. 
Well if she's your friend she would understand that you were just letting her know he shirts low
since when did it not? The most elegant lie we've convinced ourselves is true: "All men are created equal".
Let them know if you're nervous or uncomfortable; during my first pelvic exam, my provider chatted with me the entire time as if she wasn't feeling my breasts and ladybits up. :) I didn't even feel when she slid the speculum in, she had managed to distract me so well! They really are used to it, and can make adjustments in their care to make you more comfortable if necessary.
&gt;Everyone should have the right to FREE safe sex and contraception.  Based on what logic?
&gt; We can't just stand at the bar blinking slow   Yeah, because that's totally how being an average woman works.  &gt; If you don't wana fuck a girl, no amount of charm is gonna make her any hotter.  Congrats on the textbook objectification there asshat
I don't really see an issue with what your employer did.  It would have been great if they were able to accommodate you and find another position  which wouldn't require you to lift so much weight but they in no way should be required to do so.  You can no longer do your job. Also you should have gotten something in writing stating they would find something else for you, not just gotten all huffy about it after your boss went back on their word.  Also how did you get pneumonia in your fall?  Did you see the germs trying to infect you when you hit the ground?  
In treatment currently -- hoping it works this time! Six weeks of fairly intensive physical therapy (laser treatment, stretches, trigger points, dilators, biofeedback, the whole deal...), valium up in the hoo ha (I know that's TMI but I think it's hilarious and I just want everyone to know that that's a real medicine), external creams, and no sex. Then reevaluations, sex therapy to make me not so afraid of sex, and we'll we where we go.   The place I went to get diagnosed is crazy fancy so not all of this is standard, I just have good insurance and am willing to eat beans for the next month if it means I will be able to have normal sex. Literally all I did was pull a muscle and "work out" over it for three years -- it's sadly a pretty common condition and I'd hazard a guess that many, many other women have the same problem but wouldn't be able to afford the level of treatment I'm shelling out for. The normal course of treatment is just trigger point PT w/vaginal dilators and biofeedback. Insurance often covers it if you do it at the right place and it's a surprisingly popular field of PT -- it's just getting to that point (you normally need a referral) that's the problem!
Awesome! Apple pie bakes for a while, so a lot of recipes call for a lower temp (350F) for a while and higher (400-450F) for a short time. I make ring out of foil or use one of [these](http://www.amazon.com/Andersons-Baking-Silicone-Shield-10-inch/dp/B001IZ7RDY/ref=sr_1_4?ie=UTF8&amp;qid=1404265367&amp;sr=8-4&amp;keywords=pie+edge+protector) to protect the edges while the center browns.
The masturbation that causes the most burning is actually when I don't do anything internal and focus solely on clitoral stimulation. It really feels like any time anything is even remotely near my uthera, it starts burning regardless of how clean it is. And as long as I haven't touched my urethra recently, it's fine. It's like a UTI except not quite (because it isn't a constant thing and doesn't seem to be caused by dirt or bacteria)
Idk about you, but I would rather pay (through taxes or whatever) for birth control than pay for unwanted or unplanned for children. Abstinence has *never* been a feasible solution and we need to stop pretending that it is. 
This seems to be a very sensitive subject these days. If he trust you, and you trust him, and you are open and honest with each other, and he listens when you say no, and you when he says no, then I don't see the issue. Maybe try explaining that to him. Sex doesn't need to become a beaurocracy with paper work to fill out. But in the end, it is his decision. If he firmly believes that it is wrong to have sex while drunk, then you have to respect that. 
They are not discriminating against anyone. They argued that forced healthcare coverage for birth control was against their own viewpoints on the matter and that they were protected by the RFRA, which I will add was introduced by Democrat Chuck Schumer, supported by many other democrats and signed into law by Clinton.   I suspect that if male birth control was at the level as women's birth control today, and were forced to provide coverage they would have argued their case in the same manner citing protection by the RFRA law.
I don't get it. What's with the TM?
I hate awkward/unfriendly doctors of all sorts, but especially ob/gyns. It can be tough enough to sit there with my private parts on display and metal instruments shoved up my hoo-hoo. It's even worse, though, when you get a doc who seems so socially retarded that she is uncomfortable even addressing questions about gyn matters.   I had an awkward appointment with a new gyn last year (my previous doc had moved to a neighboring county and I didn't want to drive an extra 40 miles to stay with her). Well, I asked the new doc a question related to a sex matter, and she, too, could not meet my eyes. She was very dismissive and I could tell she was uncomfortable or maybe even embarrassed. Jeez.   If you can't consult the expert on the vulva/vagina about that territory, then who can you consult? It was so bizarre. I said in another TwoX thread a few weeks ago that I've had much better luck with male gyns, so who knows why I keep seeking out women docs. The men have been far more personable (not in a creepy way) and comfortable with my body, with my questions, with everything.   I can't help but fondly remember my first ob/gyn when I was at university. She had the best bedside manner in the world. I was a dopey nineteen year old virgin, but she made me feel at ease and like there wasn't a silly question I could possibly ask. I was seeing her b/c I knew I'd be making my sexual debut within a short period of time, and she took a full hour fitting me for a diaphragm, having me practice taking it in and out, telling me what to expect for my first sexual experience (and also telling me what I should say to the boy in question if he was moving too fast, etc.). It was wonderful, and I will never forget her as long as I live. 
All I know is in Canada employees are legally obligated to accommodate a pregnancy and offer paid maternal/parental leave during and after the pregnancy. As far as I know these laws have never harmed the employers, and have only created a better working environment for happier employees. So this just seems strange.
If you're an average looking woman you should have no problem meeting a man in a bar or a nightclub 
Seriously?  You're trying to argue that the women and men who post their pictures on OKCupid are a representative sample for both genders?  Here's the thing.  Men post surprisingly unflattering pictures on dating sites.  Women don't. And for a good reason, because they are judged based on their looks much more strongly than men.
I really, REALLY feel bad that this is happening to so many people, and so very *very* grateful it doesn't effect me. Keep standing up for yourselves! Go Canada! And happy Canada Day :)
OK, the pies are ready to serve, and I invoked the cook's prerogative to take the first piece (to make sure it's OK).  OMG it is actually really good!  The crust is crispy and flaky top and bottom!  The filling is tart and sweet.  My only concern is the apples seem to have gotten a bit overcooked.  One of my eaters just pronounced it "delicious"!  IT'S A MIRACLE!
Thanks for posting. I really like seeing the transgender posts because (not in any way intending to boil down your life journey into a science experiment) it's really cool to see the perspective of people who've been on both sides of the fence. Not many people can say, "Oh yeah, well I've been a man and a woman," and provide a real comparison. 
[deleted]
If the employers as individual, private citizens choose to not take, or provide BC to their own family, that is their choice.  But the instant they impose their own conscience upon employees, ignoring something essential to their health, that is what I would consider irresponsible business.
Jesus tits, where do you get such a good deal?  My insurance is about $100/mo for me, like $700/mo if I include my spouse.
[deleted]
Victoria's Secret for really good stuff.  But the Gap often carries workable options as well. 
For what its worth I feel ya.
When I had my abortion, I went with minimum sedation. It's uncomfortable, strange, and painful, but it wasn't terrible. There were a few pangs in the aftermath; they'll probably give you ibuprofen for that. Make sure you ask lots of questions about what to do afterwards, how soon you can have sex, etc.   I feel strangely ok with my decision, too. I expected to have vivid nightmares and cry myself to sleep, but I feel fine, and I think I made the right decision for me. At my local abortion clinic, the protesters were just a couple of sad-looking schmucks with signs. They weren't even chanting things.  
You absolutely did the right thing. Someday you'll be able to reconnect with them.
[deleted]
Well, good. In my experience, the more you talk about things, the more comfortable they become. Here's an [awkward internet-hug](http://media.tumblr.com/tumblr_man0zkusEM1qefhgc.gif), just for you. 
Yes, and yes? I assume my downvotes are because I hate this sub for being on the front page :)
And you don't have to shop at hobby lobby. True story, read a law book.
I'm sorry for what you had to go through man.  No one deserves that regardless of gender.
Not necessarily. Some people change but most people keep their base personalities/attitude  from when they graduated high school for a very long time.
There's an option other than going along and getting in a fight.  "Okay... I'm going to head out now.  See you guys later."  Said with a *smile.*  You're not stopping their "fun" but you're not putting up with it either.  It isn't perfect, but it avoids both fighting and encouragement.  I'm guessing you're college aged and that's young enough that these guys are still figuring out the boundaries.  Vacillating between being the "cool girl" and being the feminist ranter is going to confuse them even more.     If they're older than 22, just stop hanging out with them entirely.  That is too fucking old for this bullshit.
Yea, why bother waiting for investigations and everything to make sure it is even true. Just boycott them after only hearing one side of the story.
you're not fired cause you are pregnant, you are taking a non-voluntary leave cause you cannot do the items in your job description. sensationalist much?
If we cannot change where we predominantly store our fat, we, by your own definition, cannot bodybuild our way into an "hourglass figure". An hourglass figure is reliant on where fat is stored. 
I'm going to take from your position in this response that you have never been in a toxic relationship to this degree. You don't understand the degradation that goes into your head, that your value gets ground down to nothing and you honestly believe that you can't do anything without them. A man who is willing to invalidate your right as a living, breathing human being... a man that feels your only purpose is to be their sex toy and nothing more than an object... that's not a miserable family condition, that's a fucking nightmare.  I speak from my own experience here, and it would do you well to pay attention because I get tired of telling preachy-types like yourself that needing help and accepting help is not a negative thing and the attitude that we're just lazy for not getting out of a bad situation only leads us to our own downfall. When my ex grew tired of me and told me that he was leaving, it wasn't relief. My whole world broke down because I believed every last word he had ingrained into my psyche. I attempted suicide (the blade slipped and missed what I had gone for) as he taunted me with the phone, threatening not to call 911 because I wasn't worth the effort to help.  This was 13 years after he had built me up that no one else could love me like he did, that no one would love me more than he did, that no one did love me, that only he loved me, that I broke his heart when I did things that upset him, that... do you get the picture yet? Just when was I supposed to "take charge of my life" as you put it? When I was naively thinking if I just tried a little harder to be a little more accommodating ? Or when he guilted me into sex? Or when he started forcibly holding me down and telling me that was how he liked it and I'd be the reason he'd find someone else to love if I didn't just shut up?  No. I got help when he realized that he'd look like the bad guy if I ended up dead in his house and didn't bother putting in the barest of minimums to appear less like a psycho. I got help once they cleared me from the hospital and stuck me in the women's shelter and got me started on counseling and networking again. He had me exiled from friends and family, right where he wanted me. Without that help I would be the same husk of a human being. Without that help I wouldn't have had the courage to tell people like you that their attitudes suck when it comes to looking at the ugly side of relationships. The undercurrent that comes off your posts reek of ignorance and intolerance for anyone who can't stand on their own two feet at all times. What a horrible standard to hold the world to.
im going to be honest in saying from the info you gave, i think YOU are the bad person in this situation. first off you claim to want to bridge a gap with him, but then state hes trying to reach out to you and your just blowing him off, WTF?! second you say he dosnt know whats best for you. NO ONE knows whats best for ANYONE, we can all just make the best guesses with whatever info we have. as far as i can tell you married a military guy after only knowing him for only three months! and as a person who pretty much did this ( i was in the army and it was like 6-8 months) its a bad idea. i was told so and didnt listen. normal "civilian" relationships dont happen like this because there no financial incentive to get hitch like there is for military guys.   so heres what you do, send him an email or whatever and find out a time you both can sit and talk on skype or something for a few hours and be a grown up! you want him to understand how you feel, you must offer the same thing to him. sit there and take your ass chewing. ask him why he feels the way he does, THINK CRITICALLY!!!! you want any relationship to work you have to be willing to buck up when the paths get bumpy! if you cant do it with your dad who you have known your whole life, how will you do it with your new husband?!  Congrats by the way.
I can swear I piss printer ink, but that wouldn't make me the first person to lie in court.
 Guy here.  You made an agreement with your BF about how to handle the situation.  Now you're going back on what you agreed.  *And* you're telling him that he has to come up with more money and a way to get to you, on very short notice -- which is probably really tough for someone in his financial situation.  *And* implying that if he doesn't, you'll break up with him.  *And* you're saying you resent comforting him when he opens up his emotions to you and tells you how he's hurting.  Also, you're letting your Ian friend dictate how you run your relationship.  Taking advice is one thing, letting a single friend use you as a puppet like that is quite another.  Are you sure Ian's not aiming to break up your current relationship so he can make a pass at you himself?  I think you need to cut your BF some slack, and ask for advice from friends other than Ian. 
She's just a great choice. I like her attitude towards her work, her willingness to experiment, to prioritize the health and family life of Navy personnel, and her loyalty to her fellow sailors. She seems incredibly suited for the job. Congratulations, Admiral Howard!
[deleted]
&gt; He didn't look like a douche at all.  I don't understand...what does a douche look like?
[deleted]
I love how you assume that its a he
Ha ha, thank you for saying so! It's really helpful to have some input from other couples who have been together longer than we have. It's also been a major help watching his older brother fumble through marriage and children, but it's nice to ask questions openly without seeming too overly critical about how everyone else manages their relationships.
If this story didn't have a few dates out of line, I'd think you were with my ex. Honestly, you just have to break it off and tell him to figure it out, he has 15 days to have a removal plan. If he's on a lease, get him off it so you can kick him out and get him for trespassing if it comes to it.   If you stand firm on being done with him, no matter what threat he throws at you, you'll find he's a coward. He won't kill himself, or put a lot of effort into anything aside from what you assert. Tell him to get out and if he wants to worry about your child, you two can come to an agreement on it. Write down or record what you can. Verbal agreements count. 
It is so frustrating that people don't get this. I really wish they could come out with a female hormone regulating pill that was called something else besides birth control, it would be the exact same pill but called something like "Estrovex" that just happens to also prevent pregnancy.   Although it's sad that we'd have to do that because of judgy, uneducated people like this CEO who see the words "birth control" and automatically think slutty slut women who don't deserve control over their own bodies!
I am saying, people say that fighting is good in the relationship because they confuse its meaning with arguing. To me, arguing is good, fighting is not.   Arguing is usually just a debate over opinions and it is mostly harmless. Fighting is closer to the the kind of disagreements that are unhealthy for a relationship.   I would say that people who argue aren't disagreeing over something that would break them up... it would be over something simple like talking about ones morals vs the others. Fighting would be disagreeing on an important decision or action that needs to be resolved for you both to move on in life.
I'm sure some people do lie in court, but people behaving like assholes is a hell of a lot more common than people lying in their court pleadings.  
ಠ_ಠ
[DANCE PARTY](http://fuzzywobble.com/images/gdp_gif.gif)  Congrats Doc :)
IMO neither of them are true.  However, the above comment was simply postulating: if men on tinder are misogynistic (we're taking this statement as a premise — true or not), then that must mean women on tinder are misandrous (or misandristic, take your pick).
If you don't know, I think I am wasting my time. If you *do* know, I am *certain* I am wasting my time. 
MRAs, of course.
[deleted]
[deleted]
my bad my blunder. maybeeee that should be on the sidebar? just sayin'.  thanks for the help though. 
They're married with a two year old kid.      It stands to reason that they've spent years loving each other. Two days of bitter disagreement doesn't necessarily warrant throwing that away.      If they spend months hating each other, and it becomes clear without a shadow of a doubt that their issues are irreconcilable, then they should split up, but it would be a mistake to succumb to a knee-jerk reaction with something as important as a marriage, and a family. 
That's creepy and I would be outta there because I don't want to date a guy who randomly messages women on facebook just to hook up.
I don't usually hear 'men cannot be raped' except from clueless internet posters, and even then it usually doesn't gain traction outside of an echo chamber.  On the other hand, I do often hear 'but men are raped *far* less!' (something I doubt to begin with), usually used to excuse the mainstream reaction and cultural attitudes towards rape against men. I do think that argument is more commonly accepted, and rape against men is often dismissed.
&gt; He has anger issues, and on 2 occasions pinched our son because our son hit him. The other time he forcefully tossed him onto the couch, also because he hit him.  This is how he treats that 2 year old child.  
Have you thought about switching to an IUD? I want to get one. I've had awful reactions to multiple forms of the pill. Even if I hadn't, I'm not sure I could have given up my sexual identity. I went from insatiable to nothing overnight. God, it sucked.
Then all laws should apply equally to those groups of people as well. Separate laws but equal rights for groups of people, especially those with power and money, is untenable. But instead Supreme Court is all about protecting the 'rights' of Corporations over the rights of individuals.
Rape is actually a charge in many states. It really depends. Some states say rape has to be violent while sexual assault can be any sexual act without consent; others use them interchangeably.  I would take this study with a grain of salt, I haven't had a chance to read it thoroughly but it doesn't seem to be peer reviewed and I don't think he factored the state to state definitions in. He very well could have though, since he is in law, but my usual approach is to trust nothing until it's been proven over and over again.
I don't know - you tell me where you wanted the conversation to go. You asked why Viagra was covered if IUD's weren't, and said it was silly. You followed up with a comment that implies it's a sexist issue. Viagra can improve the lives of couples, not just men (I think we can assume most Viagra isn't taken to support masturbation). Viagra is not relevant to the conversation.
My frustration with a lot of these discussions: the RP strategy and the arguments against it, is that it seems to really negate female sexual experience, despite it essentially being about the female sexual experience.  Furthermore, there seems to an implication that trying to get laid is an exclusively male pursuit: that women either don't want it or don't have trouble getting it. But I don't think this is a gendered issue at all. I think that people who have an easy time getting laid are attractive people, or socially confident people. I kind of wondered that there isn't some kind of Red Pill equivalent for women (that isn't about subservience like Red Pill Women), but maybe that's what Cosmo is all about.
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
If I may.  MRA's come in two flavors--that men are actually oppressed by women, and that women are not really oppressed at all.  So they often argue that rape is overreported for two reasons. 1) So they can say men are actually the ones suffering from false accusations or 2) rape is a case of feminists overreacting, and is not as common as it's made out to be.  Edit: for example, see reply to this comment. This particular response is the second "flavor"--"feminism is unnecessary because both are equally oppressed," although in this case he's using weirdly twisted feminist logic to do it.
I would say its Children&gt;Children+Parents&gt;everyone else (M or F)
I agree :) I am not sure why these days we all automatically take our father's name (other than tradition). 
You do realize that people will just be paid the same and get less benefits, making this entirely out of pocket, right?  Businesses would LOVE this and everyone would be screwed out of 15-20% of their paycheck.
There's an article about the douchebag who started Tinder.  He was some frat asshole at Stanford and sent a bunch of emails with degrading shit about women.  Guy is a prick.  Fits right in with the brogrammer losers in the bay area.
Suspension in lieu of trial (or internal investigation) is not uncommon... Think of how police take a leave with pay while everything is sorted.  What evidence?  Insert comment about you not being a lawyer here.
Would you consider the reverse misandrous? There's nothing wrong with having physical preferences. On a normal dating site or out in the real world I'm noping men for the same reason I do it on tinder.
Holy shit. I had "symphysis pubis dysfunction" with my second pregnancy, which is when the ligaments stretch and make your pelvis unstable and painful. It sounds like that procedure cut that connection entirely. What I had was excruciating... I can't imagine what these poor women dealt and deal with. This is horrific. 
The title of this post is nothing like the real allegations. Shame on you!
Nice. Unfortunately I'm pretty solidly less/middle class and my parents don't financially support me.  Also debt, a lot of it. Woo college loans.   Might have gone to private school, but I also came from a different family that definitely didn't have the same type of cash / was raised differently.   Sorry to burst that bubble. 
Astraea_M is a lawyer, so probably personal experience. 
% wise, was this the case before TwoX became default?
Exactly. It's just silly *to me*. My opinion.   Neither do IUDs. Which is why they should be covered.   Have a nice day.
I think a lot about this when I read stories on here of women being cat called or harassed by groups of men. My observation is that it's much more common than stories of onean harassment. I think there's something connected with what you're saying, the ideas of hyper masculinity can cause men to behave badly towards women. I also think about this when I see stories of harassment of women after they've rejected a man, rejection doesn't fit with the gender stereotypes of a manly man, so men try to work around it and do dumb stuff to peruse women. 
I'm not going to write a long answer, because i'm 75% certain you can't be serious.  Just look at what you wrote. Your portrayal of people is a caricature at best that really isn't worth engaging with. 
I am an ex-Mormon, and I see this agony over in the ex-mo subreddit often.  I want to congratulate you on being open-minded and on growing, on accepting new knowledge into your life.  I can tell you care for the people in your life, and do not want to hurt them as your experience the shifts in your perspective.  You may have outgrown your old friends.  Love them as people, but if they cannot accept you with your newfound beliefs, then perhaps they are not the people you need in your life at this point.  I know what you mean about the atheist friends!  It feels isolating, but there are people out there who live and let live, when you find them, it is such a relief to be able to just be yourself.    Family?  Yes, well, that is difficult.  I get the feeling you are not totally financially independent yet.  I totally hate the hypocrisy of lying to parents, but sometimes the options presented by being honest are unworkable.  You have to do what is best for you in your unique situation.  It gets better, although it is not an easy path to independence.  
I didn't want to get into too many details, but as an adult I KNOW that it takes 2 to tango.   Most nights instead of trying to talk to him I go straight to bed in my son's room.  Could I have handled it better?  Yes, I could have tried to talk day in and day out but I got tired of his belittling so I hid.  We are both at fault which is why I've suggested counseling numerous times.  I KNOW that I have fault too, but I am the one that is willing to talk and to work through them.  He responds with anger and belittling, and doesn't want anybody to mediate.  Where do I go from here?  
Does it really cost that much for a month of the pill? That seems absurd, it costs $16 for a four month pack in Australia. I knew that the cost of medical procedures was ridiculous in America, I had no idea that it extended to prescription medication as well. That's horrible!
[deleted]
Prescriptions are worse. Is government healthcare not subsidized in Australia? Obviously completely different but in France my birth control pill isn't covered, but pharmaceuticals aren't... subject to the free market like they are in the US (I'm not 100% sure if the market is subsidized or just better regulated) so my 3-month pill pack for name-brand pills costs me 4€.  Edit for spelling. 
Right. Unfortunately, and particularly in light of the Hobby Lobby BS, we have to pander to the least common denominator.
This also has the issue of, your moral objection still holds, even if the moral objection isn't based on fact, but what you believe to be fact. 
Yeah, I was thinking about it.  On the men's side we've got stalkers, rapists, and people who break your stuff when you break up with them; on the women's side we've got stalkers, rapists, and people who break your stuff when you break up with them...
Those threads are usually filled with teenage boys or very young men who are raging with hormones but are yet to develop the social skills to function normally in society for whatever reason.   Yes of course we enjoy sex. Yes of course we get rejected but the fact of the matter is men and woman for an array of reasons are segregated in society and we have a whole load of baggage to get rid of before we reach some level of normality.   There are ideas floating around that women don't want sex as much as men but that's usually because men don't actually see the women they don't find attractive. They don't acknowledge them or their existence as sexual beings. If you are out of proportion or larger than expected or have looks which aren't considered appealing you're simply invisible to men. So since they aren't even acknowledging that part of society as sexually viable they just see all these attractive women that ALL the men want and who are being picky or choosy or simply not reciprocating the level of lust that is in their direction.  Good looks do not equal high sex drive. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
Ha! straight up and down doesn't read banana to me... but ok :)
I personally think the issue should not be birth control itself, but the fact that the government has defined what is the minimum acceptable threshold of benefits that an insurance plan carries in order to adequately protect all people, and these companies shouldn't get to stick their noses in and tell you which treatments they do and don't agree with. The defined coverage is the minimum threshold for insurance just like passing a driver's test is the minimum threshold for being allowed to drive a car. Everyone has to adhere to it, for the safety and well-being of everyone else around them. 
Which doesn't make herpherpherpher's argument any better though.
For anyone interested the wiki article on Symphysiotomy does on to explain how in Ireland this procedure was done for years and years (up till 1992) after it was stopped in other countries. It was also done without the womens knowledge or consent in many cases and was done as a means of "ensuring childbirth without limitation" by Catholic doctors.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Symphysiotomy
It isn't as if he is going to actually pay for her birth control if the plan covers it. The plan isn't going to cost *him* more money--he is choosing to exclude it as an option because of his religious beliefs, not frugality. I would be willing to bet that the plan covers (even *gasp* out of wedlock) maternity, which is much more expensive than birth control pills.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Great -- then OP should go to HR at her company and file an FMLA request.  I believe FMLA has a 12 week duration though, so if there is a 6 month period before she gives birth where she won't be able to perform her job duties, and then obviously she'l need time afterward too, it is going to run out.
Sorry, you are half-right. There are no current subsidies. They are expecting the administration to start providing government subsidies to off-set this cost. It has not happened yet, no, but government analysts are predicting that this will be the case. That is why I said "most likely" in my post.
We aren't basing policy on religious belief, we are protecting religious beliefs with policy. We are talking about abortion inducing drugs, 4 out of the 20 approved by FDA, whom are objectionable to individuals that own a business, and should not be forced to compromise their religious beliefs in order to operate that business. We are talking about a behavior, not some debilitating disease they are withholding life saving medication for. Women are free to do as they please, engage in the behaviors they please, have access to any procedure or medication they wish to have, but should take responsibility for those actions. It's called being an adult. Not demand that someone else pay for their choices.This feigned outrage and outcry is an insult to any independent, responsible woman. The constitution is clear. Freedom of religion and the right to operate one's business as one sees fit ,trumps the ludicrous whiny demands of entitled pseudo-Feminists who have nothing, not one legitimate thing to whine about in this country.
The thing about a C section is that it will only allow for women to have less children (according to the doctors back then). The thought was that if they did a symphysiotomy the mother could go on to have a nice big catholic family of 10 or so children.  
You should probably do some research on what birth control is used for. For some reason it's the only way they go without having a period for weeks and weeks at a time. 
I honestly think thats a little outdated.   I've honestly never cared about how many partners a girls had.   the last girl I really liked, and asked out, who I'm good friends with, has been with quite a few more guys than me, older, bigger, (stature) and probably bigger dicks as well, motorcycle riding, fast car driving badasses, and I knew some of them.   but I got to know her over the course of a year and fell in love, I was really wrong about who she was and realized how much we had in common and how much we liked hanging out together, I honestly couldn't care less how many people or who she's been with. none of that matters if you're with her, I don't know why people don't see that.   so she dated those guys, she's with you now. where are you living? in the past or in the now?
Real reason being that the winner continues onto IeSF's (International e-Sports Federation) world final. IeSF is south korean organization that doesn't allow females entering said tournament, hence the limitation. Basicly it all boils down to koreans being sexists dicks.  Also from the article  &gt;We would also like to point out that the Finnish eSports Federation is currently lobbying for the equal rights of male and female players in the IeSF tournaments," he said. "This is an ongoing process and we of course welcome any support in this matter.
There were very few insightful posts in this thread, and this was one of them. Thanks for this.
WHAT THE FUCK!?
Very happy to hear, good luck with the new job!
&gt;No, I'm wondering what exactly he and you think women can do about it when men make a point of not caring what women think about masculinity and yet somehow it's still our responsibility.  First, men have made plenty of concessions about what the appropriate way for women to behave is. Women have a much, much broader range of acceptable behavior where gender performance is concerned than men. Women stepping up and taking on masculine roles is generally perceived as an awesome thing in society.   Second, men definitely care about what women think about masculinity. Male performance of masculinity as in a large part attributed to the fact that performance of the masculine gender role is what many, many, many women find attractive about men. Men are also inundated with criticisms of masculinity...the popular 90's trope about how men should get in touch with their feminine side for example. Men have been encouraged to be more forthcoming with their feelings vis a vis romantic relationships with women. So men definitely care about what women think about masculinity.   Lastly, I don't think it's your responsibility, actually. But, I think he thinks that you actually care about gender equality and may actually want to help contribute to the the amelioration of the issues that effect us.   &gt; would like gender equality, yes. I just think men shouldn't be telling women to solve problems men as a whole don't care about fixing.  We're actually surprisingly on the same page here. Except that he's not asking you to solve problems. He's asking for help. He's asking for compassion. Otherwise, I agree. Men should be tackling this stuff. We should be tackling it alone in my opinion, because I don't believe you guys are going to be helping in any significant way.   &gt;He's telling women from his position in the privileged gender class that we have to make his situation better because apparently we're not doing enough.  No he isn't. Again, he's asking for your help because feminists have told him that you care about gender equality. He doesn't realize that you don't actually care about bilateral general equality for both genders, and that you actually care about unilateral gender equality for women. Also, he's not asking you to make the situation better. He's asking for acknowledgement and help.   &gt;We can't even get you to realize what harassment entails.  To be fair, you guys are somewhat inconsistent about that.   &gt;It's mansplaining 1301, ffs. From where I'm sitting he just has a superiority complex.  And here is where I acknowledge to myself that you're a full on sexist and stop talking to you. 
Choosing another employer simply isn't possible for many people, especially in low-paying, minimum wage jobs, and I think it's terrible when people say that. There are lots of people desperate for jobs, and a whole lot of people who cannot afford to be picky about where they work, despite needing medical coverage.  It makes me think of people who say that homeless people just need to get a job, as if that's the only thing keeping them homeless. 
She's not worrying about what he'll do. She's primarily worrying about what's going on inside his head, with good reason.   OP, I'm sorry but I'll be frank. What you're feeling isn't insane, it's actually the most normal feeling since the existence of life on the planet. I highly doubt you are going to be able to change that by psyching yourself out. I recommend firing this girl and hiring an ugly one. 
That is one of the worst things I have ever heard. Synphisiotomy was a procedure done before cesarean sections became safe. The fact that they were doing them to women, still, against their will, so that they could have more kids because a cesarean limited you the three is terrifying.   They burned that one woman's sawed pelvis with a soldering iron to stop the bleeding.   Doctors did this. 
Dude that's just your experience, i've talked to many cool girls on Tinder and hooked with some. It all depends on how interact with people just like any social setting
My gf and I recently relocated to DC(technically Arlington, VA) from New York.  We absolutely love it here.  I don't know where you are moving from but if you make it here, be prepared for sky high rent and one of the most expensive cities in the nation.    For us, there wasn't much we did that was out of the ordinary.  I think we both added a line in our cover letters that we would be able to start working in DC immediately and that we would not require any help for the move.    If you know someone in the area, see if you can use their address on your applications.  
Maybe when asked "Do you want to have children after this baby" the mothers responded yes, and so the docs chose symphiostomy over c-section. We don't know what was said.   
[deleted]
[deleted]
Excellent! I was homeschooled as well, fundamentalist, etc. My parents weren't quite as extreme, but I had cousins who were raised in the Gothard environment and though they are still Christians, they are breaking away from that now and it has been awesome! So ironic that he had sexual harassment accusations with the so well-covered women who worked there!   So much less judgement, stress, nitpicking, and oppression. It has been an awesome journey for me, too, since I've broken away from that. 
This is not a woman's forum; reddit states this is a forum to discuss gender issues. "Rights of all genders are supported here". That is the aim of this post's discussion.  I certainly hope that you really don't think the message of my post was "women should fix my problems" because that is absolutely not my point: my point is that gender stereotypes hurt BOTH genders, and those seeking intergender equality might find it prudent to examine the entanglements that both genders are subject to as a result of the same source. Asdwolf summarizes my intent well.  Also, "problems men as a whole don't care about solving": obviously this is a problem I care about solving, thusly why I've raised the point by my OP, because I think it's poignantly indicative of the harm that gender roles have intra- and intergenderly. You attack me for simply being male, which I find not only one-dimensional, but also ignorant to my whole OP: if I was a woman, my general disposition wouldn't cause me problems; I only encounter problems because I AM a male! Which is pretty crazy, I think.  I didn't come here to try and boss women around or anything like that; I posted this anecdote to illustrate how men and women can (should) come together to to work towards the same end, because they are affected in the same ways by the same things. 
This is insane. I am an American nurse- midwife. I knew of symphysiotomy as the very last life saving desperate measure when a shoulder dystocia (head out, shoulders trapped) occurs. There are many maneuvers attempted before symphysiotomy would be considered. It's almost never done. I've never seen it, knock on wood. And it was being performed to avoid c-sections until 1992?! Criminal.
Go to police, than go to US embasy and report attack and that you're informed local police, you should be safa, or just ignore it if he didn't hurt you phisicaly or forced you to do something, btw in wich city you stayed ?  
i dont like this decision by the SCOTUS but i also dont think its really that big of a deal. its also a bit stupid from the business ownership prospective - do you WANT your employees to get pregnant and miss work? 
To be honest with good sex-ed and legal abortion there would probably wouldn't be many more then there have been (women going to England). I don't believe that abortion should actively be encouraged as birth control of choice but it should be available to anyone who needs it.
How/why are these two things being conflated with one another?
Thank you,  sweet pea uvu
How would you articulate some of the primary tenants of libertarian feminism?
Okay, that could possibly be an option. What resources could you think of for harassers? Counseling services? Reporting yourself to the campus PD? 
[deleted]
Did you know that until we bring this to court everything she said is just an allegation?
i looked up symphysiotomy in wikipedia. there was a diagram showing where a cut would happen. i'm already nauseous. ill have to come back to this at another time. 
But that's still not an hourglass shape.  Hourglass is a very distinct shape that is not achieveable by body building.  Surgery, maybe, but not bodybuilding.
&gt;My statement has nothing to do with anything in your reply.  Then why the hell did you reply to my post??  &gt;But then again you are right this is america and it is full of self righteous power hungry posters that have to be correct and god like all the time.  This is ironic coming from someone who responded to a post using flawed ass logic, and then when called out, tried to claim that her post didnt have anything to do with the post that she replied to... Are you sure you werent looking in the mirror when you typed this sentence?   PS. Your misguided condescension only further highlights how stupid this post was. 
[deleted]
The ACA specifically excludes men's access to what few birth control options they had available from the insurance requirement.  That would be the Dem's "War on Men..." right?      Thanks, Obama.  
I do the three month plan. 
&gt;"having it all" can mean different things to different people  Exactly. Yes it's probably not possible be be the most attentive mother/wife while being the president of a multi-billion dollar enterprise. That's probably a fair statement. That doesn't mean that *most* women (or men for that matter) can't successfully balance their work and family lives and be successful in both.
This is a lesson I won't soon forget. Still can't figured out how the message got sent. But it did and that is all that matters.
Lol yup. It's terrible. I'm not looking forward to doing that again. Since I got an Air Force slot coming from army though I'll take it for the better pay.
[deleted]
I'm going to go out on a limb and guess that you haven't read the decision you're relying on, but instead have just read news summaries and such, right?  Just to save you the trouble, here's the passage from the majority opinion that would mean your challenge would fail (pp. 46-47 of the PDF on supremecourt.gov) --  &gt;Our holding in *Lee* [the case I mentioned above -RH] turned primarily on the special problems associated with a national system of taxation. . . . [W]e explained that it was untenable to allow individuals to seek exemptions from taxes based on religious objections to particular Government expenditures. . . .  &gt;[I]f the issue in *Lee* were analyzed under the RFRA [Religious Freedom and Restoration Act, what Hobby Lobby was decided under] framework, the fundamental point would be that there simply is no less restrictive alternative to the categorical requirement to pay taxes.  Because of the enormous variety of government expenditures funded by tax dollars, allowing taxpayers to withhold a portion of their tax obligations on religious grounds would lead to chaos.  Recognizing exemptions from the contraceptive mandate is very different.  In other words, they saw you coming and threw dicta in the way, and no court in the land would uphold your challenge.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Compared to that torture, sure, they're relatively painless, but the recovery is pretty painful. Labor is difficult and painful no matter how you go through it, which I think is more what that verse is about. There is no direct biblical law against making labor easier as far as I know.   Also, on a semi related note, Eve was given that punishment after eating from the tree of knowledge and our long pregnancies and painful labors are mostly attributed to the large size of our babies' heads and brains, which can be attributed to our intelligence. (maybe someone can word this better)   So that's kinda neat I think. 
[deleted]
...did you even read the whole article?
They're not out of the question, its just that its really frustrating and annoying and you're really only doing it to be modest.  Also, babies love to make a joke out of pulling it off their head and laughing uncontrollably at you while simultaneously sucking on your teat (or at least mine did). I gave up pretty early on modesty on my second one.
&gt; "I don’t know how to make the world a better place without holding women accountable for choosing a–holes.”    Wait. Lemme think on this. It's like... on the tip of my tongue... Oh! How about STOP BEING ASSHOLES? Kind of harkens back to the 'prevent rape by not raping' thing. 
What?  If your relationship isn't working, you fix it or you break up...you don't cheat.  There is no excuse for cheating.
While they could let women play, if a women wins she would not be able to compete in the International level tournament that the winner can go too. The International League this Federation is apart of wants to promote e-sports as "legitimate" sports, they think this is accomplished by banning women from playing in their league to segregate the sport like physical sports.
&gt; I'm not saying they shouldn't be critical of feminism where it is warranted  I actually do think that a Men's Right Movement shouldn't ever be critical of feminism. Individuals can be critical about whatever they want, but why should *a movement* ever spend its time criticizing other movements? That's just a waste of time that doesn't work to achieve their goal. Let individuals critique movements; but keep movements working towards their own goals and not busy criticizing other movements.
&gt; Welcome to TwoXChromosomes, a subreddit for thoughtful content - serious or silly - related to gender, **and intended for women's perspectives.**  also:  http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/wiki/faq#wiki_xy_here.3B_am_i_allowed_to_post.3F  
&gt; The thing with this is that it is SO INCREDIBLY EASY to breastfeed discreetly in public.  How many kids have you BF in public? I am on my 4th, and this is HIGHLY variable from baby to baby. My first was fine wherever, my second hated being covered, my 3rd I was able to discreetly nurse in public until he weaned at 17 months, and my last I gave up on at 4 months and just started taking pumped bottles out with us because he HAS to see everything that's going on at all times. Covering or even trying to be discreet with him would not work.   The thing of it is though, with very few exceptions, most women *want* to feed their baby without bothering others. There are always extremists, but the average mother doesn't plan to go out and show off her juggs at the coffee shop, trust me, we get NO pleasure at showing off. We just want to feed our darlings so they stop fussing and bothering the people around us.   That said it can't always be done with a cover. Most nursing moms try to cover the parts with their shirts, I've known very few who would pull out a boob over the neckline. But that said the people who complain about it generally don't care how little is showing(because again, the average woman is showing next to nothing). They care that they can *maybe* see something if they strain their necks just the right way, and by gosh no one should have to see that!  
[deleted]
Jesus, he sounds like someone that's never been in a relationship before. At 28 years old you'd think he'd have grown up a bit before hitting 27.  It's on him too, so he's being not only a child but not even living up to what he initially wanted. I'd rethink the relationship going forward. It sounds like something I'd expect from a young teenager, not someone approaching 30.
Did you delete this topic, or was it removed by the mods? This doesn't seem to break any of the subreddit rules...
Feminism advocates for equality in that it advocates for ending sexist (and other) hierarchies. Feminism focuses on women, specifically, since they are the sexually subordinated group relative to men. Feminism does not seek to take rights or respect away from men, but to make rights and respect for women equal to that of men. Rights and respect aren't a zero sum game. I'm sure we all can agree that more can be done in terms of how we conceive of rights and respect for all peoples, as well.   We are specifically talking about anti-feminism here. Anti-feminism can mean a couple of things: (1) to rid all gains and influence of feminism, and/or (2) to rid all future gains and influence of feminism. (1) would result in dismal prospects for women, and (2) would result in the loss of advocacy for and liberation from all current and future forms of sexist exploitation against women, another dismal prospect for women. 
It's not bigotry, but it is stupid. Just remove both requirements I'm pretty sure no one will die as a result.
Because it is using the naming system from diseases or pests to refer to human children.   When I used it that way, I meant the people in /r/childfree who actively hate all children and parents and live in their insular bigoted community. Those are the people who make it a lifestyle, as in, they have nothing else going for them so they define themselves through a hatred of children.   Obviously if you simply choose not to have children that's fine. When you become an anti-child fascist it's really bizarre and creepy.
If ou are under aged then I beleive the state has to help you by placing you in a group home. Honestly might be worth contacting child services and seeing what they have to say. Your legal guardians cannot kick you out before 18 its agaisnt the law. Also what kind of phone plan are you working with, having a contact number and ann ability to make calls is very important. How much time do you have on your phone?
Why even bother trying anything? Just because chess failed doesn't mean eSports will fail. I think if IeSF was smart they would've had gendered tournaments for all their games if IOC is their goal. IeSF is a fucking joke.
Is there any reason this ruling can't be extended beyond birth control and Christian objections to it? At it's core, the ruling says that privately held corporations can have religious beliefs. Is there anything that stops another company from saying that they have religious objections to blood pressure medicine and refusing to cover that?
But there currently are no rules for using "xe" so it can't yet be said to be used incorrectly. "They" in this context, by contrast, offends English teachers and others who promote good usage.
[deleted]
Most of us really don't, tho. It's horrifying.
Your sandbox, your rules. Everyone, only tell TwoX OP's what they want to hear, or TwoX posters will troll all over reddit. It's ok, they're women and they're being supportive. Again, how embarrassing.
Do you have a link to this? I didn't realize it went that far.  This is all I could find from an article posted 16 hours ago.  &gt;In the short term, the ruling appears to allow the owners of Hobby Lobby and Conestoga Wood Specialties to opt out of the health care law’s requirement that they provide all Food and Drug Administration-approved forms of birth control in their health plans.   http://www.politico.com/story/2014/06/supreme-court-hobby-lobby-decision-contraception-mandate-108429.html#ixzz36L6Kf2TU   edit: found it. http://hosted.ap.org/dynamic/stories/U/US_SUPREME_COURT_BIRTH_CONTROL_OTHER_CHALLENGERS?SITE=AP&amp;SECTION=HOME&amp;TEMPLATE=DEFAULT
It was performed without consent instead of a c-section so that women could have more children (and were told that it was so they could be good catholic women and have 10+ children). Also they were told that they would be cleansed of their sin of sex through child birth and by having a c-section they would not be cleaned on this sin.  Also the problem was this medical procedure was made obsolete years before it was stopped in ireland. These went one between 1944-1992.
Weather the hourly wage is considered high or low can depend on the area you live.  I think I read that HL pays $9 or so for part time work. 
&gt; If you have a sinlge encounter with a stranger and her bratty kid a grocery store, and you judge and decide she's a bad parent, you're making a lot of assumptions so that you can feel righteous about judging her.  The operative word in that hypothetical is "if." I don't have to worry about that because I don't make snap judgements like that.
[deleted]
There is a lot of pointless over sexualisation in society. It's the same thing with urination. A lot of problems would be solved with street urination, if you just put up urinals in public. Urination is a natural necessary thing and it boggles my mind why we have this insane fetishized fear of public urination.
I thought you were asking a question and I gave some detail  
often times sad stories are much more beautiful...
Why has it been ok for years for insurance to not cover certain medications? You're actually paying them for health coverage in that respect,  it's not a perk of getting a certain job. Yet they've been doing it for a long time.
[deleted]
In other news, I've watched this post getting upvoted and downvoted in equal numbers.  Tough crowd...wonder what the downvoters are thinking?  Thanks for the thoughtful responses.  Kinda thought there'd be more interest in this though.
damn, nice detective work
The message I'm getting from all this, is that body image isn't really an issue. we shouldn't worry about models being too thin, or photo shopped movie stars setting impossible standards. If you're unlucky you'll have body image issues, if you're lucky you won't. Thank you.
I'm a woman. I do not have children but I see it as pointless, I mean, some women think that they deserve the sun, stars and moon just because they are pregnant. It just annoys me for some reason, not that I am saying that all pregnant women are like that.  
As a native American/American Indian, I can tell you that there has been plenty of atrocity in the united states in the name of the Christian god.  This isn't a pissing contest, I just couldn't let that slide without saying something, I'm sorry.
If he explicitly said you weren't exclusive (or even if nobody said you were) well, then, you weren't exclusive. You didn't do anything wrong. And you did something right in being honest about something potentially sticky.  He sounds like a jealous and controlling ass.
With very little success if they've taking appropriate actions instead of firing you.  Every step of the way the CMO and CEO where in the wrong and yet you're dead set to try and blame the victim who gave them every opportunity to de-escalate this.
[deleted]
So selfish. "I want it all no matter the cost".
&gt; menstruation pain and childbirth are punishments handed down from Eve  Don't know where the menstruation pain thing came from, but the childbirth thing is definitely Biblical. But it doesn't say that all women *must* suffer the consequences of the curse.  &gt;we must go through them to be cleansed of our sins in having sex.  This isn't Biblical at all.  So, the problem is that Irish Catholics aren't reading the Bible?
I think that if a comment needs to be taken care of, if you're just reporting it, instead you should message the mods and explain why it's an issue. However, I also think that there isn't currently one widely accepted set of guidelines on what is and isn't transphobic, making this one of the most subjective areas to moderate.  I'm not condoning those comments at all. And I'm one of those people who generally thinks that people know that anything they say after "but" is going to offend someone, but...  I don't think that transphobic comments are unique to TwoX, default or not. It's like in this country we have to learn to stop discriminating against people one characteristic at a time. Race, gender, sexual orientation all needed their own set of laws and court decisions. And, unfortunately, I think that right now all of the attention focused on changing opinions on gay marriage is probably focusing some negative attention on trans issues.
PP hooked me up with two years of free birth control when I had no job or insurance. Life was hard enough at the time and the bc kept me from throwing up in the bathroom once a month or getting pregnant. I'll never forget that. Also, some of the best customer service I've experienced from healthcare. I still go to them with insurance over other clinics because everyone is very nice and very helpful.
&gt; Hey, not forcing a company to pay for abortion pills is ~~infringing on women's rights~~ **taking away women's bodily autonomy**. Mkay?  FTFY
Sorry it came off that way.  I'm just really pissed that I keep seeing people use the argument without realizing it's hypocritical.  Both birth control and Viagra are used to keep people alive in many cases.  
http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pubmed/11727171  "Definitive evidence exists for protection against ovarian and endometrial cancers, benign breast disease, pelvic inflammatory disease requiring hospitalization, ectopic pregnancy, and iron-deficiency anemia. It has also been suggested that oral contraceptives may provide a benefit on bone mineral density, uterine fibroids, toxic shock syndrome, and colorectal cancer. Treatment of medical disorders with oral contraceptives is an "off-label" practice. Dysmenorrhea, irregular or excessive bleeding, acne, hirsutism, and endometriosis-associated pain are common targets for oral contraceptive therapy."  None of these applications have anything to do with contraception.
Please just report comments like that rather than responding in kind.
OP response should read:  &gt; *Dear god, I hope no one is reading this but me and this bitch. Still feels bad though. Hopefully I'll forget about this tomorrow, I hate how this embarrassment and discomfort is lingering right now.*
Its ok, I apologize for being crass.   That question is more of one that would take me too many words for my time today to answer. For simply teaching someone to build a fire could be causing harm to someone.
[deleted]
Fucking hell I wish I could read a news story about my piece of shit third grade teacher getting mauled by a swarm of bull sharks.   Congratulations. Don't feel guilty about finally getting relief. A lot of abuse victims would kill for the karma you got. I can't wait to get mine, despite how sick it sounds. 
Boom! I agree. Feminism being co-opted for marketing isn't cool with me.
As I mentioned above, I like being alone, and I will be for a long time. I never ever defended cheating on him. I know it was wrong. I was immature and selfish and greedy. And now I know how it feels, because he did it to me too, after we were married. 
I'd be perfectly fine paying out of pocket if my pill packs were 10-15$ or under per month.  As it is, when not covered by insurance, my monthly packs are 75$-ish when I don't get discounts from my store pharmacy.  From what I've read shopping around for other types/brands, mine are about middle of the track price-wise in the US.  I don't want to switch, either, because this one has worked perfectly for me after the first initial adjustment months.
They aren't dictating the rights of citizens.  They aren't even dictating the rights of employees.  These employees can seek things their job doesn't cover on their own. Whether or not they can actually afford them doesn't matter since there are millions of people who can't afford healthcare at all and no one cares about those people.  Your job is not required to cater to your own beliefs or make things easy for you.   If you don't like the terms of employment or compensation then you are free to find other employment. Whether or not that's an easy thing to do doesn't matter since there is no law that someone must employ you. The only way it would be imposing their beliefs on you is if they somehow forbid you to do things they didn't agree with, using pay you'd earned there. In no place is that happening. However,  I absolutely agree that employment should not at all be tied to healthcare. This way, you can choose which company carries the coverage you want. I know you can already do that but because some employers use insurance to keep people working there, many people can't afford it. It would be better if you had the choice to opt out of your company's insurance and gain a bit more pay to be able to get your own.
[deleted]
[deleted]
If there's another provider in your area that takes your insurance, you have a right to switch doctors if that's what you prefer. There's no guarantee the service will be better but good, luck, I hope it is.
Neither is the US in so many ways.  But that's not the point here.  
They believe destruction of a fertilized egg is termination of a life because they believe life begins at conception. Medical science does not term someone pregnant until the fertilized egg implants, therefore abortion cannot happen before that time. Medical fact here does not strip anyone of their right to believe  life starts before the actual medical pregnancy. And, btw, they base their idea that these methods destroy fertilized eggs on FDA labeling, and HHS did not dispute. But, you would know all of these things had you read the opinion.  
And your assertion that there are noises in the air that some chappies feel otherwise should be taken as a huge sign that full change is imminent?  If it were really **that** important (as you imply), they would boycott with no further ado.  But they don't, do they?  No, they don't.  
&gt;third grade  Holy shit, I'm so sorry.
It also has to do with availability. Looking too long or holding too long / deep of a conversation with a girl who has a boyfriend is passe. In response we don't pay too much attention or we act that way to look for verbal or visual queues as to if she's taken. Then we can act appropriately. It's a shame we can't treat everyone the same, but that's the nature of male-female interaction now isn't it. The girls who don't give visual queues that they are taken, when they are indeed in a relationship, are the weird ones. Not mentioning a boyfriend or acknowledging him in a group setting is almost a disservice to everyone around them.  
It is not a right to deny another person healthcare simply because you think the world works a certain way.
http://i.imgur.com/CGqyBD3.jpg
you proved your comment was barely applicable to what i said and nothing about it was offensive just because you may not agree doesnt mean its offensive...you're right marriage does not secure happiness or love, i never said that. half of marriages end in divorce not because the system is flawed but instead because people are flawed...pride and selfishness is why divorce rate is so high...you should try hearing whats being said and not what you think is being said. I never mentioned anything being "proper" instead i mentioned typically two people committed in marriage typically do not deal with all the insecurities and negative emotions described above in regards to sex
Kind of confused.  If you are in a large group why would the conversation be tailored so that one member can follow along.  Sure it would be rude to talk exclusively about another group of friends or work, but I think its odd to feel like the conversation needs to only be in topics that you can contribute.
Ok :)  I need to give a bit of background to this; After my birth, my mum had me until I was 6 months old when I was brought into care for the first time. She's an alcoholic. After about a year or so in different rehabs she met a man that I knew to be my dad. They went on to get married (terrible idea) and have two more kids. I was passed about between care, back to parents, family members and back into care an awful lot. During one stint (after my parents had split up), my da was sober but my ma was not. My younger brothers continued contact with her but I hated her with a passion so I didn't. My da drove with me in the car to pick them up after my brother rang saying she was drunk. She ran out to the car half naked screaming 'your daddys a rapist!'. I was about 10. I didn't hear anymore about it except one time until I was about 16, but it totally fucked with my head. I would definitely change how I found out. If it wasn't for my aunt confirming to me one time that it wasn't my dad who was a rapist, but that my ma was raped by another man and that was how I was born, it would've destroyed the relationship with my dad.  I have no feelings about the rapist, other than he's obviously evil. It doesn't feel personal to me though, like seeing some serial killer on the news. I have a very rocky relationship with my mother and always have done due to many factors. Mainly stemming from drink.  I wasn't treated any different than my brothers, but all four of us are stigmatised by my mas family because they don't want to deal with her shit anymore, my dads family because they don't want to deal with her anymore and my step dads family, for the same reason.  It used to worry me when I was a teen. About 3 years ago I got the full details of what he had done and went off the rails. I thought 'well fuck it, I'm bad anyway'. I now realise what either of them do is nothing to do with me. I am basically the twin of one maternal aunt, look nothing like my mother, so I know I don't look like him.  I have 3 wee brothers. Two from my first dad and one from the second :)
You do not go hiking alone because if there is an accident and you do not have help you die. It has nothing to do with being attacked by a stranger. 
which is why when i hear "just put it up for adoption" as an argument against birth-control/abortion i get very angry. so many things can go wrong, and even when they go right they can go wrong.   i hope the effects lessen overtime for you. {{internet hug}}
The article that we are talking about. But more granularly, Google's diversity report on its company that is quoted.
Oh yes it certainly exists universally but the Irish perfected it (or so we have been told).  That video is always my favourite way to explain Catholic guilt to people who don't get it.
The Viagra defense is not a defense of why BC coverage should be constitutional.  It's a comparison of moral judgments made on men and women.  See the edited post.
They definitely don't fuck around.  It's funny because my whole family is Catholic.  One grandmother is Irish but I believe her parents were both born in America.  My great grandmother got adopted by Irish-Americans and passed it down to my grandfather.  My other grandfather was born in Mexico and my other grandmother was born in Brazil.  They all have very different takes on religion.  My parents sort of Americanized their parents' versions.  Unfortunately I think my Brazilian grandmother was sexually assaulted by a priest so that might be why her take on it is different.
Chafing does suggest that you're experiencing muscle tightness, especially if that's still happening with added lubrication. I have this with my boyfriend: horrible pain on insertion, gets better as he finds a spot where the muscles are chill, and then I eventually get worn out and can't keep going. How long does this last after sex? Have you ever experienced bleeding after or during sex? (This would just assess the level of chafing/soreness.)   Sounds like you should get it checked out. I can't really say how long a woman should be able to go for sex, but I mean, you should definitely be able to make it like, 10 minutes...if marathon sex makes you sore that's one thing, but just a few minutes is definitely an indicator of a muscular or skin issue. 
Thanks for sharing your story
[deleted]
Is that really a fair fix though? Men can have safe sex 6 times a week; while women can have safe sex as many times as they want a week. 
What you are describing is something completely different to the situations I posted about. Was my post unclear or are you simply saying that there are situations other than those I was referring to where it is OK to make comments on a persons weight?
I've been dealing with [similar issues on Facebook](http://static.someecards.com/someecards/usercards/the-number-of-people-who-dont-grasp-their-actual-constitutional-freedoms-astounds-me-42050.png) lately, as well.
/hugs thank you. and congrats on your wonderful baby boy! They are so darn awesome. My son is going to be 3 in a few days and when he saw me crying he asked if he could fix it. So, he put on FRIENDS on the DVD and said "I find the right one for you." Then proceeded to play about 5 seconds of a few diff discs.   
That's how I feel. I knew it was something that happened to 'other' people. I know it's silly, but I didn't think it would happen to me. No clue at the amount of blood, all of it was just terrifying. I am sad for my husband, too. He's been trying to be so strong for me but I can tell it's weighing on his heart too. We need to find a way to talk about it more.   
&gt;well, that state that can't decide whether it's part of the south  Oklahoma?
Tennessee here, and I'm nursing a two month old. BRING IT THE FUCK ON. I'm just hormonal enough to be a little bit crazy and will have no problem losing my shit on the first person who dares to say something to me. I'm looking forward to it.  
There shouldn't be turmoil/upheaval towards ANY of the drugs.  Bringing up the argument about Viagra without mentioning anything in your post about how it treats various medical conditions, just like bc, only encourages people who aren't  informed about the drug to get pissed off and continue to spread misinformation.  If you had written something like "it's unfair that bc isnt covered because it treats various medical conditions and Viagra is a comparable drug (in that it treats ED as well as life threatening illnesses) that is covered" I wouldn't have said anything.  You chose to not include that information in your original post, so i thought I should mention it.  
Wow, I never realized someone could be so entitled that they feel as though other people (who don't even fucking know you) who don't tailor their conversations to YOU are rude. Seriously, fuck off.
"Mateen and Wolfe were involved in a romantic relationship."  It's never smart to date a co-worker. The woman will win almost every single time. 
&gt;what tells the women that the catwalk model is better than the curvier woman?  Other women.   Women are the ones that do most of the media harassment and shaming.   Gossip rags are written by women for women.     That guy who says *"you know what would make you look better?  Losing 50 lbs and having no breasts?"*  He's a fashion designer. And he's very gay. High fashion models are expected to be *less attractive than the clothes.*  That is why they look like ethiopian boys.   They're paid to hang outfits on without distracting people from looking at the outfits.  
Do you think your mom would have gotten an abortion had she had easier access to it?  If you became pregnant as a result of rape, do you think you would be more inclined to keep the pregnancy as a result of your experience?  
Cool. Thanks for following up. I don't have herpes, so I've just tried to absorb lots of information from friends who o.
Ok so according to that article, they just said that the courts have to reconsider the issue. So they have to decide 1) do they count as closely held, 2)is there as strong a religious freedom argument for banning all birth control (looking at the way the opinion was written, as much as I hate it, you can definitely still argue this point,) and 3) that the government's interest in providing the four contraceptives hobby lobby wantedto ban is not a more compelling interest than having  some birth control available with insurance to anybody. Pretty sure they can lose on at least one of those three in a lot of places (hell, Indiana district court judges just made the governor dwlay his stay against gay marriage while it's appealing to let a dying lesbian get married, which isa pretty big leap for the state). But maybe I'm just tok optimistic and hopeful.
Guy here. I feel so much sympathy for you.  Having had a couple of false starts ourselves a couple of weeks earlier than you, a brother and sister in law who lost a pregnancy at 13 weeks and another that lost a child to cot death (SIDS) at nearly two years old it is a topic of fairly frank conversation within my family but one that I am very aware of others being highly squeamish of.  I think it is a mixture of people that haven't been close to the situation not knowing how to talk sensitively and openly about it and people wanting to put it to the back of their mind and hope for the best in case they jinx their own pregnancy.   We are currently at week 30 of what has been a very straightforward pregnancy but just writing that makes me feel like I am tempting the fates... 
The physical treatment for endo is hardly scarring the uterus, it's ablating the endometrial tissue outside of the uterus. 
But it's an easily avoidable risk.
It will most likely, like 99%, be fine. Most nurses on the OB ward (who you will see much more than the doctor) are sympathetic and kind. Take along your partner or a friend you is willing to yell when they aren't. Never forget that you are the one in charge of this process.  And welcome to momhood! It's the best roller coaster ride ever.
&gt; Not all women can tolerate the $9 pill  Very true. For instance, I can only take Yasmin without getting severely bloated (I actually have stretch marks from it), which worsens the medical issue for which I take it, and the price of it in the US is absolutely mad.
Do you mean pro-abortion or pro-choice?  I think there are plenty of people here who feel that abortion is not or would not be the right choice for them. However, I think a vast majority of contributors in this subreddit believe very strongly that regardless of their personal beliefs, they cannot and should not force them onto another situation. That each pregnant woman should have the right to choose what is best for them and their physical, mental, emotional, financial, and life circumstances.   No stats on that, just what I've seen from reading TwoX for a couple of years 
Found the article and now his Facebook.  Not gonna lie; I had a good chuckle at his FB profile pic -- trying to look hard while riding his bike with one hand and no helmet.  Rot in pieces, fucko.
&gt;The idea that sharing an experience with more than one person cheapens it - or me - is just perverse, and it's an idea we only have about sex, and not any other experience.  I think you are completely missing the point kskools83 has been trying to make.  He never even implied what you stated here.  Let me try to see if I can help get the point across.  All kskools83 is saying as that sex, when treated with respect, when both partners care about and love each other, is sacred, healthy, and good for both people in that it creates a stronger bond between them, improves their self esteem, etc.  Casual sex, however, more often than not, does the opposite of those things.  Casual sex is much less of a gift given to each other and much more of two people using each other just for sexual gratification.  Simply put, casual sex is masturbation with a partner, and sex between two people who love and respect each other is the ultimate expression of love that two people can share.
[deleted]
Maybe it's not the fact of your disagreement, but rather what you are saying.
For the most part, most of the white people I've come in contact have been able to trace their family lineage back generations. When they express pride based on that lineage no seems to object or argue. But when people say things like "white" power they flack for it.   &gt;  but it is wrong to claim that struggles and differences are only allowed for you.  Yeah. The post went downhill from there.
My "push presents" were my babies.
I'll check them out! Thanks!
There's nothing wrong with those 2. I just wanted to give dresses to organizations who will give them away for free. I'm sure there are girls out there who can't afford them. I am donating all of my other clothes to Goodwill though! 
Well in that case he's just totally unobservant or something hahaha  Maybe he wanted a quick way to see if you were taken. Idk. 
yeah but its not only because of the risk of amniocentesis is it?   eitherway malformations are infertility do increase with age. Maybe it's not 35, but it definitely happens. I dont see the problem with accepting this.
It's impossible to list every reason here. One part of this is a religious issue, when life actually begins. Is it at fertilization? Implantation? Heartbeat? Is a 10 week pregnancy, at which point the fetus has absolutely 0 chance of survival outside of the mother, really the equivalent of a full, breathing, functioning human? Is a 15? Is a 20?   What about mothers who were raped? What about moms whose lives are threatened by the pregnancy? What about fetuses who have defects such that they have no chance of survival to birth? To 1 week of age? To one year of age? Should the mother have to carry that pregnancy through the immense physical and emotional and financial struggles? What about a mom who just isn't ready or capable?  And the answer to all of these questions, pro-choice people seem to feel, is this: these are all things that no one, not anyone, can answer for one another. 
Awesome! I come from a similar background. My first vibrator was a life changing experience. And Lelo is an amazing brand!  Many good vibes to you.  :)
YES. Not to mention gaining 25-45 lbs (or more), undergoing sleepless nights and hip pain, outgrowing my shoes, and (in my case) being hospitalized, experiencing climbing blood pressure and life-threatening liver conditions and then cut open 8 weeks early.  ...And now I'm pregnant again. God help me.
Thank you for sharing, you are a strong person, that's why I think most people don't share it, it's just to traumatic and painful to do, specially when you really really want the baby...some woman can't take it and it takes them their whole life to get over something like this, and then you have to run into the one asshole who make you feel like shit about it too...my mom had three miscarriages, and she talks about it, she almost die in every single one of them. And even thou it happened a long long time ago, you can see it still hurts her when she brings it up. But you are definitely right, it helps to know what to expect physically when something like this happens and you haven't had the experience. Thanks again
[deleted]
Not true. It may be the best course of action in a situation, but it might not be.
When I was talking to her, I asked her if she was still afraid of her ex, and she said no, that he didn't know where she lives, that he only facebook stalks her but hasn't tried contacting her in a long time. I even talked to her the night she was murdered, trying to figure out our plan for this week. I was supposed to see her today. I felt uneasy about it, and now this.   I am so happy you got out, but so very sad for his wife. :( 
For the record, there is no clear line. Currently at 25 weeks, a baby has a 50% chance of survival- just survival. The baby has an incredibly tiny chance of survival without serious disability- having to supplement oxygen, being on very serious medications, blindness, deafness, severe mental impairment. Each week that passes, the baby has better odds at a 'normal' development. But even later premies often suffer from pretty critical medical and learning problems. There just isn't a standard on when it's a person, though many are against 3rd trimester abortions. 
No, irony would be if I were unaware of the context of my writing. Unwarranted would be if it were not in response to your defensiveness and justification of your own hostility.    I'm willing to acknowledge when I'm being less than polite rather than insist others accommodate it and not point it out. Tone policing suits you when it suits you, that much is obvious.   But I assure you, any irony lost is lost on you. 
[deleted]
What about pushing the actual police number instead of campus safety number as the main one to call to report a crime?  Campus safety have time and time again tried to downplay crimes to keep the university safety record looking good.
[deleted]
Well, what I wonder about is this: why can't you be effeminate and straight?  "I like women, but I'm not an outdoorsy, macho, tattoo, acting or being tough kind of guy."
Keep it civil when commenting here.
[deleted]
&gt; Besides, you realize that the Scalia, Breyer, Kennedy, Thomas, and Ginsberg nominations to the Supreme Court would not have been confirmed if it weren't due to a bipartisan effort in the Senate, don't you? This ruling happened because Republicans and Democrats alike willed it.  .  &gt;They were only confirmed because one of the parties had more than enough votes to cast a majority vote by itself.   It's clear you're just spouting nonsense rather than actually defending a coherent position.
I'm so sorry you had to go through all of that. I hope you don't feel like this thread is trying to guilt you about keeping things private. Thank you for sharing this, and I hope you're doing okay. 
As someone who uses birth control to help control her endometriosis I would just like to say FUCK THIS RULING. 
Sounds like a cultural thing.  While the types of comments you are mentioning seem offensive to me, it is because I wasn't raised in the culture you are referring to.  It seems that, in that culture, such comments are culturally acceptable.  You still have the right to be offended and handle that however you want, but understand that it is very likely you, and not them, that are behaving outside of the cultural norms.
[deleted]
Hahahaha. This article is ridiculous and so are you idiots. 
If I could have been but a fly on the wall.
:(
Well, I'm infertile, so honestly I'd never be in a position where it would be too late for me, because I wouldn't be making the decision. And I'm about 99% sure that so long as the pregnancy wasn't putting the mother's life at risk, doctors probably wouldn't abort the fetus under those conditions. So really, it's not an important hypothetical situation for me to think about, because there's arguably no significant chance of it translating to reality.  
There are a billion of them. They think a lot of different things
&gt; There would not be repeated c sections. There was no danger of that. If you had a c section you had 3 kids and then had a hysterectomy.   I was referring to if you had 10 kids, not 3. If you had 10 kids, that would mean 10 c-sections, not 3. I have no idea what you're getting at here.  &gt;Please bear in mind that you are literally the only person I've ever heard of who tries to defend what is widely accepted as a great atrocity here.  I never once defended it. I once gave you a hypothetical example, about them being medically preferred, so maybe that's what you're referring to?  &gt;What do you need explained? The explicit belief was that women should suffer during childbirth simply because they are women.  **Yes, that's what I wanted explained. You have not done so.**  Obviously I never said that it was "in the best interests of the woman's health to literally cripple her for life" and so on. And I'm 100% sure that it was never the doctor's intention to do that either. You've gone from accusing people of being misogynistic to being horrifically evil demons who delight in the torture of women. You seriously believe that?
Internalizing racism and sexism is an enormous part of keeping them strong. Like if everyone that wasn't a white dude just flipped the table and said "fuck all this shit no longer putting up with it" we would probably have less fire power but we would have more people. In order for systems of oppression to keep themselves going, the population being oppressed is most easily kept under control by breaking them down and internalizing some kind of self hatred. Convincing people to derive their own pride and happiness through some shitty association with a white dude, be that a black slave, a concubine, or even a low class white guy, is in a way the most psychologically fucked up part of internalized racism and sexism. Maybe. I dunno, maybe that's too big a claim.  But seriously when you convince a population they are inherently less deserving then another and this is just how things work and you can at least aspire to be a good mother, higher ranking servant, etc. you give that population reasons not to revolt, to escape, to overthrow.  It's really gross and fucked up but people in marginalized groups with internalized self hatred might easily find aspects about themselves that don't line up with the stereotypes they know hang around their necks, that they can mentally distinguish themselves from their own group and seriously resent group members who seem to be perpetuating the stereotype. Women complaining about other women sleeping around, wearing revealing clothing, etc., people who aren't white complaining about clothing style, or how people talk, etc. as being stereotypical and bad. It's self hatred directed at the group with an insistence that even though you're black, or female, or whatever, you're not like those girls, those people etc.   And then what are we left with? People who lose a thousand times over, because not only are they excluded from the in group, but they'd re excluded from the higher rankings of their own group. Being a part of that higher ranking and getting to feel a bit closer to the in group means having to push other people people, darker skinned people, further away from yourself, even if you're both black.  Sorry you have put up with so much. The worst is feeling betrayed by the people it seems should understand it most. I wrote this about women too 'cause it's a lady sub and internalized racism and sexism have some stuff in common. But as an intersectional feminist, white ladies are unfortunately very often very ignorant of the racism you're describing, and black women, hell non-white women, face a history of sexual battery in North America that is under fucking represented. Aboriginal women in a Canada are like eight times more likely to be beaten in the face during rape then white women. Now don't get me wrong, rape stats across the board are completely fucked, but I think it says a lot how much aboriginal women are beaten and killed. Our society does not value people equally, and even if all women are the sex class, some women face a different breed of sexual violence as a result of their race.  Sorry if all of that was garbage, I am just angry and fuck everyone who spoke to you like that and going on a rant. 
Your company doesn't decide what your insurance covers. It decides what ITS insurance covers. There's a difference. You can opt out, find your own insurance and utilize that. 
I know nothing about this, so let me ask - what's the chance of getting her institutionalized as a danger to herself?
I had a miscarriage at nine weeks. I felt it slide out and saw it in the toilet. It looked just like the 8 week fetuses in baby books. I broke down right after that and my husband had to call the doctor for me.
If only it were that easy, neither one of us has $500 lying around. Based on everyone's opinion here, I should tackle the gallstones first.
It's true. Sorry, I was busy all day with work and stuff. I am pretty sure that the company is over 50 people. I'm trying to count them all up and I can count 30 that I see around from time to time but I'm new so I may or may not be missing people. If the company is over 50 people could you explain the legal ramifications of this?
Our employer doesn't cover our health insurance. They just decide what insurance companies and plans we have access to pay for ourselves.
Beautiful tattoo! The comment would have rubbed me the wrong way too. 
I will be angry at the people who were supposed to help her but didnt.
Wait, seriously, how?  Read the bolded parts only, like you said.  Edit: and how is my comment not adding to the discussion?  TwoX is getting annoying.
1.  Stop calling your mother dramatic.  Whether you mean to or not, it is dismissing her at least within your own head.  Which isn't going to help any.  Feelings are legitimate.  You don't get to decide how another person should think or feel.    2.  It was super shitty of her to tell you that.  Especially given the kind of relationship you have with your father.  It's putting you in the middle where *you have no business being.*  The parent/child relationship is a deeply important one.  She should have gone to *anyone other than you.*  Therapist, friend, family.  Had he been abusive to you talking to you about it would be important, but in a way that helps you.    3.  Abuse is a tricky thing.  No one wants to believe someone they love is abusive.  You can witness it and still not see it.  It's actually quite common for a parent to abuse the other and not the children.  It's also quite common for an abuser to appear nice, calm and put together to everyone else.  It's part of the abuse cycle.  A really good book to read is [Why Does He Do That.](http://www.amazon.com/Why-Does-He-That-Controlling/dp/0425191656)    4.  You are never going to know what really happened and have to come to terms with that.  I *highly* suggest therapy to work through everything.    5.  Your relationship with your father is between the 2 of you.  Same with you and your mother as well as your mother and your father.  How you navigate that is really up to you.  A therapist will also help with this.  Maybe that means you tell your mom that while you do support her, she needs to stop talking to you about this.  Maybe that means you stay away from them both until you have sorted it out.  It's going to be whatever *you* need it to be.  
Probably not. I would argue that the health concern would have to be endemic, or potentially endemic, to the US.
take your time, think about it, let the bullshit sink in.
[deleted]
why, thank you.
I don't think abortion is murder or a religious issue.
I know she tries to talk about it...but I also think that as the husband I cannot relate as much as her coworkers who have had children of their own... Talk!  Words, words, words, even if it's hard!
I am very sorry you are going through this.   I had a miscarriage at 7 weeks 3 years ago. It started at work, so my boss knew. She and my husband are the only ones who know. I didn't feel right talking about it with anyone because I was an emotional wreck. Plus the pregnancy was so short. I felt I didn't have a right to be upset when other women are losing theirs so much later. I felt that I was overreacting and over-emotional, I mean, I just found out I was pregnant two weeks before and didn't have enough time to even get used to the idea.   The internet was a big help in learning what to expect. But, I really did not expect it to feel like labor pains that lasted for several days. 
[XD](http://i1247.photobucket.com/albums/gg625/dickdick4/funny-gif-Steve-Carell-laughing.gif)
&gt; I'm a redhead. I'll sometimes say my hair is natural because well, a lot of people dye their hair red. Now that's racist?   It's like you didn't read a single word I said.  &gt;I get not joining the movement or making a big deal about being #teamnatural, but you really can't say that I'm racist for describing my never dyed, rarely curled or straightened aka natural hair as natural.  I'd love to know where I called you or anyone else racist.  You're the fourth person in this thread to beat a StrawNegro and go off on an "I'm not racist!" tangent instead of actually engaging my point. :/
please look into nar-anon or al-anon. unfortunately addiction is a disease that impacts the whole family. this situation seems to be stressful. the best way to be a help to those you love is to keep yourself very strong.  my sister is an addict too. addiction is for life and you need to stay strong for the (hopefully very) long fight your sister will go through. sending you so much love tonight. hope you find a place offline to get help. 
[deleted]
If you check out the /r/ABraThatFits subreddit there's a list of great places to shop in person and online. Off the top of my head, I like ordering from Figleaves, Brastop, or ASOS.
I do think this is something we should talk about it more. People talk about the emotional side of it a lot (which is of course very important) but often neglect to discuss the physical side. Which is incredibly and shockingly painful and bloody.
If you haven't seen a counselor to deal with the emotional fallout of losing your partner, and the baggage from that event still has a negative impact in your life five years later, I'd say that seeing a counselor now would be a very good idea.   I lost my partner too, back in December '08. It was very abrupt -- here one day, gone the next. I still think about him every day, I still miss him and think about where he'd be or what he'd be doing if he were still alive, I still tear up over certain songs and laugh when I'm reminded of inside jokes we shared. 
Right, but I was responding to someone who is trying to assert that those with these beliefs are being inconsistent/illogical. They aren't being illogical. The plaintiffs brought the suit against Plan B, because they believe it to be an *actual* abortion; SCOTUS expanded the decision to all birth control. People who are against birth control don't usually believe it's an abortion, but they have different reasons. 
Missouri, who knew
I posted it as a general reply before and then replied to a specific comment you made in another comment thread.  You're not crazy! 
It's totally that way here in Australia. And you were just expressing your experience of it, so don't worry about the gender thing.
If they care so much about children then they would do things like promote paid maternity leave, promote better care for children after they're born, promote birth control, promote a myriad of things that would do far, far more to actually help children than pro-life bullshit does.   But you know what I've noticed? Most anti-choice people don't do a thing about any of that. (Yes, some do, but the majority don't give a fuck, and also spend a lot of their time complaining about their tax dollars going to welfare and other support systems, etc.) So that makes me lose any and all respect I might have had for them in the process, and makes me think that it has more to do with slutshaming and thinking that women should keep their legs shut and controlling their choices.   Most abortions are had by women who already HAVE children. They are making a choice to ensure they have a good life for the children they already have. Sometimes birth control can fail, sometimes accidents happen. A woman should always have supreme bodily autonomy over what goes on inside her body because otherwise you're asking her to do something that she may not be ready, willing or able to do, or even incubate a fetus for someone else! Women are not incubators. They have the right to choice and free will. 
I recently saw an article describing an award that a PP clinic got for "exceeding abortions". Could you explain the context of that for me? I'm a tad confused.  Edit: Honestly I did see this on a pro-life page on Facebook. Just trying to keep an open mind here.
I don't know what they're doing with her, to be honest. Azerbaijan, the country where the tournament is held recognizes transgender individuals, so she'd probably have to play in the women's only tournament which would turn that tournament into a joke.  Anyway, I doubt Scarlett is going to be playing in that particular tournament. Despite what it seems like based on the language used in certain articles, IeSF is NOT the representative of e-sports in any serious capacity. Riot, Valve, Blizzard, Kespa, OGN, and so on are the real forces behind e-sports, and their tournaments are the ones that matter. Nobody cares about this supposed "world championship", as all e-sports have their own, much more prestigious world championships. So basically it is a minor tournament that probably won't even give points for the actual world championship rankings, which is what matters to her right now.
I completely agree. People are downvoting you out of opinion, even though your post is a respectful contribution that is on-topic.
The point was that a woman has certain biological rights which trumps that of a embryo/fetus until its viability. The person I was responding to implied that all abortion is equivalent to murder.
[deleted]
I live in Missouri. Jay Nixon has made his fair share of stupid decisions. This was one of his better ones 
OP, I am so sorry that you have to experience this every day, it sounds awful! One thing I would like to know is if there is anything I can change in my everyday life to help address this outlook people had? I don't want to make you the spokesperson for all dark skinned people, but I am genuinely curious if there is any way that I could do? From your discussion it sounds like most of your frustration comes from within the black community, but please correct me if I'm wrong and there's something insensitive (or let's be real, probably extra insensitive) I can be responsible for one less white person in the world doing!
Oh my word. I am so sorry for your losses and glad to hear about your babies now! I am grieving the only way I know how and in a way that seems weird: perscribed vicodin for rwsidual pain,pizza, and a giant cooke from papajohns while snuggled with my husband watching Game of thrones while my son stays with family and can enjoy his time. Tomorrow I get him and I get to snuggle him.  Thank you for sharing And thank you for your kind words. 
It definitely can be. If nodes elsewhere are a bit swollen  then there can be a back up of lymph, which can just cause other areas to have to deal with more traffic than normal.  Keep an eye on it for next time round, and even look up on youtube some lymphatic drainage, some of which you can do yourself quite easily.
Thanks!  And no shit.  Although it was a few days I was already going crazy.  I'm not one to sit and be idle.  I hate not having something to do with my time!  I feel like I got off easy though, to be honest.
And [Ginsberg's dissent](http://www.scribd.com/doc/231974154/Ginsburg-Dissent) in its entirety.    
Its jealousy, and you can work to overcome it.  Good luck!
Bra fittings are free at any bra shop worth their salt. Most lingerie stores actually advertise their bra fittings as being free, either in-store or online. Look for a store that isn't part of a major chain-- you'll most likely get excellent service.
There's a reason there is a waiting period for guns - the background check system needs time to catch up to felons. In complete contrast, an abortion can go from legal to illegal in 3 days. One of these is a good thing.
Why would I bother? Every anti-choicer has the same tired, ridiculous arguments. Keep your morals off my body and I'll keep mine off yours. :) Even when I DO write out well thought out, well reasoned arguments it gets me nowhere because ~abortion is murder!~ so excuse me if I don't bother anymore.
I know this a bit off, but I've always thought that really dark skin is just so beautiful. I can't understand why/ skin color could be disgusting to anyone. 
I see a point there but let's look at the root of the problem. I am on welfare and EBT so I can't put my money into that right now. 
It's not about constantly pointing out race, it's about acknowledging that it exists. The idea of colorblindness contributes to the erasure of the cultural identities of PoC and acts as a blatant refusal to see a person as an individual. This isn't about seeing race first, it's about understanding privilege. It asserts the belief that race doesn't matter and turns a blind eye to the institutionalized discrimination of PoC. Denial of race, i.e. "I don't see her as a black person, I see her as a human" is just plain ignorant.  More articles on colorblind racism [here](http://www.psychologytoday.com/blog/colorblind/201112/colorblind-ideology-is-form-racism), [here](http://whiteseducatingwhites.tumblr.com/post/30824175814/race-101-colorblindness-and-the-privilege-of-not), and [here](http://abagond.wordpress.com/2008/05/31/colour-blind-racism/).
See if she'll make you her medical power of attorney. That will allow you to make medical decisions on her behalf (forced institutionalization if necessary, even, but don't bring that up), and you'll be able to talk to her doctors and social workers. Just spin it like you'll be able to help her with her doctors. 
I wouldn't say all, but according to my observations the vast majority of abortions are done exactly as a form of birth control. And just look at this quote below which is disgusting: "Each year, 1.7% of women aged 15–44 have an abortion [2]. Half have had at least one previous abortion.[3]" You mean to tell me that each year nearly 500 000 women in USA choose to have an abortion for the SECOND time because it's their LAST option AGAIN?
It's weird. This section of Reddit is hostile whenever you mention men's issues, even when you bring it up along with women's issues. For instance, a submission here omitted that body image is an issue facing everyone. Instead, the tone and wording suggested it was only women that face such problems. When I brought it up, it wasn't endearing or understanding. It was backlash like you're seeing now. Basically, like Fury's reply. You don't mention societal issues; you mention women and nothing else, even if it impacts more than women alone.    Edit: Not saying turn this into a men's discussion forum. I just wonder why it's so terrible to discuss issues that impact both genders. Focus on women. But omission always struck me as dishonest.
I think the fear of being raped also comes from how common sexual assault and sexual harassment really are. Personally, I am afraid of men, but it's not because of any statistics. It's because I cannot leave my house without being harassed. I'm single, and small. I'm a bit of a loner. So I'm pretty much a prime target.  The first time I was hit on by an adult male, I was twelve. And I LOOKED twelve too, I probably could have gone to school braless, had I chosen. Most women I talk to about this report similar experiences. It's a pretty creepy feeling, to be a child and realize that some old dude is thinking about fucking you.  I was afraid then, and it has only gotten worse as I've gotten older. Now I realize that most men who call out to me on the street are not going to hurt me. But there is always a chance.
Freedom of speech does not also grant you the right to freedom from criticism of your speech.
I tried waxing recently, and well I ended up tearing off some of my skin...
The stigma attacked to mental health is so goddamn horrible.  This is a perfect example of how it hurts so many people.  Breaks my heart.  OP, this might seem like a longshot, but there's a podcast I listen to called the Mental Illness Happy Hour.  It's fantastic and talks about mental health in an open and honest way.  I first started listening to it because it had some comedians (whose worked I enjoyed) as guests.  My attitude going in was so dismissive.  But that show has done absolute wonders to destigmatize mental health for me, and it gives me hope that one day I'll be brave enough for therapy.    All of the episodes can be found [here](http://mentalpod.com/archives/category/episodes) or via iTunes.  Maybe your sister might be amenable to some indirect encouragement.  There are any number of absolutely amazing comedians that have done this show.  The Nicki Glaser and Maria Bamford episodes might be good starting points.  So sorry for what you're going through.  I really hope things work out for you and your sister.
[deleted]
Yeh I have, thanks.  Was just saying that some people say men should not be able to have that space for men's issues, masculinity, being a dad, etc. just like some people say white women have no identity other than gender, etc.   It is funny that some groups that are purposely exclusionary aw so quick to ensure others cannot identify with their own groups as well to find common cultures and goals without being labelled racist or sexist or whatever.
Hug :-)
[deleted]
Yeah, I've heard things along these lines directed to both genders.  Without all the insults and stereotypes, there's nothing wrong with wanting different types of people at different stages of your life.
I always shaved my pubic hair religiously until a couple of weeks ago I got a staph infection down there. Skin infections suck but they really suck when they are on your vagina. I now refuse to go near it except to trim it. If any man has a problem with my natural hair I will gladly help them to go fuck themselves. 
[deleted]
Glad this bullshit was vetoed asap, now if we can only get the stupid person who made this bill lose all his money then we'll finally get some peace and quiet.
Do you have any anal itching ? The "just at night" part brings up the thought of pinworms.
Dude's been in love with you for years. Very surprised you didn't see the kiss coming. Sorry he got as aggressive as he did but it seems at the very least he knew no meant no. I'm not excusing his behavior but the fact that you are hesitant to even use the word "assault" should say something to the events that happened. Just take it as a lesson learned that guys who were once into you generally don't stop being into you and it's easy to lead them on even if you aren't trying to at all.   As far as your family, just don't react at all. It's like a bully. they only push your buttons because they get something out of you. Stop giving them anything. 
[deleted]
And then I shut the hood and drive away, right?
I completely get what you're saying
I hear and agree with everything you're saying.  I think the only thing we** can do is hold close our nieces and nephews and children and students and all of the young ones and just let them know their worth.  Lord knows there are a bunch of assholes out there who are going to let them know where they stand in the community or in the world, but we who know them can let them know their worth.  And I know it's popular now to say "don't tell your daughters they are beautiful, tell them they are kind/smart/creative" etc.  And I agree with that, but more than that, they also need to know that they are beautiful.  It doesn't have to be one or the other.    **Disclaimer, I'm Latina, but we have similar issues with colorism in our communities - altho with Latin@s it's a fine line between what is colorism and what is just anti-blackness.
Of course not every Catholic believes birth control is sinful. But we are talking about those that do because they are the problem here. And the in-betweens are perhaps the most dangerous - 'the only moral ______ is my ______'; situational/dispositional attribution - 'I have reasons to use birth control or have sex before marriage or drive without using my turn signal, but everyone else is doing those things just because they want to'.  Also if I recall correctly that '98%' statistic actually states that 98% of (sexually mature) Catholic women have used contraception at least once in their lives - it does not carry any information about whether they use contraception regularly or whether they believe others should use contraception.
Probably some TRPer's alt acc.
I tried everything.   Is was so matted and snarled there was no other option than to cut it.  I tried for 3 hours
[deleted]
Can you leave the country? If you have any sympathetic friends or relatives back home who would lend you money for a plane ticket, start looking for a job back in your home country. If not, start saving.   Open a bank account and put in a few dollars in savings from the household expenses each week. Skip luxuries for you, and put the extra money aside. Buy things that are on sale and put the money aside. Buy the cheaper versions of things when it won't be noticed. Once you've saved up a plane ticket, start job hunting in your original country.  Buy a ticket when you get that job. Contact a women's shelter there if you have to for somewhere to stay until you can get a place of your own. Don't tell your family your address.   You may be able to contact the embassy of your home country, assuming you are a citizen there. They may be able to assist you as well.
I'm a guy and I'm very pro-choice. However, I would strongly discourage women from having an abortion and try and get them to look at other options. So I'm just curious as to why women would have a problem with a waiting period, it seems like an interesting idea to me. Just looking for an honest answer here.  Edit: found the answer I was looking for, thank you for informing me
I'm drinking my coffee and I read "Mississippi Governor Vetoes..."  I could not believe it, common sense doesn't exist over there.
Fredericks of Hollywood is a good option, although I don't know if they have it at Westfield mall in SF. I believe they have it at Stoneridge Mall in Pleasanton and probably various other locations as well. 
[deleted]
How bout it just be made illegal for coprorations to donate to campaigns
&lt;3
Incorrect. I know her point of view because she shared it with us. I'm not giving shit. I'm reasoning things out, which OP and most of the high comments fail to do.
Thank you :) While it is important to run something like this by your SO, at the end of the day each person is entitled to do what they like with their body.
&gt; If you take this purely as a business question, and take all emotion out of it, this is a very smart question.   But it isn't purely business, and so his question is irrelevant. 
&gt; So I'm just curious as to why women would have a problem with a waiting period,   Because they have no need for a waiting period. The thoughts have been thought, the decision made. They don't need to hang out for a while that after.
It's definitely a frustrating process, but at least that's one step forward overall.  Arc long bend justice, etc.
No, **you** worded it in an inflammatory way. I don't consider someone calling my relationship "the positive side of negative male behavior" a compliment. I'm not interested in being perceived as the exception of a phenomenon that's primarily characterized by negativity.  If I characterized female sexuality as "a scale of parasitism" and tried to assure you that you were one of the good parasites that gives back to its host so you're not really a parasite, I'd expect you (and others) to be similarly offended.
 There's this dichotomy we seem to think is occurring (street walks vs high dollar escorts) but actually there are alot in between, many independent girls on different sites like eros and theeroticreview.   Many women are in the sex industry but you don't know it, we only see the most negative archetypes. 
and?
I feel like I have dodged a bullet with the way I was raised when it comes to body image - or rather, my mother made it apparent that body image issues were a case of Schrödinger's bullet.  I was not exposed to all this confangled air-brushed-cover-model-photoshoped-bodies-for-no-reason crap until the end of highschool. Thank the good green earth.  We watched almost no TV as kids, we did not have so-called "women's magazines" in the house, and we didn't even have regular access to a computer, let alone the internet until the beginning of highschool. We were sat down with books, and pencils, or outside playing in the dirt and running after animals (I had a particular penchant for chickens). And from the day we were born, my mother led by example - word for word: "bodies are nothing to be ashamed of and you only get one, so you have to love it and look after it."  As small children, if we walked in on her changing or in just undergarments/a towel there was no fit of hysteria or frantic scrabble to cover up, it was "next time, remember it's polite to knock".  Puberty? Several years of consistent, calm, factual warning of changes in advance.  Weight? Not even discussed unless we were so sick we had to see a doctor and they weighed us in the office.  I am well aware, after watching about every female I went to school with go through hell over their self-esteem and body-image, that I have a one-of-a-kind parent that gives a serious number of bothers. That doesn't make society's desire to obsess over young girls bodies any more comprehensible to me. You'd think that if people were so concerned about it they would stop exposing themselves and their children to it - I get that it's everywhere, but if everyone stopped endorsing brands and products that use sex and 'perfection' as marketing tools I reckon they'd get the message pretty dang quick and grow a conscience.
Technically the Constitution itself doesn't give use religious freedoms, that's the Bill of Rights. I know the two tend to get lumped together but they are separate documents.
[deleted]
Not sexist at all. They split it into two leagues like any other sport: male and female. Just because there aren't enough interested female players who are actually good enough to compete on a professional level doesn't make it sexist, it just goes to show that *there are more of you sitting on the sidelines whining about your feelings* **instead of actually playing  hearthstone.** Want to see more women in the tournaments? Quit bitching about the lack of women playing and start playing the game well enough to actually make it into a tournament.  It's not a boys club because girls aren't invited, it's a boys club because there aren't enough girls to make a tournament.
[deleted]
&gt; Are you saying that there is no value in female companionship for the male population?    I'm saying "value" and "prize or object to be won" are very different things.     &gt; that is not the experience i have in my country    Ok, good for you. We were talking about a movement and a conference that took place in the US.    &gt; If you marry an asshole, you are rewarding him for his behaviour and he will not be encouraged to change, refuse to marry assholes and their will be less of them    This is still just a nonsensical point. Why is the onus on WOMEN to make MEN better people? Why are we responsible? What if he doesn't act like an asshole while they're dating, but becomes one after marriage? What if not marrying men turns them into even more hyper-aggressive assholes who [go on killing sprees](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/2014_Isla_Vista_killings)?    &gt; i consider having one 'winning'    Having one. Having. One. As in owning. Possessing. An Object. Just take a step back and look at your language. It's hard to examine such deeply ingrained sentiments, but for your own good, you should really try. 
I didn't downvote you.   I'm not saying exactly what you said. I think that the movie implied that she is now 18 but they said they had been dating for X amount of time when she was under 18.  REGARDLESS, the age of consent in Texas is 17.
&gt; I don't understand this logic. Why can't they all be Open-for-all? It will just divide the female gamer population.  They all *are* open-for-all. Even the TTT2 one (the one that was female-only before).  There are *also* additionally two female-only competitions (SC2 and TTT2), to promote the game to women and/or gain some good PR, depending on how cynical you'd like to be. Personally, I find them a bit superfluous, like the women's chess world championship when people like [Polgár Judit](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Judit_Polg%C3%A1r) can and did participate in the regular open-for-all one. But then, nobody forces me to watch them or care about their results, and it's not *my* money which goes to the winners, so I really couldn't care less.
Thanks. All this did start at the time of the divorce, and both parents wanted me to be a character witness in court for them. Your point is valid. I know my mom was trying to take my dad for everything he was worth at the time, and was also trying to claim that he was a danger to my younger siblings (I saw the court documents but she denied this when we approached her).    I could have brushed it off as just that, but what bothers me is that she continues to mention it. 
Are you ethnically Caucasian?
[deleted]
The only reason I'm asking reddit is so I can get second opinions on what other people have been told by their doctors.
You can make the same argument that buy thing x ---&gt; thinner women ---&gt; hot women.
I never even knew this was a thing until I went to a nearly all black high school. It blew my mind how badly these black kids in my classes were talking about/treating dark skinned kids. All I could think was "Jeeze, aren't you all just black? What's the big freaking deal? How are they any different?" It didn't make any freaking sense to me, although I shouldn't have been so surprised. I've been given some crap for being insanely pale for a white person, but that's still on such a different level, I couldn't relate it. I'm really sorry you've had to put up with that crap. Super dark skin can absolutely be beautiful, amazingly beautiful! It always made me sad to see someone dark skinned getting treated like that. I could see the hurt looks.
Don't be silly, everyone knows we women don't *really* play video games, even if we devote hours each week to them. /s  Funny thing is, they are running an open for all Tekken tourney too.  ["In order to apply the new policy with consistency, IeSF has added an “Open for All” Tekken Tag Tournament 2 tournament, which was initially set aside for female-only competition."](http://ie-sf.com/bbs/board.php?bo_table=iesf_notice&amp;wr_id=105)  So the dude doesn't even have a point.
You see the "the robot" part of my name there? That's not just some cute thing I put there, it's an actual description of my emotional state: namely it rarely exists. I didn't "get emotional" about anything. About the only things I feel are my dysphoria and anger (though the second isn't really a "burning rage" and more like a small spark of emotion that is barely there).  And I was hardly pretending that I was onto something new and bold, I was just saying that while the statements may be similar the intent behind them are not. But perhaps you were to busy mocking me to notice.  And no, not everyone needs things broken down to fortune cookie sized samplers, but if you think someone missed the point it's better to rephrase it than to try insult their intelligence.
&gt;Politics has always been about politics  No shit/meaningless  &gt;and politicians have always been self serving leeches, there is nothing new about this and theres no need to pretend like it is.  Factually incorrect, not all politicians are self serving leeches (obviously), and there are significantly less of those types of politicians than there were previously (look at the demographics of people going into politics without being successful in a lobbying-related career for one of many forms of evidence), and in egalitarian states this means politicians are more egalitarian, i.e. modern politics is significantly more egalitarian in egalitarian states than it once was.  So there's the link, in one form. The other form is that politics does not merely reflect politicians, they're just overt mechanisms in the system. Politics refers to the institution of governance, which once again in egalitarian states is significantly more egalitarian than it was.  I think the reason you thought I was making a tangent is because a: you're badly informed about politicians, and b: you conflate politicians with the political system.
So they're not allowed to help because it's a company? I would have figured that if an issue is being backed by such powerful companies it would be a good thing.  Edit: Who doesn't want money?  At least they're trying to help make a positive difference while doing it.  That's better than doing nothing.
Exactly. Under federal law and most state laws, they cannot deny emergency services to anyone who need them.
[deleted]
I don't see why your pain invalidates someone else's, even if yours is worse.  That's typically not a useful attitude, and not one that's often accepted here on TwoX.
[deleted]
I'll wear the same one for a few days. Gym/workout bras once though.
/r/femalefashionadvice
So.. more insults and non sequitur comments.   Let's start again shall we?   * What you find humorous or non-humorous does not change what other people enjoy, or what they should be allowed to do or say  * Even if you are offended by something someone says, they can continue to say that regardless.  * There are literally uncountable things that can be made humorous that will offend others, or cause them to recall past negative events, beyond *rape*.     **This is my ARGUMENT**. You either have a response to that, or you have nothing to contribute. To quote you;  &gt;  Get off the internet if you can't handle it.  EDIT: Also, please for the love of *god* learn how to quote. Just use "&gt;" and then copy paste what you are replying to. I truly have no idea to what you're referring with half the comments you make.    I don't care how much you insult me, only that **you brought it up when I did it, as a criticism**.    I don't care if someone disagrees with me, or thinks I'm wrong, **only that they can see that I've presented my argument and that they understand they haven't addressed it**.    When you call my argument "bullshit" then I want to see your reasoning. I want **TO UNDERSTAND YOU**.    All you've done is claim you don't care, told me to take "my own advice" and now **have told me I'm mentally ill**.     I'm sure you **want** to believe that it's more likely the person you are arguing with online is somehow mentally disabled, rather than the *far more likely* chance that someone hasn't explained themselves clearly, but that really just doesn't work. You come across as petulant.    Is there *anything* that you don't understand about what I've said? Because I've asked you dozens of questions that you've refused to answer about what you have posted. I ask for clarifications, and you give me ...  I don't even know any more.  Further EDIT: *What exactly am I projecting?*  
I think it really depends on whether or not it's relevant to the conversation or more a tactical diversion to avoid addressing one's privilege, I imagine. For example, I have known gay men who have felt at liberty to grope women, so a conversation about unwanted physical contact isn't a good one for a guy to say "I'm gay, so peace out!" (not to mention that fact that sexual assault in the queer community is a thing.) But a reminder that not everyone is the "assumed default" of straight, white, cis, and male can be appropriate sometimes.
I am white. I have not encountered any personal discrimination, but I have seen many, many Asian (Vietnam, Thailand, China) women come up to me and fawn over how fair my skin is. One of them even told me, "We stay out of the sun, because we want to be like you." (I go in the sun.) I didn't understand why, so I asked them to elaborate. They said that being dark-skinned means you are probably a lowly field labourer who has to work all day, whereas being lighter-skinned means you probably have more money and can stay indoors while hiring other people to work for you.   Then came the comments about how "dark skin" is "dirty", and then (Asian) men chimed in, talking about how they love watching porn with white women because "everything is pink" and "doesn't look dirty like Asian women". That just made me absolutely sick.   The odd thing is, for most of my life, I have been the butt of white people's jokes because my skin is so white. They called me a ghost, a shut-in, a basement-dweller because apparently it looks like I never go outside. So, so many white people have told me I need to go tanning because my pale skin is gross and I look sick.   This whole thread is just breaking my heart. I hate that this sort of discrimination exists for women of colour. I hate that people of their own race even discriminate against them and insult them for something they were born with. It makes me sick.
no not really.   I mean you could argue it, but everyone would think you're a moron.   we clearly have a standard for when live starts, and its birth because thats when we start counting.  otherwise I could've had a drink legally 9 months sooner.
I have one sports bra. It cost $66 and I can't afford another. I'm trying to be active this summer. And laundry is a once a week thing...   I'm gross
Ultimately, it is up to you, but I'll tell you a little story that may show you how you feel about this sort of thing.  Once upon a time, I got very sad, for a very long time. I had been on a couple different anti-depressants, but they hadn't helped. I started using recreational drugs to cope, and at first, it actually improved my performance at work. I was happier and friendlier, and it was a coffee shop, so those things are pretty important. But, as is the nature of most drugs, my current use (only at home, after work) was not cutting it anymore. I began to take "whippits" the gas used to make whipped cream all fluffy, to get high with. The high is very quick, lasting a minute at most, but it was enough to make it to my next break without killing myself/my customers. Eventually, the one or two I would sneak were once again, not cutting it. So I started taking a box of ten home after work. Every day. I was sort of dating a co-worker, and she ended up telling the boss out of concern for my well-being. I was upset, and quite worried that I'd lose my job =&gt; income =&gt; rent money =&gt; apartment. I wouldn't be able to talk on the phone long enough to schedule an interview, let alone stay sober enough for a job, so it was looking like suicide for PinkoHippie. Starbucks is a very caring company, and they ended up keeping me on staff under the condition that I attend counseling sessions (that they paid for) and substance abuse support groups. I don't work there anymore, but I was able to leave on good terms and I'm thankful for that.  But you know, I am not angry at my co-worker. Yeah, she could have warned me instead of going to our boss, but I wouldn't have stopped. My behaviour is my responsibility, and I am the one who has to answer for it, just like your friend. Will telling her about it stop it from happening? If so, go ahead and tell her. But to me, it sounds like it is going to happen no matter what, and telling her will only make her upset/dreading the moment it finally comes. Better to let reality give her a (fair) kick in the pants. Talk to her afterwards, I say. Help her if she wants help. But don't risk both your jobs just because one is already on the line. 
Now I understand your frustration. I agree that forms of male birth control should also be covered. Currently, however, there is more help for the sex that takes on the actual physical pregnancy. If we could do as seahorses do and pass fetal development duties off to men, I think there would be more urgency in equalizing the matter.  Note that I do not agree that it should be limited to women. I'm just pointing out that pregnancy  disproportionately affects women, and that affects how it's approached. Again, I'm all for equalizing birth control coverage. That doesn't mean you should tear down the fact that women DO have access, though.
I know right, one is an elective procedure that involves certain complications including death, can cost tax payers money and is mostly avoidable. The other is a constitutional right. Missouri had a 72 hour waiting period so that a women could decide if she wants to abort or not (Separate question because I don't know much about it: Can the potential father say no to the abort or demand a child be aborted?). To purchase a gun requires a background check that is instantaneous yet requires a non criminal to wait 5 days after paying for it. Sounds crazy when you type it out.
I am glad I am not the only one. I only hand wash them and never remember they need washing till I am putting them on in the morning. 
[deleted]
Perhaps they should have said, "Why did they make up some obscure Texas law that doesn't actually exist because age of consent is 17 in Texas and Texas also doesn't have a Romeo and Juliet law?"   Fine, she's 17. It still doesn't matter because she is legal for anyone to have sex with in Texas, regardless of age. Making her not "under age."  The whole reason they had the scene was because Mark Wahlberg's character plays the worst kind of dad trope. 
[deleted]
I am sorry for your previous losses and so happy you guys are having an uneventful pregnancy. Positive thoughts to you during this last bit of pregnancy!   Also, screw the fates. Bunch of assholes. 
Well, it's not like JCP has a choice anyway. Or any of us, really. For we are all mortal and shall be consumed.
Should I be insulted if they did?
[deleted]
Also, are you drunk? 
[deleted]
That doesn't really change much, as donation limits are what led to super pacs.  Anyone can make an ad, etc on behalf of the candidate. Regulating or preventing that conflicts with the first Amendment because it censors political speech.  The Wikipedia page of citizens United does an excellent job explaining that case. 
Sorry about that. I didn't see it. Usually it lets you know when you try to post a link that's already been posted to that sub, doesn't it? Did they get rid of that feature?
Thank you.  This is a great explanation.  Like with all major SCOTUS decisions, people end up super misinformed.   People should realize that Congress can just "fix" the law to get rid of this issue. 
Because the posts seem all over the place, and I am really curious as to what the distribution of answers is, [here](https://docs.google.com/forms/d/1lGaCScoNb2jGoQ5pIgx3Vfe0d1bGQSuvIVf0rC-NxC0/viewform?usp=send_form) is a friendly poll.   EDIT: Here are the results for anyone who does not wish to vote: [Results](https://docs.google.com/forms/d/1lGaCScoNb2jGoQ5pIgx3Vfe0d1bGQSuvIVf0rC-NxC0/viewanalytics)
Yeah, that's a little odd.  Bras wear out so fast when you wash them that often and those things are just too expensive to replace constantly.  I also couldn't imagine going through several changes of underwear in a day.  I don't have time for that much laundry.
The part you specifically mention is actually what I considered to be condescending.   Also, I meant that the culture surrounding redheads and those with African hair are very different. I think comparing the two is apples and oranges.   Your version of natural and the version for African hair is different. Which is the point of the entire post. 
I remember this coming up in a Dear Prudence column.  She polled the women in her office and found that the average between bra washings was about 2 weeks.
That doesnt sound right. Wouldn't more frequent washing give the bras less life? 
Have you ever taken your shirt off in public?
If you're concerned enough to take pics and post them in the internet, you should probably see a doctor.  However, I don't see anything necessarily abnormal in the pic as it is.
You could, but you would want to invest in a good quality one. Human hair and lace front wigs can get pricey. Keep in mind too, wigs can get very hot. 
Although that sounds like a great idea, the trip would end up costing quite a lot of money if I were to do that. 
Serious question are you in favor of all types of abortions or do you draw the line at somepoint?
Maybe they're just not phrasing it right, and they mean "wow, what does your husband think?" Or something along those lines?   I have one tattoo that my husband isn't fond of. I do want to get more tattoos but he's not comfortable with it so I'm waiting until he is comfortable with it. I don't see that as him making the decision for me-- I see it as, he's my partner and although it's my decision, i agreed to respect what he wants too when I married him.   Besides, a tattoo is going to be on my skin forever. What's so bad about waiting and seeing if I change my mind?   Tbh I don't really know where I'm going with this. I guess I'm trying to say that either way it's not that the person 'lets' you, it's that there is a choice made mutually. If your partner has agreed to spend the rest of their life with you then they should have a say in something that they will see every day for the rest of their lives. 
[deleted]
Don't call people revolting here.
Very true lol. Ideally I would be a stay at home mom/graphic designer, which I am striving to get too, but for right now, its corporate america! I do love my job though, and I know my boss wouldn't mind, shes seen pictures of when I did it a long time ago and thought they were awesome.   I do have visible tattoos and stretched lobes, which I had when I was hired, so I know they are not completely 100% on appearance alone, but I think flamingo pink hair would be the line. I could probably pull off a deep burgandy, or even a deep purple. I have seen red hair in the office that works. 
Thank you! I am going to check out a wig shop in my town, the specialize in human hair wigs. 
&gt;If an infant popped out it would have no chance of survival without the mother as well.  But once it's born, *you* or one of your hypocrite friends could take care of the baby. What's that? A baby won't fit in your life right now? You can't afford it? Don't have time for it? Don't want a little black/brown/asian/disabled/redheaded baby? Well, fuck off. Every baby born should be a wanted baby. If a woman doesn't want a baby--for whatever reason--then the law must not force her to have it. If YOU want a baby, then get over your fear of sex and go make your own.
Wow, everything in this thread is BS.  Just treat people how you want to be treated. That's it. 
I'm so tired of people telling me to be careful... THE GUY BREAKS INTO LOCKED HOUSES!!! Now, how in the world should I go about "protecting myself"?
You could try and get her into an abused spouse program.  You don't say anything about physical abuse, but this definitely counts as mental abuse.  That might open up some doors to therapy as well.
Same hear. And I use bra bags to help them stay in good condition. And on a delicate cycle. 
[I totally read that as "abortion complex."](http://www.theonion.com/articles/planned-parenthood-opens-8-billion-abortionplex,20476/)
A human must apply the advanced care. It merely existing isn't enough.
You could just as easily say that instead of focusing time and effort on these major problems that will take huge amounts of resources and will probably never be solved, we should just quickly talk about how much shit people are given for very inconsequential things and try not to do that. Both arguments are silly. Trying to solve one problem does not stop you from solving another and people will naturally gravitate towards the issues that interest or affect them.   In addition, being upset at the armpit hair double standard does not denote huge amounts of resources or time.  I think you fail to realize that the many double standards dealing with gender are all part of the same problem and just because one discriminates against woman and one discriminates against men does not separate their root, nor does it make one worse than another.   Bad breath smells bad on everyone, armpit hair only looks bad on women   and rib-cages only make men look emaciated. You can go back and forth all day about who has to conform to more beauty standards and which is harder/more expensive/more time consuming to fulfill. All I know is that it doesn't matter what you post, someone of the opposite gender will chime in with a "That's my fetish" gif or a heartfelt "that doesn't bother me at all, you should be proud of yourself" post that gets a dozen upvotes. 
How about you don't fucking tell her whether she was assaulted or not, yeah? Some women are really hesitant to put labels on the things that happened to them. You weren't there, don't tell her what happened to her. 
[Easily accessible, cheap birth contro](http://healthland.time.com/2012/10/05/study-free-birth-control-significantly-cuts-abortion-rates/)l and [sex education](http://observer.com/2014/02/new-york-city-abortion-rates-drop-to-lowest-point-ever/) are the most effective ways to reduce the abortion rate.   It's pretty unlikely that a woman could call an abortion provider and get an appointment on the same day anyway, meaning she already has to wait a couple of days. Legislating more time in is unlikely to change her opinion.
This reminds me of my Great-Grandmother (who was an olympic level racist, grew up as a British aristocrat in the early 1900s) She used to say things like; "DreyaNova; English is known everywhere, you just need to speak LOUDLY and CLEARLY and people will understand" ... Never could tell if she was joking, but from the sound of it I guess this is a pretty widely held and obviously idiotic belief.  I can however proudly say I have never said "gracias" to someone because I thought they were Latino/a and could not speak English, I've never been *that* ignorant.
[deleted]
You need to study up on embryology. That "mass of cells" is most definitely alive. 
Thank you for this. It is shocking to think that as an educated, modern woman, how few opportunities I've had to learn about miscarriages.   I've had all types of human sexuality classes from elementary school to college - even a course on the psychology of death and dying - and it was really never brought up other than "it can happen, particularly in the first trimester".  Information is powerful. While I hope I never have the opportunity to use this, I'm glad I have it. It might be me, it may be a friend or sister, but being able to understand a situation is a huge leap in being able to address it correctly. 
Oh yeah I totally agree they need to find some new phrasing.   Well I'm jealous that your husband is so relaxed about tattoos! Mine is just wary that I'll get a tattoo then change my mind and hate it later. Just gotta wait around a bit to show him I won't change my mind ;) 
Perfect, thank you!!! I was so worried! 
If you're a dude- what do you wear in the pool?
I feel like that's a reasonable request from your husband since tattoos tend to be expensive, and as you said, they're on your skin forever.   I waited 3 years to get mine. Mostly because I couldn't talk myself into actually spending money on it, but then we started budgeting for a house. We each have an allowance so I saved mine, and was finally able to get it.   What do you have in mind? 
/sigh  (Next up chick filet won't pay for HIV drugs  /S)
[deleted]
What do you mean "down play the decision"? Like they are giving medically inaccurate information?  I'm assuming you've never had an abortion so I'll let you in on a secret: women who are potentially on the fence think a lot about their personal thoughts and feelings before scheduling an appointment. All of my friends that I have talked to about this all thought in depth about abortion before they even had sex for the first time. The whole "is the idea of an abortion right for me" isn't something anyone in this situation needs prompting to think about.
I am from Bosnia and I could easily imagine such behavior. There are lot of lowlifes with nothing to do. They would harass people out of boredom.   Usually people are kind and welcoming to foreigners, but like everywhere else there is bad people as well. This doesn't mean something will happen to you, more likely is just a bad joke but stay aware and avoid contact with the person.   I am sorry you had to go trough such experience. I hope this incident doesn't ruin your trip. In Sarajevo there is a tourist info bureau you could ask for advice there, on how to cope with this situation.   Calling your embassy is a good idea too, if nothing just to inform them that you are there. There is probably something they could do. There maybe other Americans or at least foreigners close by, with whom you could get in touch. In a group you would have a much better sense of security.   I wish I could help you more, but without knowing where you are staying I couldn't provide more concrete information. 
&gt; Just treat people how you want to be treated. That's it.   Awesome advice!  So a guy who would like interested women to tell him he looks hot should tell women he's interested in that they look hot?
I love you all and feel so much less disgusting than I did before!
I'm pretty sure in the case of an eptopic pregnancy it's NEVER complex. It's 'get the embryo out.'
Thank you for pointing this out! I honestly have not paid much attention to this state's politics since moving here a few years ago, and I don't see my interest changing much soon, but I will keep an eye on him. It is good to see an opposing argument complete with an actual example. Again, thank you. :)
Are you sure?  Try to get a prescription for condoms. Your insurance may cover it.   Source: Pharmacy tech who sees a surprisingly large number of condom Rx's since the PPACA and they do run through insurance. 
Soooooo.   Ima dude and want to see the poll but i dont wash bras..
I cried when I first rejected a guy. I  didn't want to go out with my friend, but he was a friend and we could have made something work and it might have been okay. You could say that I mourned that possibility of a relationship. A pregnancy, no matter the circumstances or the viability of the fetus is still the possibility of a child.
Yeah, like how my mother only ended up receiving half of the equity on her home, even though she paid 90% of the down payment and over half of the mortgage payments.   It's not always a payday for the wife.
Congrats, you are very lucky.  Many women have much worse experiences, and quite a few are left with permanent nerve damage or scarring.    Abortion also doesn't have to be painful, and overall is considerably less likely to be painful than a birth.
The fetus' rights, whatever those may be, do not trump the mother's.  In no situation other than forcing a pregnant woman to carry to term do we require one human being to sacrifice their bodily autonomy for another human being's health and well-being. Even a dead body can be opted out of the organ donor registry. *Even if* that dead body's organs would allow another living human to live where they would not otherwise.
That's how I always saw it.  Not so much a social etiquette to spare other people knowing about your pregnancy and miscarriage, but more of a way of protecting yourself from having to tell a bunch of well-wishers your tragic news.  Early pregnancy miscarriages are common, but still heartbreaking for many women, and this would minimize the number of times they have to answer a "So when's your due-date?" from someone they are not very close to, with an explanation of their miscarriage.   With both my pregnancies, we told our parents, sisters and best friends right away and asked them to keep the news to themselves until later.  If anything had happened during the first three months, those are the people whose support my husband and I would have needed.  Everyone else got told after my three month check-up confirmed that all was well.
&gt;Campbell was released from prison in April 21 after serving time for an attempted kidnapping conviction out of Oklahoma City.  Well, there's your first mistake. 
I agree. He knows that you're not happy. You need to get your passport and enough money together to fly back to your home country. Do not tell your "husband." Do not tell your parents or any members of your family. Leave as soon and as secretly as possible. 
Which is why I said I would like this story "paired with a story from I'm Not Sorry" not "replaced by a story from I'm Not Sorry."  I agree, different people have different reactions, and presenting both sets of reactions is a fine thing.
To be fair the sex usually does tend to get better, but if you are really incompatible i would agree and not stick around. Life is short and you have to find who and what makes you the happiest.
[deleted]
We get shamed for our periods?  I've never heard of or encountered that and I grew up in a family of boys.  Well, I learned something new today...
To be honest I think the majority of them do it because they think abortion is wrong..... The elimination of someones existence should only be up to the person who exist in my opinion. Are you suggesting that people are doing their potential children favors by preventing them from existing? Pretty sure most choices are made for personal interest, which is fine but lets not try to make this some sort of unselfish favor to the potential child. 
I don't think people care about age gaps very much once both parties are full grown adults. It's when one or both of the parties are still teenagers when it gets really weird and more likely for someone to be manipulated or abused.   sure some work out well but for the most part, someone is being taken advantage of. 
Thanks. 
[deleted]
&gt; AFBB  African Federation of Bodybuilding? All Florida Bail Bonds?
 My kind of girl..lol
What they fundamentally are is the potential of a human being, an oak tree, or a chicken.   But I think this argument is pretty pointless, and I'm going to go and make myself a potential chicken omelet. 
  Many have commented that this subject is "Taboo"  it's not so much that it is taboo to talk about.  Unless you have been through one,  it's hard to say what your going through or what your feeling to someone who has always happy happy healthy pregnancies or just a normal regular period.    How to you explaint he feelings over having a baby you lost at 6 weeks?  or at 18 weeks?  or a stillbirth at any point in time?  you can't.  you can't explain or really describe the grief the feelings and near-depression you fall into.  people just tell you stuff like " oh have another one" and "well it happened for a reason"  when no.  really..  it could be no reason that they know of.  it could be a genetic abnormality that wasn't viable and your body rejected it.    so you will find more people will commiserate with others who already have had miscarriages, and lost babies.  you can talk to them because they know what your going through.    i lost a son at 18 weeks.  i want to say i was mostly fine.  but i was not.  i held it all inside.  i have been told the things from "have another one" to "happened for a reason"  and "god is preparing you for something"  which is all bullshit things they say to make them feel better.  it made me feel horrid.  i mean for craps sake...  i said all my life i didn't want sons.  i had no idea how to raise them,  now i lost one..  without having the chance!    so no,  this subject is not taboo,  death is just a really hard subject to approach others on, and to know what to say.
My argument is simple. If something starts growing in my body and I don't want it there, I'm going to do everything in my power to regain control over my body. I am not willing to share resources with an uninvited entity. I am not willing to physically and psychologically suffer so that someone else may have the potential to be a grown person like me someday. Until the technology exists to remove the blastocyst from my body, it may not grow there, it may not grow into a fetus, and it may not continue growing into an autonomous baby.
Agreed.  It is very simple.  You look at that pregnancy test and feel either joy or terror.  
they are rationalizing loss of sexual market value over time.
Actually, we pay for our own insurance, and the company kicks in an amount as a benefit to their employees.   This is not an optional birth control choice, it is the ONLY birth control I can use, after several long consultations with my GP, OBGYN, and neurologist.   Without my IUD, I could die. 
Actually in my relationship I provide more than half the income and I provide ALL the assets. So what's your point again?
[deleted]
just fold the bottoms up about an inch and then fold over. have you ever cuffed the bottom of your pants before? it's exactly the same just a smaller cuff
[deleted]
Well, yes. Teaching people to not rape would be the best thing.
[deleted]
[deleted]
I've already contacted my local coop to talk to them about not carrying these products. Wish me luck. And the folks who shop at WFM may not know about this one yet as it's really just now hitting the main press. I didn't know about it until this week myself.
over a thousand people voted, i think it'll be ok
Men's reproductive rights in a nutshell ___________________________________  Finally, I told him. Why not? I was proud and un-conflicted. I was exercising my right. I was making a video.  He pulled over to the side of the road, right there on the Brooklyn Bridge — not only illegal but dangerous. “Please don’t kill the baby,” he said. “Please don’t kill the baby.”  “What are you doing?”  “Don’t kill the baby.” He wouldn’t move the car, though horns blared all around us.  “Keep driving! I have an appointment!” I shook his headrest. This was not part of the script.  “Please don’t kill the baby,” he said again, turning around to face me. He had beautiful big brown eyes — almost black. “I will take care of you and the baby. I work two jobs.”  “Drive,” I told him.  “You are going by yourself?” he asked.  I said, “Drive.”  He drove. 
Is that a crime though? What would the police do?
Gotta say, I've never changed my own tire. Not because I dont know how, but because anytime I have to, someone will pull over and refuse to leave until they change my tire for me.   While I appreciate the help, I know it's only because I'm a woman. Not a single person has ever stopped to help my boyfriend or any other male friend of mine in the same situation. 
yeah and its a thing i never hear of with any other depo users I am trying to lose weight as well so i am wondering if me losing weight has just kicked my body into normal I am still massively overweight but these seem pretty close to as normal a period i can have so far so i am trying 2 experiments first lose the rest of my 100lb goal and secondly if that doesn't work off the depo 
Oh yeah, I can see how that would work.  "Was I supposed not to rape? Is that bad?"
...*golf clap*  beautifully and intelligently said 
[deleted]
that is so terrifying :( I'm so glad you made it to your car! I wouldn't have gone out in the parking lot by myself if that had happened. I definitely would have gone and found an employee or called a friend or something. 
same thing happens to me with now and then from women when I hold the door open because they assume i am trying to make a point. Even when there was no way for me to know the person behind me was a woman. it's like, come on.
I have used diflucan with no side effects.   In Canada it is available without a prescription so it is low risk.
That's your opinion. She accomplished her goal. It doesn't matter what your size is originally. It sucks to gain weight to a point that makes you feel uncomfortable, and should you have the desire and motivation so lose said weight then do it and be proud of yourself I say. 
I can only hope this ruling is going to be overturned soon. This is ridiculous, and really just asking for trouble.
*so many hugs*
&gt; the court argued that this demonstrated they did not consider contraceptive coverage important enough to force it upon business.  The federal government pays for the contraceptive coverage that gets left out when the religious exemption is applied. It's still an absurd decision, but at least no one gets excluded from her access to contraceptive coverage... for now.
Fiance and I are at the hardware store yesterday to buy a small can of paint. I walked in not ten seconds behind him. I am not familiar with this particular location, and looked up at the signage to see what direction he was headed. In the middle of this, an employee asked if I needed help. No, no I do not. So, we pick out the paint and as he's waiting for it to get mixed, I go off to look at some potted herb plants. I got turned around and walked passed the same employee. And AGAIN, asks if I needed help. Like, just NO.   And it happens every. Single. Time.   Even Fiance has commented on how he LOVES shopping at hardware stores with women because employees straight-up ignore him when he asks for help and women "don't even need to ask".   But I'm just an unsupervised woman in Home Depot, what do I know about tools or wood or gardening or any of that shit. :(
I had chronic BV for over a year. I took every pill and used every gel/cream they gave me until they were at a loss.    I finally found a specialist and with one look under a microscope he said he didn't think BV was my actual problem. He sent samples to a lab to confirm and found out that I didn't have lactobacillus.    He put me on a round of probiotics that are meant for Ulcerative colitis. I took one by mouth during the day and inserted one at night. My 30 days just ended last Saturday and my vagina is FINALLY NORMAL! No more smell, no more discharge! I have my check up with him on Monday. I honestly I can't believe I suffered that long. I haven't had sex for soo long. I felt dirty and terribly disgusting all of the time. I've been crying from joy.    Since the infection went on so long I developed vestibulitus. But he thinks we caught it early and it's already feeling better with the cream he gave me.    I just wanted to put my story out there in case anyone else is going through something similar. I saw 4 different gynecologists and none of them picked up on anything. They just shoved antibiotics at me. I was in the office at least once a month and constantly buying the metro or clindamycin. So much money wasted. Not to mention my mental health, relationship with my boyfriend, and self esteem. 
It's not just about you. What if something happens to another person, one who isn't as aware as you? With your incident (though small) on record, it can help in the future for someone else.
Personal experiences to the contrary are relevant I suppose. I just gave my experience as a minority and what I've heard similarly from other minorities. 
There is no message here about it being "socially acceptable to be medically obese." The message is, don't let your weight stand between you and doing the things you love. Don't postpone your passions until "then." Do them NOW. Sure, go ahead and continue with your weight loss, or whatever other self-improvement scheme you're on, but at the same time, live your *happy* life, do your *happy* things, don't tell yourself you're not allowed. This is not about social acceptance, not one little bit. Kind of the opposite, actually. 
Yup, been there. Lost a pregnancy a couple weeks after telling people (not everyone, but a few people.) Having to tell them I'd lost the pregnancy was suuuper difficult. This last pregnancy, I waited longer before telling anyone.
[deleted]
Have you tried "bearing down"? Like the movement you use to poop? That pushes the cervix down and may make it easier to reach. 
The vile comments? How dare we believe that people's religious beliefs shouldn't restrict our human rights, or that corporations shouldn't be considered "people" when women aren't. How dare we fight against religious persecution in a country that was founded on the principle that any man should be allowed to believe whatever he wants. It is despicable for women to want to have more say over their own bodies than their employers. And you know what? We really should just accept shitty conditions we are granted in life, instead of fighting for better things. In fact, let's go to back to the Industrial Age where children had to work to help feed their families, where men were frequently killed on the job and forgotten, where men and women alike were forced to work the majority of the day. Let's just give up our entire lives for minimum wage, for companies that profit millions every year! Let's accept the bare minimum! Let's make our forefathers proud!   Happy Independence Day, everyone! 
I don't understand why abortion is such a hard choice if it isn't really a baby. If it's just a clump of cells like pro-choice people say, whats the big deal?
[deleted]
Fuck. YES. She is super charismatic and that was amazing.
100 times this!  It's not about you, it's about HIM.  You are the only witness to his predatory behaviour and you have a moral responsibility to all of society to sound the alarm.  If he predates on someone else and your notifying the police could have set off a chain of events that prevented him from reoffending, you are partly morally responsible for that person's victimization.
Hey, it's so awesome that you are asking for advice and that you want to make a change.  It sounds like you are really, really self-aware.  But you talk about your wardrobe and everything like you aren't happy with it.  So maybe that's a really superficial &amp; easy place to start -- if you feel happy with the way you look, you will act differently.  I have a feeling you ARE really lovely esp. since you're so self-aware and you actually seem really optimistic.  What happens when you try asserting yourself?  What happens when you speak up more loudly and express an opinion?  Do people listen -- or have you not tried?    Don't put too much pressure on yourself to be 100% different all at once.  I think change comes in small steps.  Take small steps towards this: say "hi" to someone.  Give them a compliment and ask a question.  Say what you think about something when you are 1-on-1.    All the other things you want, you will get, but it will take time.  It's scary to speak up and be yourself, because you run the risk of people not liking you... but at least you will feel happier with you, and you are really the one you will have to live with the whole time.  Good luck.  :)
I get where you're coming from, but the context of weight loss is important.   When you're fat, it's really easy to fall into the lie/trap of the diet industry and social pressures that you can't be happy and fat at the same time. People are fat for a lot of reasons, and the diet industry only makes million of dollars because it doesn't actually work, it feeds off people's desperation. That's why you get the line 'I tried everything and nothing worked, until I found [expensive item/service]!!' All the time.   It takes a lot of self love and self respect to lose weight, because it's difficult and for a lot of people a struggle they carry with them for a long time. If you wait to be happy and hate yourself until you reach some nebulous target weight, how is it going to feel when you slip up? (not good.)   Besides, fatness is relative (some people are convinced they're fat though having a healthy BMI) and you can be fat without being unhealthy, so for people who don't have health issues it just becomes about self image issues.   If health is really your concern, then I would suggest you advocate for people having fitness goals, not weight goals. Advocate for people to feel happy and free in their bodies to persue those goals instead of ashamed of existing. Fitness goals are much more reliably measured and tie directly to your health whereas weight fluctuates and isn't a consistent indicator of health status.  Honestly, I think there's room to tell fat people they can be happy too without in the same breath chaining on 'solongasyou'rehealthy'. Yes, we should advocate for health, but we also need to advocate not feeling like shit for existing. We don't need to do both at the same time, and we should do both for every one, not just fat people.
I am not anywhere near ready to have a baby with my partner, nor have I ever been pregnant. But, I know so many people, including family members who have had one.  My aunt miscarried her first baby, and there wasn't any discussion about what she went through, other than the baby was lost.  Same for my cousin.  Knowing that some women go through this makes my heart hurt.  I was crying so much reading this, as I never knew it was like this for women. Thank you for sharing this story. There needs to be more discussion regarding miscarriages.  I am deeply sorry for yours and your husband's loss.
Same here. I got pregnant with 7 other ladies and almost everyone, except me and 1 other, had a miscarriage. That's when I realized having a baby is truly a blessing because pregnancy is so unpredictable. The other woman who had her baby ended up getting preeclampsia and having him 2 months early. Like I said totally unpredictable.
Sit them both down in the same room, tell them what you know, and then walk out and never speak to either of them again.   If your relationship is going to be ruined over something petty, their "friendship" ought to be ruined too. 
You should tell the cops about this. You might just stop him in time before he does something worse. It would be the right thing to do. 
[deleted]
I dunno, I think in general it's a pretty good law. Maybe could be tweaked a bit (and I know virtually nothing about it so maybe it allows for more) but I think it is way better than stand your ground law, and other laws that give people the right to kill people.
&gt; who are completely free to get their iud/morning after pills through the ACA provided insurance without their employer being involve  Presumably with money paid to them through salary from their employer. So "employee compensation" ends up being used for things they find morally reprehensible anyways. There is no meaningful difference between the two.  
[deleted]
I hope this is sarcasm.
You're vilifying the guy in the situation for being a pig, treating her as "damaged goods," etc. The emotions are far more complex than that.
How does that make them full of shit?  I'm sure you have purchased something made in China.  Does that mean YOU support killing babies?
In most jurisdictions sex offenders have to submit to lie detector tests at the discretion of the PO. If he fails that, after a report is made against him, he goes to jail. Your husband wouldn't have to know if you didn't want him to. You wouldn't have to go to court or even make an official statement. Simply reporting it to the local probation and parole office anonymously would be enough. 
Based on the title, I really thought this was gonna be a story on /r/nosleep.
Oh yeah.
We had something like this a month or so ago!   Stay calm - try taking a nice relaxing bath if you can and see if that helps. Try taking a muscle relaxant.   If it's still stuck then see if you can go in to see a gynecologist (better than the ER!). &lt;3 Hope everything turns out okay! 
&gt; there are times when i get a stain on one side but the other half of the pad isn't full. Other times i leak through the back of a not full regular pad. Sometimes I also get a giant stain above my clitoris with barely any blood on the pad. I also leak out of the top of my ass when I lie down.   Yeaahhh I had all of this too, pretty much every single month. That's why I switched to tampons and never ever ever ever relied on pads ever again. Fuck pads, seriously. 
Your BMI is 16.60 kg/m^2 which is worrisome. 95-100 lbs is really the right weight if you want to be thin but still within a healthy range. Most of the celebrities you see on covers are heavily photoshopped to look thinner. A counselor might be able to help you. Best of luck.
[deleted]
I have taken it several times, for yeast infections and for black mold exposure, and I have never had any side effects.
Merrells are excellent, but you're not gonna find them for less than $70, unless you find them at a pretty steep discount somewhere.
Yeah, I feel like the three month rule is usually passed on from woman to woman when one is pregnant... I remember my grandmother commenting on it once when my cousin told us that she was pregnant and it was earlier than that. 
[deleted]
I may look at that...in a week or 2. Thank you.  morbid humor is all we can do to keep sane, so that really helps. 
Awesome! Seeing as I've never bought any I wasn't sure if I had to go to a gun or sporting good's store. Glad to know that it's more accessible 
I have had horrible nausea/vomitting on the first and second day of my period for YEARS accompanied by severe cramps and dizziness. I got the Mirena a few months ago and my periods have improved drastically. My most recent cycle, I didn't take any ibuprofen. NONE! And I felt almost completely fine, which was totally unheard of. I don't know what your situation is bc-wise but just thought I'd lend a little hope! I'm so sorry your periods are awful! 
Yea. I noticed that too. I know it is just tv, but part of me thought that at 6weeks that is what would happen. I mean, i know it is glossed over, but I didnt expect what actually happens. 
[deleted]
Yes, stress really can delay it that much.  My period was always irregular (until I started birth control pills), but one year when I was really stressed it was 7 *months* late.  My doctor said it was fine as long as I got 4 in a calender year, which I just barely did.  If you always use condoms, and you're using them correctly, it's far more likely that your period is late because of stress, not pregnancy.    You only use one condom at a time, right? "Double bagging", i.e. layering multiple condoms, reduces effectiveness.  Other mistakes include tearing the package open roughly, which can tear the condom; neglecting to keep a space at the tip; and not having a properly-fitting condom.  If you don't get your period by the time you leave, you could consider packing a couple pregnancy tests in your bags and taking them later on, if that might ease your mind.  There is a possibility of a false negative, though that's most likely within the first week after the missed period.  If you took at least one of the tests after July 1st, they should be accurate.  Tl;dr: You're probably not pregnant, assuming you've used condoms correctly and took the tests 7 days after the missed period.
Thanks! We live in the seattle area. I moved here 5 years ago from michigan and this will be my 1st trip to the peninsula. 
How am I generalizing?   Let's be honest here, if things went the other way, people would be saying "How stupid, he was on the sex offender list, why didn't she realise". Women are always between a rock and a hard place when it comes to their behaviour. Either they're labelled as paranoid and crazy or they're stupid and naive. 
THANKS! :)
I feel like this is what the vaginas in Dr. Seuss books look like.
I've had an ovary removed due to a tumor that was cancerous. This was in my teen years so I'm lucky I didn't die from the ignorance of my doctors who didn't believe me.   I've alsi had problems with both fibroids and endometriosis. The fibroids grow to the size of plums, apples and even grapefruit before they get too large and their blood supply can't keep them alive. Very painful when they die which can happen whenever.   The endometriosis is more of a problem during my periods. This tissue acts like a uterine lining formed when your body is preparing to nurture a fetus. Periods are longer and more painful.   I have surgery every 3-5 years to remove fibroids and the endometriosis tissue which they've found growing on my bowels and other internal organs.   I'm in my mid-thirties and a seriously considering a hysterectomy.   Edit: Forgot to mention that I've found that wearing a corset during my period drastically reduces my pain. I learned about it from a blog I follow, Epbot, which is written by the wife of the couple who do the Cake Wrecks blog.  http://www.epbot.com/2013/05/can-corset-cure-cramps.html?m=1 
[deleted]
You might want to consider weight training. You'll be able to eat more and look healthy and lean without actually being at an unhealthy weight.
[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
Beg your family for shopping money "to cheer you up/because you don't want to burden your husband" but really  to help yourself get to the embassy when you're ready to go.  As others have said, its better to turn up at the embassy and wait for them to help you get home, and then live in a Domestic Violence shelter while you get the rest of your life together.    Hopefully you can take some jewelry/electronics with you to pawn.  If you have access to the internet, perhaps e-mail is a good way to reach the embassy. Remember, once you're away from the house at safe at the embassy you can reach out to everyone you know for help.
It is amazing how strong cultural conditioning and habit can be.  It takes a massive mental effort for me to be the one to take out the garbage LOL, but I do my share of that.  :)
Ah!  There's a fresh perspective.
Awww look, baby's first attempt at trolling! 
I just wanted to let you know that according to the NHS, stress is NOT linked to miscarriage in any way, shape or form.    I was like you with my son, worrying about miscarriage, worrying that it wasn't the right time for a baby, worrying that I'd gotten very drunk just before I realised I was pregnant and then worrying that my worrying would hurt the baby.  The chunky, healthy 6 month old on my lap says different.  Also, try not to panic too much.  Cramps can be a bad sign - or your uterus expanding.  Sudden cessation of pregnancy symptoms can be a bad sign - or you'll find they come back days later with a vengeance.  I was terrified the first time I bled while pregnant, I was certain it was the end.  Nope, cervical erosion.  I mean yes, seek care if you're worried, but it ain't over 'til the fat lady sings.  Congratulations and good luck! 
I've been having stress-related delays for two semesters now, the last one, coupled with stress from flying, has pushed back my period for more than 10 days. 
[deleted]
That's horrible! Glad your ok. I use our campus movie theater &amp; would totally expect to be safe there.. I guess you never know :( 
I've never heard of a "bra" for a stomach, but I would suggest giving yoga and/or pilates a go, as it will increase your flexibility and increase your energy levels, making any other exercises you do that little bit easier.  Also, if your back is causing you trouble, lie flat on the ground with maybe a rolled up towel for support (under the small of your back). Do this for a short time each day, and it should ease the pain for you.
The pain can come from walking only 10 feet, and I know it is from my stomach pulling down. I've done the lying flat with a towel thing, it hurts.  If I am in any way under the weather just walking around my house doing chores can cause severe pain to the point I have to sit down and wait it out. And it cant be any sit down but in a way i can relieve pressure.
It would be best to report it. There are a lot of parole officers who wont do much about this but I would guess at least half will have some serious interest/concern about watching the video. What if it happens again then you have to tell your husband this is the second time, he would prob be ready to do something stupid and/or manly. So just tell him the first time right?
Solidarity is the best way to get through them. Well solidarity and ice cream. :)
[deleted]
[deleted]
Point at the gruesome picture and state "That. That's what I'm getting today." I wish I lived in an area where I could troll protesters, but I'm very glad I don't.
[deleted]
If you are feeling pain like this after only walking 10 paces - it sounds to me like there may be another problem. Nobody should have to suffer like that, and I would consider going to a doctor, physio, or a chiropractor.   Quite often as well, I truly believe that our own mental stress can reveal itself in these kinds of physical ailments. A positive attitude can go a long way for physical health. Healthy mind = Healthy body. 
[deleted]
*"Are you saying that getting multiple abortions is an indicator of using it as an alternative to contraception? Why do you think that?"*  *No not in a generalized sense of all.    *It stands to reason the availability of the multiple varieties of contraceptives that can be used in unison if the users want, and the low failure rates of the properly used contraceptives that the instances of multiple abortions would be relatively low, and not be almost 50%.  *Murphy's law will still rear its ugly head and account for some of these multiple instances.  *"Also, just logically, what reason would a woman have for getting abortions instead of using contraception?"*   *There is no logical explanation for that. I can not pretend to know exactly what reason if at all a person who would do this have.   I can sympathize with someone who has had bad luck and just gotten the short end of the stick, but not with someone who has not done there homework, and keeps getting stuck in the mud.     
I mean, let's be clear, if you pepper spray someone without sufficient legal justification you will also be in legal trouble.  The scale of the legal trouble might be different, but it's not like you're just allowed to pepper spray people because you felt scared.
Wow those bank staff were great.
My body, my choice. I have to be the one who chose if I want to change my body forever and go through pain. Or if I want to have a medical intervention.  BUT, it's not fair to guys that we are able to correct a mistake,  but guys can't. They have to pay for a kid they didn't chose to make while I can get am abortion if i'm not ready
Do whatever you feel you need to do in order to put it behind you and move on with your life. Legally, I don't think there is anything *you* can  do about what he did to you. But if he is alive and still doing it to others, maybe making the authorities aware of what happened to you could help prevent future abuse.
I had a miscarriage last year and had a D&amp;C at 8 weeks. I had a choice and I chose the surgical option and even then 2 weeks later I miscarried the rest of the tissue in the middle of the night. It was two hours of the worst cramps ever. 
[deleted]
That was my immediate thought as well. If there's someone running at me, I'm going to shoot for the leg so they go down and I have a better shot to run the other way. 
I agree with you. I think it's interesting that most people have responded with their own shaving stories, and what they do to make it  less irritating, instead of discussing the implications of those nsfw hairless threads. Shaving seems to have become a mandatory act.
If we lived in a world where an embryo could be removed from a woman's body and transplanted into a man to carry to term, it would make sense to talk about men's right to a say in a decision about abortion. Until then, the woman's bodily autonomy is the only right to speak of here.  Once there's a baby, though, the right of the child to be provided for trumps the parents right to complete financial autonomy. If we lived in a society where we collectively provided for children, it would be reasonable to talk about parents signing away their parental rights and responsibilities. Until then, "financial abortions" that leave children in poverty can't rightly be on the table.   Men have rights here, though. They have the right to be part of their children's lives,  or to choose not to be part of their lives. They have the right to use condoms or have vasectomies. They have the right to abstain. I think it would be good if men had a range of birth control choices too, but the pharmaceutical industry believes that there isn't the market for this. Perhaps this is a good starting point if you're concerned about men's rights in this area. 
Good points both :)
Cloth pads are amazing. I just started making my own, and Sweet baby jeezus i'm never going back.  
I really like the variety of sources you provided here, well done you.
I'm glad I made you smile :)    From a western perspective, the immediate visceral reaction you will get is "Just leave.  Run.", but I totally understand why that is not realistic in all cases.  Arranged marriages can work and I totally understand why you would want to at least give it a fair shot.  It sounds like even though you don't love your husband, you at least have some respect for him.  It also doesn't sound (from the small amount of information you gave) like he's abusive or trying to control you, just maybe a bit lazy and acting "how a husband is supposed to" given his upbringing.    For all we know, he might be scared to try anything interesting in bed because he's been taught that "virtuous women don't like that", and he probably doesn't realize how isolated/helpless you feel all the time, because he's been taught that the way to make women happy is to provide a nice living so that they don't have to work. It is quite possible that when you talk to him, you'll find some common ground.   Finally, you can work on your marriage while still setting aside some savings "just in case".  If things start looking better, it's still good to have a personal emergency fund.   
np.  :)
&gt;Would they really be white?  That is why I said 'stereotypically white', meaning that others stereotype them as white.  Granted, that might not have been the best choice.  Perhaps I should have said 'passing white' or 'individual who is stereotyped as white'.  &gt;In America, where this movement has gained the most traction, the people with Afro textured hair are black.  This is a phenotype that is highly correlated with race.  That is why I'm asking if it is actually the phenotype or the race that is the defining characteristic.  If it is the phenotype, then there is nothing racist at all about excluding those without it from the group.
Also, maybe you could convince a police officer to go and have a word with him. As a precaution. He should know that his behaviour is not unnoticed; he is not anonymous.  Might make him think twice next time.
[deleted]
Seriously?? It might be easy in some extreme cases of incest rape. But in general?  An abortion is an operation - it is dangerous for the mothers health! Talk to a doctor about the dangers of anaesthetic. Or infections during operations. Women which abort are obviously not old women, which lowers the risks - but the risk is still there.  I assume that the right to live is a basic human right. You might argue, that an Embryo is not yet a human (fine with me) - but than please tell me, at which point does it become human? This alone is a difficult question. Would it be ok for you to do an abortion 10 minutes before birth? If not: what about a month? Two months? I think defining this threshold is pretty difficult. Basically we don't have a clear scientific answer to the question, therefore we (as society) have to make the decision: at which point has the right of the baby to live a higher weight than the right of the mother to chose whether she wants to give birth to a child? This question alone looks pretty hard to answer.  The father might want to keep the child (and might be able to support it). Should this be taken into consideration or not? He can not chose to keep the baby or to abort it - he also can not take away the burden of pregnancy. Therefore he is in the worst position: if the mother keeps the child, he needs to take the responsibility, if she aborts, he has to accept it (and there are men who go through depression because of that, this is an issue).  In most western countries, it is possible to give a baby away for adoption pretty easily (in the city I live there are baby boxes - so a mother can put a baby into that box at the hospital and noone will ever ask her any questions). So if it is only about the cost, I would be glad to pay for a pregnancy with the money I pay to my insurance company every month. I know several women who can not have children and are in waiting lists for an adoption (and I am sure, most of these women would be wonderful mothers). But since so few people give their children for adoption, it is pretty difficult to adopt a child. So if it is ONLY about being able to afford it, I don't see a reason for an abortion - there must be more reasons than that.  I think abortions should be legal (since the alternatives are much worse), but calling the issue simple just states that you didn't think very much about it.
If you consider how many opportunities women have to get pregnant during the 30-40 years that they are fertile, it's not particularly surprising that some people have two or more abortions. A 2% failure rate per year (condoms perfect-use), or even a 0.3% failure rate per year (pill perfect-use), adds up over that kind of time-span.
I considered that, I just don't know how well she would take it or even how to phrase it. I mean I know she knows who I am because when I come in without my SO she asks where he is, makes small talk etc... but I don't think she is ready to hear that while she is beyond nice, she really needs to step it up in the service department. No amount of smiles and  head tilts and strange curtsey/leg kick things make up for the fact that she is not that great at her job :/ 
First of all, it is **not** a "little effort". Her boyfriend wouldn't want this to happen, her family might get very concerned, police procedures are difficult, long, and risky.  Maybe if she really felt the need to do it, which I agree would be the best option, she should send an anonymous tip, or tell someone else to report it for her. If she doesn't want to help out the next girl we can't force her to, because a lot of people here are acting kind of like they're so entitled and in charge of her life. After posting this up here and reading everything people are saying, maybe she'll change her mind. Maybe she'll help out the next girl. Maybe this guy's probation officer will keep him a little bit more in the lines. But again, she has NO OBLIGATION. That's all I'm saying.
It depends what circumstances they mean. As for the other 29%, yes, those people are far, far worse than rapists.
You really don't get it, so let's try this:  **Topic**: "The US Military has created a new rule to the dress code stating that women may not wear their hair in braids, twists or dreadlocks. This new rule effects black women primarily."  *What is your contribution to this conversation?*  **Topic/Rant**: It's bad enough when white people put me down about my hair, but even other black people put me down, too.   *What is your contribution to this conversation?*  **Topic** My hair does this, but I want it to do this. How do I get it to do what I want it to do?  *WHAT IS YOUR CONTRIBUTION TO THIS CONVERSATION?*  Let's say the group were to say, "OK, fine. We'll let you in". What would be your role? What would you do, especially when you see, really see, the group has fuck-all to do with anything you want to say or do? 
But it is true that trafficking still exists to a large extent in Denmark and Germany, as traffickers make it seem that their workers are legal. It's not just the media overblowing the subject.
Sounds like you should join us at /r/endo
Wow... I've lurked here for a while and really liked and respected 99% of the people/opinions I've seen. The fact that an honest question discussing the male experience of abortion is removed because of the potential for trolls seriously makes me feel disillusioned. Particularly when I can see at least 3 or 4 posts about abortion from a women's point of view - are they not also flame bait for trolls? Seriously disappointed in that decision. 
Why don't you answer the question?
You are impressively horizontal.
He's clearly already being negatively affected by the emotions attached to this situation. Those physical symptoms are a clear indication of severe anxiety. I disagree with the age thing - I think it depends on the child. I know some 16 year olds who wouldn't be mature enough to make the decision, and some 11 year olds who would. In those situations the courts (if it ever gets that far) take the maturity of the child into account 
Was he handsome? Come on, we're all thinking it.   I picture J Peterman from Seinfeld. 
[deleted]
*holds up can of bear mace*  Best. Deterrent. Ever. 
[deleted]
I always though penises were weird because they look like big deformed clitorises.
[deleted]
But that skin cell will not form another human. Unless you have perfected budding, in which case congratulations!
Remember that most people don't care half as much about you as you think - if at all.  They're unlikely to recall or constantly consider past indiscretions constantly, if ever.    Give it a few days of good performance and all that bad stuff will just wash out.  Be as likable as  you can, and mistakes are more easily forgiven.     Don't be defensive or proud if someone has to correct you, accept criticism graciously and it'll brush right by in their minds.    
Breaking up with someone due to their breast size is a bad thing, But breaking up with someone because you are not sexualy attracted to them, or because your priorities in the relationship are not as invested as their priorities is a good reason to break up.  If the lack of breasts is making that much of a difference to you that you have to ask this question. Yes, you should break up. *unless* you are both only interested in a short-term, casual bit if fun, It seems like you are not looking at the big picture of the potential relationship, and for that reason, it may be better for you both if you end it sooner rather than later.
I couldn't prove anything because he wouldn't ever contact me directly, but he would call my friends and family from other people's phones pretending to be someone else.  We only found out who it was because he called my sister once and her husband, in the investigations department in the military, checked it out.  Unfortunately, it still wasn't proof enough for a restraining order.  It caused me a lot of trust issues, but thanks to great friends and family (and a bit of counseling) I'm finally starting to trust people enough to go on dates again.  It probably didn't help that he was my first ever boyfriend.
Thanks, that makes a lot of sense.
[deleted]
It sucks way worse being a guy getting turned down than being desired.
It would be lying by omission. What would you say if he asked, "Mom, why did you and dad get a divorce?" He has a right to know why everything changed. Lying to him to protect his adulterer father makes absolutely no sense. Anyways, this particular boy already knows.  I'm sure he has a lot of questions that he is trying to work out the answer to. Does forcing him to spend time with his father solve any of these problems? The anxiety comes from feeling betrayed by his father and then being forced to spend time with him and pretend nothing happened.   It's fine to have empathy, but to put the father's interest above anyone else's is ridiculous. He caused this mess. He cheated on his son's mother, he forgot to pick his son up, he is trying to buy his son's respect, he is changing the son's therapist because he doesn't want to feel like the bad guy, he is punishing the son for not respecting him and then blaming his mother. These aren't things a good dad would do.  If the father wants to have a good relationship with his son, he needs to take responsibility for his actions and work to build back the trust that he destroyed. He hasn't done these things.
College common room :)
I'm really sorry to say this but it sounds like you're sacrificing your happiness, ambitions and fulfilment for the relationship and in my opinion, no-one who loves you would want you to do that. A relationship is about both people being happy and wanting to be where they are and although there are sacrifices and compromises, it still has to work for both people whereas it sounds like it isn't working for you.  Saying that you're putting your life on hold means that you're not living the life you want for yourself. Why would someone who loves you want that for you?  I think you need to have a good honest talk with your partner about what can work for both of you, not just what works for him and what you're willing to put up with while you wait for happiness.  I hope this doesn't come across as harsh, I really feel for you.
The perfect relationship!
Why does fetus necessarily "deserve" life?
Here are the daily odds of a miscarriage: http://spacefem.com/pregnant/mc.php   It drops below 10% just before 6 weeks.  Also, it's generally week 26 where the baby is considered viable since it has a 90% chance of living outside the womb then. But again, it's not a sharp cut-off, just a sliding scale of probability.
[deleted]
BDSM sex does *generally* tend to be healthy because communication is explicit, unsubtle and effectively written in stone. Someone says the safe word, you stop. Because of the complexity of the actual sexual acts (restraints, etc.) you essentially have to be sober to engage in BDSM-- so that's a whole issue in vanilla sex that's essentially been erased.   Honestly, most vanilla sex between partners who communicate well is probably on par with responsible BDSM in terms of safety and consent. People just need to learn to say what they want, say what they like, and *most importantly of all*-- respect a no. It doesn't have to be a safe word, but similar rules should apply. Simples.
Haha shit I'm sorry :( I would have been embarrassed too. Sometimes I take a different way after I've been driving after a car for a long time so they don't think I'm following them. :/
[deleted]
Adore that color!
[deleted]
Its not really sexual and I am friends with them its just their joke and I really don't like.
Thank you!!!  He's a Weasley. 
Can you get a dog or cat or something? I know it's not human company, but it may help. Plus a dog you can take for walks and things, and train at home. 
&gt;Its not really sexual  It sounds like it is. Even if it wasn't, they are communicating with in you a way you don't like- if you've told them to stop, and they don't listen, that means they aren't respecting you as a person. 
So glad to be able to be helpful. Please feel free to contact me again if you like; I'm fortunate enough to think I know what a healthy relationship looks like and I want it for everyone.
Yeah, I don't do the annual either. Now that I'm menopausal, I think I'm supposed to. But I'm asymptomatic, so to me it's just another chore.
&gt;  If you don't want to shave don't, but body hair is not for me.  Me neither. I find hair removal to be far more comfortable, so that's what I've always done and that's what I'll continue to do. To each their own. If I were in that class I'd rather forego the extra credit and potentially take a lower grade than be physically uncomfortable. 
Um, if a person says someone living in a slum is not a person, they are wrong because that person is capable of thought, action, and self-preservation. This person...has been born...they have been carried to term and birthed. Lack of finances does not invalidate human life, and I'm not really get your analogy here.  Clearly "the collective" does not agree at what abortion is, made clear in the recent birth control "evidence" submitted in the Hobby Lobby case. People were calling the prevention of implantation, which literally is a sperm and egg, ending a human life. There is a very vocal section of Americans that believe doing anything that could possibly interfere with conception as killing a maybe baby.  I'm not trying to put words in your mouth, so forgive me if this comes across as hostile. It just worries me that people dismiss how serious this matter is or write it off as something more reasonable, especially when most pro-lifers aren't just against the abortion of viable fetuses.
[deleted]
Thanks for the insight. I'm most worried about the healing process because I have a desk job but t requires me to travel a lot to different cities (trains/planes).   Also - how do I know if they specialize in reductions? All of the websites focus on cancer. Should I see a plastic surgeon rather than a breast surgeon. 
[deleted]
That's really interesting actually... I had two kids, so I saw it being done but never actually knew it could look like a smiley face.
Cats rule &amp; that is one fine cat :)
I struggle so much with the flag! Your's looks fab! Are you over at /r/poledancing ?
They all are.  :-)
Religion, isn't it fun? I'm sarcastic of course.
How does someone without insurance pay for an abortion? In all western countries except the US, this wouldn't be a problem anyway. I think health care has to be a human right - especially in countries that have the money to provide it to everyone. You know what's way more expensive than a pregnancy? Cancer...  IMHO, the health insurance problem needs to get fixed urgently. I hope we can agree that nobody should be forced to abort because of money - giving birth and giving the child up for adoption has to be a viable alternative for all women who are pregnant (keeping the baby has to be the other alternative- obviously)
Yep! The cat on the couch is Paris. The one on the floor is her sister, Florence.
A revolution?  Sheesh. Why not just pass laws to protect people? How about repealing the laws that created the religious exemptions?    http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Religious_Freedom_Restoration_Act
Not relevant, re "not their [the employer's] job to pay for your private sex life." We work for paychecks including those benefits. I earned it and I can have a private sex life with my the salary and benefits. Switch to condoms? Are you an ObGyn whose reviewed her health records to recommend that as a birth control. No? Then if my doc tells me that IUD is best due to my personal health and place in life, then I really don't care about your opinion.
Ok. Can you show that the RFRA was passed by means of wealth or force? Do you even know why the RFRA was written? Do you even know the text of that law?  Do you have any real facts whatsoever to back up your conspiracy theory accusations as they relate specifically to the case at hand?  
So this is a common point brought up by a lot of people, my self included. The problem with this is it is not practical. If you look at competition shooters they have specialized guns and ammo to shoot tiny targets while moving and the targets are not shooting back and they are not under stress.   To make it where you could pick and make a disarming shot would take an incredible amount of time and money. Something most people and police departments don't have. Then the problem is compounded because biologically your body dumps adrenaline into your system when you are under a high stress situation, like being shot at. This results in the loss fine motor control which is hugely important for hitting anything regardless of intent.    Finally, a gun is a tool. They were designed to kill and they are dangerous. So much in fact that one of the rules of safety is "do not point a gun at anything you are not willing to destroy".  Symantics aside if you can make a decision to "shoot to disarm" then your life probably is not in so much peril that a shooting is justified. 
The fact that you're not willing to educate him on safety and how to properly use a firearm. Tells me you shouldn't comment on posts like these. 
Agreed. Also, I looked into more posts on this page, and apparently you can also do things like keep someone from messaging you if they get creepy, is that correct?  I would have loved to have that on dating sites, even when looking for a casual hookup, because a lot of the time I'd find that looking for a FWB seemed to bring out people who were confused about where my boundaries were or who didn't respect them. Not that all people who want casual sex are bad, I think it's more like certain people ruin it for everyone. One person who almost ruined it for me was a very pretty man, he just had stupid ideas about boundaries.
[deleted]
You must be a blast at parties
I think pro-life should mean pro- all life. So, Buddhists are pro-life because they are vegetarians and seek to not injure any life. 
Many western governments do not supply birth control and they don't have these problems you suggest at higher levels than the USA, Canada for example. 
24 weeks is viable. [Viability](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Fetal_viability) is currently defined as a 50% or greater chance of survival outside the woman's body. I think that is already more than generous. 20 weeks is NOT viable.  Edirt cuz speelings and linkage. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
&gt;What I can do is prevent the willful destruction of other human beings.  How? Besides making it illegal or mostly illegal, how do you hope to prevent the "willful destruction of other human beings"?  
Like most things, if you give it a little time, you get used to it and it doesn't bother you.
I mean , all colleges used to be all male colleges
Still learning, but I think I'm doing ok :)
Seconded, please don't do that, even if it is allowed, its not a good idea 
You like like you wandered out of Dishonored. 
Not if Hobby Lobby gets it's way it won't.
Thank you for saying this. I'm taking pole and it makes me sad that people need to justify themselves by insulting others. They refuse to teach anything remotely sexy too because of it , which is annoying -.-
Sweet! Toronto and Missasaugua have huge communities. Which means delicious food and pasteis de nata!
It's hilarious that you did this at your college.   I was on the way to nursery with my daughter. She is US-born, and your onesie would be so up her street.  Happy 4th!
And beautiful.
I hate to be this person, but have you checked out /r/ABraThatFits and/or looked into speciality boutiques with competent staff that can properly fit you? I had to go for regular massage therapy appointments and had chronic back pain until I started wearing properly fitted bras. At your weight and height, a size 38 band seems like it might be too big (I'm only a bit taller than you and weigh a little bit more and I wear a 32 band). If your band isn't the right size then it's offering no real support and that's where back and neck pain would come from, especially if the straps are doing all the work. You can x-post to /r/bigboobproblems for more advice too.   I apologize if you are in the right bra and this is all pointless, but I just thought I'd share. I had planned on getting a breast reduction for years (but wanted to wait until after I'd had kids) but now that I'm wearing good bras I'm actually comfortable and don't plan to anymore.
Newborn heads freak me the fuck out.  D:
I'm really more of a patter. I just wad up the toilet paper and blot it where the pee gets. I guess it is probably different for everybody but only a very small area of me gets any pee on it, and if I wipe then it just leaves toilet paper lint behind. I just blot it up real good. So there's that. 
Oh shite
[deleted]
That's so cool!! Always good to find a real-life person on reddit :) 
Thank you!!
L.A. Eyewear? They look much like my first pair!
So, your point is that I should be afraid of you? Is that a threat?  It's a holiday where I am. I was browsing reddit, just like you, and saw your message. I assure you that I am comfortable with the amount of time I do, or do not spend on reddit. 
There's a lot he could do.  My friend married a man with severe end stage M.S. and he still manages to interact with social services to get his entitlements (bit long ball of red tape, but he did/does it).  
Just make sure you always wear a matching red nail polish and you'll be fine. Fuck those envy bastards. 
My sister did it a few years ago, and she is super happy about it. She didn't have any awkwardness telling people, but she doesn't have any awkwardness with anything, so I don't know if that's useful to you. :)
Looks nice, but you really do need bracing on the legs. Also, you REALLY should add some type of rubber or plastic feet. All but the most disappointing sex is going to make those shift around and it will scrape the hell out of your wood floors.   Aside from that, maybe it's just the lighting but if that's pressure treated wood it's gonna smell rank for a few months. 
Image Fest Friday
what the heck? you obviously need to tell your dad that your mom is cheating on him right now!!! that's the **first** thing that you have to do!!  am i going crazy?!
New Beige as it is pronounced locally
The best thing to do is to moderate the people who you choose to surround yourself with. Associating yourself with toxic people only allows them to negatively impact your life and make you feel bad when you deserve so much better than that!   Do you take any medication for your depression? I'm not sure how healthcare and things of that nature work in the states, but check and see if you're paying for medical insurance with your tuition. I live in Canada, but I know that my uni includes dental and medical insurance in tuition costs which can really help out when trying to find something affordable! A lot of therapists also use sliding scale payments which can even go down to around $5/session if you're lucky. You can try searching online [here](http://therapists.psychologytoday.com/rms/) if that sounds like something that would interest you. I do understand that time is money though, so you could also try something like [7 Cups of Tea](https://www.7cupsoftea.com/) which is an online emotional support service that connects you to another person who can try and help you out and feel a lil better! 
My personal opinion is that r/amiugly and similar subs are generally frequented by people who have poor self-image and who are hoping to see pictures of people they consider to be unattractive, in a futile effort to feel better about themselves.  This means that the pool of people commenting is already biased toward hatred and negativity, and will latch onto the smallest most unimportant physical details of a person and blow them completely out of proportion.  The "positive" comments are often about whether or not the commentor would have sex with the person in question, as if being told that some random stranger on the internet would do you is synonymous with being told that you're beautiful.  (It's not.)  Also, consider the amount of photo manipulation that often goes on before people post their pictures online.  [Look at the video of this girl on a train.](http://gawker.com/pretty-girls-make-faces-on-the-importance-of-angles-1080957757)  She looks like two completely different people depending on where the camera is.
[deleted]
Howso? It's actually pretty great. Highly recommend if you have the correct anatomy? 
no.
I'm just so excited marshmallows are now a fruit!! 
My mom used to say the exact same thing to me when I was little. I'm and a male and much larger than my mother but she would say it in a joking manor. I've never heard anyone else that's ever said that.   Seems there's a long history of manipulation tactics used by your mother. It's just one example to its difficult to speculate. Also, my relationship with my mother isn't great either, so what do the fuck do I know? 
I can't imagine doing this to another woman, let alone a friend, let alone *a sibling*.  OP's sister is terrible for doing that.
The question is silly and should not be here. 
[deleted]
I think that you should go get tested. You can catch HPV and herpes with perfect condom use. 
You're both adorable!  Your love for each other translates so well in this image.  
I only have good points because I've lived through a lot of them, which totally sucks :(    But you know what?  Thanks for the good discussion.  After your first message I thought I was going to get beaten over the head with some kind of rant by someone who thought I was protecting rapists or some such craziness... and I really appreciate that we could have a mature back and forth discussion.  You're cool peeps, internet person. :)
This...because he will find out...either from someone else or from your own guilt expressing itself.  People almost always find out.  And you simply can't base a relationship around a lie.  If you were raped, you should tell him and if he is any kind of man he will support you.
Like 2. Really not emotional at all.
I cry at like every movie but other than that I only cry at big things really except when I have those really emotional days.
a child should never have to support their parents.. especially when they are causing issues in your own home
An infant continuing to live is also another step along the way to a potential person, yet people would take great offense at anyone who kills an infant.
 you're facing the wrong way
[deleted]
Well, I had a chuckle so that's fortunate. :)
I wipe back to front but I never wipe my butt and then continue to my vulva. Never. They are two separate acts of wiping on two clean pieces of t.p. Despite what everyone says about never wiping back to front, that's not the whole story. Just don't get poo in your vulva and you'll be ok.
&gt; a girl can get sex pretty much whenever she wants  Tell that to me in high school.  That's a tired stereotype.  I'd argue that an *attractive* girl is on par with an attractive man for difficulty in getting laid by their prospective sexual partners.   
If it is not meant to be all inclusive it should not claim to be all inclusive.   If this was labeled differently I would have no problem with it, but look at the post title. It says the word "Everyone". It is is addressing me and therefore I feel that I can complain about it not encompassing me.  There are 2 posters about age and 3 about weight. That is very unbalanced and to me the overabundance serves to emphasize just how much reassurance the author thinks those women need. 
[deleted]
I kept them on a leash at all times because there are lots of reindeer where we hiked, belonging to the Sami people. We have a hands free jogging belt but didn't take it with us (we use it for canicross so they pull when I wear it, it also got in the way of the backpack). My boyfriend and I split the "burden" and we used flexi leads to give them at least some freedom. It wasn't much hassle at all. They're used to camping and sleeping in tents, and being tied up while we pause, have nice leash manners etc so it was great to have them with me.   I had no idea there are restrictions like that, that sucks :(. Here we have "the right to roam" which actually includes our dogs as long as they don't disturb the wildlife. Why would you forbid dogs on a trail? 
Not to say anything bad about OP but she's 230 lbs, I'm not sure if you're making fun of her with this comment or if you're serious but if you're making fun, that's really mean. 
I wonder how the people who call her 'Nigger Venus' or 'Sailor Venus Williams' would react if Asians called them out on playing Asian characters while being white.  'Oh that's different...see--'  'No. Fuck you fucking Crackashi Sensei.'
I think it's the double standard that she finds annoying. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
A week. 
[deleted]
Yep - I've gotten that reaction before, too (the devil worshipper thing). I've also gotten called crazy and stupid. I'll take the "ew" over those things!   I still try to educate about them (when appropriate). I've changed a few peoples' minds! Yay for small victories. :)
I'm 33, male, and I don't know what IFF or what that red thing is.  I tried to google, and I"m getting no context from these comments.  What is IFF and what is that red thing?
[deleted]
I know what you mean... I don't take my wife glasses shopping with me because she deems *everything* I try on "too hipster."
Don't feel bad, I've had that one as well.
The heat can warp the underwires, but it's mostly the elastic that you want to worry about.
I remember one episode when she has the one night stand with the "naked man". Always annoyed me because Marshall "called slut on her". Kinda sexist, methinks, as he was never too bothered by Barney.
Super cute
[How the author must imagine every white person with curly hair feels](http://media-cache-ak0.pinimg.com/236x/a0/63/8c/a0638cfc25c14b4522f67a76bbf8af27.jpg)
I am not sure. Black people were once viewed as human, but not human persons under the law, as were women. So I figure it is a similar debate in that regard, except fetuses are not independent or conscious. That's where it all goes downhill.
What will you do with the babies?
I guess it depends on what you mean by government being the problem.  The system is big and slow, but it also has the ability to regulate the market and set standards for safety.  Lawyers I will generally say are more of a symptom than an actual issue, but yes frivolous lawsuits and the increased cover-your-ass needs do impose a certain burden.
[deleted]
&gt;My husband has used the word selfish in regards to how I act in bed. I kind of am, I just want to fuck, I don't care about emotions and such, I just want my partner and I to get off. Well last night my boyfriend and I were talking after sex and he described me as selfless. I made him repeat himself I was so surprised. I know everyone is different but I don't get how two people can refer to my sexual style using two polar opposite words.  Let's focus on that last sentence:  &gt; I don't get how two people can refer to my sexual style using two polar opposite words.  They're not. Your boyfriend is talking about your sex style of " I just want my partner and I to get off" hence the selflessness. You help him get off so he sees that as selfless.  your husband, on the other hand, seems to be talking about intimacy.  " I just want to fuck, I don't care about emotions and such" So your husband is calling you selfish in terms of intimacy. He probably wants to be closer and cuddle and stuff like that while your boyfriend wants sex. So in terms of sex you're selfless but in terms of intimacy you're selfish.
Thing about cosplay, is that they value accuracy.  Accuracy comes in two forms, physical and essence.    Top tier cosplay must capture the imagery of the character and their attitude/presence.   Sadly, essence is lacking now days.  As far as black cos-play goes, yea.... i got nothing.  Shouldn't matter really sense we accept gender swap.  If a girl can go around dressed as female version of male character, community can easily accept girl going around dressed as black version of a character.   Most likely it's the minority with loudest voice that give community a bad name.
Every once and awhile, I get complacent and wrongly assume a certain type of sexism or racism surely must be gone. It's 2014, no one could really think "this is a man's game, get out" when playing an online game with a woman, or for people of color, the article in question. Then I am harshly reminded that no, we haven't gotten past this base level of racism or sexism, that we still have many serious problems to confront as a society.  Just disgusting. Anyone of any color, race, creed, gender or sex can cosplay whomever they want. Cannot believe people would do this.
Yes, I will be selling the babies I don't keep! I am not sure for what yet, since I don't sex them until they are couple weeks old. Most of them are Yellow Bellies (morph), and then I have two normals. :)
Usually bangs sound like a better idea than they actually turn out to be. You definitely pull it off though. 
Thanks! It was definitely a risk, but I'm glad I did it!
Good lord sweetie.....Let it go, let it go! Tis madness to assume badness. No harm done, nor intended.
Close the door or not have the dog in the same room when you're having sex or masturbating? 
4 I guess. I can tear up a bit at a Disney movie, but when something critical happens (kid falls into the pool, man passes out from low blood sugar, etc.) I'm gonna turn into a stone-cold zero until it's over, do what I need to, and freak out about it later. But that's just the EMT coming out in me. 
[deleted]
I'm kind of sad that she didn't link her Batgirl cosplay. Does anyone know where to find it? Google search failed me.
Calling her names is the clearest example of racism, but here is the passage that was most impactful for me:  &gt;"For a black cosplayer (not to be racist) she did an amazing job!" the original Tumblr post read. It was later was edited to include "I love her skin tone" after all hell broke loose.  &gt;Personally, I've always been stuck on those first few words: "for a black cosplayer." As if the bar was set lower for us, as if we weren't expected to perform on the same level as white cosplayers.  As a non-cosplayer, I see cosplay as a bit like Halloween. People dress up however they like and run around having fun. We don't tell a 5-year-old not to dress up as The Incredible Hulk because his body type doesn't match. That would be ridiculous, just like telling a black girl she shouldn't dress up as a white superhero.  To me, this "for a black cosplayer" comment reflects the same kind of sentiment that makes people laugh at [Tron Guy](http://pic.geekitude.com/d/10986-2/P0000537TronGuy.jpg) or say that a movie director sucks because their film didn't exactly follow the book it was based on, or how a young child will notice and get loud when mom or dad doesn't read the story book exactly the same way they did the other 359 times they read it.  People have a natural tendency to notice when things aren't how they have always been before.   I do not believe the vast majority of people who commented on her skin tone were thinking, "There is a lower bar for black people." I believe they were thinking, "I've never seen a black Sailor Venus before. That's *different* and not what I was expecting."    
Wow, that sounds terrifying. I hope everything goes well for you!
I don't think I could ever masturbate or have sex with my pets in the same room... They get thrown out for the duration of sexy time... Just imagining them watching me is awkward... Eww
The outrage isn't over what medications or who pays for them. It's about staying the fuck out of a woman's vagina. It's about someone other than the person taking the medication having a legal right to discriminate against them because they take the medication. The law doesn't protect Hobby Lobby's religious beliefs but it does give them the right to force them on members of their organization. The constitution doesn't protect that.
That uh, doesn't sound right either. 
Black female geek weighing in: Growing up in my geeky circles I would always hear my fellow geeks look down on the "jocks" and "popular" kids for being so exclusive or intolerant of kids that weren't "cool" like them.  There was this attitude that we were somehow better than them because we didn't exclude others due to their looks, athletic ability,  knowledge of sports, hobbies.  As I got older, I realized that that is largely bullshit. The things that you are into, the hobbies you enjoy and the type of media you consume do NOT dictate your morals, kindness, inclusiveness,  tolerance,  etc.  I can't tell you how many geek men I've encountered who have decided that they need to quiz me after hearing that I love manga and videogames.    Being a geek doesn't make you immune to be a bigot, racist, sexist, closed-minded, or cowardly; the replies on your tumblr post are proof of that.  All in all, I was really touched by your story.  Keep doing what you love! Maybe one of these days I'll finally cosplay as Cammy!  TL;DR: Geeks can be jerks too, unfortunately. 
[deleted]
"Sorry, Robin, but you hooking up with this guy makes it seem that the only thing standing between you and sex is clothes." That line kills me every time.    It still bothered me he called her a slut, though. Why doesn't he call Naked Guy a slut? The guy literally takes his clothes off on every first date in a desperate attempt to get laid. 
Exactly. Just because you have a thought doesn't mean you need to broadcast it and hurt people.
I will look it up! Thank you! :)
If you can't tell the difference, how is that my fault? Further, what does it matter? Feel free to think analog instead of according to your perception of one vague generalized movement.   I'm not going to prescribe casual sex, but I think the burden of those who are (dramatic word here, please excuse) enslaved by monogamy, that is participating in the system though they are unhappy, far outweighs both in number and severity the burden on the chaste sensibilities of a few people who mistake acceptance for espousal. Primarily because you can just decline to have casual sex if that's not your thing.   
Ted tries the naked man move on his date later on in the episode and no one gives him shit.
If the only issue was prescription fraud, and you're not getting any prescriptions from him, I'd say there's no reason to stop talking to him as no one is questioning his credentials as a talker.  As for the other 'red flags' you don't detail, I can't say, except that if anything makes you uncomfortable then you should consider moving on - making patients comfortable is the first thing a therapist needs to do, and if you're questioning anything it's a bad sign.
The truth is, both men and women have casual sex. Therefore movies and television shows, to be accurate, should depict both genders doing exactly this in order to be accurate. There are a lot of things that aren't 'plot related' that show up in movies/tv shows, it helps flesh out the world and the surroundings and the characters.
[deleted]
Keeping for seven, but how long you been breeding?
Ha, I forgot about that. What the fuck, writers?    I really enjoyed that show, but moments like that really soured things. 
Absolutely not. I was trying to get a view of "What did I do, because I'm pretty sure I didn't do anything wrong, but I just want a second opinion- for good or bad."
The assumption is that human beings like sex, and the reason men are allowed to admit this and women aren't is cultural oppression of women.  Therefore, women being promiscuous are inherently disobeying those cultural prohibitions, making their behavior an inherently feminist act.    That doesn't mean that those who are not promiscuous are less feminist, it just means that promiscuity for women is inherently a rebellion against oppressive gender norms.
So - post the material you want to see more of, instead of complaining about the material that is posted? 
Do you look down on James Bond for not respecting his body and giving it away indiscriminately? 
I'd just had a very long relationship and was trying to define the relationship as purely friendship/fwb. Ultimately I'm a monogamous person so that didn't last.
Did James Bond ever desire anything more beyond casual sex? 
From what I read, I don't think so....but I am not positive.  It really is an odd situation to be in.  From what I can find, he got the suspension a month after my husband passed away, so I would assume that given all that was going on in my life, he didn't want to 'burden' me with his issues....yet, I feel like it does effect me.  I think my plan is going to be to continue seeing him, but start looking for another therapist.  Like I said before, part of the reason I don't want to just stop seeing him is that he has history that no other therapist has and I can't let go of that yet  :/
"It definitely made me realize that if you’re not strictly adhering to socially prescribed gender roles, your body becomes a site for contestation and public opinion.”  Well said girl! Though I'm not going to lie, I would have wanted to shave before my wedding... it's interesting how we internalize social norms as comfort preferences.
join /r/showerbeer :)   i also find it really interesting how the stigma of owning a vibrator is decreasing nowadays. just showing it off without a care! :)
Funny thing is they often do in Asia. I have white American friends who went to Japan for a cosplay that got a lot of racial remarks, scoffs, or WTF's. But I think it was mostly because they were fat. 
Thanks :D
I did try to post things that I found relevant or interesting. They get buried. They are not nearly as relevant or interesting as someone's sugar packet collection.  I did unsub on my main. This place turned into a circlejerk of "people are creepy", "tell me I'm pretty" or "DAE find it difficult to be a woman?"   I'll read this thread til it dies, but this is my last reply.
http://thesocietypages.org/socimages/2010/08/30/guest-post-why-do-the-japanese-draw-themselves-as-white/  tldr: The Japanese see anime characters as being Japanese. It is Americans who think they are white. Why?  Because to them white is the Default Human Being.
I travelled loads as a woman on my own and my problems have been few. I had a pick-pocketing attempt in Naples; I don't think they targeted me because I was a woman, just because I looked like an easy target loaded down with bags and in a rough port area (great place to put a hostel.... not). I joined an organised tour during an East African roadtrip that allowed me to see most of Zanzibar Island and the African tour guide turned up at my hotel room drunk and refused to leave until I hugged him. If I hadn't been sharing, I think that would have got much worse... I didn't have a problem in Stone Town in 2009 as such but I did feel extremely uncomfortable with the way certain men looked at me so that was a place where I tried to never be alone. I'm not surprised that place is now having religious problems and acid-throwing events....  I've been travelling solo for more than a decade and have visited so many countries in that time so really two actual encounters isn't that bad. Undoubtably the media portrays it way worse than it is but it depends on country selection. There are some places I would never go as a woman travelling alone, Egypt being one of them. For some countries where issues against women are common, I'll make the effort to find others to go with.  The hardest part of solo travelling for me is dealing with the loneliness. Some people take risks that they shouldn't as a result. I totally get it, you're lonely and want someone to talk to so you latch onto people but who are they? As someone who was raped by a work colleague, I'm wary of other people. Murderers look like normal people ("He seemed like such a nice guy") and so do rapists, perverts, paedos, etc. I once met up with a girl who'd just climbed Kilimanjaro and we travelled together for a few days. We stopped off in Nairobi (I think that's where we were) and were walking through a market when she vanished. I had no idea where she was and spent ages looking for her! She turned up totally nonchalant and told me that as we walked past an alleyway, an African guy had told her that he had stuff to sell and to follow him; she did. Luckily for her, he was genuine but why on earth would a person disappear down an alley with a stranger???  And I've met some amazing people and had loads of adventures with people I've met on the way, many of whom I'm still friends with. Watching baby turtles leave their nest and fight their way to the sea was one of the best and most spiritual experiences of my life. My adventures might not be 'crazy' compared to others because everyone has a different definition of what crazy is. I've heard other peoples' 'crazy' stories of drugs-fuelled parties and how things went wrong (think The Hangover in real-life) and to be honest that just turns me off.  And no, no-one has ever told me 'no' because I'm a girl. I moved abroad alone when I was 18 though and my parents have always resolved to let me lead my own life so I've only ever had support from them. They know I'm sensible and that I take calculated risks. I plan ahead so, like Kill_the_dinosaurs said, I know where the consulates and embassies are, I carry a photocopy of my passport and some money hidden on me at all times, I know the emergency numbers and I try to always be aware of my surroundings. I trust my instincts implicitly now after my rape experience so if someone feels 'off' then I would rather be rude and get rid of them instead of trying to be polite and paying for it. When you travel solo, the only person who can keep you safe is you. 
Does you bf smell him as well? I'm asking because I once had a fellow student I could smell everywhere, but nobody else was able to smell him. Smell can be a very personal thing.   If your bf smells him as well, it might be better if he approaches him, because often discussion of such a delicate topic is better received if it comes from someone of the same gender.   Anyhow, it's best if you address it directly, because it will most likely affect his chances with potential partners and employers, so it's better to catch it now and stop the problem. Be nice, but blunt, and offer help. It might actually be a sickness causing him to smell funny, so you might want to try the "I'm worried about you"-angle. Depending on your relationship, of course you could also go the "hey, is there something dying in your room or do you need me to explain how a washing mashine works", said jokingly, it might even work. ;) 
It depends on the individual! Manasa was fine with me looking and poking - she let me unwrap her from the eggs without so much as a hiss.   Some animals are more defensive than others. I am sure wild ball pythons would be more defensive than captive ones, usually! 
"As a black cosplayer she did nice" Is not racist. She is saying the obvious fact that it is harder to Cosplay when you yourself look nothing like that character. I know I will get downvote for not agreeing, however a rebuttal would be much nicer.
He does smell him but doesn't notice it like I do. If I sit next to him sometimes it's overwhelming. He theorizes it is because they have worked together for a few years now, where as he just moved into our house about 3 weeks ago and it's the most contact I've had with him.  I have thought about that as well. He's a virgin and never dated so I feel like if I say something it might be a bigger blow to his self esteem then if bf approaches. However in the 3 weeks he's been here I haven't heard him shower and he definitely hasn't washed any clothes since moving in, so I don't *think* it's medical issue but I wouldn't have thought about that angle before, so thank you!  Thanks for the ideas!
I travel alone all the time and I love the freedom of being able to do what I want when I want without coming to a group agreement. Men will certainly approach you a lot but no more than if they saw you alone in your hometown. If you're traveling within the US, you'll be fine. If you travel internationally, then you can experience harassment depending on where you go. Most countries are ok but certain countries are heavy on the harassment and groping (Italy, India, Vietnam, etc.). If  you take the usual precautions and are aware of your surroundings then you'll be fine. You should totally go on your own. IMHO it's the best way to travel!
[deleted]
When did I ever say I was a victim?
I've never been to Columbus, but I have to say unemployment rates can be deceiving. I lived in Austin for a long time. Austin has a very low unemployment rate, but that rate doesn't say anything about *under*employment.  With a Masters degree, the best job I was able to get in Austin paid only $21,000/yr. I have friends back there who graduated from some of the best universities in the country, and they work as bartenders and waitresses. One of the girls I know graduated from Dartmouth, and after she came back to Austin, she wound up going back to school to become a massage therapist, so she wouldn't have to work in data entry for $9/hr anymore.
Maaaaan, speaking of the Harry Potter franchise, remember how in the movies, they initially cast Lavender Brown as a black girl, and kept her that way for three movies? But then when Lavender Brown started dating Ron Weasley in the books, the movies just completely [recast her as a white girl](http://33.media.tumblr.com/19847e72684ee1e57e5485bfd4a37b1c/tumblr_mn9yqrb4Lo1sntmevo1_500.png)?  That was absolutely shameless.
I think you should explicitly tell him that you don't want him to talk to you, period. You don't need to explain, just tell him directly, "Please do not talk to me, I don't want to talk to you, ever. Thank you." If he engages you, repeat, loudly, over and over until he gets it.
This is true (and the sort of view that Europeans often take:  things will work out in the long run as long as the structure is properly set up).  
Me, too. I've had people follow me around at the grocery store an awkwardly try to do it thinking I wouldn't notice. 
In anime there's a lot more black people then you would think off the top off your head. Cowboy Bebop, Samurai Champloo, and Black Lagoon are three roleplays off the top of my head that have black or darker MCs.   http://ultimatedarkskinanimelist.blogspot.ca/2014/02/the-ultimate-list-of-dark-skin-darker.html  A big problem is people tend to consider any racially borderline character white for some reason. A lot of characters that are asian and/or have light brown skin tend to just be considered tanned white people.  Obviously the extent to which it was taken is too far, but it's different strokes for different folks when it comes to cosplay. I generally tend to consider a cosplay better the closer they match the character. It's not like I go out of my way to comment on people who don't match the character's physical appearance. If a 300 lb neckbeard wants to cosplay a Lucky Star character, I'm not going to insult him, or think ill of him. But I'm not going to think the cosplay is very good, because to me a good cosplay does consist of looking as close to the character as possible.  
[deleted]
[deleted]
I refuse to believe you are so naive that you don't see why starting a statement, "for a _______" is offensive.   The fact that she's a black cosplayer is noteworthy, but you don't use it as a way to frame a statement, even if it's intended compliment.   If you were into surfing and someone told you, "For a gay guy, you surf very well", you wouldn't be offended? The fact that you are a good surfer has nothing to do with your being gay and the statement makes it sound like you are being measured not against surfers, but gay surfers. 
[deleted]
Wow. I can't imagine going through it as a teenager.  Is everything ok now?
Zoe is a kickass lady. That would be a sweet cosplay.
That's true. Thanks :)
What makes you say that? Not everyone posting pictures of themselves are self-absorbed. 
I also recommend acting classes, although I've yet to have some dramatic differences. But i think i just need to put some more effort into it. The class I took was called Acting with Voice and they taught us how to project and enunciate (helpful with mumbling). 
Probably. Most days I go without makeup but there are some days that suck and makeup makes those days a little less suck-y.  The point of the exercise to get rid of the habit I have of taking so many pictures and not even sharing a one because I don't feel "pretty enough". I should feel pretty no matter what.   The same can be done in a photo journal which is probably why I would use a blog instead of Instagram, Facebook, or Twitter. It kind of makes the experience more personal even if there is a chance that someone else is reading on without you noticing.
oooh im so jealous! you look great, style suits you. too bad i have sparse and curly hair with a high hairline. really cant pull of this look no matter how hard i try
title are usually chosen to capture attention, so i would look at the title and the movie separately. why do you find it sexist though?
I don't understand why people Dont like her doing cosplay. She pretty and cute and having fun. Her costumes are genderly accurate. I Dont see the problem.
[deleted]
It gets people to think about gender norms, and to experience what its like to go against those gender norms, and actually experience firsthand the kind of backlash and biases they might be completely unaware of because in our society, these things are currently what we consider normal. 
That's not hypocrisy though. White people see most anime characters as white people because of similar skin tones. It's not the people at the cons accept a white person playing an asian role. They just don't realize it's an asian role.   There are extremists who do say that kind of stuff though. I've seen cosplays of Dutch from BL and Ed from Bebop ripped apart because they were white.
I've been flying alone since I was 13.  Not especially careful out in public and I've never been raped or otherwise molested by anyone that isn't the TSA.    Flying alone isn't really a big deal regardless of age.  With the right itinerary, you have plenty of time between flights.  Signs are plentiful and clear, and there are staff everywhere if you get lost and need to ask directions.  If you look lost and confused staff will stop you, ask you for your boarding pass and point you the right direction regardless of if you say you need it, in my experience. 
Hang up there! I am a good 50 lbs heavier that you and If I can be a sexy bitch, you can rock it too! I suffered from depression in college and was also on academic probation, but I did better in school, not great, but better and graduated! you can pick your family and I think that what your sister and boyfriend did is wrong, you deserve a guy who will treat you like a princess and give you the respect that a woman deserves! chin up, buttercup :) I am sure you have lots of positive things about you, but the negative things might be making them hard to see right now. If you need someone to talk to feel free to message me :)
It wasn't. It's a pretty common sentient among purists that white people can't even cosplay because most characters weren't white.
[deleted]
Thanks, even that's the most I could hope for! 
"He has never had patience with the amount of contact and reassurance - his LEAST favorite word - that both of us need from him."  If you're going to be in a polyamourous relationship you are going to need to cope with the emotional needs of more than one person...
&gt;Duh, trying to show there's a lot of white people in anime by showing a show specifically set in America is intellectually misleading.  I understand 'anime' in English to refer to animated shows and movies made in Japan. The fact that many of them are specifically set in white-dominated places and times IS an indicator of the level of white people in anime.   &gt;Gundam characters are not white for the most part. They're generally all Asians descended from space colonists, except in.  &gt;I never counted Japanese and Asian as the same thing  Now you're just trolling. Read the names and bios for Gundam characters, they are western/white.
15 minutes is a pretty long time considering the time it takes to do everything else in a shower. stopping shaving cut my shower time by 50-60%. 
You're right. It's a family reunion thing and they also said that someone would have to be waiting for me on the other side if they let me.This is actually the first time I've ever flown, so I can see their worries I suppose. Thank you for the reply, it helped me a lot. :) 
You sound like me when I started having some issues with my thyroid. Start getting some blood work done and monitor your thyroid regularly. That is always a good place to start.
I worked at a job where I flew quite a bit for 7 years, its not that uncommon to see someone your age flying alone. Take the normal precautions you would travelling anywhere alone, remember where exits are, security stations, all that jazz. If you get bad vibes ( I for instance always looked furious that human beings were coming near me because I fucking hate the airport and have never slept the night before a flight) just steer clear and hang out near the terminal. Most people are fine, keep your shit together and you'll do alright. On the other end, if you have issues with baggage claim don't wait around forever. Once they've done your flights bags and you don't see yours on the carousel, hit up the counter ( I think each airline has one, or it may just be a single counter run by TSA or some other airport entity) show them your baggage claim ticket and they'll let you know what the deal is. Usually its stuff that got on a different flight (most commonly if you have a layover and your bag doesn't manage to switch planes as effectively as you) and will end up there later that day or the next. When it has happened to me they have delivered my bags to the hotel I was staying at within 24 hours.   If you can, book your flight as far in advance as possible. If you do it 24 hours or less before it leaves you get the auto pat down, TSA policy I think. Good luck
If you worked in a male dominated career field, and then came in and rocked at your job, would you be flattered or offended if a male coworker to say "For a woman, she's doing a great job" ?  When you use "For a ____" in conversation, the implication is pretty much *always* belittling to the person or group in question.  Also, if you have to use some form the disclaimer "I'm not racist, but", you probably are.
&gt;Fix problems where they occur, but also realize that you can't ever eliminate huge social problems. If you doubt me, show me where it's occurred in history?  I don't have anything helpful to contribute to this, just want to say that I think about this exact thing *all the time*. Every generation tries to exorcise what it sees as its social demons... and just leaves new ones for the next generation to grapple with.
I wasn't talking in terms of getting blown up. Although it's surprisingly easy to get contraband past TSA.   I was talking more in terms of 'stranger-danger' which is something I'd be concerned about as a parent. 
It's not her fault that she doesn't have the same skin as a lot of the popular characters to cosplay as. Why insult her? Just let her have fun and stop treating er this way.
In other words, if someone who has a child is poor, or suddenly becomes poor, that child should starve.  Because you don't want to support it.  I'd rather not live in that kind of dog eat dog world.
The fact that I love rodents as pets makes this give me the heebie jeebies.   Do they feed on full size adult rodents , or smaller ones? I don't know much about snakes, so I don't know how large these get?
That. Is awesome. 
No way its bad. Can deal with it but not really enjoy it. The way I explain it to my BF: "It's like someone hacked a salty loogie into your mouth".
Yes, but I think you're missing the fact that that's the whole point?   She's using four arbitrary beauty standards to draw a comparison that the OP can understand. That's all. She's not implying that shaving is okay and normal, she's using that because OP can probably empathise with the way society reacts to women not shaving and use that to understand how society reacts to black women not straightening their hair. She just used the heels example because OP is not black and doesn't have to worry about straightening her hair, but can probably empathise with having to wear heels. 
We're going to see it tomorrow. I love Melissa McCarthy's acting and want to support her with my ticket money. I hope that seeing her success will inspire other directors to cast bigger women and bring more body diversity to media.  I think that it's fair to be weary of these types of movies, because "fatty fall down" humor is typically mean-spirited. But I had the same reservations about Identity Thief (the previews were pretty much all slapstick gags), and the movie turned out to be genuinely funny and touching. McCarthy employs physical comedy, and it works well for her, but she's also got lots of depth as an actress.
I've always had short hair. As a younger person I hear all the time about how I should grow it out. People just need to mind their own business! I don't think there's anything wrong with short or long hair, no matter your age.
While I don't think having a "mini-beard" is so horribly embarrassing that I wouldn't want my friend to tell her SO about it, I think your friend is taking this "telling each other everything" too far and it just seems mean of her to let you know she told him anyway against your wishes. Her boyfriend has no reason to need to know about the hair on your chin and you made it clear you wanted to keep this between you and your friend.   On the bright side, I think you should be happy she made it clear everything you tell her will be discussed with Chris. At least now you know you shouldn't share anything with her if you want it to be kept private.
Egyptian Tina Fey has some fine points.
[deleted]
There sure are great people who simultaneously struggle with anger and even violence issues. The difference between them and abusers is that they go out of their way to keep them from hurting people and, if it happens anyway, regret it enough to take steps to resolve them.  Your bf isn't doing that! Oh he's followed you to therapy, but if he still believes that he doesn't need to respect your gf's feelings while expecting you to forgive every time he rages, he's not ready to benefit from them. From the look of it, all three of you would benefit from splitting. Even him: being alone might help him realise that he needs ways to cope with anger other than lashing out against someone.
I believe in infinite possibility, and so I do believe abusers can change. But I also believe that they will only ever be that new person if they are with a new person. I think once they've abused someone, if they get back with that person, they will fall back into old habits. They know they can. They know they already broke *this* girl once.   I don't think it's a matter of them changing *for* someone else, but I believe they can change, and then find someone else. I saw J's father as a changed man from the man J told me stories about, after he remarried. My own father apparently beat my mother when they first got married, but only touched her in anger once from the day I was born onward. People can change when their environment *also* changes.
Condoms are fairly expensive, especially ones for someone (either partner) who has a latex allergy. Those go , at the cheapest, for $17 for a pack of ~10. Depending on your sex life, that's roughly $34 every 2 weeks. It adds up.  And no, you can't get those free anywhere. And no, other condoms are not easy to get for free. Especially if you're poor, work full time (therefore you can't access places with free condoms during their open hours), and limited or no access to a car. 
:+( don't be sad!
I agree with a lot of the other posters but I have a different idea.  I just got a pillow pet for my anniversary (okay actually I got two but that's besides the point :) ) and honestly I can't believe how much comfort they give me.  Every night since I got them one is with me in bed with me and my husband and I snuggle with it all night.  Not only are they adorable but they are super useful since you can use them as a stuffed animal or a pillow! 
:-\ don't be sad!
Trans women experience misogyny, too; especially the ones that pass well.
Ugh.  Some times, I just don't want to live on this planet.  You look great, and your costumes are outstanding.  I hope you cosplay Archie or Superman or Popeye or Martha Washington or whomever you want!  Don't let the haters slow you down.
It's sad that every time someone posts a Youtube video to Reddit that's really good, I see someone in the Reddit comments advising not to read the Youtube comments, which good advice. 
I don't know the guy so this is purely speculation from past experiences but it sounds like he is very unhappy and has confidence issues. I say this because i acted more or less the same way with my previous girlfriend, I basically felt like i didn't ''owe'' her anything and i did unintentionally hurt her emotionally and when she would point it out to me i would just tell her to stop being so emotional. I since went to therapy and will never act like this again ( sorry bout the friken life story, just trying to get some context in ). So i guess long story short, guys like this CAN change but dont expect him to and in my honnest opinion it feels like he doesnt acknowledge your relationship, he just likes having you around.
Just curious... Do you think women are treated as equals in any other cultures? 
No. It is not everyone's responsibility to be respectful if the question is out of line. Imagine if someone came to you, complemented your cleavage and then asked to cop a feel. Not even in a sexual way, just because they are curious. "Oh my God, you have such a beautiful bosom. Can I touch it?" Would you feel good knowing that you got a compliment? Or would you feel insulted that someone that you are not very close to is asking to touch your body. And wouldn't you deem it ridiculous when the asking party questions the tone or rudeness of your response? Let that sink in.  If he was rude in his delivery it's because it was a rude question to ask. If you as accepting of all races as you say you are, you will understand that his response to your rude question was fine and it's ridiculous to add insult to injury to insinuate that he should've been kinder when YOU asked to touch his personal body.
Did you copy the wrong tab's URL there or did you just find a really crazy pic?
I would've thought he was a female. 
No you don't. You believe their so-called "belief" should dictate the behavior of their employees. You value the dudes at Hobby Lobby, the ones in the position of authority and power, over their female employees.   Sure, they can go out and buy whatever they want, but some of the options their doctor may prescribe aren't covered by their insurance now, so now you're arguing women are incompetent and not entitled to medical care like a man would be and that they're not entitled to the same confidentiality. Now you're asking women to make decisions about medical care based on what their insurance covers or make them pay for it out of pocket.  Which is all moot anyway because now Hobby Lobby is not only paying for it anyway, but so are all of us, since the Obama administration has stated that the taxpayers will pick up the slack these greedy fucks leave just like we pick up the slack by retailers like WalMart that don't pay a living wage, putting the burden of compensating their employees and feeding their families on the rest of us.  So bravo for Hobby Lobby, they've managed to not only accomplish nothing but they've managed to make the entire country pay for their dog and pony show. 
&gt; As a woman, you couldn’t walk down those streets invisibly,” Vincent writes. “You were an object of desire or at least semiprurient interest to the men who waited there, even if you weren’t pretty — that, or you were just another pussy to be put in its place.” Men, on the other hand, tend to meet each other’s eyes for a split second and then look away, in a gesture of mutual respect or at least “a disinclination to show disrespect.  &gt; What follows is just my view of things,” she writes in the first chapter, “a woman’s-eye view of one guy’s approximated life, not an authoritative guide to the whole vast and variegated terrain of manhood in America.”   And written by reviewer Andrew Ohehir:  &gt; When Vincent reports, “It was hard being a guy,” she really means to say that it’s hard for all of us to live up to the hackneyed ideals of masculinity, and maybe only a little harder for Ned. But I strongly suspect that she means it was hard for Norah to be Ned in ways she hasn’t quite confronted, that pretending to be a man did not confer upon her any of the alleged privilege or freedom of manhood, and that that was subtly and perhaps subconsciously disappointing
It's like impossible to catch them all. A lot of the time it's hard to notice somehow. I've watched Fullmetal Alchemist several times, and yet seeing Scar on that list was a surprise for a second.
[deleted]
Sexual assault of a 13 year old female, prison time done
[deleted]
TL; DR - It's good to be alive.   I'll be 39 soon. After nearly dying last year and then discovering I could live for at least a few more years and then deciding that I still wanted to live, I made a bucket list and I'm slowly checking things off. I never thought I'd be one of those 'ladies who lunch' as I've always been kind of a loner who'd rather spend money on books and cat toys. But the things on my list are more active and adventurous - I will someday go back to knitting and spinning but in the meantime I'd like to ride a horse, go rafting, and dabble in ceramics.   Travel is out for now due to my health problems but I would love to go overseas. And back to the Grand Canyon. I will retire there if I can. I know it's just a big pile of rocks but it's a lovely pile.   I like my job most of the time and I'm blessed with great insurance and lots of flexible time off. I own my car and got the mortgage all by myself and we can afford to buy everything we need plus some stuff we want.   Even though things didn't turn out the way I dreamed of when I was 20, I am mostly happy with the way things turned out. If I didn't have ESRD, I'd be ecstatic. But since I do, I think I take more pleasure in the mundane. It's taught me how to live in the present and suck all the enjoyment I can out of everything. 
But don't panic! Hair growth could be much less serious than PCOS
You've suggested repealing RFRA, and then said that you support religious freedom in the US. What does religious freedom look like to you?
It *is* possible to become pregnant after anal sex. There isn't much distance between the vagina and anus, and sperm can travel. You should never wash your vagina with soap; there are good bacteria that live in your vagina, and the soap can kill them and give you a yeast infection. Furthermore, washing out the vagina after sex increases your likelihood of conception. And finally, you should use condoms during anal because it's the riskiest form of sex, in terms of STDs. During sex, the rectal wall can tear (which probably caused the blood you saw), causing direct blood-semen contact. 
[deleted]
To suggest that the status of women in an Islamic state is not the main factor that makes the behavior in this video so common is absurd. Just skim this wikipedia article [here] (http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Women's_rights_in_Saudi_Arabia). Women are told exactly how to dress, they've just been allowed to vote, they aren't allowed to drive, there are no laws defining minimum age for marriage which often leads to spousal rape. There is a massive list of ways that women are second class by law. This obviously carries over into social interactions between men and women and it objectifies women in a true sense of being nothing more than a man's property. Then to suggest that any man is prone to the same behavior just because they are a man, and not because of the environment they were raised is simply offensive. Some people disgust me.
These people rely on others "staying out of it", "not wanting to look silly" or worry their husbands.
My ex wore an HH cup and had a reduction to a C. Healing was pretty easy, after the first week or so which was pretty sore. She was thrilled with the results and said it changed her life. Long term, the scars almost completely faded away.  I haven't asked her about them lately, she's my ex, but I doubt she's any less enthusiastic now.
Who knows - maybe you have resting asshole face?  It's honestly very difficult to say why people might think poorly of you until they get to know you, because it could be for any number of reasons.   Often, when I dislike someone at first glance, it's because they're closed off and make me feel unwelcome / uncomfortable. Maybe they don't engage in conversation with me easily, maybe they're awkward, maybe they make me feel awkward - so many reasons, it's difficult to narrow it down to any one thing.   It could be, as your title leads us to believe, that you're simply very attractive and people assume you'll be a player who uses and abuses people. Who knows?
Another 51 year old here, I've had gray/silver/white in my hair for years now and I've gotten more compliments than I did before it changed color. My hair is just below should length, I used to have it down to the middle of my back before trimming it shorter. I had it trimmed because it is easier to care for and I have fewer problems with a clogged drain in the shower. :-)  I have also had people tell me it I should have my hair cut shorter and I've decided I like the way it is. I like see who I expect when I look in the mirror and not what someone else thinks I should look like. I'm glad to hear someone else is not worrying about dyeing their hair as they get older. :-)
I don't like the fellow colleague. I want to cut my hair off (jaw lengthish) in maybe 5 years or so as dying hair every few weeks is more of a hassle with long hair and do it will be easier. But if I was rocking long grey hair I would continue doing so. 
[deleted]
Breast discharge is a sign for many different varieties of cancer. It's ALWAYS better to get it checked out than assume it's nothing. OP was sharing a warning sign some people may not know about. Breast cancer does kill people. No one was talking about money or lobbying here, so it's not really the place to bring either up.
[deleted]
OP, I'm not sure how old you are, but I would encourage you to check out a few awesome non-profits for young adults with cancer, ages 18-40ish (some are a few years older and younger). Stupid Cancer, a national organization with a great website filled with resources and several conventions throughout the year and meetups across the country. If you need any help with finances, emotional support, fertility, or just wanna rage, they can point you in the right direction. First Descents offers young adult adventure therapy trips to regain your sense of independence, confidence, and physical sense of self after a diagnosis. No prior athletic ability needed to surf, kayak, or rock climb on a FREE trip! (Can you tell I love them?!) Also, no matter what your age, Imerman Angels offers 1-on-1 support matching. They will find you an "angel" with a similar diagnosis, no matter how rare, age group, gender, etc. Nice to have a friend you can call to ask questions about treatment and surgeries, but also to gossip with and who understands you. I hope everything goes well with your MRI! And thank you for sharing your story!
the burning ring of fire (when the shoulders pass) is very painful.  BUT  having pancreatitis is worse.  much much worse.  mostly because that burning ring of fire only lasts minutes.....  Pancreatitis lasted for days,  to the point where i don't remember a week because i was so pumped full of drugs.  yaaayyy...  caught it the second time really really early.      i would take child birth over that, and abdominal surgery to removed the gallbladder.  i would also take a c-section over that as well.
Some people are just really hateful, for any number of reasons: jealousy, just being a negative person, not having a filter, whatever. I know it hurts, but try and brush it off! I'm sure you looked fabulous.  For the record I wear a middle part almost everyday and I love it! And I give HUGE props to anyone bold enough to wear red lipstick. 
It's a similar thing here in Norway. When I'm out with my SO and her friends they occasionally get some very forward advances - about two or three times each "outing" - and almost always from people of middle eastern or african descent. I'm not at all calling it a racial thing but more of a cultural one.
Obviously it's super differently because technically your parents do """"own"""" you for until you turn 18 and obviously your relationship with your husband should never be like that   Edit: general "you". Not you specifically. :) 
[deleted]
i dont think its too that point, not even close. plus that doesn't help me explain it to any other men. its not like she wants him to go away forever, she just didnt want to see him this morning for whatever reason. 
I live in the UAE and while I haven't experienced so much overt sexual harassment since I arrived here what bothers me(especially as a New Yorker who is used to walking everywhere) is that women are generally invisible and limited to 'protected spaces'(malls, cars, office or home) even when the weather is pleasant. When you do see women more often than not they are completely covered  with their veils so you cant even see their eyes. Many even wear gloves in 110 degree F heat. It is very oppressive and makes me feel if I were to walk around the town center I would be in danger. Granted I am not in Dubai but I didnt think it would be that bad here.
What is the point then?    The writer uses the Landon Donovan example as the main one in her piece.  Several paragraphs are devoted to this example.  I was simply pointing out that there was a reason there is a difference and why, in the World Cup, with men playing, that Landon Donovan would be stated as the leading scorer in US history.
[deleted]
[deleted]
The capacity for experience is not subjective.  It's measurable.  That is how doctors can declare someone brain dead, and indicate that they are incapable of experiencing stimuli.  
thank you! i've always wanted to try contouring. i guess looking on the bright side of this situation, maybe it's giving me an opportunity to try it? haha. 
I hope so!
You don't know that they can't. And where does that belief take you anyway? Sitting around criticizing people who have something to fight for?
My father likes to say things like 'girls shouldn't wear short skirts' or 'you should dress better because you're a girl'. He's very conservative about sex and places a very high importance on virginity, and that hurts. So I hope you wouldn't do that. But what he did well was:  1. For the things that matter, he told me to go for it. If I wanted to be a pilot, astronaut, engineer, make-up artist, he'd pack a bag and take me to a museum or he'd buy me books about it so I'd learn. Never once did he tell me "You're not good enough for that." Instead, he'd say, "You'll have to work *really* damn hard for that. Now go clean your room." 2. Taught me to do things myself. Even when I was in primary school, if I had trouble he would sit down with me and help me brainstorm solutions instead of immediately contacting the teachers, etc. 3. He's very blunt. This can backfire, but generally he was very good at telling me: "You're wrong. You're being irrational. Think, dammit." (Usually followed by "don't be such a girl", which, well. Don't do that :p) 4. He also tells me to chill a lot. "Nothing wrong with taking it slow," he'd say. Would have liked it if he actually helped hands-on, sometimes, but other times you just need someone telling you you're in over your head. 5. Dad jokes. A *lot* of dad jokes. Once he apologized to me for not wearing condoms on his honeymoon. Nine months plus some twenty odd years and here I am. His biggest mistake ;p 6. He used to bake cakes with me. I liked that.  I don't know how old exactly your daughter is, but if she's a baby then probably the most important thing right now is for you to just be there. Because if you're staying home with her, you're probably her best friend already :) Read picture books to her; studies have said kids who are read to, even if they don't understand the words, learn vocabulary much faster. And bright colors may stimulate brain activity, so some drawing or finger-painting (if she's not too young) would be awesome. Once she's older you could include her in house chores - builds responsibility and bonding time, and the skills she'll learn (cooking, house chores) would be valuable in her future.  edit: to add, the things I wish my father had taught me:  1. How to change the wheel of a car. (You know, 'boy' stuff). 2. Finance and banking and mortgage and tax stuff. (Like, 'adult' stuff). 3. How to talk to boys :p
The Nordic countries.
Whoa... but what would they do if someone got out of control and just socked someone in the kisser?
Correlation does not equal causation. Your logic also does not hold up when taking into consideration that in India, where sexual harassment towards women is incredibly high, the majority of people are Hindus (80.46% - 2001). China is another example where only 1.8% (2010) of the population are Muslim. I think what you're trying to say is that the treatment of women in non-western countries is generally not good.  Edit: With a big emphasis on the word *generally!*
Thing is.. the guys which harrass don't give a fuck about feelings. Soo.. what now?
I'm 56 and have mostly silver hair, currently about middle of my back length. I decided to grow it out after keeping it extremely short (less than an inch) for several years.   Short hair is so much easier to care for! My pet peeve was that it would look *dreadful* when I took off my motorcycle helmet! It would flatten down on my head, and nothing short of a handful of gel and several minutes of fiddling with it would make it look any better.  Now I can braid it or put it in a ponytail and it looks great when my helmet comes off! And I don't have to resort to wearing a baseball cap to hide my helmet hair. :)
'Hi, hey do you know where the avocados are?': not harrassment  'Good morning': not harrassment  'Awww girl, look at that! ' (staring at ass): harrassment  'Hey Blondie. Blondie? Blondie! Look over here hey blondie!' : harrassment  'If you're not busy later,  would you like to go out for coffee? ': if guy has been nice in conversation so far,  not harassment.  If guy has pestered and ignored repeated "nos" then harrassment  Staring, licking your lip while staring, invading personal space when there are options to stand father away,  etc: harrassment plus aggressive/intimidating body language.   ' You should smile more!' Obnoxious, we don't know you and shouldn't have to perform for you.    ' You have a lovely smile ': not harassment.  Generally a nice compliment, unless you're also staring/invading space or otherwise setting off creepdar.  It's not rocket science,  and has very little to do with the attractiveness of the guy.  
[deleted]
Don't get caught up in this fairy tale that you've created, especially since you seem to want to believe it so badly. Not saying it's all in your head, but keep your feet on the ground. 
Well, there are probably big TV cameras and crews around, it would be pretty interesting, and I'd probably stare to see what's going on also.
[deleted]
I don't mean to be harsh, but...  It kinda sounds like you're trying to soothe your own feelings of guilt for treating her poorly and using her for sex. If you feel bad about how you treated her, then fix *you* not her.   If she is in "figuring herself out mode" let her do that. She doesn't need your help, and really you gave up the right to be intimately involved in her life when you broke up with her over a year ago. She's almost 30 with a master's degree? It sounds like she is quite capable.  Yes, I think it's inappropriate, and perhaps even degrading, and you should probably move on from this idea. Maybe focus on what made you use her and treat her poorly, and work on that if you want to engineer something.   (Edit: I don't mean this to be rude or insulting. Clearly if you're even asking the question here, you are trying to think before you act, and I applaud that.)
But those are different comments.   Again, speaking well, hair styles, being considered attractive, etc are all subjective things that the person talking says. Those types of comments are wrong. They are based on opinions and not physical facts.   You are confusing the point of that statement.  I have to think that you are not a cosplayer, because it is difficult to explain what this comment means to non-cosplayers.   "For a red head, you pulled off this cosplay well". I have red hair. Few characters have red hair. I refuse to wear wigs because they are itchy. I know that the original character did not have red hair. The whole premise of cosplaying is looking like the other character. So whatever the difference is will get comments. If people don't like a cosplay, they **are not** backhanded about it. They will be very frank.    It isn't saying as a red head I am a worse cosplayer. It is a compliment that even though I have differences that keep me from looking like the character, I still had one of the better cosplays and was complimented for it.   You are using comments that take the person's opinion based on stereotypes. This comment is relating two physical facts.  One does not look like the other. Nothing wrong with it, but in a game where the goal is to dress like the other... it will be commented on. 
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=hU-FAlKnaFU  Got some bad news for you...
What's astonishing is that there are even Western women who assumed that the Egyptian women couldn't speak English (or were uneducated) as well. While usually this does hold true in many of rural or areas that are stricken in poverty (however, for both males and females)-we were in an upper-middle class urban area. 
That's not true. Tinder was created, incubated, and bankrolled by IAC, an internet corporation with multiple dating holdings (Match, Okcupid). 
Everytime I hold a baby I want it out of my lap immediately
When she gets older, let her help you out instead of treating her like she's made of glass. My dad is in his sixties and has a bad back, but would never let me mow the lawn for him, even when I would ask to (in part because whenever I would try I wouldn't get the lines straight enough for him, he wanted the yard to look like a baseball field).  My dad was great, if maybe a bit overprotective (I'm twenty-four, but he won't go to bed until I'm home if I'm staying at home with them). Take her places, let her explore her interests, help out when she has problems.   Since she's still really little, read to her!! This is one of my favorite memories of both my parents. Also, counting. Count everything. And when she gets older, show her how to calculate the tip and ask her to help you do it. My aunt did that and it made me feel important, and also wasn't too much math for an eight year old.  You sound like you'll be a great dad. :)
My dad taught my sister and I how to do laundry, make a basic meal, change a flat tire, and how to fix a running toilet. So, basic life things.  He also said that classy girls don't burp in public or swear, which is kind of funny considering how gender progressive my parents are.
It's not just women, it's anyone who is married with out kids for any period of time. My wife and I have been married 4 years it's the first thing people ask me "you have kids ?!" I did not get married just to have kids.
"what about the menz!" 
I'm going to assume those girls were attractive? I've been hit on in a persistent way by someone I didn't find attractive, and it wasn't fun at all, especially if they get gropey.
I basically won't hold my niece for this very reason. If I show ANY interest in her at all my entire family jumps on me about when I'm going to have children, even though I've told everyone I'm related to that I will never have children. I actually got into a screaming match with my grandmother over it, but no one thinks I'm serious. It's infuriating that I have to keep an entire room's worth of distance between myself and every infant I encounter just so I don't have to deal with being harassed by every last blood relative.
For some reason, I cannot comprehend the logistics of doing the FBA.  Something that I have been working on for years and just can't understand.    I will head on over to sewing again though. I did a search for FBA but didn't see a whole bunch. Will post directly this time. 
For those of you who are offended when asked if you have kids - don't be. Usually I ask only those that seem nice or that I like or could see hanging out in a social situation. Not that I don't hang out with childless folks but since we had kids that seems to be more of a locus for us to hang out with someone.   As for those who are unready for children or don't plan any - don't lower yourself by making up fiction as to why you don't want to hold a baby. Kids can be fun, they can be a huge pain in the ass. I love both of mine more than is rational which comes in handy. As I told my almost teenager the other day when she started getting dramatic and lippy - "You puked IN my eye and I didn't kill you, so you need to chill out." She gave me a strange look and walked off. Good luck out there are you childless wonders. Sometimes I complain about not sleeping well and someone will concernedly ask when was the last time you slept well - oh sometime before my oldest daughter was born. 
So, what, they should have investegated the legalities of her abortion? Women should have to get the father's permission to get an abortion?
[deleted]
[deleted]
&gt; Perhaps it's a disconnect between wanting what they actually want and saying what sounds good?  You do know you're just saying the same thing redpillers say but with reversed genders?
He sounds extremely cool. I especially like that he was patient and personal responsibility is a big deal to me. Age appropriate of course, but I'll keep that in mind. 
When I met my husband I thought there was no way he was my type. I was planning on canceling our first date because I didn't really want to meet him. By the end of our second date I was hooked. Consider dating outside of your traditional comfort zone. My husband looks nothing like my exes (yet I find him incredibly sexy) nor is he college educated (but he makes good money and knows stuff about absolutely everything which I love!)   It was so worth not settling or trying to lower myself for someone that had such bad insecurities. I actually had my long term boyfriend tell me he would "rather date a waitress" than someone in my profession like it was my fault that he didn't have any ambition or drive. So stupid.   Good luck!   
Misery loves company
Yikes. I've always heard it put as being easier to take care of when you're busy with a child and/or harder for babies to grab. Never thought of it that way, which makes it even worse.    I've had both very long and very short hair, and I find that long is easier for me. I can just do a bun or briad to keep it up and out of the way, and never had problems with my son. Now, long dangly earrings are another story.
I'm 35. I'm finally old enough that people are stopping asking me questions about when I'm going to get married or have kids and starting to think I'm defective in some way. 
Years down the road, where and how he asked the question will seem incredibly trivial compared to the reality of life in a marriage. It's style vs. substance. If he is the right man for you and will make you happy for the rest of your life, it does not matter one bit that other people trying to live through you don't get excitement out of the proposal.  In contrast, many a marriage failed that started with a grandiose proposal. Did it really matter then? No.
Yep. Not all great lit should be non-creepy, that's absolutely true. But you do have to look at some of its fans with a sort of sick fascination. 
If its really needed have a doctor perform the search in a dignified manner. Having some CO high school drop out tell you to bend over as they shove a flashlight up your ass is not the way to do it.
First of all, congrats on the engagement!  Honestly, my husband and I don't really have a cute, romantic story either. But I love our story because it's OURS. And I don't care if other people think the proposal was meh. In the grand scheme of things, how we decided to get married really doesn't matter. We got married at the court house, by the way. Because I've never been one to pine over a big fancy wedding. And that's ok. The marriage itself is more important to me anyways. I'm happy, because I'm with the man I love.  For what it's worth, I really think the whole " proposal" thing has been hyped up by our culture. The way HE proposed (why can't SHE propose?) is made out to be a bigger deal than it really is, at least in my opinion. Yes, getting engaged is exciting. Getting married is exciting. But it doesn't need to be a grand proposal, planned out to the minute and in public for it to be exciting. 
[deleted]
Or, "You'll feel differently when you're older."  Well, I'm almost 33 now, and the older I get, the more ambivalent I am about having kids. *Maybe* if he wants one, in a few years, etc. etc.
[deleted]
my cousin proposed by sliding a.ring.across the table and said "might as well dot tje "i"s and cross the "T"s. she thought it was hilariously nonchalant.
Ah, that's kind of sad.
"14 books by female authors we're going to claim are controversial"  They're all probably wonderful and powerful books (I've only read a few from the list), but it's about 50 years too late to call them controversial.
[deleted]
I always say no thanks; I don't wanna be the guy who drops the baby. 
And look at the ocean of comments on it! Which is 3 centimeters deep. Seems most people on reddit like echoes after all.
&gt;sucker me into their club of diapers and sleep deprivation  Or maybe their lives are deeply enhanced and enriched by having children and they think that yours will be as well. Babies grow up and stop crapping everywhere after a little while.
I came to comment this exact thing. Was on board with the topic until this happened. It's just a case of "She wants to justify how she feels, and I want to justify what I do" while calling each other slurs about it. They're in the same boat.
So sorry about all the negative things people are saying here! It's good to be cynical but right now I'm just so happy you're happy and he's happy and you're happy together that's just so cute and sweet snsjeijajsksjs. 
(((hugs)))  Time to get a good lawyer to get a legally binding agreement tht covers your child and your custody agreement.  You will want to get something that covers regular drug testing for her to have unsupervised visits with your child.  You want to have written out the agreement to cover your child's education, activities, health care, etc.  Do it now, or she may come after you in 2-3 years claiming that you alienated your child and remove your parental rights while getting child support to support her habit and her boyfriend of the moment.  It happens.  Counseling to help you deal with the situation.  No, it isn't easy, and unfortunately, it is much more common than you think.  You don't have to love her to have a good co-parenting relationship with her.  You have to learn the tools to keep from badmouthing her around your child.   You have to learn the tools to build strong boundaries around her.    She should go to some counseling sessions too so that you two will be on the same page when it comes to your child.  For your child's sake, you have to treat her with kindness and respect.  That does not mean getting back together.  That does not mean enabling her drug addiction.  That does not mean allowing her to take advantage of you.  It does mean not calling her names or trying to hurt her.   You can do this.
Thank You!
I looked them up.  That's exactly the kind of place I was hoping you'd find.  Remember, if you don't click with the therapist, you can ask for a different one.  I'd give it two or three sessions before deciding.  Let me know how you are doing.
Yeah, you're not alone dude, but some people don't get it and feel a real need to tell everyone who does feel that way that they're liars or asexual or have a medical problem or don't exist, or something.
Misery loves company. 
Well I have elderly relatives who I visit, and some I don't. The ones who are sitting in their home with no one to visit them were unpleasant, abusive people to me when I had no choice but visit them. Now that I am an adult and no longer have to tolerate verbal and emotional abuse, I choose to spend time with people who are loving and affirming.   People do judge me for not visiting so-and-so, but life is too short to hang around with shitty people. Life is too short to *be* a shitty person.
[deleted]
Same here...I have a child of my own and she is super awesome but I just don't really like babies. I don't fawn over them, if asked to hold them I decline by saying I'm sick, who wants to hand their baby to a sick person? Lol I find puppies way cuter, esp my puppy :)  http://imgur.com/nVElbdf
Your post has been removed due to rule 5 in our [sidebar.](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/about/sidebar) You are welcome to repost on Friday during our [image fest](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/comments/y8k2m/mod_post_we_are_launching_an_experiment_image/), or you may repost now as a [self post](http://www.reddit.com/r/TwoXChromosomes/submit?selftext=true) with the story behind the image if you're looking for a discussion. Thank you!  *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FTwoXChromosomes) if you have any questions or concerns.*
My family does this to me all the time too, but you know what? I just don't let it get to me. I usually make a joke and brush it off. Things like this only bother you as much as you let them. 
Why?
Her name is Olive :)
We're they pms? I don't see any. 
That's the positive interpretation. Another one is that they're doing their best to rationalize to themselves that they made the right decision, when deep down they regret the loss of freedom and opportunity and wonder if it's all worth it. Convincing others to join the club helps validate their choice, and even just making the attempt helps convince themselves that they really want this, honest.
[deleted]
This might sound cold...but...as a guy you have a little bit more time.  [Assuming the half plus seven rule](http://xkcd.com/314/) you could very reasonably be with a 30 year old at 46.
&gt; I'm not saying I don't or haven't trusted any of my partners before. It's not about not feeling safe with them, it's about how I feel all of the time. Nothing they have or have not done to me, or to make me think of them specifically in that negative way.  I can't quite imagine, my best guess is that you feel like the cases where you can trust someone is an exception rather than the norm. If so I can see why you'd be creeped out by default by someone showing interest until you know them. Sadly though majority of rapes really are from people you know.....  &gt; ...I've, erm, gotten to know my past boyfriends and girlfriends just fine, it's not about chit-chatting and deciding on a "safe word". If you let certain mentalities fester long enough, they become ingrained issues. A stain you can't just rub out of the carpet.  I don't really understand what you thought I meant, but I'll rephrase, that is for you to filter the most obviously dangerous. If you let someone know you're nervous about sex and that you might have to ask them to pause during, and their reaction is less than understanding and focused on what you're saying that's your alarm bell. And given how it's presumably ingrained in them that they have right over your body, yes they will act like they're within their right to "speak up" against you, when you mention that. So this does filter the people that may not be trying to be abusive, and are ignorant/selfish to abusive degrees. Some people really do start out with the expectation of full sexual advance approval being a given if you start. I'm not making it up either, I've met such a person.
I've been bra-free for nearly a year now and love it! Am a B too, and although I believe it's not a crime to have nipples (i.e. have them showing) I get what you mean by feeling uncomfortable by having them show. If that's an issue for you try nipple tapes or pasties, or just experiment with what shirt material makes yours stand out.
Be careful.
You know, that guy will probably never rape another woman.  Tell your friend thank you for me.
Ovaries are stupid. I have a one year old right now, but nooooo, that's not enough. You have kids already! Why are ovaries so demanding? 
My thoughts are that proposals are just an extremely absurd idea. Just randomly asking like that, I feel so alien to the whole concept.  To me it is something to talk about, together. Planning your future, together. Randomly asking such a life changing question just like that, well, I just find it absurd.  And walking around keeping it a secret that you plan to ask them, and, well, everything just feels so alien to how I have relationships and how I communicate. I share my feelings and thoughts with the person I love and am together with. Why am I with them if I don't do that?  Sure I might surprise them with something now and then, but something big like that? I just find the concept so absurd.  Anyway, I am just rambling on about some of my thoughts on the topic to provide some perspective.
I ain't gonna lie- there are times when I feel like my ovaries are going to burst. I see my peers, friends and family reproducing - it makes me feel a bit envious. But I have my reasons for not having them. Depression and anxiety runs in my family and I have beeing spending years trying to get a handle on it with more failure than success. I am not financially equipped to give the kids a life that they need. My husband is fairly ambivalent about parenting his own child from a previous marriage (He loves her but parenting is out of his scope - he has ADHD &amp; other baggage. No excuses, just a reason and he can only be pushed *so* hard by those around him) His daughter lived with us while her mom got herself together and I was an utter failure at it. She and I get along better apart :-/ But I still love her like she's my own but I am glad her mother is present for her now.   After my years with depression and anxiety, I realized that no child should be exposed to what I am at my worst. Not because I am horribly dangerous but when I suffer, those around me suffer too. I could not expose another human being to 18 odd years of such instability. It would set that kid up to fail and it's not fair to be so selfish because I wanted a baby.   When I visit my sister and see my 1 year old niece, she gets my best. I change diapers, feed, play and pitch in wherever I am needed. I get to have the "experience" with few strings other than the normal obligations that families have. I get to brag, take pictures, squee over outfits. I can kiss and cuddle her - I get to see the changes and have pride. I may not be her mommy but that doesn't stop me from loving the squeezins outta her.   TL;DR - I want kids but it's irresponsible with a life long mental health condition that is being treated but never conquered. When I am together I can be my best and when I am at my worst no innocent kids have to pay for it.
A sex worker has the same right to some privacy as any other worker.  I mean, would he hunt down his dentist on Facebook and reddit and say that because the dentist goes out in public then she has to expect people would try to pry into her nonprofessional life?
The commentor that mentioned seeing your doctor may be on the right track. As well as thyroid function decreasing with age, stress can cause raised cortisol levels and that can cause body fat deposits to increase.
Not to me, but it did happen to my older sister. I came home from school (I was 13, she was 17) and I heard her faintly calling for me from the bathroom. She was huddled on the floor and bleeding so heavily, the blood was black. Thank God Mom came home shortly after because I had no idea how I was going to help her. My sister had to go to the hospital. She was always having problems ever since she started having a period. Birth control helped, though.
That is not strong reasoning, particularly on a sub that intended to be respectful. Your first comment got deleted so the mods agree. 
yeah, I think a 15 year old is wise enough to make the correct social decisions at an airport. One year away from trusting them with a car, I think they can handle navigating an airport. And if they get confused, just find someone with an employee's uniform on, they can help.
I'm sorry you're dealing with rude dickbags. Even though I work in retail, I still get hit on and I just be very cold and matter of fact. "Are you single?" "Nope." "Can I get your number?" "No." Things like that. You may have to be a bit matter of fact to these guys (especially if they're drinking). Being friendly and outgoing is good, but when they start pushing questions like "Am I good enough to fuck?", It's time to stop being nice and be a firm, but polite about your stance. I can't really tell you what to say because I don't exactly know the enviorment there and, plus, I have a dry sense of humor and I'm sarcastic. If they start following you around, That's dangerous, imo and if they don't sit down after you tell them to, I'd tell the manager. They may roll their eyes, but your overall safety is more important.  Good luck, girl. Hang in there.
Yep, I'm a puppies and kittens person
I fricken LOVE Corgis, and only semi like kids and pretty much don't find any babies cute, so yeah...your dog is much cuter than human babies.
YAY! looks cute! I always support a good chop!
Jesus... I mean, I'm not too big of a fan of that sub due to some of the negativity, but all in all it sucks that they'd be connected to that wacko.
How I've been taught to handle this and for the most part it works (other times it offends but I don't really care, they offended me first): "Oh. Do you think that is that really an appropriate thing to say to someone?" By questioning them you take the focus off of you and make them reflect on how that could be a potentially damaging question.  Just because I hold a baby does not make me a baby crazy schizoid and I'll make the decision to have a kid when and if I'm ready for the challenge.
&gt; or what cause the attitudes in men so reviled by women.  In other words, it helps feminists actually understand men, rather than demonizing them. 
twinsies 
I stumbled into a conversation of girls here, but I am one of the guys who realized he didn't want babies. I was honest with my current wife going in, and she accepted that, and enjoys being a doting aunt.   I worked with problem kids for 3 1/2 years, and that is when I realized even sincere, responsible parents can have kids who can suck the light out of a room. Nurture often gets the blame, but nature sometimes produces little horrors. I chose to not play that lottery. I am now much older than most of you, retirement age, and have no regrets.   Additionally, I want to leave you with something. The parenting job is so very demanding I think every person should take a personal, intentional commitment to it, maybe even have to get a license. You have to get a license to drive a car or catch a fish; why should babies be left to the whims of the one-eyed monster?
So given that your dad has said that if you move out, you can't move back in, the question boils down to are you prepared to make it on your own? Are you prepared to pay higher rent if New Boy's current roommate leaves, sticking you two with the rent and utilities? If things go south with New Boy and you find yourself in a situation where you realize you can't live under the same roof, can you afford rent, utilities, food, etc. for an apartment of your own? Are you okay with finding a new roommate (someone you don't know too well--at least at first) to split costs with?   If you're prepared for the ebbs and flows of having roommates leave and finding new ones, or if you could afford your own apartment, but are choosing to live with New Boy, then sure--move out and enjoy life! If you're not cool with roommate hunting or you can't afford your own place--eh--you're risking what happened two years ago, which was clearly a bad situation.
http://www.nhlbi.nih.gov/guidelines/obesity/BMI/bmicalc.htm 
Oh my God! When I will act like this I would be by my cheaty A**hole of EX - Boyfriend. Your right - thats why we need feminism. 
Look, I get you are trying to be helpful but learning something from my rape only took away many good hears from me.  Because my mistake was:  1. Decide to trust two male friends who i had known for years and who never gave me any reason to worry and who I could have trusted before. This, instead of walking home alone.  2. I wore a ankle long skirt and a long sleeved shirt.  3. I had had a beer or two, and while tipsy I was not out of control.  And I got raped. Bad choices I made, huh?   So what was my solution? Clearly I had done somehing stupid and... like you said, better learn from it. So what could I do? For years to come I wore literally ugly clothes, I never had my hair free, no jewelry, no hair dye, no makeup. No male friends. No parties. No alcohol. No studying with a male class mate anywhere except public places.  But is that life? And aren't you right now thinking that I was paranoid? Yeah, probably you were... but I was just following your advice.
[deleted]
And the photos of the proposal taken by someone hiding in the bushes or whatever? They rub me the wrong way. Your life isn't actually a movie, get over it, it's going to be fine.
&gt; eah, I've always said that my kids were going to be able to go to any kind of school we choose, in a big city. Somewhere where they can be as eccentric as they please and be able to be around other weird/nerdy kids  you need to be aware that you will be taking this choice away from your children. Also, possibly the happiness and safety.   If your kids are in any way similar to you (and they will be as they will be growing up with you) - your choice will mean that they will be subjected to the same bullying and anxiety that you had growing up.   And all your bad feelings will come back to you.   I really don't see buying a house there as a good choice. There is this bit where it looks good on paper (big house for cheap etc) - but, especially now after you tasted the life where you are accepted for who you are - this will emotionally kill you.   You ran away from there once.      
DO NOT DRINK THE AID  :))
You could tell them it's none of their damned business. I fully expect that I will be ecstatic when my boyfriend proposes, but he's not romantic. Whatever happens will be a private, beautiful moment. That's what you had. So if they keep asking or commenting on it, just say "He did it just how I imagined it" or "He proposed to me the way he knew would make me happy."  Awkward wording is awkward, but hopefully you get where I'm going with this.
Is terrible. Married? It gets worse :(
 Good thinking. I hope he listens.
Any change means baby to everyone. When I bought my house is when the questions started and since the engagement its like no holds barred baby interrogations. God forbid I get sick because a cough/sneeze/flu etc could all be signs of a baby!!! I also love the passive aggressive comments regarding what life is like if we have kids...for example...I plop on the couch and look tired and I have to hear how I just need to wait until kids then I'll know what being tired is really like! 
but this advice is not about forcing yourself to have sex even if you changed your mind.   this advice is about "yeah sure maybe I want to have sex with him" being a bad attitude here. it's irresponsible and it's *unsafe*. you should only do anything when there's no "maybe" in question there.  
Fantastic article! Quick PSA: link goes to page 3, but there's 3 pages total. [Link](http://www.politico.com/magazine/story/2014/07/glass-ceilings-glass-mirrors-108516.html#.U7nBxI1dU71) to beginning. 
While I agree with the argument from this blogger, I don't like her post at all. Does she really need to refer to the other blogger as a "bitch" and blame her for making her angry? I don't see why we need to use derogatory names for other women. I can not like another woman's opinion. I might want to debate &amp; argue with another woman. I don't need to label her as a "bitch," though. 
Before I went on the pill, I experienced symptoms very similar to this.  At a grocery store once the cramps became so severe I doubled over, became super weak and clammy and it felt like I was going to shit my pants and vomit. I lost my hearing and vision (temporarily). I just had to sit there on the floor until my sight returned and I wobbled out to the car.  Doctors were never able to find anything "wrong" with me and just determined my heavy cycle was causing extreme hormone fluctuations.  As soon as I started the pill, these symptoms stopped.  I'm assuming your body went through similar hormone changes, either caused by a miscarriage or just the fact that you are off the pill. I've heard that miscarriages are very painful. If you keep experiencing severe cramps like that however, you might want to see a gynecologist to get things checked out.  
[deleted]
[deleted]
No, the first amendment provides protection for your right to practice religion, this law just gave legal status to those who are unwilling to follow a federal law because of a religious law.  It's a bad law that allows a reinforcement of the idea of corporations as people.   And yes, it does flow into the class warfare/social justice issues.
Im so glad my upcoming wedding is child free.
Thank you, I think it was the right choice too.
There's actually not that much drama: I slept with Don, before he and Jo started dating, and she just found out and is freaking out. Dramaaaaa.   Otherwise, my life is very much drama free, thank you. :)
I already know I'm definitely not going to the wedding. Even if she decides at the last second to invite me anyway, I'm still not going to go. I'd like to give her the card and present because I do still care for her, and I'd like to try to end it on good terms. I hate having negativity around any sort of event like this. 
Yeah sounds like she's hella jealous and doesn't want you getting in on her "territory" with her fiancé.   Some people are weird. Forbidding their SOs from ever even speaking to their exes and she seems the type to have that mindset if she refuses to be your friend after finding out you and her fiancé hooked up once.   Even if it happened before they were together, you still had sex with her now fiancé and some people just can't handle their jealousy.   It really sucks that she's being that way but you can't really change her mindset on this. 
"No choice" but to write about it. Nope, she has no free will or personal agency.   She so desperately wanted to insult the first person that she HAD to write about it, even though the original poster clearly didn't want any more comments on it.
[deleted]
&gt;&gt; "Make a baby for him... Make a baby for him."   OH MY GOD.  WHAT.  That is incredibly creepy!!   
It sounds like you're already on the right track just by being there for your daughter. The best thing you can do is be there during her formative years. My father missed the first 6 years of my life and was a virtual stranger to me. Don't fight in front of the kids. Get a divorce if you're unhappy. Let your daughter make her own mistakes. Get your daughter's input on things. Be supportive. Allow her to make her own decisions instead of making decisions for her. That's the only other advice I can give. My parents constantly fought and stayed together "for the kids" when they should've gotten divorced. My father did everything wrong so I can't really give you tips on how to be a good father other than to be around and to support her dreams. Otherwise you can destroy the relationship forever. 
Because women won't stop complaining...
[deleted]
God, I hate all the advice you're getting about aging. Fact is, you can get your hormones checked all you want, get botox, get moisturizer, whatever - but nothing stops time. You will not look the same as you did at 20 ever again.   You can't stop aging. It's a myth: all these women telling you that you can turn back the clock are in total denial. Sure, you can look better, but you can't stay young. Is it really that these women believe they're going to find the fountain of eternal youth? Crack the code? No.
As am I.  When coworkers bring their babies to visit the office, I stay at my desk all cool-like and say, "Hi, Baby. How's it going?"  When puppies come to visit, it's "ohmygod puppypuppypuppy whatasweetbabyyouare pleaselickmyface" as I vault over the desk so I can lie in the floor and play with the puppy.  From other people's reactions, I assume that my response is the exact inverse of what roughly 85% of adult women experience.
The MRA movement really reminds me of the Tea Party Movement. I see the same pattern, where a grass roots group has a set of legit and reasonable concerns, but a larger political machine comes in an astroturfs them to be used as weapondry in their larger and established partisan battle. It can be very hard to separate the legit issues from the heavy handed hyperbolic bullshit that gets slathered on top.  I suggest brownies &gt;.&gt;
Yeah that's what I hope it is. I was stressed out of my mind last semester. I had normal flow for about a day or two somewhere in the middle, too.
This is what you said though:  &gt; This behaviour seems to be common in Turkey and seems to be a theme in countries with Islam rooted in it. I would'nt want to label all men of Islam but it seems to be acceptable to harrass women and especially white women are seen as objects.  My issue isn't with the fact that you find religion oppressive to women because that's your thing. My issue is that you were directly attacking Islam.  *This*  &gt;Generally, I think an underdeveloped society tend to mistreat women. And majority of countries who happens to be Muslims predominated (a Pakistan, Iran, Indo, ect) are still not fully developed as a society compared to the rest of the world. In places where living standards are highest and income discrepancies are lowest (Germany, Switzerland, Sweden, Norway), generally we will find great progress of gender equality.  EDIT: I should have said: You were directly attacking Islam and making it out to be the sole problem of women's oppression in other countries.
Just found out a few weeks ago my body is almost definitely never going to allow me to have a baby, even in the unlikely chance I magically change my mind.  Already, I've had the sweet moment where a particularly intrusive family member pulled the "you just wait, you'll change your mind and you'll realize you need a baby to be complete and really have success in life. You just need to grow up a bit first, then you'll see" (she's my age, and has been saying this for nearly a decade), and I got to respond "According to my doctor and my mangled uterus, I'll never be complete. So, if you'd please just drop it?"  I will never ever have to hear her condescending bullshit about how babies are the only way to happiness ever again. It's almost worth these pills that have me vomiting every few hours... almost.
Hey, I'll be your friend! My husband and I both really like kids but we don't want to start having them for a few years. We also love walks in the park!
I completely agree with wearing heels around the house to practice moving around in them! You really do have to hold yourself differently in heels. Without any practice or experience, your walk can get a little "clompy". Practice makes that all go away though. And who wouldn't want to feel fierce and in control while cleaning? :P  Also maybe start with smaller heels. A little kitten heel before the big guns.... Helps to work up to the heels that can double as a weapon, I think.
Don't let the narratives of other peoples' fantasy objectify the value of your own life.  
Me too. :(
Thank you xx
Please please please don't lump MRA's in with RedPillers. My wife wears the pants in our relationship and we are both very happy (hence I am not alpha in the slightest). Your standard  level-headed MRA is about as far away from Redpill as your standard level-headed Feminist is from Radfem. Neither movement should be judged by the (often more vocal) extremists in their camp.   To stay on topic a bit, I don't know much about how this stuff goes down in a nursing environment, but I have worked in childcare since I was 17 years old. I have been Teaching Assistant now for 7 years and I absolutely love the children (and the job). I guess childcare is sort of the same thing as nursing in this context, as both fields tend to be female dominated.  More men should get into childcare, especially primary aged schooling (here in England that is age 4 to 11 years old). If you are a guy and ever thought of taking the plunge, please do so! Don't get put off by people stereotyping you or assuming the worst. 
I absolutely agree with your first paragraph on what not to do as a father. I guess I would also add that I wish my father wasn't so emotionally distant.
You are NEVER wasting time asking a doctor questions, EVER. It's your body and you have every right to be well informed. Your therapist may also be a good person to talk with about this. Sorry I don't have any advice about specific birth control. I think different ones will affect different people differently. What makes someone else spin out of control may be just fine for you and vice versa.
When I was in boot camp, with 60+ girls, there were quite a few of us who didn't get our periods for the entire 13 weeks,  and for some that even continued when we went to our next training after that.   The bleeding now, do you think it's unusual for you?  As in, different appearance or different physical symptoms? You said, "having a decent amount of mucus has not been unusual" - do you mean right now, or for you in the past? 
Are you me? 
It's tempting, but I know that follow-up questions to that would be even worse!! Asking if I've considered adoption, will I need IVF? talking about god's will and how things happen when they're meant to, saying I need to just "relax" or go on a cruise with my SO, or take this vitamin or that supplement and then constant questions from then on about how the process is going. Nope. It's easier in the long run to just try to change the subject. 
So ignore them instead of spending an unhealthy amount of time obsessing over things they say. Very weird behaviour
My mom only has to know because I am going to put it on the insurance.  It is free, and she can't stop me from getting it, but it would be much worse for her to find out from looking at the insurance "charges."  My normal doctor is a pediatrician and the one time I tried to mention I was depressed, she told me I was just sad, and when I told her I had severe anxiety, she gave me a "worry stone."  I have every intention of starting fresh and going to planned parenthood for advice because I had a good experience there when I had a yeast infection and wanted to get it checked out.
I'm just glad she didn't keep the baby while she was bulimic. That's just asking for problems. 
I never think most babies are very cute, never have. Never wanted to hold them either. I have two girls, and I still don't want to bother with other people's babies. Of course I love mine but I'm not exactly wanting more of them. And I still think most babies aren't cute. Of course, their parents are entitled to their own opinions.  I've never understand why some parents constantly want to foist their babies into everyone's arms. No, I don't want to hold your baby. I have my own.  And I'll damn well tell you, too. Obviously I know who in my family loves babies and are ok with just having them handed to them, but I also know who doesn't want to be bothered. I'll herd my toddler away from someone who doesn't want to interact with her beyond an awkward smile. I always ask someone if they'd like to hold the baby and make it clear I won't be offended if not. And just because she's happy and mellow at the moment, I wouldn't be stupid enough to ask if the person wants one now. Just because I like to pet your cat and scratch your dog behind the ears doesn't mean I am prepared to or want to bother with a pet right now.  I guess the TL:DR is I might have babies but I'm not part of the baby worshipping cult.
Thank you so much for your advice.  I plan on asking the doctor about which is the right option, but I want to go in with kind of an idea of the different options because I want to be able to walk out with a prescription, or something to that effect.
&gt; The bouncers have decided that I'm supposed to deal with it  Sure, I agree that getting hit upon is part of the territory... getting _harrassed_ however, is not. I mean, _they're touching you without your consent_. There's a line, the customers crossed it, you _no longer feel safe_ and that is something that your management/bouncers need to address. If you are ready to walk away anyway from this job because your uncomfortable, why not escalate to mgmt and tell them it's their job to provide you with a safe working environment. Frankly, cracking down on this behavior will go a long way in making female customers feel welcome, and we all know, more women, more men. 
I think he wants this relationship to be over. :/  Can you talk to your mom about it? Do you have a close girlfriend? Talk to them and then end things with him.  Focus one something else (hobbies, work, walking in the park etc.) and try to find fun in something else than this man. 
:'( don't be sad!
Are you going to wear a sign around your neck every day that says "I'M WEARING A TIFFANY RING"? Because how else are people going to know unless you brag about it?
I am very sorry that you are going through this. I strongly recommend seeking counselling to deal with the aftermath of the abortion. It's a terrible thing to go through alone. I'm suggesting counselling/therapy because it has really helped me in the past. 
I haven't read much of the Redpill stuff, and I'm sure there are quite a few dumb assholes(sort of like how there are a few man-hating feminists) who frequent it... but all I saw from it was that women like confident guys...and if you haven't noticed in the real world that women do indeed like confident guys, well you haven't been paying attention.  
Thanks for the reply!
Buy your own freakin ring, if your friends also fall for such crap. Engagement rings....gawdelpusall. What a racket. Why should rhe guy pay anyway, are you helpless? You even have the right to vote, you know. 
My boyfriend said something similar the first few times we had sex. I think he meant it at the time; we had a lot of fun together! But we hadn't been dating for long, so of course he didn't actually *know* if he wanted to be together *forever* (nor do either of us today know really, or even if we'll be together in a few years-we haven't even been dating a year yet.) I think even if he didn't really mean it he meant it in the moment. So either way it was a good thing. Good luck and have fun! 
Aw thank you! &lt;3
If I say no, will you tear me a new asshole?
I pluck once or twice a day. Started with a hair or two on my chin, then one under my chin. Now it's the entire under-chin. :(
I ranted about this on Facebook the other day, as I'm a newly wed and cannot stand when people inquire as to when we plan to procreate. What I do with my reproductive organs are no ones business but mine. Thanks &amp; fuck off.
[deleted]
No itching or strange discharge! It hurts only when trying to seat... fully. If I move at a shallow angle, there's no pain.
Hmm. Unfortunately I can't speculate any more - I'm a doctor so I want to keep asking questions but they wont help you! You'll definitely want to get swabs for STI's and for thrush (in case it's just on the cervix), and a thorough exam 
 I don't think there's any reason to tell your boyfriend.    That said, it's very possible your roommate has perspective you do not re your boyfriend, and was trying to give you the heads up.  It might be worth raising with the roommate  -- it was a rude comment if the only reason he said it was the age gap.  But there could well be more behind it.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Haven't heard it yet. But I am very interested in hearing his interpretation.
That is how mine first told me he loved me and close to how he proposed.
Only if you want me to. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
This is exactly what I think about people that ONLY go for certain races(not preferences). When people go after someome solely because of race its exoti-fying and putting them on a pedestal based on preconceived notions of what they want them to be. This is exactly what I felt like was happening when I was "fetish-ized".
Conception, b/c the child is immediately viable. The child could be removed, but you could never kill it. 
Yeah, that never ends up happening! Usually, I fall asleep or get distracted.
How can you not visualize mens sizing? Its inches around the waist by inches down the inseam
I don't think that MY hard earned money should be spent on women who choose abortion as contraception.   These women have baby after baby because they know they can get more money from the government. Welfare is not a way of life. Go on it, get back on your feet, get off it. Don't make it an incentive to have more babies. Having said that, and as harsh as that sounds it is the truth, we do want to help the mother and child. But as i have said above, I do not want my hard earned money to pay for something  that i do not agree with in the first place, and for women who refuse to take responsibility for their actions.
Pro-choice as in the baby chooses to be aborted?  Why not call it pro-abortion so at least it is more real.
How is braiding your hair offensive? Are white women not allowed to enjoy their hair or something? To be honest, if something like this offends you you need to take a look at your viewpoints. It's braids. It's not like it's a rule of the universe that white women can't braid their hair, that's absurd. 
You're proving my point.  The label "pro-life" was never meant to be an accurate description.  It was simply meant to make those opposed to the idea sound "anti-life."  Of course they're only referring to human life.  But why?  If they're truly pro-*life* then shouldn't they at least care about other sentient beings?
Hmm. Well bon courage as they say and I'm glad you're alive. Also someone pointed out that the sub reddit I had meant to suggest was /r/raisedbynarcissists so sorry about that.
I think you have a good point here. 
This is the first I've heard of that? Why would a witness who blames themselves appear more credible to a jury?
[deleted]
You're absolutely right.  We should call it "pro-abortion" and "anti-abortion" because that's exactly what it is.  But people want to make the other side of the fence sound like they're terrible people, so of course they choose emotionally-charged wording like "pro-life" and "pro-choice" to make their opponents sound "anti-life" and "anti-choice."
just like Eraserhead 
It's not just 'non-western' countries where this is a problem. Mexico is also pretty bad. If you go to a non-touristy mexican city, men are very vocal and will stare. Not to stereotype, but I've also noticed spanish speaking men in my southwestern-US city are the same. 
You should consult your relevant country and state laws to determine when the mother has the right to an abortion. But don't assume that right exists -- amazingly it still does not in many progressive and advanced countries.  Also, you presumably concede there are significant differences of opinion on the matter, and many who believe that abortions are appropriate in many circumstances. So you're free not to have one, naturally.  
Yeah, I'd be pissed too. Don't blame yourself for not doing anything sooner. It sometimes takes a little while to really see a problem and early on it really could have just been that he was busy or having an off week. But by this point it's clear that that is not the case.   Good luck and I hope you feel better soon. 
Personally, I don't think that "pro-abortion" sounds like you think people should get them.  To me, it just sounds like you think they ought to be legal.  But I guess I can see how people might think that.  I still think that "pro-life" is a terrible label for what it's describing.
I think the only reasonable reaction to "pro-life" is "anti-religion."   If religion didn't have a bug up their ass about it, abortion would just be a standard medical procedure. It was religion that determined the right way for a woman to have sex (with the man she was sold off in marriage to, whenever he felt like it, with no choices of one's own).   When secular law finally said that women get to do things like refuse a marriage, or God forbid, get a divorce if she was unsatisfied with the man her family forced her to marry, then it was religious "morality" which determined that women outside of marriages should *never* have sex, because that made them awful people.   And when the technology came along to empower women to decide whether to protect themselves from pregnancy, it was religious morals which determined that this was, actually, really awful, and made you a bad person. They used this "moral" platform to make birth control illegal. And information about birth control illegal. And telling women that birth control was *even possible* was illegal.   And when the technology came along to correct the situation that Christian morals got us into, namely a surgical abortion, Christians decided to pretend that a fetus was a person, so they'd have an excuse to **keep fucking controlling women.**   It's not about morals, it's about whether women are people whose bodies belong to them. Anti-abortionists are just the latest in a long line of evil motherfuckers who try their hardest to punish women for having lives of their own. They're using women's own bodies, and their capacity for reproduction, against them in the sickest, most deceptive possible way.   And yet, you still see people "willing to respect their beliefs." As if their sick control streak was on an equal ethical ground with a modern, individual-centric view of women as full human beings with full autonomy over their own lives.   It's baffling, how unwilling people are in general to name the villain out loud. It's religion. It's always been religion. 
What if your contraception fails? 
I was about to mention that exact example...
you know what she means
Dinner and a movie?
Ah yes, then please by all means chase this issue. You're aiming your energy at the wrong issue. Less poverty = less unplanned pregnancies = less abortion. Bam
The justice system makes mistakes, not everyone sentenced to death is guilty.
In my personal experience... probably not.   I don't have naturally red hair, but I'm extremely fair colored. I'd dyed my hair red in the past for a couple of years, and everyone thought it was my natural color. Anyway, I once had my hair braided, and it looked weird because my pale scalp was glaring between all of the braids. Also, within a couple of days, the ends of my hair were frizzing out of the braids.   I mean, if you want to try it, you absolutely should. Just don't get your hopes up of it looking great and wearing it for very long.
The whole argument boils down to: Quality of Life vs Life at all Cost  
why would arming my energy at what you just said was teh root cause   &gt; Less poverty = less unplanned pregnancies = less abortion  be the wrong issue that is non-nonsensical.
Eh, puppies and babies are pretty similar.
Ugh, that's awful. I'm so sorry to hear that. "The right thing" is so, so, often the wrong thing.   An 18-year-old couple right out of high school *might actually be* mature enough by some miracle to make an informed decision to have a family, but the odds are emphatically against them.   This is where miserable marriages, divorces, and broken families come from. All involved are just lucky if substance abuse and violence didn't enter into the picture as well.   This is what I'm talking about when I say that religious-influenced ethics ruin lives. I've seen it happen, too, but with much unhappier endings (violence, alcoholism, years of misery, child abuse, poverty, foster homes, etc.) than yours.. 
It's crazy.  I suspect with the advent of better technology we are going to face a lot of conundrums as fetuses become viable at younger and younger ages.  But I really really hope people will at least be willing to make exceptions for rape or other horrible situations.  The fact that there are pro-lifers out there who would want a woman to carry her rapist's child makes me really sad.
I don't necessarily mean that their beliefs are worthy of respect, I just mean that I can respect the fact that they are not being hypocritical.  The fact that Sister Joan has extended her beliefs to the fullest extent is much better than pro-lifers who don't actually care about the kid once it's born.  I may not agree with her stance on abortion but I am glad that she has clearly thought this out all the way through.
your sheep are scared of you again?
Did you read the comment I responded to?  &gt;I think that should be more accepted, rather than abortion being the "last resort" or lesser option  It should be a lesser option than BC and sex ed. There should definitely be less stigma, but it isn't and shouldn't be a first choice, either.
&gt; I think you have a decent point there. If I were a single mother, with say 2 kids, on a low income, there's no realistic way I could possibly keep said 2 kids happy if I lack the resources to provide basic needs to my family.  Which probably explains why a lot of women who abort are actually mothers already. They're doing their best to provide a good life for the children they already HAVE and people want to take that away from them. 
From a religious standpoint, I don't think being pro-welfare is necessarily more moral than being anti-welfare. There is grace in giving to charity voluntarily, and this is what Jesus commands. There is no grace in forced charity, ie welfare. 
Is it a punishment for our bodies to act the way that evolution and God made them? Take God out of that sentence is you must, but for me this is at the crux of the argument.
The pro-life movement works to promote confusion because it let's them falsely increase their numbers. Many people don't think they'd ever choose to have an abortion themselves, and that's fine, so pro-life people like them to accept the label of pro-life as meaning, "morally against abortion," rather than "wanting to make abortion illegal."
Grad school
All of this is opinion.
Well I have an interesting standpoint here. I'm christian. I wasn't raised christian, its never been stuffed down my throat, but I'm pro-choice and against the dealth penalty. I believe that if a woman is pregnant, for whatever reason and she decides it is not a good time to bring the child into the world, for any reason, she should be aloud to terminate the pregnancy. This choice has nothing to do with what I would do as an individual, I personally would never abort, but instead with not feeling the need to force anyone else to make the same choices as me, with the knowledge that I'm far from perfect. Life is precious, I don't think we should end it if we have the choice, but death is also a part of life. I do believe however that there should be a period in the pregnancy when legally, you can't terminate. If you've been raped or had unprotected sex, you know it and you take a test and find out if you are or are not pregnant. A baby does not start out with fingers, or toes, or even a heartbeat, it starts as an embryo, two specialized cells combined through fertilization and if you don't want that baby, get rid of the embryo, not the baby.
I love mine and only have occasional spotting, but I was warned that every woman is different, and just because it works for me right now doesn't mean I won't create the hallway scene from the Shining tomorrow. I'm still a huge fan, though.
I lived and studied in a Benedictine-run college and then a different Benedictine run seminary. Joan Chittister is probably my least favorite Benedictine alive in the USA. Definitely on the fringe a bit. FYI  Apart from that, as a pro life woman, I agree with this statement. Thankfully my Benedictine alma mater also runs a shelter for pregnant women that helps them get on their feet so they can keep their child and get a job until they are able to support themselves. 
I'm with someone and we already plan to be married one day just not to-day. So I'm not deciding to fall in love. I already did that which is the important part. Getting married has nothing to do with it. People confuse being in love with being married all the time. 
Not my body not my choice? That's a ridiculous argument within itself. That's saying I should be able to do heroin, cocaine, and meth all at once with no consequences. That's saying it should be legal to commit suicide and we shouldn't try to stop those from that action because it's their body and their choice. On the topic of abortion I'm not arguing that a women shouldn't have the right to her body, but that right now comes into conflict with a living human being inside her, this is where the argument really lies. Does life truly begin a conception? I believe so and that's why I am Pro-Life. I believe that the babies right to life triumphs the woman, who consensually had sex fully knowing the possible outcome of her actions. Now I do understand that there can be exceptions, such as when the birth mothers health and or life can be in danger. Don't yell at me not my body not my choice and because I'm not a women I don't know what's going through their head. The fetuses right to life, in my mind, triumphs that of a women's right to her body.
That is HIGHLY disingenuous, but I'll bite.  Killing necessitates life and the issue of when "life" begins is still highly debatable. As such, the performing of an abortion IS NOT KILLING if there is no life.    This, obviously, is a matter of personal values at the moment - when you believe that a life has begun; the moment of conception, after the embedding of the foetus, when the heart begins to beat etc. etc. Interestingly thought, the governments of most countries have laws regarding that, which is why late-term abortions (I forget the month limit off the top of my head) are illegal.  SO if something not living, it cannot be killed - thus "protection".  And if your definition of "protection" only includes "not being "killed"", then your police must have it super easy. And what about "quality of life" issues for mothers and children? Are they not worthy? 
Exactly this. It would also help in the cases where the woman may want to terminate the pregnancy, but the man does not. No, women aren't incubators, but it's pretty shitty that men don't have a say in the life of their potential child until it is out of the womb. 
The embryo is alive before the abortion. After the abortion, it is no longer alive. If that's not "a kill", what is? They can detect the death of an embryo or fetus if the mother miscarries, too - a simple ultrasound will make it obvious. The living one has a heartbeat, if the mother is far enough along. The dead one no longer does. Once the embryonic heart begins beating, the line between life and death is a lot more clear.
Well, you are certainly entitled to your opinion, even though you say that I have no right to my own. Thank you for your interesting insight.
Science defines life. An embryo is alive. A fetus is alive. Did you know that it is not considered a fetus until 8 weeks - at which point it has a heart that is already circulating blood through its body, as well as limbs and a face and many internal organs, and that it is capable of basic movement? It is *alive*. It can't think yet, but comparing it to skin cancer or a teratoma is ignorant, surprisingly so for someone who keeps talking about science.
I don't have twoXchromosomes so some may say I don't have a right to comment, and you may be right. I am going to comment anyways and I'm sorry, I feel like I understanding the reasoning behind abortion. However let me say, I haven't had the easiest of life's and when I try to picture myself growing up/living in the worse case scenarios possible vs not having a chance to live; I would take the worse case scenario. Every breath, every emotion, every pain, is all far to precious to me; and when I think of taking that away from someone else it terrifies me, and I would not call that pro life.   Standard of living and living are two completely different things in my book, and one greatly outweighs the other, I can still breath and watch a sunset regardless of my life's living standards. I do understand the arguments though it's a fine line and I just happen to lean the other way.
The reasoning is that when nobody is around to care for a child is it in **great** risk of ending up with a miserable life and nobody wishes that for a child. The point about abortion then is that you terminate the pregnancy before you have a child. Edit: Inserted an "a" before child.
They do get long enough to notice the length, my husband teasingly points then out, and there are odd black ones. The prickling is what mainly annoys me most though.
[deleted]
Then my comment doesn't apply to you.   
I think better education of sex overall would be a much better way of preventing unwanted pregnancies, and even STI's. Sex is such a taboo topic (well in the US anyways) and I find that so ridiculous because sex is so natural. Our bodies are pumped with hormones that make us feel all sorts of ways and that should really be expressed towards our youth! How to control those urges and how to protect yourself.  But yes, birth control all the way!
Honestly, if it were me, it wouldn't be the fact you had been intimate with the person I was dating but that you had conspired to lie to me about it for so long.  Lying is death to any relationship, friendships included.  Once a person lies you can't trust anything they say AND it sends the message that you didn't think that person was worth the truth.  She's probably thinking you were hiding it because there was something more there or that you weren't as good of friends as she thought.  I think you should go to see her at the church with a card and maybe a gift certificate to a restaurant for her and fiancé.  **Apologize for lying.**    EDIT: I also just want to ask OP, what prompted you to suddenly think to tell her in the middle of stressful wedding planning?  You seemed fine not telling her for 8+ months but as the big day approaches you suddenly have a conscience?  And are apparently talking about your one time thing with Don with other people?  Are you sure you aren't having unresolved feelings about Don and him being with your friend?
[deleted]
You're interpreting "consequence" as "punishment" or "lesson" when really it just means consequence--the natural effect of certain causes.  If you engage penile-vaginal intercourse with informed consent (and that *informed* part is where a lot of the ethical grey area lies, for many), you are taking on the risk of causing a pregnancy. One of the *consequences* of your decision, in other words, might be the creation of another human being. Justifying an abortion by citing how difficult life would be for the mother and/or father if the baby is born is saying they should be able to avoid the consequence of their decision--right or wrong, that is the rationale frequently put forward.  If you consider the unborn embryo a life as worthy of protection as any post-birth infant, citing the difficulties that the parents might face is bullshit. If you don't think the unborn embryo is a life worth protecting, then allowing the parents to avoid the consequence of a baby isn't that big a deal. Either way they're avoiding the consequence.
I usually assume everyone is pro people not getting hurt in war
Were did i say that?  What i meant is:  Leading someone on and pulling back is not "fair",  but if he (or she) doesn't accept a no, that is not ok.
[deleted]
Your opinion is the one that I hold.   The BDSM community is by and large the strongest proponent of obtaining and respecting consent, and the entire reason they have safe-words is so that they know to stop, and stop immediately.   If the girl did not have a safe-word then they were all "doing it wrong" and were in a very dangerous situation. If she chose to not use her safe word then she basically tricked them.   Edit: But I do want to state that this is a special case due to the nature of BDSM and Scenes. In standard sexual interactions you should either know a sexual partner well enough to read their non-verbal cues or you should be cautious with a new partner and assume only verbal consent counts and the moment they start to become non-responsive you check if they are ok. 
&gt; shit happens.  I'm glad you feel that you can so blithely dismiss the suffering of rape victims because ~shit happens~. 
Have you considered a second opinion?  It sounds like there must be some kind of imbalance or irritation that is ongoing. This can be something like the bacteria levels being off all the way up to serious illness. Your doctor doesn't sound like she is giving you the level of care you need.
Why isn't "pro-abortion" a label? I'm that.
&gt; I don't want abortion to be illegal until law makers can write an exception for rape and complications that doesn't require overhead/paperwork.  I disagree, but have an upvote for having an actual coherent explanation. :)   Also, men are perfectly welcome here!
I have, but its difficult for me to get the courage to go because I feel so insecure about everything now and I am so inexperienced with how to go about to find a new doctor. I asked her to refer me to a gynecologist but she said that the wait list was very long and there's not really any need for it. I've been going often for other things as well and she makes me feel like I am a hypochondriac because "everything is always normal".
&gt; Miscarriages are spontaneous, involuntary terminations.  Yes and since you consider the foetus a human at point of conception surely you'll want to investigate the real reason behind each death?   Remembering oftentimes a miscarriage will pass in the early stages of pregnancy and present as a very heavy period.  Right?
Do you have a source? I can't find anything on it from any source at all.
As a former Catholic I challenge you to a duel!  Or if you're Catholic, a guilt-off.
[deleted]
Pro choice for me. People that should not be parents and would rather not be... Don't make them have a child who could not be cared for, loved and raised with parents who didn't want to be parents. It makes for messed up kids. 
Proudly European. And I'm happy to keep paying my taxes so that if I ever lose my job or become disabled, my child's food, housing, healthcare, and education are provided for.   And should that situation arise neither I nor my fellow countrymen will ever have to go begging for charity for these basic necessities while trying to get back on our feet.
You can lead a horse to water, you can't make him drink.   Stay thirsty, my friend.
[deleted]
I only date white guys because I can't picture myself with anyone else.
?
Poor OP, carrying a *Discharge Diary* around with her.  (Joking aside, excellent advice, I would think)
And pregnancy and childbirth still carry a lot of risks. Are you really expecting to be able to force a woman into accepting those risks for a child she doesn't want?
[deleted]
A semantics argument.  That'll show 'em!
&gt; … I'm curious as to why there isn't a similar controversy with animal euthanasia.  Because non-human animals are not persons.  &gt;My opinion is that life is defined by the presence of a sentient mind --  Sentience is a purely conscious experience. Sleeping people, the temporarily unconscious, the comatose, and the very young (e.g. children aged &lt;3 years) all lack consciousness, and thus cannot experience sentience. They're all living organisms, however.  &gt; … the actual physical encoding of one's personality and memories in the mechanisms of the brain.  Saying these things are "physically encoded" into the "mechanisms of the brain" is very vague. What do you mean, and why is this important for your argument?
&gt;If you leave sperm alone, it has absolutely zero potential to turn into a human. It's not a stage of human life, it has zero potential to grow into human life on its own. A fetus does.  A fetus also fails to grow into a human life on its own, it needs to live inside someone for quite a while before it can do that. Even ignoring that, this is why I originally only talked about ova. A fertilised ovum *can* grow into a human, it is absolutely a stage of human development.  &gt;If you personally disagree with whether or not it's considered human life, that's your personal opinion.  I intentionally never argued with this, my argument assumes that a fetus is a human life.  &gt;humans are humans no matter what stage of life they're at  It can't be that simple though. No one is going to argue that an ovum should have the incontrovertible right to live of a human, and even if they did they would still almost certainly accept that it would be worse to abort a fetus, or kill an individual after birth. That means that there must be some scale involved that considers the life's potential and autonomy. To set the markers on this scale where they're set by pro-choice people implies a massive respect for the sanctity of life.  That's honestly something of a noble position in my opinion (while potentially misguided in practice). However, you can't apply it willy-nilly to whatever you like. If that's someone's position to be consistent they must be strongly against war, the death penalty, euthanasia and as I said before be huge proponents of social welfare including strong universal healthcare. Now, I'd be delighted about (all but one of) those things, but sadly it seems rare that people have this consistency.  &gt;I think taking away human life should be illegal. That doesn't mean anything else. That doesn't require anything else. That doesn't imply anything else.  Sure, but what you define as "human life" means a lot. If you define a fetus as a human life that means something beyond that they have certain rights.
But a foetus is not a child or any type of living creature. In truth you believe that too or you'd be demanding a murder investigation be opened for every miscarriage.
&gt;She had the choice not have sex or unprotected sex if you will.  Your argument that a woman should be forced against her will to suffer 9 months of pregnancy as punishment for her actions when the man does not suffer any similar physical consequences for his actions is incredibly sexist. Furthermore, do you think she should be forced to carry the child to term if she did *not* choose to have sex?  &gt;I believe that if you want to support something you need to fully understand d the gravity of the actions that movement is causing.  You mean fewer women being treated like baby factories or suffering horrific deaths resulting from back alley abortions? I'm proud of all the good legal abortion does society. A doctor's graphic description of the removal of an *unwanted* fetus that had amounted to little more than a parasite to the woman doesn't make me any less approving.
Then why was it so ridiculously hard for my cousin to adopt
You started off by saying that you really wanted the answer, which lead me to believe that you wanted to listen in good faith. Apparently I was mistaken.   You're not actually listening to anything I'm saying. You're taking my words and using them to fit your own argument. You've decided that an adult being 'happy' to be alive means that abortion should be illegal, even though the two have absolutely nothing to do with the other. A fetus cannot be compared to an adult human. By the way, are you out there protesting against IVF clinics? Because they work with embryos, you know, and most of them don't survive the procedure. More lives wasted in your books. But those are people who *want* babies, so what to do?  See, what you're doing here is going down the path that's similar to the Godwin's Law argument that's frequently brought up in regards to abortion. One side says "Well, wouldn't you want to stop Hitler from being born?" and the other side says "Well, wouldn't you want a Nobel Peace Prize winner to be born??' Both sides are talking about eventualities that aren't relevant to the argument at hand.   Sure, the fetus could be happy when it grows up. Or it could be a serial killer. Or it could be horribly depressed and suicidal. Or it could be an abusive person. Etc, etc. All these eventualities don't change the simple fact that a woman has the right to bodily autonomy and has the right to decide if she's too poor or unready to raise a child. It's that simple. Boiling all of that down to 'well it might be a happy adult' is far too simplistic. It's why I hate it when pro-lifers get their kid to march up and down with a sign saying that they're happy they weren't aborted - it's a cheap, emotional argument.
Not really. If both parents can drop down to working 4 days a week, then the child would be in childcare for 3 working days a week. I think that sort of level is good for them- learning to share, interaction with other children, meeting different caring adults. If the couple is lucky it could be a family member anyway. (At the moment in the UK where I live there is flexibility for women to go part time but not men, this contributes towards making having a baby a career killer, along with female only maternity leave which thankfully is about to change.)  You can make it less expensive by making the training accessible so there are lots of childcare options, making employers (of both parents) contribute, with tax breaks for childcare businesses and childminders. Parents shouldn't pay tax on childcare which allows them to work and pay tax.  I thoroughly agree with lolmonger that we could make having a child in your 20's a lot more accessible. There is also the issue that if you wait until you are financially secure, your biological clock is running out. 
It's shameful to me because I've been with so few people and that was years and years ago. It makes me feel so childish and stupid because everyone around me is out having a good time and here I am too scared to pursue relationships because of this problem. I am so inexperienced and surrounded by people constantly reminding me how great sex is and to me, I just feel dumb being a 25 year old loser.
No one should have the power to choose what other people do with their bodies. Also, religion should have no say in laws. Basic human rights and laws should cover what is needed, the rest can go.
Thanks. I will get it checked out, money is just tight and my cat needs to go to the vet first. 
Do you also believe that having rights as an Afro-American should INCLUDE having the right to be pro-slavery? Technically, yes, that's called freedom of speech. But you can hardly expect other Afro-Americans to sympathize with such beliefs.
[deleted]
[deleted]
thank you.  All of the people trying to make the gov obey their version of morality and thus all the rest of us (on either side) need to fuck right off.  Everyone can argue the morality or appropriateness of abortion all they want. If the pro-birth win the argument in public opinion, abortions will be rare. If the pro-choice voices win public opinion, guess what... they will still be rare... but less people will be in prison for them.
As /u/atheist_jew said, im not using consequence here to mean punishment or lesson. How about i change the term. Kids are a result of sex. I believe, you should be ready to deal with the results of sex if you are having it.   That said, i heavily believe in preventative measures such as open and honest sex positive education, birth control availabikity, and other resources.   I wish that adoption was less expensive, and i wish parents who try invitro would consider adoption first.   Now im genuinely curious since youre pro choice and use your own mother as an example, would you rather your mother aborted her children? Im not trying to be offensive here, but im genuinely curious if you would have preferred no life over the one you have.   Edit: also, i never said i would vote to make abortion illegal, just that if i were in the situation, i wouldnt do it. I explained why im not anti-choice as the user above commented. I understand that how i view life and abortion is not shared by all and i cannot impose my ideas on others. 
I completely understand your position, and I don't disagree with it because I think the experiences are equal... I disagree because pegging them to each other is the only way to guarantee women aren't competing in the workplace with one hand figuratively tied behind their back. If both parents take the same amount of parental leave, then a significant reason for difference in career path between the genders is eliminated.
I live in the uk so obviously i see a different way to others but its possible to be 'pro life' here.  it starts with the nhs. If you don't want a baby then go and pick up some FREE contraception, there's no excuse. If you do fall pregnant you will get FREE checkups and if all is fine and then suck it up because youre having a baby. Laws are in place so you won't loose youre job. Tax credits and benefits (if you don't work) are there so your child can be fed and clothed. Free education for all children. The taxes will even pay for appropriate housing (per room needed, the rules are a little complicated but it works).   just because i am 'pro life' (i don't like that phrase) does not mean i am against women or neglect to think of the child's future, i just live in a country where an unplanned pregnancy doesn't mean you NEED to get rid of your baby.   i know Il get downvotes but no one can deny i have a point here. No one wants the stigma that comes with claiming benefits (welfare) but its there for a reason. Its there to help every life here and no matter what your views are a baby is a life.
Love this well thought out answer. 
Good for you. Fuck what everyone else thinks. That's what I say. And I'm a man. Big and strong.
There is nothing easy about the decision to terminate.
And this is why the problem is bigger than it should be. Not only does the problem exist... But whenever an MRA raises these sorts of issues we get them marginalised or silenced.  These are government statistics, they are very real. Go ahead and google how many male DV shelters there are in England compared to female DV shelters, this is is also very real.  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=u3PgH86OyEM
[deleted]
I have rather mixed feelings about what category I fall into here. I am personally pro-life now. By personally I mean that I cannot will myself to have an abortion or think of it - even though I have complicated and dangerous pregnancies. Back before I had my second child I would have stated I was pro-choice. Abortion was something that I may one day face because of my first pregnancy where I delivered a micro-preemie (25 weeks gestation). My second pregnancy went the same way - however my little one didn't survive due to complications from being premature. After that I had an internal struggle about this because I had learned someone in my life had used abortion as a form of birth control. Waiting until the final weeks where abortion was still available before having it. She had multiple abortions and then became unable to have a child. Because of this, she began infertility treatment and eventually did have children she kept. All this while I was struggling to even attempt to have another child and had to do infertility treatment myself. After a long time, I finally managed to get pregnant with the help of my doctors and go full term.  Now skip ahead to my life now. I just had to make a choice for myself - one that my doctors were even unsure about. I became unexpectedly pregnant with my 4th child and was not financially, emotionally or physically ready. I spoke with doctors about the risks of both abortion and going through the pregnancy. My doctors stated the risks - both were about the same to be honest. My husband begged me to terminate the pregnancy due to my previous ones (He has watched me nearly die due to pregnancy complications). I couldn't go through with a termination and realized abortion would mentally undo me worse than the alternative - giving the child up for adoption. It's been quite a few months since delivery and I don't regret my decision on it - even when I almost died yet again.  Do I think everyone should keep a pregnancy? No - because there are situations like mine that happen. While I couldn't live with myself if I had an abortion, perhaps another person couldn't live with giving up the child. But at the same time, I don't believe that abortion should be a form of birth control - Not just because of the idea that they're constantly getting pregnant only to terminate it... But because it has serious risks and consequences involved to the people who use it as such. Sadly, not everyone realizes those long term risks because they weren't informed.  Overall, I really wish that abortion wasn't viewed like a dirty little secret. Perhaps if more people were informed and educated about it, there wouldn't as much of an issue with people talking about the pros and cons of abortion with their doctors. Even when I spoke to my doctor about the risks of termination (knowing I had a medical reason behind such), I felt very uncomfortable about it - and that should never be the case.
Pro-choice of course! Why would we tell people what to do? Freedom, baby!
[deleted]
Sex is natural - the complete or near complete bifurcation of sex from reproduction, and the huge shift from sex being a commitment to a small number of partners and the millennia peesent norm of formalizing that through marrying young found in so many human cultures, to being a true recreational activity for a certain span of age with all its emotional and physical baggage, to being one of reproduction again that our bodies often can't handle when we're too old (buy sometimes have no choice in career wise), *etc etc etc*   All of that lies in modernity alone, and I don't think it's all for the better.  
pro-abortion
By bringing back good old fashion exorcism yep all sorts of progressive ... 
[deleted]
I get what she is saying but the whole looks fade thing is so fatalist AND is part of the reason why people get so wrapped up in trying all they can to stay looking the same way the looked at 25. 
Quick question - you said you went to the gyn in November and everything "was normal apart from 30+ day periods". This in itself isn't normal - did you tell the gyn about it at the time, and what did they say about it?
[deleted]
I don't think stable marriages are really a realistic goal at this point.  While it's admirable, the fact is that people are living longer and women have more independence than they once did.  Those are good things, but it does make family dynamics more complex, and often it will result in divorce.  I think a better goal to set is helping *every* family, even if they're not of the traditional nuclear variety.
[deleted]
It's both. There are women who use abortion as a contraceptive, and there are women who have babies so they can get more welfare money.   I do not object to my money going to welfare, I object my money going to people on welfare that make it a way of living. Welfare is not a long term solution. It was never meant to be. 
Then you read it wrong. I never said I refuse to support the mother and child. All I said was that when women use abortion as a contraceptive, I don't want to pay for it.  Really, I don't want my money to pay for ANY abortion. Welfare is not a way of life. It was never meant as a long term solution. Get on it, get on your feet, get off it. Use the benefits. But when you use welfare as way to fund your life in the long term, then no, I don't agree to that.  
[deleted]
Hey dude, congrats on the addition to your RES tag:  &gt;Yes, SOME women die. SO THE FUCK WHAT.  And now released back into the wild for easy identification later.
No *federal* tax dollars funding abortions. No tax dollars to feed or home anyone. It's the only way to protect the rights of everyone involved.   You'll never stop people who don't want kids for getting pregnant. You'll never stop abortions from happening.    Life is hard. People suffer every day. Bad choices should make it worse. If we remove the negative reinforcement for bad choices, it's tougher.    If you chose to live in a county that wants to fund abortions and give free housing to those unable *and* those unwilling to work, feel free.    The problem with welfare and Planned Parenthood is that the people who want it to exist can't make it happen without forcing someone who doesn't to pay for it.   And forcing others to pay for your moral standards is wrong. 
Abortion before 16 weeks is one thing, but each week thereafter becomes quite gruesome. What type of person would abort a viable pregnancy of 22 weeks? Before hearing from all those naive women who have not had an abortion after 20 weeks, let's hear from those that have.
Your employer provided health insurance is part of your global compensation package.  You are earning it the same way you earn your wages.  By refusing to pay for something which should be covered in your health insurance, your employer is stating that you will use your compensation package how they choose.  I would not allow my employer to dictate my supermarket.  I would not allow my employer to limit my alcohol intake out of work.  I would not allow my employer to tell me if I can buy cigarettes.  Why should my employer be able to dictate how my health insurance is spent?
What makes it difficult is that it is not just her body, there are two bodies.
I thoughts it was after the first trimester. I mean I don't think it should be legal or socially acceptable after it's kicking and moving. If it can come out crying I don't think it should be done. Before then is fine. Just my 2 cents.
&gt;Here's the thing--we do this in nearly every aspect of the law.  The key difference is that I am vaguely aware of those risks. I can chose not to walk the streets, not get surgery, etc. Fetus doesn't have that option. We would 100% rally against someone dragging another individual from their home and walking them into a busy street, thus forcing that risk upon them.     &gt;trump the rights of the mother?  That is a strawman. It isn't "trumping" they are sequentiall applied. The idea is that women that consent to have sex elect to suspend their right to bodily autonomy assuming they get pregnant. Men take a different risk when they have sex, but you aren't arguing men should get to terminate the fetus, right? See how that works?     &gt;But don't push your beliefs, which aren't substantiated by science, on me.    I'm sorry to say, this isn't how the world works. If you want to enjoy the benefits and comforts of a societal living arrangement, then we (as in all its members) get a voice in what we generally find acceptable or not. We don't permit theft, rape, murder, arson, etc and the idea that I would withold the fetus-murder belief is completely illogical. Can you honestly imagine if the ruling party in history had told women "don't push your belief that you can vote on me" or any other such nonsense? Of course not. 
"Sorry... but I don't WANT everything that I hold. I can't financially afford that type of extravagance." :D
I had an abortion 3 days ago and could not be more relieved or happy. It wasn't even a question – I'm 20, and my boyfriend and I, while we love each other, are in college and in no position to be parents. I was sick for 6 weeks straight until I went through with the procedure. Abortion saved my life (and my boyfriend's, essentially). 
This was very informative and I think it will help anyone who has questions about the procedure :)
This is clearly directed at homeless men wanting money and when not getting it acting out. She really doesn't realize what it means to be in that spot? Many of them have mental issues. There's a reason that they are on the street. This isn't street harassers, it's homeless begging for money. Yeah I get called shit to if I don't give them money. These people need help that they are not receiving. Poverty sucks. Maybe she should try helping them through the church or something instead of hating them for being in the hellish situation that they're in.
I am pro-life.   Basically it all boils down to this: I believe that a fetus has a soul, and that it has every right to live.   I understand that some pregnancies are traumatic, that sometimes a parent doesn't have the ability to take care of the baby, or the resources. But ultimately the baby is still a baby who is filled with potential.   I think the main issue here is that I think life begins at conception. Aborting a fetus is the same as killing a toddler to me. It doesn't matter whether the toddler's dad raped me or if I cannot take care of him/her, killing a toddler is murder therefore killing a fetus is murder.   And honestly I think that a child who is alive but in distress is better than one who has no opportunities to live at all.
Much of the comments in this thread are very disturbing. I don't know if you have had an abortion, have had a good friend get one or even spent time at a planned parenthood. Abortions are very emotional, some women need a lot of support just to get into the room. I'm pro choice because the option should be there. I feel pro-abortion just treats it like a statistic that we should raise no matter the health of the women involved. 
For me, ideally, each welfare recipient or family would be assessed personally by some sort of case worker rather than just an automated filling out forms type situation, but I realistically acknowledge that that's not financially practical.
This is what pisses me off the most about "pro-life" people. They care so persistent on what a woman SHOULD do with her body. They never take into account the situation she is in. Most of the time a woman would want to abort if she is too young, not financially stable or could have health issues while pregnant or when the baby is born. Once the baby is born they do not care that the mother is potentially a 15 year-old living in a bad neighborhood. And then they judge her by saying why she had a baby at such a young age...
I actually think both are accurate. From the pro life standpoint the opposition thinks killing babies is okay. From the pro choice standpoint the opposition thinks that women not always being in control of their own body is okay. That is why there will never be a happy conclusion.
[deleted]
&gt; I agree, it can be a serious act with serious consequences, but it often isn't. If you take the appropriate preventative measures, sex can be light and fun and have minimal consequence.  Pro-life people like myself however think that a retroactive abortion isn't justified, though.    I don't have a problem with light, fun, casual sex.  I don't want to punish people for having sex.  I *don't* want developing humans to be extinguished because their burgeoning lives are inconvenient to adults who chose to have recreational sex.  I don't think that cuts mustard on killing a developing life.  &gt;We should not encourage abortion as birth control, but I also don't think "don't have sex until you are ready for babies" is going to work.   But it does work; not with 100% efficacy, but it can work - - that it's difficult is no reason not to instill more responsibility.  Different cultures (and our *own* culture throughout time in the US) have had this kind of responsibility ingrained in them - - we've just lost a lot of it in modern times.  I'd rather see a lessened social stigma and greater social support for unplanned pregnancies (*and* planned ones!) than I would abortion.   
I ... had a labia fold pimple once.  It can happen to the best of us.
"Generous"? Not hardly. "Nothing about abortion"? Nothing except the entire ordeal of the bitter water from the Sotah of the Talmud, which I've already linked to a direct translation of.   Every translation you've posted reinforces my point handily, so thank you for that, as well.
Yeah my dad will be 60 when my sister graduates highschool and I'm 10 years older than her. My parents both invested in medical careers. It can be done. Not saying it's not difficult, but it's doable. Lots of sacrifice.
Thanks for sharing this. I've also had negative experiences with Christian fundamentalism and I'm sure many people in this subreddit (and elsewhere) echo your sentiments.   And I'm not here to argue against you. Your opinions and experiences have value and validity, and this subreddit seems like it's been a generally positive place for people to share their experiences and find advice and healing.   This is the first time I've commented in this sub, and I hope to avoid conflict. I happened to see a comment that pained me so I wanted to express my sympathy, then I saw someone acting out in irrationality (at least from my perspective) so I felt the need to comment again.   Please don't let any difference in our beliefs cause unnecessary divisions between us or anyone else. We've all been hurt (to admittedly different extents) and I've found that being open with one another is one of the best ways to experience reconciliation or healing.   Thank you for your honesty and your welcoming attitude.   EDIT: I also appreciate what you added to my original comment. I mentioned that people I know are genuine and likeable, so I appreciate you pointing out that it's possible to be likeable and still cause a lot of harm. That's definitely worth reflecting on, because it's certainly true. Thank you again, and please continue adding to conversations like this one. 
Her statement is woefully ignorant of many things. First, that the government is the best distributor of said funds. History has shown us that when the government is placed in charge of distribution of funds for the needy, the needy grow in number while the problem the government is charged with alleviating continues to get worse.  Secondly, she ignores all of those programs (one of which I am deeply involved with) which teach basic life skills to teens who have become pregnant, provide free after-care for them and their children and do what we can to make certain they make wise choices in their future. These programs do exist, but are steam-rolled by government agencies which fund programs like Planned Parenthood.  Thirdly she seems to believe that as a people, we can never be expected to rise above our most base impulses - which seem to also include total irresponsibility for one's actions.   The government is not our parents, people. It never was and was never supposed to be... at least in the United States. The U.S. Government was a design which was to allow people to reach their potential whether such was seen as large or small. When government get into the business of micro-management of the populous, tyranny always follows; there is no other recourse for a soulless machine. Control and order are paramount, but such typically is not how humanity operates.  The solution to this problem of "unwanted" children rests with all of us, our compassion and charity. People are much better at being "parents" than is any government. When we as a people can rationalize away life, death is the only alternative. Shouldn't this experience of life be more than that for everyone?    
Exes generally just mean trouble. I'd stay away.   It also sounds like you're missing something in your current relationship and you're looking elsewhere for it.
&gt; aren't in the the correct position to successfully raise a child?  I don't think the solution to that problem is killing the unborn child.  I think it means society has a clear cut responsibility to help them, and to educate and provide guidance for its children so the situation isn't repeated.  
&gt;Also, the child is not recognized as a living human until after the first four months. (In line with the current medical standing, I believe?)  That may be true legally, but it is not true scientifically.  It is a living human when it is a zygote, because the zygote is the first stage in the development of an organism.  There are many stages of development of an organism until it reaches adulthood.
[deleted]
but American take on the subject is (a) very important and influential concerning 300+ million people (b) perfectly demonstrates the hypocrisy of many so called "pro-lifers".
[deleted]
I think it's an incredibly narrow-minded position on their part.
She was totally understanding, and she understands what is going on in my personal life as well, but I still felt embarrassed at the time. Thanks for sharing.
I think it would be really helpful to have them be the same length, because a) fair is fair and b) it's hard to predict how affected the mother might be by childbirth. She might have a lengthy recovery, complications, etc. and the father may well need to pull the sled for a while until they get that sorted out. It's not just about "well, you are physically capable of standing on your feet for 8 hours, so back to work for you!" But also about managing the household, feeding schedule, making sure everyone's getting enough sleep, etc.
TIL Lazy at work is worst than lazy at parent. 
If you think that all babies and pregnancies are wanted, sure, I can see how that would surprise and sadden you. But a lot of them aren't, and a lot of women don't have the relationship with their fetuses that you're projecting onto them.
This is going to feel good to get out:  Initially, I wanted to state that my childhood has been the hardest time of my life.  I suffered years of physical, sexual and emotional abuse while living in poverty with my mother's then-boyfriend.  However, I realized after some reflection that my life was sooooo much harder once everything came out and I started to stand up for my own rights as a human being.   Sure, things were hard growing up.  My parents split when I was about 5 or 6 due to my father developing full blown paranoid schizophrenia.  My mother thought he was careless, looney and on psychoactive drugs.  Even after she started to collect social security from him due to his inability to have a job for a serious mental illness, she still bad-mouthed him all the time.  How horrible he was as a father and how hard life has been for her raising his 3 children.  She lived off of our SS/child support payments, never had a job, and just complained about everything ALL. THE. TIME.  I later came to resent her default pity-party behavior as it prevented her from seeing that her children also had emotional needs.  As a young child, I believed that she had a shit deal of life.  I felt so sorry for her all the time with her sulking and depression that I ceased to properly care for my own needs.  I guess that is why I kept the sexual abuse quiet for so long (5 years)--I thought it would destroy her.  He physically assaulted us too but her a lot.  I couldn't bear to see him pummel her face with his fists.  I would fantasize about discovering gold somewhere and lifting her out of poverty, making her happy and proud.  I catered to her constantly, drew her baths, woke her up (or tried to) in the morning, made her coffee, took care of my siblings and got everyone ready and off to school.    School was something else.  School was the most bittersweet of places.  The pros?: Structure, safety, food, excelling in academics and the ability to be around "normal" kids.  The cons?: Feeling like an outlier, not understanding middle class references, knowing that all my clothes smelled like cigarettes and pot, not being able to participate in extracurricular activities, explaining to teachers why I cannot attend the field trips, getting constantly picked on from all groups of kids, hiding in the bathroom stalls to cry, and that sinking feeling of when the bell rings--I wanted to hurry off home, and not--at the same time.  Skip to age 12.  By then I have already attempted suicide, contemplated waaaayyy to much about murdering my rapist in his sleep, had to sell my christmas presents at a yard sale to help make ends meet---etc, etc.  But no, that wasn't as bad as age 12.  I came out.  I spent an entire school day in the counselors office telling her everything.  It took at least 3 hours.  I just wanted to go back to class.  I was told to stay in the office.  I felt punished. Then police officers came to the office.  Three men in dark uniforms with badges.  It was hard at first to speak to them.  I was so embarrassed to have to repeat it all.  Details.  Shame. I felt dizzy, knowing the ramifications of telling the truth.  What would my mother think?  Where would we live?  Hours later still, and lots of tears later I was finally able to be escorted to Social Services where I was placed in a small "make-shift" cozy room with a two way mirror hiding a camera.  I felt patronized by how nice everyone was being to me.  I was told to repeat my story.  Again.  It's weird because every time I had to talk about my life it got harder and harder.  My emotions broke through--the ones that were bottled up for so many years.  After all of those dark years fantasizing about having a normal family and a normal life, I thought maybe everything would get better after this.  He would go away.  We could be live in peace, not in constant fear of his rampages.    Then I finally got to see my mother.    I was led to another room where my mother stood, looking like a zombie.  I ran up to her and wrapped my arms around her waist and cried as I hugged her.  She stood still.  She didn't hug be back.  She didn't even lift her arms.  I cried more and let go.  She wouldn't speak to me.    That year was the most difficult without a doubt.  She moped around in a depressive state.  Would only talk to adults who were willing to help her bail out her boyfriend.  I felt betrayed.  Then two weeks after coming out, she called for me from the bathroom.  I was excited!  She wanted to talk to me!  Maybe she realized that all of this has been sooooo hard on me too and she wanted to ask me how I was holding up.     Nope.  She asked me to go to the counselor's office in the morning and report my initial statement as false.  She spent an hour trying to convince me of ways that I could "sell" my new story--where I got ideas from, what movies I watched etc etc.  She also told me that I was sexually molested at the age of 4 and that I should pretend to remember the incident as a way to fool the system.  She justified this situation as the only way we could "get him professional help".  It took a LOT of convincing on her part, but I eventually caved because I just wanted to make her happy.  My whole life.    So, I went back and said it all was a lie.  The counselor didn't believe me.  She drilled me on who was pushing me to recant.  As a good mommy soldier, I didn't budge.  It was a hard process.  Keeping this lie "straight" in accordance to what my mother wanted me to say.  All the while, feeling more and more shame.  I had one friend in school.  She was the first person I told about the abuse weeks prior.  She somehow found out that I recanted and ceased speaking to me.    I'd go home.  My mother wouldn't speak to me.  I'd go to school.  My only friend was no longer my friend.  Rinse, repeat.    Weeks went on.  My mother constantly dragged me to other doctors' offices for vaginal checkups so she could find an angle that would get her boyfriend out of jail.  I was reaching a breaking point.  I would cry in the waiting room.  She wouldn't even look at me.  I don't know what she told those (male) doctors but there were very very rude to me.  (I want to also add that the first vaginal exam I had after reporting my abuse [DA's exam] was from a male doctor but he was very kind, gentle and nonthreatening.)    Weeks went on again.  It was hard answering the phone and hearing his voice connect through a collect call.  My mom would push me out of the way to accept his calls and spend long expensive calls talking to him, crying about how hard this is for her.  One afternoon after school I came home and saw a half written letter on the kitchen table.  My mom was nowhere in sight so I read it.  It was from her to him--she was consoling him (CONSOLING HIM!) in the letter, telling him that children are selfish, blah blah.      He somehow got out of jail on bail I guess (don't ask me how) and the night he returned home (illegally) she made steaks for dinner for only him and her to share.  I had to sleep on the front porch that night.  They had loud sex.    I could go on and on about the overt and subtle "punishments" I received thereafter.  But instead I'll skip ahead to the part where we were homeless and hiding out in his van living wherever the law couldn't find us.  Worst summer. Ever.  For a few weeks we all slept in a spare room at his aunt's house.  He would secretly tell me to crawl into his side of the bed at night.  He was trying to play my mother into thinking that I was his seducer.  It was horrible.    We moved out of state with another relative.  He became a fugitive by fleeing with us.  Another relative found out and invited me and my sister to live with them, in yet another state.    I thought that was it.  I was free.  I missed my mother and worried about her everyday but I finally had a chance to live in a "normal" middle class home with an uncle, his wife, two kids and dogs in a two-story home!  Things were great for months, until my mom came to live with us--bringing her "woe is me" gloom into the air.  Bringing her cold shoulders and trail of mail that followed from a certain jailhouse.  I guess he was locked back up.  Good.    As months went on, things just got weird.  My uncle's wife was a closet alcoholic, would get in raging fights with my uncle, picked on the kids and was a special sort of psychotic.  I guess my middle class dreams were shattered by the special kind of dysfunction that occurred behind the scenes of that utopian Christian life.  We had to move out.  On to another state, with another aunt and uncle.  And their chaos.    By that time, my mother had given up.  She didn't even apply for free lunches for me so I went hungry at school.  Sometimes she would give me a roll of pennies.  So I would get in the food line, just so I could get to the cashier to exchange it for quarters and waltz over to the vending machine for a honey bun.  Then, I would go home and see the $300 phone bill she would rack up with his collect calls.  Dark times.  TO BE CONTINUED         
When I got my first non-retail/food service job, I just called it my grown-up job. 
I really don't know why I want an elaborate proposal especially when I really want a simple wedding. I guess I just want lots of people to see it happening because I am really excited about being proposed too.
&gt;There appear to be very few modern MRAs who are anywhere other than Reddit or internet blogs.  Could that be because they are villainized horribly, and therefore unwilling to out themselves in public? Could these people be hiding anywhere in your life, quietly believing that men deserve to be protected as well, but not saying so for fear of reprisal?
How's your diet? When my wife drink chocolate booze she smells and tastes like chocolate! Look into your diet, it could also be long term exposure to the oils in the theater air. If not, see a gyno.
Agreed!
I used to be vehemently pro-birth, as it were. I thought it was so terrible to be killing babies before giving them a chance to live. Finally, someone I respect and love a lot mentioned that she would rather have babies go straight to heaven without suffering than to have them live a life where they're practically doomed from the start. That was when I realized what it truly means to be pro-life. I feel that until we can have the proper systems in place to PROPERLY care for all children, including those with disabilities, abortions must be available. 
And you can cycle the wrong way down one way roads, you don't have to put lights on, you can ride without a helmet and best of all you don't have to pay for anything.
An individual certainly can spend more on charitable giving than they do on taxes. So it certainly is possible for an individual to be libertarian, and pro-life, but not be a hypocrite. 
Masturbating is a wide spectrum. If you haven't, you may also try playing with a toy, specifically one that is smaller then your SO but larger then a tampon. You want something that you'll need to stretch a little for. See if you have similar discomfort.  I agree with the other comment that additional lubricant may help. I prefer water based personally.  You should check yourself out. Next time you have pain or discomfort get a mirror and take a look.  If things don't improve definitely check in with your doctor. 
I think we'll have to agree to disagree there - it looks to me that most of those translations are describing a physical effect, not an abortion - an idea backed up by the fact that they translate verse 29 to mean "will continue to be fertile" not to refer to her already being pregnant.  As for your "direct translation" - all very well, but (1) it's ambiguous and (2) given that I don't speak one single word of Hebrew and you either don't or at least haven't offered a detailed commentary on it, going to it is of limited use in this discussion.  I'ms till waiting to hear about this overwhelming academic concensus you mentioned that the passage is promoting abortion. 
Just checking -- plastic applicators?
By accepting I can't change my genetics. I can gain or lose all the weight I want, but I'll still have hips. I hate my chin but I can use makeup to draw attention to my lips or eyes. For every negative I can find, I try to find a positive and focus on that. 
Definitely.
You said, "I've been really wanting to find a way to strike up conversations with my exes" and "suddenly I find myself looking them up on Facebook and thinking "wow, it would be really cool if I ran in to him so we could chat"" ... and I think those are bad ideas. 
Meh, honesty is better than lies, which seems to also be the OPs preference. I would think that meal planning is good advice for those with eating disorders as it takes the moment-to-moment decision making out of it which can be the source of the problem.
[deleted]
She told me she wanted to, but wouldn't because of her "faith" practices.  Doesn't really matter if she did or not.  I only cared about her intentions.....
Still not your problem to resolve. 
Oh my god, that's terrible. Maybe try calling some on tour own and telling them you have abnormal discharge with some blood and that your gp is giving you a hard time with a referral.   I also wouldn't use that doctor anymore.   Edit: Not in America; I may be overreacting. 
Yeah, this seems like a terrible analogy in almost every way actually. It's not very well thought through.
[deleted]
So maybe increased mental health awareness and insurance coverage of mental health problems and reduce stigma towards metal health problems would be great for all people in all walks of life.  Meanwhile, I like Canada's system, where all people that give birth get a few weeks off for preparation or recovery (I think 12 weeks) and all new parents get time off for bonding and care (I think something like 35 weeks split any way between the two parents). Note that these are not gendered rules and that medical need versus parental need are separate (which works well for adoptive parents and birth mothers).
You're my spirit animal.   Brilliant comment, and seconded. 
There is a degree of that happening, but at the same time… When online communities have had the same discussions again and again and have come to a general consensus on what they support, having someone come in and rekindle debate starts to get eyes rolling. In those communities, they've heard every point already and even if it's that new person's first time discussing the topic and they want to have that discussion, it feels unproductive to the larger community.  I'm reminded of this great "Not All Men" [comic](http://www.listen-tome.com/save-me/) everyone's already seen. No, it's not a carte blanche for misandry, I think it effectively shows how it derails further topics of discussion and debate to have people keep chewing over ideas that a community has taken as self-evident and foundational.
I've had a yeast infection *and* bacterial vaginosis at the same time, so I recommend waiting for a doctor! Good luck!
Thank you for your reply. It always helps to hear that there are others who have felt the same way, that I am not some freak for hating my appearance.  Like you said, hotness isn't important on the grand scheme. I actually just went through my computer to find some pictures of me. And I didn't even hate them. They were all old but they gave me perspective. At least I know how I CAN look now.  Did you find that being with your SO changed your view on yourself at all? My boyfriend is unbelievably complementary but since I got together with him, any semblance of self esteem I had sort of died off. This was almost a year ago.  Also, you sound really pretty. Most importantly, confident. I take great comfort in the fact that you are a redhead. I'm a redhead with pale eyes too, and I always have felt 'different' and ugly for it. I recently made the mistake of dying my hair to try to blend in, and then topped it off with a very bad bob hair cut (thick, wiry hair is not meant for bobs).... and now I look worse than ever. But I'm trying to comfort myself because I know that my hair will grow back the way it's supposed to.  Thank you again. I'm sorry that this comment is so disjointed and maybe not very direct. I think that a lot of stuff has been going on with me and I'm taking it out on myself via how I feel about my appearance. Now you've given me a lot to think about.  Thanks again. I just might take you up on the offer to critique, as one redhead to another. But we'll see. 
Completely untrue. Are you an MRA? MRM believes in equality of the sexes. 
Do the reading.  DO THE READING.  (I might be a professor.)
there is 'gal', although I can agree it's not used that often :) 
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=G6i-7Jg_4Dk  My husband says this when he sets up the baby gate correctly or troubleshoots home networking problems. And he IS a big boy! SO BIG!
I call it Pro-Fetus. But so much this!
[deleted]
She couldn't have an abortion anymore. She would have the right to get the fetus out of her body, but she couldn't destroy the fetus.  
yea this is incredibly common, as is "put on your big boy pants"
Sometimes there's just not enough upvotes. Thanks for sharing this.   I'm a fifty something guy and I have been through 2 surgical abortions with different SO's at very different points in my life. They were absolutely necessary and I regret neither.  
&gt; And it sucks that that's what we have to resort to in order to feel non threatened.   Did you try telling him that his behavior was making you feel uncomfortable?...  Edit: Is this really an unreasonable opinion? Can someone explain what is unreasonable about it so I can learn what I did wrong instead?
&gt;I mean, there are tons of things that I believe SHOULD happen that I don't think people should be legally forced to do.  Okay, but the nun is specifically talking about people who think that women should be legally forced to have children they didn't intend and can't support. If you don't think that women should be legally forced into carrying pregnancy to term, then this isn't about you.
Godwin's Law is in effect apparently.
Condoms? Day after pills are much more expensive not to mention the health side effects and the fact they don't work on women weighing over 170lbs and they don't protect against stds. Just some food for thought. Day after pill is not a long term or sustainable solution. But it does have its place in emergencies.
Well I encourage you to go and sort /r/feminism by "top" and see what you get. It's not nearly as vitriolic as what you see on /r/mensrights. 
Speaking from experience, I myself had this problem when I first started to use tampons, but I swear now by plastic applicators (especially tampax pearl). Also, when I first started to use them I always thought I could feel them, but it turned out to be more psychological than anything or I didn't push the applicator far up enough. You might also want to try using tampons where you use your finger as the applicator, it may help with a more controlled placement (I had a friend who used the O.B brand). Hope this helps! 
[deleted]
Drop one.  I bet the harassment will stop.
[deleted]
The quote is specifically about the hypocrisy of trying to force people to have babies but not being willing to use the same force to ensure those babies are adequately cared for. Saying that you disagree with the second part but not addressing the first is entirely missing the point.
[That nun is, like many politicians, part of the "I'm personally against but.." group of people who politically support abortion while saying otherwise.](http://www.lifesitenews.com/news/dissident-nun-sister-joan-chittister-the-lifesitenews-interview) 
Sister C did it in six brief sentences. I tip my hat to her, and observe for the many dozenth time: if you want to find everything that is *right* with the Catholic faith, look to the nuns.
Oh yeah absolutely. Sometimes it just doesn't happen. My SO is EXTREMELY giving, and pretty fucking god-like in the sack, but sometimes it still doesn't happen. That's just my body. He always apologises when it doesn't and seems to take it hard, and I just get so frustrated.. it's certainly not his fault. He puts tonnes of effort in and if I could bottle and sell his skills, I'd be a very rich woman.. it's not his fault that my body goes 'Lol nah..' from time to time :P  I hate that he seems to think he's let me down when it's far from the truth :/   Oh, and I have encountered guys who think that I can have multiple orgasms. I cannot. They get upset about this because a woman having multiple orgasms turns them on like in all the porn, and they seem to think I am purposely not doing it just to ruin their enjoyment. Or, they talk as if I am defective just because my body can't do what a porn stars does. No I just.. literally cannot do it. Can you cum like a porn star guy?! Thought not! Heh.
I love giving head, but yeah, I've always disliked the taste, so I just swallow to get it out of the way. People taste differently, ranging from a very bad, bleachy taste, to neutral salty. Although, my current boyfriend is the only guy I've ever experienced to have a neutral to slightly pleasant taste! I will lick it off him (or myself!). ;) (Though still mostly because it's sexy, not because it's delicious by any means).
&gt; It is not "all of them".  From the perspective of a queer atheist: it seems like "all of them" sometimes because the conservative Christians are the ones who speak up, who drag their faith into every conversation. I can't really identify the liberal Christians except online because their beliefs don't get thrown in my face (a positive thing), but they also, in my experience, tend not to contradict prejudiced or otherwise questionable statements by their conservative counterparts.  I think in part this is an issue of public dialogue being dragged to the right in the US - it's permissible to express right-wing beliefs but not always left-wing ones in conversation. So I can't pin that much blame on progressive Christians, but this situation means that I don't always see, hear, or otherwise notice you all.
I really appreciate your response, and I agree with you on many points.  Something I want to clarify; you said that you aren't against choice, but that the choice here also involves the 'choice' (assuming all conscious beings try their best to ensure their survival) of the fetus. If it were up to you to write the laws, would women have the right to seek abortions? I just want to be sure I'm on the same page as you are, because I've read from many redditors in this thread on both sides of the fence that regardless of their personal convictions regarding the morality of abortion, they still feel abortion shouldn't be made illegal or unavailable.   Not to say there aren't many logistical, financial and other barriers to women seeking abortions in the US, but according to the laws currently on the books, there isn't a single state that makes it illegal to have an abortion before the fetus develops to the point of viability. The [wiki](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Abortion_in_the_United_States) on the actual figures and reported reasons for abortions are really interesting. If the pro-life movement is afraid of what may happen if abortion were fully legalized, I think the evidence is already there that there's little to fear because the rates of abortion are on a downward trend with the current legal status.  Being able to see both sides is indeed a special power… I'm actually really amazed by how many people have replied to me in this thread who are willing to see and acknowledge both sides of this complex topic.  The thing I most take away from this thread is how much the vocal, radical minorities on both sides have left very little room for more moderate voices to be heard and do more harm to the discourse than anything they could gain from it.  Again, thank you for your reply!
An interesting article about aggression directed toward cyclists: https://medium.com/p/9316abbd5735
Why can't he take the leave?  
A lot of great advice here, but a quick bit of bio for context!  It is entirely natural to be a little icked out by genitalia. Guys are often grossed out by vaginas at first! It is no weirder than being grossed out by any other sweaty and smelly part of the body.  But the brain is wondrous! The brain, upon getting sexually aroused, actively represses feelings of disgust and nausea and other such things. You just have to get past that initial hump, and your body chemistry should do the rest (at least for the icky factor).  In other words, you are totally normal for feeling that way, and you can totally get over it with practice and patience and enthusiasm!
That's one of the points of this analogy that a lot of people are missing.  Some women don't experience any threatening behavior throughout their life and some do.  Just like some cyclists don't encounter any aggressive drivers and some do.  I ride my bike several miles daily and encounter assholes on a weekly basis.  Don't dismiss others' experiences because you claim they "don't cycle particularly often."
&gt; This. My mental struggle exactly. I think a lot of guys who have had mostly casual sex and not as much 'relationship sex' get used to the idea that they don't have to care. They're used to a fuck buddy or whatever and don't take the time to get to know the other person sexually.  Or they just don't know when their partner has orgasmed or not. You can't go more than a day or two without seeing a post or comment here about women that say they've faked it, or lied about orgasming. In a lot of those threads you end up seeing comments from other women saying it's caused problems because their partner thinks women are supposed to orgasm every time.   Women don't orgasm every time, some men don't orgasm every time. Everyone is different and has different signs. It's a lot easier to tell when a guy orgasms because you have a clearly visible reminder. He can't get to know you sexually if he doesn't know what the difference is between you orgasming and not orgasming looks like. If it bothers you that you didn't orgasm this time, or enough times _let your partner know_. No one is a mind reader.   As for this specific situation yes it was probably foolish of him to think he could get you off and him off especially with your time deadline. He should have accepted the fact that their would be more fun stuff later that day/night. And if he didn't accept that there are probably more mature ways he could have handle it.   You can't keep holding the fact that you only had 2 orgasms over his head. You didn't communicate the issue with him. He had no idea and once he did he's working to fix it. You both need to work on communicating how you feel and what you want in the relationship. If you want it to be tit for tat, or will be upset that he wants things to be tit for tat when he goes down on you either communicate why that's a problem for you, or break up because you have different views on sexual intimacy in a relationship  
I don't know anyone else who did all this, but most of my friends were burn outs and drop outs...  Buy your books as early as you can (but also second hand if you can!) and read as much of them as you can before term starts. Whether that's one book per course, or doing all the readings for a course and none for the others, or just the ones that seem interesting, whatever. What you have just done is bought yourself time. When you get your syllabuses (NEVER LOSE THEM) tic off the readings you have already done. Decide how much you need to reread or review it when the week comes. You will be so happy when you have enough time to finish two papers because you already did those two weeks worth of English readings. Getting ahead and staying ahead means that if something happens and you fall behind, you are still on track.  Hit the ground running. Don't spend the first two weeks procrastinating because 'term just started'. Treat the beginning of term like exactly what it is - 12 weeks til finals.  Keep your syllabuses. Know them. Get a calendar, mark all your major assignments. Check it often. Note when you will have over crowded weeks. Note when you have fairly empty weeks, you'll want to use them trying to keep ahead. Memorize the most important dates of the term. If you totally learn your schedule and the timelines for each of your courses, you will never be caught off guard by an assignment or evaluation you forgot about.  Learn to procrastinate by doing work. Really dreading studying biology? Read English or Sociology readings. Dreading writing your English essay? Do your math homework. Most people will always procrastinate to some extent, doing it this way means you don't really screw it up too badly, and getting something easier or more interesting done can get you in the mood to do the harder thing.  Do not assume the people around you are balancing their choices with good grades. Most of my friends skipped class, skipped writing the occasional essay, and in general were satisfied with mediocre grades. Most failed out of university. Do not judge yourself against other students, judge yourself according to your own expectations and goals. Are your grades high enough to maintain your scholarships, get into the program you want, keep your loans, etc? That's what matters, not whether everyone writing the math exam is also going to the party.  I screwed up my first couple years of my bachelor degree. I got serious, did the above, and graduated with a 91% average in my major. I had a 33% average at the end of my first term. University or college is a big change but it is not that hard to do well! Good luck!  Edit: NEVER SKIP CLASS. EVER. NOT ONCE. Unless you are a senior student, know the prof well, know the material well, have an evaluation structure that would allow it (no participating grades, quizzes, etc.), and feel completely confident that you could successfully challenge the course. Then, you can skip class. Otherwise don't do it.
I started on 2x about 3 weeks before it went default. Those 3 weeks were almost always filled with considerate people who didn't down vote you to hell for offering a different opinion as long as you kept the convos going and given deeper insight. Since default I've noticed a sharp incline of 0 responses with a hell of a lot of down votes. Things have even gotten heated and someone tried to get me banned for being against their point of view. They deleted their username and I got a slap on the wrist over being bluntly critical and a little name cally after they got mean. Group got bigger, problems are going to happen. If it rebounded to non-default it would calm back down I'm sure. 
Childcare does not mean someone else is raising the child, it means the parents can work for 8-9 hours a day while the child is cared for, socializes with peers and participates in group activities. They go home to their parents the other 16 hours, the parents that are there everyday for the next 18 years of their life.    
Not to mention circumstantial abortions. IE. Rape, non-consensual conception etc. What about the mental stability of the bearer of the child. It`s rare to hear pro-lifers  talk about what`s best for the mother and her life.  no one LIKES abortion, but it`s a very grey issue! There is no right answer. I honestly don`t even know why we bother re-hashing it and arguing about it at ever turn. Does anyone really believe we`ll ever have an answer and law that pleases everyone on this matter.
[deleted]
Soon to be female or soon to be college student?
Wait... that gold was you, wasn't it? Aww, thank you so much!
I don't think you'll enable her to be "sick" or "relapse" as much as she might construct relationship expectations that  ask a lot of you, and you might not notice until its the structure of your interactions. without overworrying, you seem to know to look for signs. trust your gut.
[deleted]
Feminism is for equality. It aims to work towards equality by addressing patriarchal issues that face women. Feminism has never said "we are trying to solve every problem in the world." It said "we're trying to solve problems for women." That's still for equality. Working to solve one part of a large problem still means you're trying to solve "the problem" and doesn't mean you're anti-every other method that people use to try to solve the overall problem.
The pressure has always been on the man to make the woman come or she will tell all her friends he's bad in bed, who wants that?  If a man comes quickly, it's his fault. If a woman takes a long time/doesn't come, it's the mans fault. If a man can't come, it's the mans fault.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Ouch. Walked into that lol.
[deleted]
I don't think I could answer that accurately myself. I lived about 30 minutes away from my college so I usually was able to make a trip home before the final move out. It will depend, I think, entirely on your room storage. If you can't fit everything in your room, then obviously you have too much stuff. If that's the case you can decided right then what to send home. All college dorms are a bit different and some people bring additional storage units. Some people I know even bunked their beds so that they'd had more floor space. So again it depends on the layout of your room. My college dorm included a closet for each and two two-drawer dressers so I didn't really need any more boxes for stuff. 
Was anything else weird about it? Were your genitals touched and did the doctor make any remarks? If the angle wasn't correct I can see them asking you to try a different position. If that was the only thing that seemed odd I don't think anything was that off.   I'm not sure how you should cover up in that situation anyway.   I know I've been asked to move or go into different positions to get the angle right for the doc. 
Well quite obviously not being stupid with your personal information is the first suggestion. No selfies, no sexting, nothing of that sort. Not only it gets you in trouble with an irresponsible ex-boyfriend (or ex-girlfriend I'm not sure how women act about it) but it is easy pickings for any semi-skilled hacker or for anyone really if the phone/stuff is stolen or lost. Not to mention that this is really one of the most primitive and disgusting practices humans engage in. And that comes from someone who's an attested pervert. So keep private stuff off your smartphone or tablet or even your personal computer. Stash it somewhere on your disk where most people won't find it, re-name it, archive it. Treat it like your porn history on a browser.  Secondly once you take some racy pictures or movies always make sure to have a copy yourself and include content which identifies location or the person doing the shoot. It doesn't mean watermarking but shoot pictures in your room so that you can prove the location. Or mention names in a clip which you get a copy of in its entirety so you can prove the original if it gets edited for the web.  This is important for claiming violation of copyright although you need to talk to a lawyer - different countries and states have different rules when it comes to details. In some places having you in a picture is enough for you to issue cease and desist order for content not covered under a release form. You're in a picture and you haven't released it you only need to contact the website or ISP provider and threaten legal action (but talk to a lawyer about it too). In other places it is easier to claim stolen content as in "somebody took my laptop, passwords for internet banking and *those* pictures" which gets police involved quicker. For the same reasons it's really risky to send stuff to people because putting an image in a message or email might be sometimes construed as permission to use it and if you really want to always include a note like "it's for your eyes only" or "don't show it to anyone else". Essentially it's helpful if you can point to stuff which asserts your ownership of the content and makes it clear that *it's you* because sometimes people who put this stuff online will claim that it's somebody else or it's random picture on the internet or will crop it, blur it whatever.... Also remember that it's helpful (and legally binding under certain circumstances ) to officially demand that all such content be destroyed once you break up. He doesn't have to comply but adding yet another charge to the list is a good idea once it's gone ugly.  Thirdly - keep deterrents. If your boyfriend wants to take sexy pictures of you demand sexy pictures of himself. And I mean something which has a potential to embarrass him in a similar fashion. If you show him your boobs, take a picture of him under the shower. Most men are absolutely crazy about the size of their dicks so un-cropped pictures are like an ICBM for most. It will not only keep him careful for practical reasons but will also simply teach him the experience. Women are too often being objectified and men (and women) are used to it. Just think about what idiotic fads we have - selfies with duck faces, gonewild etc. Being photographed in a delicate situation will occupy his mind more than once and will make him more sensitive to the issue. So even if he's angry with you he'll remember what he felt like and it might - surprisingly - make him think twice. He'll call you a bitch in public but will not publish anything. So not only deterrence but education. Alternatively ask him for poetry, love letters stuff like that. Not only it's fun and romantic but can sometimes be more embarrassing for a manly man than naked picture.  Four - think about potential consequences before you decide on a break-up. Break-ups can be like divorce - if you are not cautious naturally prepare yourself. If your boyfriend has bad habits make sure to find out if and where he keeps this stuff and find ways to get rid of it if you feel unsecure about the content. This is tricky spy stuff but it's something that can save a lot of trouble. It's not about private stuff but also passwords, acces codes, history etc. All the stuff that can put someone back on your track. Some people put stuff on revenge porn sites, some become stalkers and read your email and some generally like to cause trouble.  Find good excuses, fake a computer crash or a virus whatever.  Five - never, ever under any circumstances talk about advice regarding points 1-4 online unless you teach yourself to be anonymous both on- and off-line (meaning someone needs to look something up on your computer aaaaaaaaand an accident happens). If you ever have an issue approach someone who you might trust in person.  Six - you can always hire Russians. They're cheap and scary.
I had hyperemesis too (as I just posted elsewhere), and it has made me MUCH more concerned about the importance of abortion rights. Even when you want a baby, hyperemesis is really horrible to deal with, and it's hard not to resent the fetus that's making you so freaking sick for months on end. It's just unthinkable to me that we could force anyone to go through that when she doesn't really want a baby right now. It's torture, literally.
Most places, actually. It is mainly banned in cities, which is a good idea.
It really is the case.  So much factors into the kind of orgasm we have and it doesn't matter if you are doing exactly the same things you did that other time she had a huge one.  If we have a ton on our mind that day, if we are feeling less than attractive that day, etc.  Really, stop worrying about it so much.  You need to take her word for it.  If she really isn't telling the truth it is her problem, not yours.
I don't think it's unfair for OP to tell the sister her side and then let the sister decide what she wants to do.  I won't be _surprised_ if the sister decides she'd rather have a better relationship with Jo, but it's still her choice and the more information she has to make it, the better. Jo should be adult enough to respect that. And OP should be adult enough to respect whatever decision the sister makes afterwards.
My ex couldn't understand this. I was on various anti-depressants while dating her, and those of course make it very hard to orgasm sometimes. If I couldn't come, she'd start to guilt me, asking if it was *her* fault, calling herself ugly and useless and such to try to make me feel bad. This is one thing I made clear with my boyfriend from the start, that while I enjoy orgasms and I'd like to have them, sometimes I really don't need it.
&gt; is she really on the pill?  That's gonna be mighty controversial with privacy rights. It would have to be an option for the end user.
&gt;My husband likes to spend time with his parents (we currently live with them  This is probably like 50% of your problems right here. I bet if my wife and I lived with her mom, we'd be fighting every day too.
Only if that means they are not meeting financial obligations. 
It would depend on the ex and the level of honesty.   Like I said, we are honest and open. 
And now there are two comment threads!
Can you explain how I'm discrediting you? I fully realize there's a pressure to perform that many men may feel and I even touch on why I think that pressure exists, maybe how some or a lot of it is self inflicted due to things like an unbalanced view of sex to begin with or even from a selfish origin (looking for an ego boost because that's what a "man" does--make them b****es moan."  Sexual literature shows most women don't get reliable orgasms from sex. If most been feel pressure to perform... what is the performance about exactly? I think there's too many assumptions on all ends. Like I said I think most people are raised on perspectives on sex that are fundamentally imbalanced. If in porn the women reach ecstasy in two thrusts and a slap on the ass, when reality doesn't measure up, a portion will think there must be something wrong with them, a portion will think attribute it to the guy, and everything in between. It depends on that person.   It's not ok for women to expect their male partner to do all "the work"---BUT how do those same women define good sex then? How do YOU define good sex? How do YOU define "all the work."? We have to define all that.
[deleted]
You completely just ignored the analogy he made...
&gt;Encountering someone who believes that fetuses are human life makes you sick to your stomach?  I am staunchly pro-choice and will be the first to tell you that a fetus is a human life. However, being a human doesn't make one a person, and being a person is what matters when it comes to abortion rights.   &gt;You can't fathom hearing the opinion that all human life deserves basic human rights?  Of course I can fathom hearing it because I hear that shit all the time. I can't fathom how someone could believe that a fetus is a person just like the woman carrying it.   &gt;Believe it or not, some people advocate pro life for reasons other than wanting to strip women of their rights.  I don't put much stock in *why* a person wants to strip me of my right to do what I please with my own body: all I need to know is that they *do*. 
Well, she's a grown up.  This is a decision for her, not you.  I had a friendship that ended because well - - - - she was set on having another child and she wasn't a particularly good mother to the first 4, 2 of which didn't talk to her any more.   That isn't the type of person I need in my life.  She needs counseling, and YOU are not her counselor.  
[deleted]
Well I was going to ask where the source was on those numbers because they seemed arbitrarily picked and I'm not sure it would even be possible to get those statistics. I just responded assuming that they were true stats, it's most likely bs though. I would certainly hope neither side is 10% crazy extremists.
Because it's nice to see another lady who is a traditional housewife (or seems like one) and nice to meet another lady who dislikes feminism. I don't really care much about her radical views that are slightly offensive because they're in the minority and I agree with some of them. In my household the husband is the leader, not that I am stepped on or anything but I give him the large benefit of the doubt. I give my input and he highly values it and he makes the final decision
Try the Billing's Method, you don't take anything at all.
Twist it when you put it in, and use the smaller ones for teens just starting.
So, are you saying that you only read to there and stopped? Because that's what it sounds like you're saying...
[deleted]
You just do it. It's brief. You may feel light headed after, so just lay on the table for 10-15 minutes before going home. My doctor told me to take 600mg of ibuprofen and hour before the appointment; also we scheduled it for the beginning of my period (when the cervix naturally opens up a bit).
